##### CLUSTER 0 #####
Hi I am moving a US entity from Reviso to Xero - has anyone done this and have any suggestion of a quick method?
Hi all, I currently work on implementation of Xero for our Company.
Hi Everyone,Not only do I use Xero for my business but I also use it for my personal finances.
Hi there, I began using xero in August of 2016.
Hi Xero Users,Issue:I have purchased purchased 3 items from XYZ ltd. ItemsBat  1  30 30Helmet 2  20  40Ball 3  10  30Total  100Paid shipping to DEF ltd 30and custom to XYZ ltd. 30Total  160Please keep in mind there are 3 different contacts; inventory item can be entered once and no MJ can be passed within contacts.
Hi, I'm in a bit of a pickle cleaning up this Xero system for a client of mine.
Hi, I am currently registering fixed assets in Xero.
hi guys,I'm fairly new in using xero.
Hi,I'm am new to Xero so please forgive any ignorance as I'm an engineer not an accountant.
Hi,I started using Xero for my coffee-bar here in Paris.
Hi,My client has a financial year end of 31st March, they started on xero from 1st April onwards.
HI all,I am in the process of taking over my fathers business and started inputting data into Xero yesterday (start of the fiscal year).
Hi,Anyone knows how to enter non inventoried purchases in Xero.
Hi,I have a scenario in one of my application which will be integrated with Xero.
Hi Everyone,Anyone experience loss of data on Xero?
Hi everyoneI have a new client who is converting from MYOB to Xero.
Hi all,Is there any possibility in Xero to generate only outstanding AR/AP positions.
Hi, I am trying to set up my first Xero file and in the past in Quickbooks I used tax codes such as CAG, FRE, etc to categorize the nature of the expense.
Hi,when starting with Xero, I was advised to reflect inventory in my retail business with the following manual journals:DR Opening stock CR StockFollowing a year of trading, another stock count was performed at the end of the year, giving a new figure the value of inventory in the business at that point.
Hi Folks,I have an issue here regarding how Xero is calculating my VAT returns.
HiHas anyone successfully imported debtors from MYOB Retail Manager into Xero?
Hi thereOur bookkeepers are in the process of setting up our business in Xero.
Hi,Can anyone familiar with the UK flat rate VAT scheme in Xero please advise.
Hi There,I have started to build an e-commerce website on Bigcommerce and have heard that I can link it to Xero.
Hi I am currently looking for a couple of primary schools in the uk that use xero.
Hi, Im looking to setup some weekly and monthly payments so they are automatically added to xero rather than me keep adding them manually, is this possible.
Hi, How do I enter utilitiy bills into xero?
Hi Xero,Any news on your progress with Phishing within your program.
Hi, I am looking for software that can be integrated with Xero that will allow me to manage recurring work.
Hi There,I'm using Xero from Safari(various versions) on a Mac(10.
Hi,Can someone please share how to set up this on Xero.
Hi there,This is both a Xero and an accounting question:My US business is based on the  and my year end is Dec 31st.
Hi Could we please have a button to logout of the RealMe IRD site, so we can file multiple Gst returns with different user names in the IRD site, or if we swap companies in xero it logs out the of the IRD site.
Hi - Xero is a great tool but for invoicing needs some work.
Hi,it would be really useful if there was a column in My XERO with financial year end for each company.
HI,A great time saver for people who have multiple companies in Xero under their log in.
Hi,This is quite a simple one (hopefully I haven't missed it in Xero).
Hi all, can anyone tell me if the new payroll for xero has the ability to mass upload and or import employees?
Hi all,First time Xero user and having some difficulties understanding exactly how the GST module works.
Hi, I'm new here, and looking for a bit of advice from any experienced Xero users.
Hi, There is any facility to feed bill automatically at supplier end to our Xero pack
Hi,We have two companies in our Xero platform.
Hi Everyone,Started working on Xero.
Hi,I have a credit card that I use for purchases for 2 businesses that I run on Xero.
Hi all,I'm in the process of setting up Xero for an E-commerce business.
Hi,  Can Xero be used to run every aspect of a  small business' financial operations?
Hi Xero,In view of the fact that you are increasing the monthly subscriptions, can I ask that you look at previous requests from over 2 years ago, please?
Hi,I am currently in a position where a previous bookkeeper who set up my Xero did so in their business name.
Hi,Apologies as this is probably a very simple questions, but I am new to Xero.
Hi,Is it possible to move or import data form one Xero subscription to another?
Hi,We start use Xero in our company a short time ago.
Hi everyone,I can't log-in to the Xero app on my iPhone anymore.
Hi All,We have taken on a client who is now a little weary about Xero.
Hi there,I'm a week into using Xero so apologies if this is answered else where.
Hi all,I am closing out my 2015 Fiscal year on Xero for a small S-Corp.
Hi, I have increasing more clients using Afterpay and was wondering if Xero can consider a potential automated feed implementation (similar to Eway)?
Hi am new to xero but i gather than unlike sage poas  overpayments or prepayments wont show in a customers ledger is that correct ?
Hi,Our company recently started using tracked inventory on Xero.
Hi EveryoneI am going to set up Xero file for one of the client in Ireland.
Hi allI am attempting to import some credit notes via the csv import that xero offers.
Hi - im new to xero, i went to do my recons and i see theirs no Particulars or code fields in the concon cash code list!
Hi allI currently have a contractor working remotely on my Xero bookeeping.
Hi,Is there anyone using Xero in Brazil?
Hi all,Our company is using Xero, our accountants use Sage.
We'll be attending and exhibiting at various conferences around the country – we'd love to meet you and tell you more about Xero, so if you're going to any of these, please come say hi!
Hi, could someone please explain the point of the credit card feed in Xero.
Hi,I am looking for some guidance on integrating Xero with Capsule CRM.
Hi good Xero folk,In preparation for the EOFY processing of payroll I have a query for which I cannot find an answer.
Hi, I am fairly new to Xero and having trouble finding whereabouts I can set up the superannuation Due Dates - in the auto super area to be monthly.
Hi,There is a new feature in Xero payroll which allows delete notes not only your own but also notes written by someone else.
Hi,I am very new to Xero, so sorry if this is a simple fix.
Hi, Could you please explain the different methods within Xero to calculated Leave Accrual?
Hi guys,I'm new here in Xero, and my boss asked me to reduce the wage of the employee through journal.
Hi - I am having major payroll issues  - Xero is telling me I owe taxes in one state, while I have a credit balance.
Hi, I have auto enrolment set up on Xero with Nest pension scheme.
Hi is anyone else having an issue with Xero's lack of a response?
Hi,I have a client who is considering transferring from Sage to Xero.
Hi allCan someone tell me if this is a Xero issue?
Hi Has something changed recently in how Xero calculates pension contributions?
Hi all,Hoping someone can shine some light on this as Xero are not being helpful.
Hi All,I have two companies set up in Xero, and I work for both of them.
Hi, we have 2 staff members with student loans but Xero is calculating the incorrect deduction, how can we override this?
Hi there,I have only been running payroll in Xero for 4 months.
Hi, We have built an integration between  and Xero and we're looking for bright, good looking and switched on community minded folks to test how the connection works.
Hi i am working with a client who is looking to use Xero forn their accounting.
Hi thereCan anyone recommend someone who can export all data from Xero for a small company?
Hi there,Our firm has got a client who is with Xero.
Hi, is there a cvent integration available for Xero?
Hi all, I moved to XERO and love it, but I do miss a feature that I used to have (in Streamtime) when quoting.
Hi, I am looking for an accountant who is qualified in Xero.
Hi,Is Xero down as I keep getting a server error messageReference #3.
Hi There I bought Xero as it is doing so well as I though the support would be all singing and dancing.
Hi GuysI was one of the people banging on about having Remittance Advice for Xero, i'd come from quickbooks and it seemed such a normal requirement, anyway you have now implemented it so its only fair that I now say thank you.
##### CLUSTER 1 #####
if so to where and what are the JE that need to posted?
Also if we need to do a restore ie go back a week or two due to massive data misentry .
Please could someone advise me on what tax rates I need to set up for our US based business ?
Is there another step I need to do before the tick appears?
Can I have my legacy accounting records to refer to if and when I need to while creating and operating with a new "organization" file?
BUT do I need to fork out hundreds of dollars to find some one else to fix their problem?
Is there anything I need to be aware of when making this change?
The complication is that this is in the last financial year, so I'm going to need to carry this over to this year.
Do we need a journal?
EOF Conversion Balance, need to reverse this entry, can you please advise the steps to do so?
Please advise asap as we need to get these posted to the ledger so we can close down May!
Is there anyway I can get it to pick it up or will I need to put through a spend/receive money transaction?
Do I need to worry about it,  or is it a bug.
I need some suggestions!
These I allocate as Inventory items as I need to do stock control for them.
How do I enter point rewards and keep track of everything since they need to be entered as accrued liabilities?
Lastly, do I need an inventory app for this?
do I need to unreconcile.
I need a class or someone I can talk to and have them walk me thru it.
How do I record the &#163;75 money off voucher from O2 that I had or do I even need to?
Do I need both?
My question is, do I need to set an opening balance / transaction of what the total available amount of the loan is (e. g 100k)?
Or do I need to manually enter them into Xero and then use DEAR after conversion date.
I understand why it is there and that I need to do something to get rid of it.
Recently, I have received some year end adjustments from my accountant that I need to do in Xero, for 2013.
I don't need Xero to calculate that, I can pull this amount from my website.
What I need is a $100 sale item, 5% taxes shown as payable to the government, and total amount due of $100.
If this is correct (as I'll need to edit some existing entries if so!
If thats correct what is the journal debit and credit i would need to enter?
Now in Xero can I still do a journal, or do I need to set up the asset register?
We need minimal human involvement and can't afford for it to become an accounting nightmare.
What do I need to do to make this appear in the Sales of July 2012 instead of the Sales in June 2012.
AT the moment I still have all the depreciation information on an excel sheet and then I calculate the 40% claim I need to make for income tax purposes.
Or can anyone suggest an alternative to iZettle which will offer me the solutions I need?
What do we need from you?
There is a need in his books though to start reporting his inventory and there is the desire to grow so working with other softwares/apps I can create a pretty awesome marriage of the information.
htmlUsing this method I can easily calculate what I need to declare as a 'shareholder salary' - it's simply the amount of owner A drawings for the year.
00 or do I need to enter each item on individual lines?
So from what date should i do GST from, if i need to start with a Zero balance.
Do I need a banjo?
I now need to check what the original cost was.
What if I need to do both?
Also, we obviously need to go back to beginning of this FY so we can make any necessary rectifications with ATO as we have been paying too much GST.
Any advice of things i will need to focus on?
I also need to discuss with someone what plan is best for our business.
Now we need to enter VAT No to Xero, but I can't find how to do it.
So here is something I need you to realize now:Google is trying to make it easier for you to get on the front page!
Do I need different software for this?
I do some work for clients outside the EU and wondered which of the nil VAT rates I need to flag these with?
If I do work for clients outside the UK but in the EU do I need a further nil rate to be applied?
A single bulk order can take them a week to input so we need some improvement!
They do not need online shop capabilities.
We do not need or use a Petty Cash system.
:-) All they need to do is to enter how many days they worked (sometimes half-days) at the end of the week.
3) We don't need any sophisticated accounting features - we only track PnLs by project (forecast vs. actual).
Office admin then can check times when doing payroll and confirm hours need to be charged out.
It would be better if in Xero User Right Management, we can have function where we can restrict user not to have functionality of remove and redo so that if they make the mistake, they need to come back to higher management for approval and then only can do remove and redo.
Can you please devise xero so that in the date box we don't need to enter the / or- when entering the date?
At the moment you need to click into the GST or Payroll tabs to see the due dates and for clients filing their own returns, they can sometimes miss the dates.
As much as I hate to reference Quickbooks as an example, I need to do it here.
So I do not need to type my email address every time to logn in.
There is often the need for a back-up Excel schedule to be added as a supporting document into a section in Xero workpapers.
Instead we need to resave the document, make the change and then re-upload,  This can become quite frustrating if it needs to be done a few times.
Currently you can only authorise one at a time - frustrating when you need to approve them all in one go.
It makes more sense to learn something when you need it, so it can be applied and not 'lost'.
I love the ability to see how many lines are unreconciled and under discussion in MGX - really need this feature in the mobile app to make it of any use to me
There is a necessary need of keeping record of opening as well as closing stock every month.
I can't see any need for the button General Settings .
This would be helpful for members of Professional Associations that need to do a certain amount of CPD.
Hence when it is dependent on a percentage all you need to do is change the percentage to vary your budget.
when reconciling a transaction and you need to “find and match” in the "search by name or reference” box you should be able to view all customers by say the first 3 or 4 letters (similar to searching for contacts it gives you options straight away) instead you need to type the name in EXACTLY as to what is recorded in contacts to get a match.
There is a need to restrict access when you allow employees to complete timesheets.
However, I cannot check attachments from the reconcile screen - I need to open up the "Find and Match", then open the specific bill in another tab before I can confirm that the receipt has been attached.
A value would still need to be entered before posting the bill so there is no accounting transaction or implication.
There is a need to be able to deliver a Statement under each Brand Theme effectively to the same customer who may use both Company Brands.
This would make it easier to find when there is a need to correct (restore or delete) the transaction line.
We are aiming to go paperless and need a robust system to restrict "approve" to those who are authorised to do so.
I need the OP balance as many items in WIP can straddle the accounting year end.
I run multiple versions of the statements as I progress thru month-end and need to mark what edition it is.
What is the wording I need to enter in order for the sales tax lookup to work automatically upon import?
they only need to be a couple hundred KBThe issue is exacerbated by exceptionally slow file delivery from go.
Then we can send a reminder to the ones who still need to reconcile before we can prepare the BAS.
When importing contacts - can we make the need for http:// optional ?
This is an issue when there's a need to go to Xero to discuss information on a specific company with someone in the room (i. e. , without exposing broad company data).
I also do not need email addresses for each person so that field should be optional when entering multiple contact names.
There is no need to have this calculation display the cents.
I do not need them to see all contacts on contact list or full inventory list
co. nz if you need a Xero MVP on your team!
I am sure there are other adjustments to UK VAT returns which need to be made and which, whilst a work around can be found it is less than elegant, which is one reason for using Xero.
Please vote for this, as anyone hoping to build a big online business will need this.
Would be great if we can import the payments against a sale, would probably need a unique reference number to then match it all at once to the POS settlement?
One person may need item and qty, but I do not.
When importing goods we need to track any deferred GST and enter it as a seperate line item in our BAS.
What we need to be able to do is see the actual balance the client has.
We have no need for any further detail to be stored in Xero re this transaction.
With the general pool of assets I need to deprecate these at 15% for the first year in (regardless of when during the year they were bought its as though all were bought on Jul 1st) then in year 2 I need to depreciate these at 30% for the rest of their time.
Otherwise It's more or less perfect for what I need!
I have employees on a fixed salary regardless of hours worked but I still need to allocate their hours worked to a tracking category so I can see how many hours of labour have been done at each job.
Unpaid leave need to be included as an earnings rate line with number of hours at $nil rate so employees and employers can see that this has been recorded.
This is fairly common so I would think that other companies would also need to use this option.
We also need to be able to enter a contract end date into the system so we can have this data located in the one place for reports etc.
Need to update so that the employee can nominate the actual hours of leave being taken.
Do I need to try again?
What do i need to do?
I need to be able to include our company information, logo and job title on the form that can be printed out - or electronically signed by the staff member and the authorising client without going through some painful seven-step process.
What format would the csv file need to be in?
Or do I need to enter manually?
I am already registered for CIS but as a sole trader only need to include details of any deduction incurred when I submit my end of year tax return (not monthly EPS).
Assume I stay in several hotels, do I need to create a new contact for each separate hotel?
Could you look into this please as I really need to set this feed up as soon as possible?
I can anticipate that down the road I will need to upgrade to a more complex program.
What we need is for the Contact Person to be included in the address block.
The reference information is what tells them who they need to chase.
I need to void the bill and create a credit note however i cant find how to move the pdf without deleting and starting again.
I need to allocate my incomings and outgoings to each of my three shops so I can keep upto date on if they are breaking even or not, and then I can work out commission to staff.
What if the claim is for last month and I really need to get them in for reporting purposes?
Do we need to begin a new Feature Request and if so, can we roll the votes from the old one into the new one?
Do I need to create a transaction to document my contribution and if so, how?
I figured I didn't need a contact called Shell oil, and another called BP, standard, bob's gas, Etc.
Should it change automatically or I need to do a general journal entry?
do I need to attend any training ?
How do I need to enter the figures?
I am using the search and match function and can find and select all of the entries I need which turns the box green ready to reconcile.
One of my client in Ireland started using Xero  and they need to do IntraStat reports.
Basically i assigned some receipts to "subscriptions" and they need to be in the "Office Expenses".
Query is now that I don't have money coming from insurance company and need to write off the stolen amount I am unsure what to do with GST.
(And I dont need to remember what the promocode is, or where I have put it!
What I need:An enhancement on the manual journal function.
I have developed an import file to replace the manual process of entering on Xero, however, I need to run an import 7 times (for each day), due to only 1 date being allowed at a time in manual journals.
I need it to use the rule instead of this previously entered transaction but for the life of me can not figure out how.
Once an Activity Statement has been filed with the ATO, we need a receipt that we can send to our clients to confirm that the statement has been lodge.
The reports in particularly are not giving me what I need (and it's pretty basic to be honest).
Can anyone advise on how I can achieve what I need?
i. e 2 x 35sqft container = £34 The issue i'm having is that I need to multiply that £17 or £34 charge by the number of weeks that the container is being used.
I'm wondering if I adjust the term deposit amount or do I need to enter a transaction in for the interest amount?
Do we need to void them?
So now I need to create a proper journal entries for wages and I am not sure how to do it correctly.
Hello dear all, need some assistance with the payroll that was done on 30 June 2017.
Xero - when are we going to be able to advise employers what they will need to do.
00 at the tax on the unused label, what do I need to do to correct this?
or is there a process I need to do.
Also you need to do separate leave requests if you want a part leave day.
Can someone please show me what I need to do in order for that information to calculate and show up on the employees payslip?
HiI need to split my monthly payroll into two banking .
Any ideas why this is happening and what I need to do to correct it?
Do i need to enter in a Termination date & then re-enter him as a new Casual employee?
Is there anything we need to change in the settings for tax scales etc?
Sometimes my employees need to purchase items with their own money and it would be a lot quicker if they could submit their own expense claims.
Even better if we can set alert dates for when things need to be checked or reviewed as per expiry date of licence.
Can you please advise what I need to do to be able to make the leave accrue.
Do I need to do one?
Do I need a DE user ID?
I'm setting up my first one and was wondering if these need any additional details from a regular Superannuation Fund?
Do we need to?
At the moment all your employees need to reside in one of the supported states in order to use payroll.
Please contact support if you need more guidance on how to set the appropriate auto enrolment status for this worker.
When posting an existing payroll onto Xero do I need to include leavers & their YTD figures as employees/leavers ?
If i am using Xero for RTI do i need to so with Basic PAYE Tools?
We would really need a unit type or work type to do this justice.
No need for paperwork, everything is already there.
Anyone else with a similar request or need ?
We are looking for a CMS that can intergrate with  Xero,It need to utilise smartlist so we can monitor VIP customers, low volume customers  and customers who may have not ordered for awhile.
Is this something I need to adjust in Deputy or Xero?
We need to be able to do mail merges, track conversations, track progress of customer orders.
Is there anything we need to be aware of or concerned about when making these changes?
Check it out at  and if there are any features you need which aren't present or have any other feedback, feel free to drop me a line at benjamin@forensant.
We need an inventory integration that can handle our 10000 + sku's, an ecommerce integration and a CRM.
I therefore need to appreciate what I need to do in Xero before we feed our first sales through Vend.
In order to get digital filing of my federal and state documents I'd need to enroll in the $70 plan.
I need to make a decision in the next week or two, so any feedback would be great!
Therefore in order to keep for 7 years as required, we would still need to keep the hard copy of the document or again scan it in ourselves duplicating the time.
Would Procision do what I need?
Is it correct to say I will need to create a .
Small site I am investigating for so do need anything complexThanks in advance
Why do I need stock on hand in order to receive stock returned?
For me, I really need the solution on how to reconciliate my PayPal USD.
Firstly, I'm not sure what's different about FreeAgent's relationship with Barclays, but the feeds work in FA without the need to re-enter Pin Sentry details, so it *can* be done.
Accounting is not my thing, but It is a task I need to perform in my business.
##### CLUSTER 2 #####
Is this possible?
Any advice would be helpful.
What's with the '', seems a bit funny to clients.
If so - how do i find my Bacs user number?
how do we do that ?
How do we fix this?
Any ideas?
- Can I insert a line into the P&L to show the GP as a percentage .
Any ideas?
as he brought this job into the business having done a great deal of the groundwork in a previous life.
What should the entry be to record this Grant in our Restricted Funds  GL?
Any suggestions?
Thank you for any assistance on these questions at all!
Can't find anything in the "user manual".
An employee can claim exemption from the Medicare Levy, complete form NAT 0929, and submit with employer.
Employer is then required to reduce the PAYGW in accordance with the software formulas contained in NAT 1004.
I can see the figure on the statement.
A few days later I see the back transaction to be reconciled, because I am so organised I can put my hand straight on the statement and select the individual bills which - kerching - match the amount paid exactly!
Now I wake up from the dream, it's been a bit longer than a few days, the statement seems to have a different figure to the one I banked and can I get the bills to total exactly?
We should be 1/4 - 30/9, can anyone advise how to change this?
Due to a change in the layout of two of my employees, I filed they 'ordinary time' in the 'annual leave' line.
I am entering expenses claim.
In this case I originally paid $100, and the refund credit was in the amount of $15 usd.
Has anyone had problems with weird statements being emailed to customers eg a statement dated 2012?
Anyone have any thoughts on this?
How do I reconcile it?
,  This procedure shows you how to delete the duplicate entry.
We can see the first two here are the same entry and they occurred on the same date.
It is only to remove duplicate lines.
can't find the option anywhere.
This should be simple.
50 per Business Transaction, but that it depends on whether the partner company is participating.
Am i missing something really basic or is there a work around?
Do Director's wages get posted to 320 (Direct Wages) or 477 (Salaries) ?
Also what is the difference between the two?
We will want to do a profit and loss for each house, my first thought was to use the tracking, but I've read that this is limited to 100 per category, is this true?
will it cause any other issue?
EC Acquisition (20%) or Zero Rated EC Expenses?
This is what I cannot get to marry up as all the items are not showing up on the find and match panel together.
has anyone else experienced this?
Any advice?
I have entered the bill and receipted the cash deposit however I am stuck as to how to do the rest.
Thank you SO much in advance for any advice!
Any suggestions welcome!
What do I use in the drop down Tax rate?
Any ideas?
What other options do I have?
Has anyone else had experience with this that can assist?
IRD is yet to respond to my request for information on this.
I receive a commitment fee that is paid by the client.
If so, how do they calculate this and where do they use the tax rate for it?
co. uk for books (which might be hard or might be soft copy, unclear).
How do i reconcile this with an itemised receipt?
How can we allow for a few pence of rounding error in the VAT calculation, without forcing the user to check the VAT calculation and potentially adjust the VAT amount?
I am really confused how to resolve this and would appreciate any advise please?
If I put the £100 then the VAT is worked out on that figure which is wrong.
How to record this entry in the system?
Can anyone throw some light on this please?
Could this be done via manual journal to cancel it out?
Or what should we do for this type situation?
I am a cash based agent.
How can I fix it, what is the reason and what could I do?
So we are operating an e-commerce none retail store, and we are dealing with hundreds of tracked items.
But how do we balance Historical Adjustment after all?
I have looked at the guides but I don't understand how to reconcile this.
Can anyone shed some light?
Please assist how to deal with the posting.
Can anyone point me in the right direction?
Firstly, is this correct?
Am I wrong?
It seems, that depending how the address (or contact) was created affects how the delivery address is printed.
Can you explain why this would be the case please.
Can anybody offer any suggestions?
Basically, I am a sole trader.
Any ideas, Please?
Where did it go?
Are these COGS or Expenses?
Is this balance an issue?
I have looked at doing via an expense but would rather not have to do this each month.
one thing I'm struggling with is how to swiftly deal with VAT on expenses where VAT is variable.
but now I can't reconcile them because I can't click '20%' VAT because that's not correct.
Am I missing something?
Could someone please explain how to delete them.
We have several years of accounting history but for 2017 we decided to fix a lot of things in our accounting processes that were broken.
If so, how would I do that?
Was there reports removed or changed in the last few weeks as I used as recently as the 16th of May?
How do we create custom ones as there is nothing there when I click the custom tab.
I'm trying to explain it as best I can.
I am a freelance writer and US CPA.
This has caused a problem as he has left and now our automatic reminders have his name displayed in the "From" section of the emails.
I entered the bill as a transaction (that is showing past due because I back dated it) but how do I show that it is paid and the mark the funds as an owner contribution?
Can anyone shed any light on this?
Anyone who got an idea about this?
How can I record 2 (tracked) inventory items that we have taken out of inventory to be used for display purposes?
I'm assuming this should go into conversion balances - $10k stock, $10k Cash, $100k loan, $80k?
Having trouble wrapping my head around the accounting in each of the organizations.
Any suggestions?
I am mid swapping our accounting software and I have received a refund on an business expense that falls before our conversion point.
Can someone please advise me where/how i should log this?
I mean, how do you do it?
00Has anyone experienced this?
On the quote template in the subtotal area there is a field reference "TotalDiscountAmount".
Is there a field syntax or a method to hide this amount if the discount amount equals zero?
Are these COGS or Expenses?
I also cannot seem to find any reliable resources that deal with this specifically.
EXPENSESUSD PayPal Expenses: do not make any purchases with my USD PayPal balance moving forward.
What I'm trying to figure out is how do I keep track of expenses by client when they are not being reimbursed?
Can you please explain which tax code to use and so I understand, why!
What should I do?
Thank you in advance for any suggestions.
Anyone sees a problem with this?
Is this possible?
I Can't wait days for this to be fixed.
Can't afford to lose this money.
How do I code these two?
Am I asking for accounting advice?
It is not a lot of money, however, they don't offer me any compensation.
HelloI am in Australia and I have no idea what I am doing most of the time with accounting.
is there any alternative?
Am I doing something wrong?
And what will be the nature of these deductions?
Any idea how can I retrospect sign-up for the Employment Allowance?
*   Tax Exclusive*   No Tax*   Zero RatedTo me they seem the same - what are the circumstances where each one is used?
as i am reconciling i am always left with an amount left over.
We have recently registered for VAT and are about to do first VAT return.
Hello, Some one please advise how can i made a multi currency in Manual Journal and Budget
I'm not quite sure what I would put for Legal Name of Businesses or for the SSN/EIN?
We do not have an EIN as it is not required.
When reconciling this cheque transcation, how do I match it up with with the overpayment I originally created?
We wish to generate another document from the information entered whilst invoicingOnly some details so we can pass it on to the drivers as their runsheet telling them the details/description of the trip.
How can I assign that check to the bill to show it paid without having to delete the check?
For previous Corporation Tax, at the end of the year we have raised a Bill from HMRC, on the last day of the year and coded it to the Corporation Tax code.
What are the correct steps please?
In Singapore, it is mandatory for us to contribute Employees' Provident Fund.
Any other suggestions?
If documentation on this already exists, please locate me to it, make it easier to find via keyword searches or link near the fields on the form itself.
I am talking things about US related software licenses which don't have GST, international conferences etc.
How to solve the problem?
Any ideas on how I can fully depreciate these assets while still maintaining the reconciliation between the Balance Sheet and the Fixed Asset Register?
I am running a balance sheet for this years taxes.
or How do I handle these line items?
What am I doing wrong?
There are also some other fees I paid out of pocket for, such as the business license fee, taxes, and some other legal fees.
Though I'm not sure how I can associate those costs properly against the startup advance.
That may be better in the long run anyway since if there is no bonus the advance doesn't have to be repaid.
Aside from this specific issue, I think the rest of what I’ll be doing will be super straight forward.
Any suggestions on how to make this easy and still be correct?
Do I record this as 'No Tax' or 'Tax Exclusive'?
How do I reconcile this?
Can I reconcile this as the 820 GST Liability?
Should this be happening?
As obviously for this Canada one it is saying the amount is out by £12, so won't let me reconcile.
Any thoughts?
NB:  this is not cost of sale.
Please advise if this requires the implementation of additional functionality or if I should undertake this reconciliation using a different process?
How should non-deductible expenses be treated?
Handed the season ticket in on 12/02/2017 and received a refund of &#163;447.
I financed the purchase of some equipment for our office.
36Total Cost of Goods (What it should be according the the cost prices in inventory items):£14.
Approximately, half of that is received in cash the other half is eftpos.
Is this possible please?
I am a beginner.
Is this possible?
I would appreciate any comments or feedback.
how do i do this?
I hope this is clear!
Any advice on procedure/steps to take, reports to run, etc.
However that is not the case.
Anyone else have this problem and how to solve easily?
I cannot seem to find a place where I could set these up.
Can anyone assist or point me in the right direction?
Can someone explain in a bit more detail what needs to be done please?
Can I make the change before 1st April with an effective date of 1st April or do I have to flick the switch on that data?
I can't seem to find a the rent/lease or business property.
I am new to this whole accounting thing and this is so NOT my field so understanding a lot of this is taking up a lot of my time.
My first thought is Business License & Fees, but I'm still a bit paranoid to get it right.
Why cant i do this?
How do I reconcile the refund?
Concern:My concern is the amount received is a liability to us even though it is a revenue stream.
Also, are there any simplied measure to make easy.
Your suggestions would be highly respected.
From what I am being told it might never come back.
This is expected.
They have no IT department and outsource this as all small banks do.
How do I then treat this?
So, long story short, I have a business with a couple of friends which I am conducting as a sole trader.
Can I do that?
We buy workwear for our staff and keep a quantity on hand for new staff or replacements.
The value of this can be significant over time.
We have to buy exam papers for a number of our courses and this again can be a significant amount.
How do I do this?
Is this a manual process?
How should I sort this?
How can I retrieve back the big list of Vendor #1?
I am hoping there is a short cut to this, as I have to do for last two years!
Any guide how I can set Vat Tax calculated for states ?
We sell also free Vat items inside of Eu, any info how we can sort for it?
A portion must be for the principle and some for the fixed fee but I'm not sure how this all works.
Is this possible?
Anyways I'm wondering how I can reconcile a recent tax return that was paid to my by my accountant?
I'd also love to understand the accounting entries because I can't see what is happening.
Any news on this front?
Has anyone else encountered this?
Has this been experienced by anyone else?
Some of the sales were paid for with cash, others EFTPOS.
Any advice?
Or am I missing any steps?
Anyone else had this happen?
When buying a car to fix up and sell, is this a direct expense or should it be put in cost of goods sold?
Also and repair costs, MOT, bodywork and work outsourced (paintwork, mechanics etc) for said car is this a direct expense or a cost of goods sold?
Finally, each car is advertised individually, as its part of the cost of selling said car is this a direct expense of cost of goods sold?
Any chance of setting up a live feed with CFC Stanbic in Kenya?
Is there anyway to exclude VAT payments from appearing as money going out?
How do I handle this entry?
It is a personal expense in the sense that I paid it, but it is VAT that the company needs to claim back.
Any suggestion?
It was for £1,200, which is to be paid monthly by direct debit.
How do I code it?
Expense Reimbursement or Revenue (Refund) ?
I am slowly deleting our company name from each supplier contact page that was affected so HOPEFULLY (!
Anyone else have this problem?
Is there a workaround or something I'm doing wrong here?
What is the appropriate process to use when removing a tracked item from inventory for use as a demo product or sample?
Is there a workaround for this?
Could this be the case that it has duplicated statement lines and if so how do i go about sorting it out?
how do i reconcile this?
I think I have to set up two different rules for this, but I have one rule that triggers if the amount is greater than $15.
I created another one for if it is Equal to or Less Than $15.
We apologise for any inconvenience this may cause.
How do I do this?
Any suggestions?
This is occasionally annoying.
I can't seem to find anything on the topic as the keywords are too broad.
How do I reconcile this?
How do I reconcile this?
If you check the image here you can see where we issued a refund of £147.
Any ideas how this can be prevented?
Can anyone explain things to me please?
If there is any remaining deposit leftover after that, it will be refunded.
Has anyone had a similar problem?
How do I fix this?
Then credit my direct costs and debit closing stock with our closing stock figure?
if any one has any advise i would love to hear it
In filling out the losses schedule it appears that the field "excess franking credits converted into losses" doesn't automatically pre-fill nor can you manually input the amount.
Has anyone had this problem before?
Any ideas?
What can I create to apply this against?
Am I missing something?
I am a sole trader
How do I reconcile?
I  want to keep track on any new contacts and one to keep track of any contacts that have left.
Any advice?
I'm not sure what option I should choose.
Any suggestions?
I do have an issue when printing checks for AP.
I have looked on the discussion board, and someone else wrote in about how the checks are printed in a very random order, instead of alphabetically.
This is where I am lost.
How can I group my company customers under projects or jobs or batches?
I am an accountant in an Edu-Tech company.
Here is Canada, we have 2 taxes, I see *TaxType	and TaxAmount in the demo csv but how can I import 2 different tax rate and amount?
Any quick ideas on how I am able to find this error so that I can then fix it?
Any idea on how we can sort out this problem without creating a mess with Accruals & prepayments?
So what is your response to this?
Can anyone explain how to do this?
Why is this?
What would be the process to fix this please?
What should I do?
Yet, can someone shed some light on as to why this happened?
Any ideas?
How do I code it?
They have also asked for the Business Performance graphs to be within the reports - I can't work out how to do this either.
They own a boutique/salon and there's a woman that sells some of her consignment inventory through their shop.
Any suggestions?
I run the P&L and in the sales line (before costs of goods sold) it gives me a figure.
And how can I allocate the difference?
Is this correct?
I currently have it set to "Suspense" so I could go ahead and reconcile.
Hello,I have a question on whether or not to include inventory purchases I made this month (December) on my company's tax returns "ending inventory" for 2016, despite the fact that the goods will not be delivered to me until January of next year.
Is it correct to include this inventory on my 1120S form for 2016?
"):  Am I interpreting this correctly?
I'm hoping there is a simple solution to this.
I am reconciling my credit card.
Is there a manual journal  I can do?
If not an someone has experience then i'd be very grateful for any advice.
That is the advice I've received from my accountant.
A similar thread from a few years ago showed others as confused as I am.
grateful for any insights.
What do I use as the expense category for my storage unit fees?
00When I email and they open as a PDF, they get As Quoted Services                                                                    $500.
How then to link the two?
- or am i wrong
How do I get out of this nasty tangle?
Any questions, please ask.
Why not have as a standard tax code 'Purchases for private use or not income tax deductible'?
how can i include all the cost in the cost of the inventory.
How do you I correctly enter this purchase transaction?
what is the solution to this issue please?
How do I enter that?
You have introduced cheque printing for many countries but not for the UKCan we have this feature please?
Can I delete the statement line or is there another solution?
ideas anyone?
how to code/receive  the refund?
Has anyone got experience setting up and accounting for a self administered childcare voucher scheme?
Any thoughts/advice/experience?
Appreciate any assistance regarding this.
Is this a double up?
Can anyone shine some light on this for me?
Is there anything to consider here in how to set up or otherwise?
How can i do it?
Any ideas?
What I am a bit stuck on: what do I code the freelancer 'purchase' to?
This is where I am stuck.
What are the implications for the BAS for this?
How do I change this?
What’s the best current workaround?
I'm trying to figure out how to categorize everything to make sure everything is reconciled correctly.
How do I fix this?
Anyone else with this issue?
Is this possible?
I'm not mad, am I?
What should i do if i want to pass adjustment within the item sizes.
But we do not currently track inventory on an individual item basis.
Could we create a Bill for this, coding to expenses, and paid from COGS?
Anyone else had this trouble?
Any ideas Zero?
Any suggestions?
I looked at what its doingMost times the json being returned is blank.
How do I do it?
Is this possible?
How do I dispose of part of an asset- can you explain the workaround as I understand this has still not been brought in despite requests.
Any suggestions to tackle this issue.
Any advice?
My question is how to your reconcile these?
80 AUD - (From U. S. Dollar Currency Conversion (credit) - Completed)How would you reconcile each of the line items above.
7, net sales should be included in Box 6 of the VAT return.
I mean how to check the opening balance of each inventory?
47Where do these numbers come from?
What is the difference between "TrackingName1" and "TrackingOption1" in that spreadsheet?
Ideally setup so that we can tell which gift cards have a balance to be used.
What happened was, the tax accountant started working on the figures in early July.
It is hard to read when printed out.
I can't split the original debit into two parts (overpayment and regular spend money transaction).
What do these come under?
General or Direct?
any ideas?
All this is a little confusing, but I'm sure there is a clear response to it!
I understand that a credit note can be created, but since the inventory has been reduced already I think applying the credit note might not work?
Or something else entirely?
55How do I reconcile?
Any suggestions for how to resolve this?
For the 50% claim on entertainment (business lunches etc) how do I claim this correctly?
I am a sole trader and an Australian tax resident.
Can anyone suggest a good accounting firm that works in both countries?
Any ideas how to change this?
It could also be adjusted via a Journal if it was seen to be increased?
Is this something that is as simple as this to do, ie Drawings out and then later Funds Introduced in.
Any suggestions.
What do you guys think I should choose?
How do I code this transaction?
(How) Do I manually reconcile?
51The widgets will be listed for sale, with a sale price of $960 ($60 each * 16)How would you make up the Bill for this?
When buying in the service, would I assign that to 310 "Cost of Goods Sold"?
Or would it (and anything else that is resold, either tangible parts or software/service) better fit elsewhere?
Therefore, there is a balance for Unearned Income at 12/31/15 that becomes the Sales opening entry for 2016.
This balance is automatically being shown as Current Year Earnings on the Balance Sheet at 12/31/15, which is incorrect according to our accounting method that defers earned income.
Should this be registered in conversion balances under "881 - Owner A Funds Introduced"?
Is there a difference between these two reports and the information they pull out?
There is a code already for directors loan.
Only I can see the Manual Journal entries.
I am operating vat flat rate cash scheme.
Any ideas?
Each time there is a service provided to a client we bill them per hour of the consultant's time.
Is this wrong?
I plan to have her do a 100% hand count of what inventory we have on hand.
Is this possible?
From what I understand, the structure of the business determines how these personal funds are noted.
There is no conversion balances.
I am a taxi company.
I got some contracts with local council and my drivers do the work.
On my latest Business Activity Statement for April-June 2016, the "GST On Purchases" amount is $0, even though I have multiple expenses for that period listed as "GST On Expenses".
What am I doing wrong?
Now that even Barclays have finally caught up (and least there is a Yodlee credit card feed for Barclaycard) my loyalty towards HSBC is going to be severely tested.
Is this possible?
But I was wondering if anyone had any idea on how to go about recording the payments in, the repayments out and the interest.
Has anyone found an automated solution for this process?
Suggestions would be greatly appreciated :)CheersIan
Is their a provider that can do this?
Because is a new customer we don't want to charge him this fee.
Is that what you would do, or is it worth the extra time to get all of the year's data imported?
This is not always a trivial process.
or do I treat these losses as GST exclusive?
I am told there is a system tax for GST but I don't understand how to go about it.
There is a sales tax (0%) in the system but I cannot modify the percentage.
Some background info:I sell goods online and am based in the UK.
What would be the best method for accounting for some sales being subject to VAT and others not (i. e. where the customer is outside the EC)?
Should I have changed it in settings or wait?
I'm interested in opinions here, what do you think is the correct decision?
What would you do?
Any suggestions?
This is all new to me - please bear with me.
Or should I do a journal to move that expense from rent into accruals.
In fact I am still under medication for my most recent ailment ….
If there is, could someone please tell me!
What can I say, I am a new user with very standard expectations.
I'm having a bit of a conundrum and can't seem to get an exact answer.
any suggestion on this?
5% of the would be VAT figure that is removed from my revenue generation.
How do i edit this?
I have added the fixed asset as the total price - not sure if this is what I should have done or not.
But how do I treat the replacement?
Are there any downsides to using this accrual/lock down approach?
Looking for some feedback from users that have set something similar up for other clients or for themselves.
Though it may result in loss of recent changes made in the accounting.
How do I record receipt of a government grant for our not-for-profit family trust?
I'm in the U. S. In my State there is a 6% Sales Tax on certain purchases I make for use in the business.
Adding line items to correct a 1 cent discrepancy is a pain.
I've called NAB and don't have any answers from them.
Google shows up 1 result in the whole work, which is a tweet from another book keeper to NAB, in which no light is shed.
So no money in or out.
Or are they assets with a depreciation of a year?
Has anyone been faced with a similar situation before and can anyone assist please?
What's the best practice?
there is a charge of 0.
Can anyone tell me a work around they have found?
I do see code 2400 that is maybe for taking out cash from my line of credit.
any ideas?
I am a service fee based business.
I am selling merchandise (from my Supplier) at no markup and only charging a fee for my service.
Am I doing this correctly?
I also use services from other suppliers which I do not mark up.
What am I doing wrong?
Anyone use Sorpaid?
Any good?
Any advice welcome :)
However, I can’t see anyway to set up the units being invoiced to match the number of days in the month.
Most of our sales are done online but occasionally we'll do stalls at events, either ourselves or someone else will do it for us.
On top of this, cash hasn't been banked daily in the past so sometimes can't match which day/s the deposits relate too.
How do I credit that but at the same time apply it as a marketing expense in my reports?
Please can someone advise me how to manage this better as its a nightmare!
(Please do not suggest a bill or expense claim, those require reimbursement by the company).
Did anyone else experience a similar problem?
24, how do I reconcile this?
Under what category do I put that in when doing the reconciliation?
We work in an industry whereby we and other suppliers will not make payments below a certain amount (£100), however our outgoing payments still show as overdue when in effect they are being rolled over.
:A customer orders 15 meters of fabric but in order to cut a clear 15 meters, 17 meters of fabric is used with 2 meters wasted.
Hence there is discrepancy of 1-2 days between dates of each record.
When I make a deposit, I find myself manually calculating the checks to deposits, then once the deposit clears, then I can match and verify the amount.
Where do I record this $100 overpayment in conversion balances?
Lets say this was $1000, how and where do I record this?
The scenario will be a business with several thousand lines of stock, some brought to order, others held in stock.
I would appreciate some assistance on the best to set it up.
If so I could have mentioned that we should book revenue as it is earned, with the debit to AR.
It's not a bill, and it's not wages as such so shouldn't go through payroll.
do i enter it as exempt, zero rated or no VAT?
I do not understand which object attribute is relevant here?
Therefore, I have to make adjustment in the stock for costs of the product say 100 USD each.
How should i book this transaction.
I'm sure I'm not the first to have this issue - can anyone else advise please?
And, if we do this and then register for v. a. t. in the next twelve months, how do I then reclaim it all retrospectively within the rules?
Is this wise, and how would I go about it?
Did I do something wrong here?
I am using a eftpos service that takes there fee every transaction rather than end of month.
I also use stripe for credit card payments and they do it as well.
Can anyone point me in the right direction?
Is anyone else having issues?
3125 or $53.
How do I fix this?
Can anyone explain how this could possibly happen?
How do I reconcile these two lines with each other?
Any suggestions?
Is there any reason why this method wouldn't work?
Any suggestions would be greatly appreciatedDoes anyone
How do I reconcile or fix this problem?
Is this possible?
I'm well versed in forum courtesy so I apologise in advance if this is (a) a very basic question and (b) already been asked before.
What do I do about all the intangible/soft costs incurred to setup the business?
How do I depreciate or amortise those costs?
Can I still run my activity statement at the end of the quarter and will I have accurate figures?
Can anyone explain what to do?
I am a little bit confused by what purchases fall into which category.
Is anyone able to give a brief bullet point example of what would fall into which category.
Any thoughts?
How do I enter this?
Hello folks,I am not an accountant so please forgive me if I don't use the proper lingo.
How do I correct them?
Can anyone offer any assistance please?
how do I resolve that ?
How do I "zero it out"?
As I no longer have any payments for this loan left.
Any suggestions?
Hey guys,I am self-employed (resident in Australia) and have a number of clients in the USA.
HiI am a director of a small UK-based private limited company.
When a New Inventory item comes in at a different price, it would be nice to have a percentage adjustment for the new product or an average for all products in stock, making it the sellers choice whether to use the % or the average.
So How should I track this import tax?
there is no indictaion as to how much of each these payments goes towards the capital and how much goes towards paying the fee which I assume is the expense to be accounted for.
Any advice would be welcome.
Is there an automatic process available?
Can i make the discount as before tax.
Is this possible?
If interested and if you have any question, please email info@jnngroup.
Notably, rather than agreeing a dispensation and/or putting items on the employee’s P11D, there is the option of .
Is there an online copy as well?
Can anyone please advise if I have recorded the below in error and assist (if required) the correct procedure.
I will write out step by step what I have done to record the transaction.
I do not have an 'advisor', so whilst I can see the list of fixed assets, I can't register them and use the associated functionality.
How should I record this?
I am wondering if anybody here has good suggestions on software we can use for tax returns.
Any suggestions?
Any expense can be considered in mind for the following details.
I am not going to use the whole can of WD40 or the whole box of rags on one unit, those could last me months.
What do you think would be better from a tax and accounting view point?
How do I check to confirm it is including VAT items from before 1st Sept?
I assume the "second" quarter can then be ticket to cover Late Claims.
What is the difference between GST free expenses and BAS excluded?
We are a new small legal firm, so have expenses such as ASIC fee's - they have no GST on them, but which tax code do I use?
Do you creat an inventory item?
I am starting a small business that is providing handyman services, car detailing and other home services.
I am using Timely as a scheduling and online booking tool.
Any ideas?
asp), but have not had any luck finding advice specific to professional services businesses.
Anyone out there have any history with this?
Any thoughts on how this can be done?
Can anyone provide some insight into why some would have reconciled and others not and/or how to fix?
The problem I'm having is the card is showing a positive balance due to these rebates that come in the form of a statement credit.
How do I get the credit card to balance?
Should I be getting statements from Go Cardless?
What am I doing wrong?
how do I do this?
I have also entered other purchases for the business such as office expenses, tools etc through purchases and as a bill, again GST on expenses.
and then how the GST component of these purchases can be included in the purchases on the Business Activity Statement.
This is messing things up!
how can i let the quantity to appear in the inventory
Any ideas?
), and then journal any rounding errors.
How do I do the transaction so that I can claim all of the GST with the first instalment.
Or am I wrong?
Any thoughts?
This is what we do.
And how far back the transaction history can go beyond the 24months?
Any problems with my plan?
Any better suggestions?
When they enter an event again they can redeem that credit note to offset their entry cost.
I am not sure I am doing it correctly.
How come the cash basis income statement is not showing tracked inventory item purchases?
How simple is this going to be.
What's the cost?
What comes across with the new file?
How do we go about doing so?
Do these go under Cost of Goods Sold or under their own expense lines?
Until now I'm pretty happy with Xerobut I'm stucked with one thing: how should I deal with refundable transport packaging such asbeer barrel and cases of glass bottles?
My question is, is it necessary to always split out the transaction fees?
There is no sales tax issue.
Any idea why this would be?
I think that is legitimate but it only provides me a full profit/loss picture on an annual basis.
I'd love to see profit/loss on a monthly basis.
Obviously I could manually do an adjustment for each sale but that's tedious when I'm selling thousands of items in a month.
Any suggestions?
Is there a setting I can change for the system to include tax on purchases as part of the expense?
Any suggestions?
Hello, I am a small manufacturer.
Is it okay for me to expense those items out to COGS even if they are not completely used up?
I am in South Africa but I doubt that makes any difference to my question.
We do Party Equipment Rentals such as Candy Floss machines, Popcorn Machines, etc.
I think its option 1 which is how I have it now but please can someone reassure me as the numbers are drastically different if not!
The problem is that Paypal then adds 20% VAT again.
Any ideas how to turn this off?
I've worked with larger systems that allow for allocating an expense (manually) over any period of time.
Which one do I keep for proper bookkeeping?
I can't see the entity at all.
Am bit worried :(ThanksDivvi
Any ideas on how I can correct this?
And In next month I made the sale of remaing goods, so my profit will be (Sales - Codt Of Goods Sold) and due to that percentage of Profit are different in each month.
So what I will do to distribute the landing cost and import duty in COGS for getting the profit correctly?
if someone has any ideas please share.
I'm sending the first VAT return for the business I work for, but there is a problem.
Any ideas on this issue greatly received.
Has anyone got a solution to this ?
Hello,I am a small business offering a service.
Is it possible to introduce Cost of Revenue as an Expense category?
How do I do this?
How would I go about it?
Is this when tracker would come in handy?
One issue though is that the from email address is "invoicereminders@post.
What entry should we do?
I am an author.
I sell books at events and accept cash payments as well as credit cards through PayPal.
How do I handle such a transaction such that it doesn't mess up the 'Total cash in and out' graph on the dashboard?
I get that, but where do I enter that.
Is this correct?
Any suggestions?
Is this marketing speak or is there really something to this?
Moving over is a pretty major move so I want to make sure I'm not missing something.
However when I navigate to Features there is no Fixed Assets option.
Is this happening to anyone else?
Can the conversion tool handle multiple currencies.
I want to bring in the last 24 months of data?
Do I use a series of credit notes for this?
Ideally I'd have two columns or something.
Any idea how to fix that ?
How do I record this transaction:1.
Any ideas?
For a cosmetic company that manufactures its own products, how do we record the sales?
Am i right?
3- Details : what is this for ?
So what i want to do is void the bill in the company it was not supposed to be in.
A word of warning to anyone who sells goods from the UK to consumers in the EU.
They work on the assumption that all EU sales are 0% sales to EU businesses, and even gave me incorrect advice twice on how it should be reported.
Any ideas?
Any suggestions on how I deal with this?
What's the recommended work-around for this so the return can be prepared and submitted?
How should I enter this information when reconciling the purchase?
I would appreciate a quick response as have a VAT return to do for someone urgently.
5% tax, or $15.
Sorry if this is basic accounting 101 - but we are newbies trying to plug a gap!
It seems the consignor proceeds is a payable, but how do I deduct my fee?
Any ideas?
Can you quickly copy the same information down an entire column?
It is taking a while to create these.
So it would be extremely helpful if you could import into this area, copy or paste, or some other method of quickly adding information into here.
Should I be doing two separate batch payments?
Is this possible?
Expense Claims: There is no feature to make edits to a "note"  in the receipt process.
I've set the conversion date to the start of the financial year (1 July in Australia).
Any suggestions?
Any ideas?
Ignore the overall effect over the full year, yes there is not much of an impact.
Here are the problems:1/ By keying in SGD on different dates and using the above approach, there is still a small difference remaining in Accruals a/c.
How do i reconcile this?
What's the process for entering samples and errors (individual product/garment)?
It is doing the same as the "transfer" option but with an extra line.
How do I record that transaction?
The feed back stated that Reason: Please contact your software developer.
Any idea on how to fix this?
What's the correct answer here?
Then when I reconcile the income from the sale what do I code this to?
Any assistance would be fantastic - in layman's terms.
How do others deal with this scenario?
Any suggestions is welcomed.
Any ways around this?
Any ideas?
how do i make an entry for the refund that i received?
Please provide one of the following:1.
Any advice?
Is there a workaround on this?
This is confusing me as there are codes which aren't necessary.
How do I fix it so it's not doubling my income?
If so, how might I go about investigating why it's non-zero?
Any ideas?
How can I do that?
com and I am wondering why it's not converting properly.
Which service should I integrate?
I'm confused because it states that this is is the proportion due to be paid.
Based on some online reading I did, I guess this is referred to as "constructive receipt" (viz.
When I went through the setup process I think I was asked what period to start from.
How can I get the previous 12months to come across?
Any suggestions?
Can someone please tell me how to run this out.
What would be the best method of entering this into the books?
Any ideas?
Is there away around this?
if thats not correct place - where do i enter them.
What do I do if it was paid cash on delivery?
Or do i leave it blank?
Is there a process or video on what needs to be done to produce BAS Statements for the ATO?
Can anybody point me in the right direction to get my reconciliation on track?
I relied on the class system in Quickbooks as I run a number of events.
In some instances, however, there is a fee to withdrawing the cash (ATM owner's fee).
The sticky part is that Squarespace only sends the amount of each transaction and doesn't contain the information about what was ordered.
Any ideas?
I am batch uploading, so this is very tedious
Now lets say i have a receipts for several items of stationary how on earth do I put these through?
The part that I'm really having trouble with is the reconciliation.
My question is - what is the best and most convenient for reconciling this fruit salad of payments?
Is this possible to create yet?
Guessing will have to do a receive money but am unsure what to code it to?
Thus he tracks how many cubic meters, are in stock and bills the current issue.
How do I mark them as reconciled?
Can somebody contact me so I can do some work
While my expenses are all on Credit Card which is easy to reconcile.
Am I missing something?
Has anyone else been able to manually download a statement from Bankline?
Any ideas ?
I am a qualified accountant though never really used it much (working in industry) but sufficient to generally do okay with bookkeeping.
Any suggestions?
but that doesn't seem to make sense as it is not a direct cost.
Any suggestions.
as this is a longish story.
Is there anyway to bill a percentage based fee?
There is obviously a timing difference for eWay transaction settlement, versus the MEMNET receipt date.
Surely this is incorrect?
How do we remove this option?
Is this right?
Should I keep trying?
00) or 2,500.
how do I get rid of that carry over figure?
Has anyone used this feature?
Is there a compliance issue here?
I'd be grateful for any assistance.
Is there a new mergefield needed to show this data?
Is there any work around apart from cutting and pasting the narration into the reference box in the details?
How do I fix this problem?
Any suggestions welcomed!
I am trying to put some travel receipts (taxis, etc) into the mobile app.
Im trying to correct an erroneous inventory amount done by an outside contractor, but it wont allow me to run a MJ to offset against the inventory lines - is there a workaround for this, or is it a broken feature?
Any clues as to what we have done wrong or how to fix.
So i am wondering.
I do business with several UK & Irish charities.
Although it is not important to me now tracking sales to a particular customer.
How do I enter the refund so everything cancels out.
This is a government requirement.
Anyone ever encountered this scenario before?
Can anyone tell me how I can reconcile the original &#163;75 cheque received and the subsequent &#163;15 refund?
Anyone else having this issue today?
Any ideas how I can solve this?
Anyone else had this?
That said, the approval i can live with.
Has anyone any experience of moving from accrual to cash accounting for vat.
how do other people make this easier and scaleable so i dont have to find and match every transaction manually?
Any suggestions for making this into "beautiful accounting"
1) First there is the  who sells the product to us and then 2) there is a  which charges Freight, Handling and Import Taxes for bringing the products to Guatemala.
Any thoughts?
If I don't use prepayment the amount paid by the customer won't display correctly in the sales list so that I can eventually apply the credit.
Can I automatically seperate sales from the international and Australia ?
How do others handle this ?
Any thoughts ?
This is a simple question, yet I've not found an answers after scouring this forum.
I am migrating over from quickbooks.
My employees have company cred cards, as do I, and sometimes I will ok them to grab lunch or something.
It always says "apply rule" and won't do it on its own.
Can anyone provide advice?
Any thoughts would be great!
Perhaps someone is willing to take a look at my csv file?
Is there anywhere to record purchase orders sent to me from a customer?
Is this possible right now?
Some involve shipping a physical product, whilst others do not.
How do I fix this?
I am in New Jersey, USA.
How do I change this setting for the Income Statement?
Or is there even different aproach to this, how did you start your brand new company with $0 ?
I can't figure out, however, how to reconcile sales that A) have discounts applied, or B) were paid with a previously purchased gift card.
What am I doing wrong?
I do not see any reason to enter these information to any utility bill.
What I am trying to do seems simple in my mind but it seems i'm doing something wrong.
Everything I do is Completely Cash based, and I want something better then my excel sheets.
Any ideas?
The income for the year is almost double what it should be.
Can can we ensure it is in accordance to recent accounting standard?
This is normally after I have provided the client with a quote.
Hope it all makes sense and thanx in advance for any advice.
There are separate additional spreadsheets floating around recording who has paid money in and ho has been refunded.
This can apply to both my own home (not tax deductible) and the investment property (deductible).
I can't believe I have to ask this, it seems this should be very easy to figure out.
or so I thought.
Paypal will deliver a credit of &#163;35 and a debit of &#163;1.
Can I combine these to make a credit of &#163;33.
What started as a rough record keeping of income/expenses/fixed assets in the most basic of spreadsheets has continued until this day.
So where do I begin?
How do I create and track my business credit cards?
How do I set up the beginning balances?
or can use tracking under one company?
How to set the cogs for this?
If I have an online store that sells different items daily, how can I create a list of the items sold?
Am I missing something?
Also how do I escalate an issue?
Should i use a manual journal entry?
Am I doing something wrong?
Any ideas?
Sales consist of things such as venue hire, food and drink sales etc.
I thought it would be simple, but with the fee situation, I'm not really too sure how to do it.
If it makes any difference to any forthcoming advice, I am GST registered.
My question is how to handle the payments?
This is being looked at as a deposit but it's my own money that has already been accounted for.
I am lost.
Im looking around but can't see how I should best deal with this.
Am I missing something?
Anyone have any ideas what the problem is?
Anyone got a good system for this?
Could anyone advise?
before the order is processed the business consultants have pre-approved a value 'up to' which will be paid.
Most of the time the final value comes in lower.
My GST filing is 2 monthly, 1st Oct to 30th Nov.
How do I reconcile this?
)Chattel Mortgage:- We currently use the cash accounting method and can claim the entire GST input upfront- Car value $22,325 from dealer on road:   Car $19,703.
However, there is no specific date required or planned at this point in time.
HelloI am a new business and not registered for VAT (UK)I manufacture my products and they are all VAT zero ratedI have been recording the VAT paid on items such as fuel, Amazon purchases etc as 'Tax Rate 20% on expenses option).
However, Now I am looking at reports and I find under liabilities an amount of say (1000.
It looks as though after I have reconciled the acnts they are both treated as one in terms of reporting etc.
How do I edit or reconcile these errors?
All of the sudden all items purchased before 1 Jan 2013 is deleted from our Fixed asset,How can this happen?
Proper application of the standards will require companies to track contracts with customers, performance obligations that are embedded in those contracts, and changes in recorded contract assets and liabilities.
Grateful for anyone who can advise on the following please.
Any idea what's wrong?
secondly, as a plant grows from sapling to a full grown plant it is transferred to a different size pot.
once again its cost should be increased to show the transfer and the empty pot then classified in a different category of stock item.
any workaround?
There are no complicated equities in the business or anything.
After an additional $60,000 in operating costs and expenses, my net gain is left with $15,000.
How to categorize the shareholder distribution?
Everything before that is simply reducing my equity in the company.
How do I determine my equity base (this is my first year running the S Corp) since I am a 100% share holder?
Has anyone else had any success with this?
Can I do this?
I am a sole proprietor so that should make it a bit easier but I do have some people I have paid over 500.
I do have W9s for these people.
Would I enter these as bills or payroll?
Depreciation is run monthly but is Can I change the calculate method to be And how can I change that?
How do I capture all those expenses to accurately portray the value of the company?
In the chart of accountants, I have set up 3 codes : "Sales UK", "Sales Europe" and "Sales International".
I am thinking that it will take two steps - but I could be wrong.
If that is the case above.
has anyone out there tried to change their year end dates?
Set up a recurring entry instead to apply this monthly?
I don't believe they should be classed as taxable income as we do not derive any income from them.
All monies collected are then passed to two local charities, we do not receive any profit for this either.
This total is incorrect.
I do volunteer work for a non for profit and am looking at ways to streamline our membership renewal process next year.
I am a sole trading consultant.
How do I deal with these two amounts?
Is this correct?
When I start keying in the vendor name the dropdown list shows credit card suppliers (which can be many branches of the same vendor) from the banking area as well as our contacts.
As we don't use the credit card on the dashboard anymore it would be great if we could archive these suppliers only - I did read that they can't be deleted.
How can best provide for an expense where I do not have a bill yet?
How do I reconcile this amount to the liabilities shown on the balance sheet?
any advice?
What are the rest of you doing?
If so, how do I do this?
So my questions is how long has this been going and why am i still being charged an extra $20 a month?
I can see the modified journal in a Manual Journal Search, together with its History & Notes, but there is no error message to suggest that the journal is in error, or that it was not posted to the General LedgerIs there some sort of process that I should have performed to get the journal to post?
do I put it through purchases ?
Would anyone else find this helpful?
00Suspense -$35So at the end of it there is no liability and the sales revenue is $10.
Wondering if anybody has experience with this already and could advise how best to go about it or point us in the right direction.
While NSCOA is not compulsory, there are benefits in using it.
Important - Any organisation is able to adopt NSCOA.
Or a specific date range, etc.
How would I do this from the reconcile screen?
HiCould I please have an explanation of the figures used to calculate the Return on Investment ratio on the Executive Summary?
At some point in the future, the supplier will issue us a single bulk refund of the core deposits we made -- it will normally apply to multiple bills, and it could be partial for some bills.
There are no sales tax implications and payments are almost always simple wire transfers.
They have come to me to tidy up their system as it is in disarray.
Has anyone used PocketSmith?
How do I get rid of these duplicates?
How to enter data in the past years?
How to set the comission for employees?
Any suggestions.
I am sure there is an easy solution to this problem
I'm not sure how to fix these up and reconcile them?
Is this correct for periodic inventory?
If I do this monthly, do I repeat that process?
We have recently advanced an amount of $500 to an employee to cover any living expenses while travelling.
can anyone assist here?
How can I make sure these sales and expenses are accounted for in the same month, so I am able to follow-up profit on a monthly basis?
Anyone got any pointers?
Am I correct here?
Any pointers as to what I can do?
I can't send a repeating bill and there's no specification for what the client is paying for?
Is there anything else I have forgotten or overlooked?
Could someone please tell me how to reconcile this, or if it's even possible!
Can anyone give me further guidance on this?
"Looking into the issue" and I'm not even sure if there is an issue etc.
Am I doing something wrong?
So that you fully understand the problem I'm having please let me explain a little bit about my business and how I receive payments.
Please see a theoretical example at the bottom in case my wordy explanation loses you.
com/Settings/OrganisationThe system says "GooglePlus user name is not in a valid format"Any ideas about how to overcome this?
Are there any other inventory management systems that can work with WorkflowMax?
Any pointers as to what I can do?
or any other workflow that can solve this?
How do I record that?
This makes it hard to recognise what the item represents as the amount was either paid to or received by the same company.
Obviously we are going to do this as its better for cash flow.
Do you enter the bill in its entirety at the date of issue 31/07/2014?
How do you allocate the direct debits against the bill?
My thought is this:1.
Any difference in the WorkCover payable amount should reconcile to the end of year WorkCover reconciliation.
I mean a Company tax return or Individual.
It can be frustratingly difficult, because if you don't have all the correct bits ticked (or filled in) then the option will not come up.
What am I missing here?
Any thoughts?
im hoping to try and do a bath of them as there is quite a few.
com/article/223730With some clients I am paid for the number of hours I work.
How do I reverse the debit/credit fields?
00 in the COA of "Repairs & Maintenance".
Or have I made a newbie error?
Is this an expense?
What is the best method to do this?
How do I split or apportion depreciation expense over various teams using the Auto-Depreciate feature in the FAR?
What is the advantage of sharing the same sequence ?
What can I do?
I want to fix that now by doing a stock take.
But since I don't actually have that stock 'on hand' I am not sure if that is correct.
What is the correct procedure?
HiI have suppliers that I am entering opening balances for.
How do I reconcile the refund so that the overdue amount is re-assigned against our supplier?
I've tried various combinations of overpayments, refunds and all sorts but still can't get it to do what I want it to!
No point in making smart looking reports if the data cannot be Audited or analysed by the users.
Any ideas?
Basically, I want to create memorized reports with two specific classes so that I can track income/expensese against budget.
Am I making sense?
Previous staff have entered the payable as a full amount to the payable, which I believe is incorrect.
Can anyone give me a heads up on this?
Is it possible to alter the allocation of transaction data fields (as is possible in a csv or qif download)?
However I'm not sure how we get our Debtors off the Debtors Ledger once the factoring company has been paid in full.
How do I make an adjustment to make my "Sales Tax Payable" $0?
I read the posts in the community, in the guide and then decided to play around some.
Am I missing something?
Again, is this correct?
text isn't lining upNeed more character spacingunderstanding how the Word template margins work (that is the biggest nightmare).
As we buy, sell, lot trace and warehouse inventory I am using DEAR for this.
Are there any problems with option 1?
Any explanation that could make this simpler to understand would be great.
This is money held on behalf.
How should this be handled?
Any suggestion?
Am I over-complicating this?
Am I doing it right?
Am I missing something?
Any ideas?
au with the information on you and what you charge.
The problem is, if I want to work out what the $5000 is for in the budget (vs the actual), I have to recalculate making this format not useable for my purpose.
Could anyone please recommend the best practice in this scenario in order to get the depreciation posted?
I get charged each month but the amount differs depending on how much I have sold.
Any thoughts?
So I can claim back the GST i originally paid for at the Wholesalers.
According to HMRC I can reclaim VAT on purchases made prior to registration.
Any ideas?
How can I classify this transaction without it adding to my income?
Any ideas?
Is there something wrong with my settings?
So I want to flush out all the information and start again can this be done?
Anyone have a solution or an idea to try?
Is there anyway I can search by journal number to see if I can find out what happened.
Customers or Suppliers?
Any other suggestions/questions for my business model?
Please enable the client queries to be emailed to more than one person?
I purchased some stickers on behalf of a conference, using the company credit card.
I put content with Thai content and choose Tahoma font.
How is this done?
Any ideas?
Has anyone else had a problem with this and how did you fix it?
When I look at the budget I am not really sure which amounts relate to what.
Has anyone else experienced this issue and is there an easy solution?
Can anyone shed some light on this?
How do we clear these out?
How have others kept track of donors and been able to generate donor giving statements at the end of the year?
That is why we created a program to do this very quickly and automatically.
I do not collect sales tax from clients.
Anyone else with this problem.
How do I reconcile this transaction?
Am I missing something?
Is there a work around for this?
I've heard other companies do a journal to somehow show the income and cost of sale in the same month, can anyone advise how you do this?
I understand this is a system feature but its pretty useless to have a tax rate that can never be changed.
Why is this?
Is this a flaw?
I can process the expense claim but how do I then attribute the $1000 as a prepayment to the supplier?
Surely this is possible?
In annual statements, the dividends paid appears in the statement of cash flows, or the statement of changes in equity.
I don't see how to create a credit card purchase at the time of the purchase.
Any advise.
Any ideas?
But what is the distinction between Liability and Non-current Liability?
Any fix to this?
Is there a feature to select the tax table or is there something else I can do?
I have been told to enter as at 30/6/13 and with no tax which I can see how to do.
That is how the figures looked in MYOB before they converted!
pngCan anyone please explain as to why these codes are coming through (accumulated depreciation codes as per the photos always appear regardless of client, and in this case, the accumulated depreciation amount of $1824 is then coming through as a purchase code?
Is anyone experiencing this.
however whenever I import the next month's statement it misses the Payee Name and Gross amount.
Am I going insane?
Should these match?
So who is right and how do I fix this?
Is anyone else having this problem?
Can I post a journal that only picks up the GST?
Has anyone else come across this or have any advice please?
Could anyone advise how I would record the cost of fabrics purchased for the manufacture of dresses for a fashion business?
I will not do auto feed again.
However, is there any default  so that I can set up more conveniently?
Any referrals?
How can I do this?
I wish to see any debtors outstanding in a particulat tracking category.
If the latter is the case how do we treat the repayment and interest charges etc.
Are there any other ways of handling this?
Anyone else had similar problems  and a solution?
I really can't tell how this happened, as it was a while ago, but doesn't change the position I find myself in at the moment.
Any ideas?
How do I achieve this?
So, giving a very basic example, if a meal costs 100$ and GST was 5% (ie.
50$ can be claimed for GST purposes and the other 2.
Of course it is expected that this loan will be repaid to me, but whether it will be in one or multiple instalments is to be determined.
In other words, this is money that the company owes to me (via a loan), and there is no fixed timeframe to return this loan.
Then when the company has made enough money to repay the loan, whether by one or multiple instalments, how should I go about it?
I am not registered for GST therefore I do not charge GST on my sales to clients.
Any ideas?
These part payments were dated between 1 July and 31 July.
This is what I expected.
Is this a bug?
Has anyone had experience with deffered GST liability.
Any comments are welcome.
How then do I recognise the £0.
I'm sure there is a super simple answer!
I am wondering if perhaps I do not understand how the sales tax on purchases works.
I do not sell any product/service that includes a sales tax.
One of them is only used for paying withdrawals to a high volume of different payees.
Whats do you think?
Did anyone happen to meet these kind of situation?
Do you have any advice on how I should act upon it?
and there is no where to record the GST component of the asset.
Sorry I am a bit confusedregards Ian
How do I set up our employees' long service entitlements to accrue?
:)If so, any suggestion of number for classification ?
How do I combine them into 01 Asset.
So I am importing purchases from a previous accounting system (MYOB's AccountEdge, US version) via a clean CSV file.
"Prepayments" will then show up in the dropdown of step 4 above.
Any charges I make are listed here.
Anyone got a neat work around?
How do I fix this?
I am hoping that someone can shed some light on the problem!
Example: Car Rental with total VAT charge to me is 100 Euro.
Is this correct?
Is this possible?
, create rule (cannot do it on date range) ?
I do not expect to get any money back from these items for a while, as they are simply 'start up capital'.
Is this correct?
I can do a simple search but not a detailed search.
I understand how the tracking works and I have done this for all of the income, which all looks fine.
Is this really necessary?
I would be grateful for any comments/suggestions.
Any thoughts?
Is this something that can be pulled from the system or now?
Surely this is possible?
Has anyone been able to do this?
How can we enter the opening balance of the new credit cards?
Any offers?
Or do I download as a quickbook file?
00I now want to repay the loan but can't see how I would do the reverse of this.
Any suggestions?
How do I set my first VAT period to end on 31 May 2013, because it is currently showing VAT periods ending 3 months from 1 April 2013, which is wrong.
How do I reconcile the following items:1.
What do I do with these?
It is weird - or at least seems so to me ;)Would anyone be able to shed some light on what is happening here and what to do?
Any ideas?
What I am having trouble with is accounting for the first $5000 immediate tax deduction, in addition to the 15% depreciation for the 1st year.
GST of $120), and I earn $100 each month (excl GST of $10).
), debit Cash ($1320 or $1200? )
Am I missing something?
In Canada, we can claim back the HST paid on expenses against the amount of taxes charged to clients.
I have a problem in that on the balance sheet, the Withholding Tax is higher than it is supposed to be.
I can see what has happened, it has added the year before's withholding tax onto my current one, giving me the total of two years worth in my 2012 balance sheet.
Any advice would be very welcoming.
I'm a little confused as to where to enter in any receipts.
So if I'm doing this then I'm probably not doing expense claims and make everything a bill?
Any thoughts?
If I create a new Inventory item, lets say for service fee, do I enter price inclusive or exclusive of GST?
There is no VAT Return menu item in my reports tab.
I can’t fill the number by typing.
Would you please get someone amend the format properly?
I am working on a client's prior year financials.
Am I missing something?
Why can't I return back to the Income Statement I am working on once I reclassify a transaction?
Is this correct?
However, some of the line items are exempt and some carry tax.
This is what happens.
Is it too much to ask?
Any other suggestions?
How do I accound for the loss/gain based on the current exchange rate at the time?
Sometimes we hire out equipment and there is a deposit that is reimbursed when the items are returned.
Any suggestions?
And in doing so, as 'Owner A Drawings'/'Owner A Funds Introduced'.
55My question is then:What is the best accounting practice to deal with this issue?
How do others in the US market resolve this?
Hello,In my country Colombia there is the common Sales Tax (called IVA).
How do you deal with this scenario?
I have found this quite frustrating as  there don't seem to be any shortcuts for entering large volumes of data.
How do I do this manually?
Not sure if it's worth doing ti myself or getting someone to do on my behalf.
Any idea what costs are likely to be.
Any recommendations (I'm in Illinois)Thanksmark
My understanding is that this is included in the conversion balance so if I code it to the expense category this will double the income?
I am unable to change my Fixed Asset Start Date to any earlier than 1 Feb 2011.
Can someone please outline how this should be set up.
•	If it is high – what do you tell your client?
•	If it is low - what do you tell your client?
Any ideas?
This is straight forward.
But there is another requirement with regards to purchases from abroad.
which looks OK to me, but it might be more of a dirty fix.
Please can you tell me how I can do this and what the benefits are.
The start and end payments can also be different from intermediate payments.
A small % of the income is revenue but the majority is a liability that is payable to the charity.
Users can also donate to multiple charities and campaigns in a single transaction.
Any other suggestions?
At present there is no actual fix for this.
Has anyone else experienced these problems or found a better ‘workaround’?
The totals of the receipts are such that I can't "Decline" some of the receipts to bring the total to around 15,000.
How can I process this without leaving the claim partially unpaid?
We have also paid these expense claims so everything is good there.
Am I doing something wrong here?
How do I reverse or edit the sale of a fixed asset journal that has already been posted?
How do I get out of this bind?
My question is:What is the best practice for this?
Can anyone suggest how to do it.
305) any ideas?
The later would surely give me more details on how much I'm spending with each supplier?
Any ideas, or better yet any plans to get this added in as a new feature?
I wonder if any one can suggest which reports will give me similar info?
Is there a "turn rule on" button I am missing?
What am I doing wrong?
I can't see how I can do this.
Hello all,I am starting a business please excuse my limited knowledge.
I would welcome any thoughts or experiences of anyone else who has done this.
4) Can any of this be automated, and if so how?
How is one supposed to reconcile when the two reports are out?
I tried to use a credit note for that purpose, but credit notes do not apply to employees.
Am I wrong?
I have the notion that I'll use a money spend to transfer the disbursement, but how to I put the total repayment in?
Am I doing something wrong?
Any suggestions would be welcome.
What I cannot seem to figure out it how I can view the GL with comparatives for the previous year, similar to what you would see inside the MYOB AO GL.
Can anyone advise ?
this would give me the correct amounts, but i am unsure how this would stuff up my poor accountant.
I might be asking the wrong question here, so I'll lay out what I am doing and explain what I am trying to achieve.
I am selling a service for $497 + GST = $571.
I think I should be recording $571.
What journal can we complete that would allow us to move the wages from the 2012-13 year back into the 2011-12 year?
Anyone tried this with success?
The questions I have are:- Where and how I do enter that kind of deposit?
- Can I sent a reminder that I have to receive that money in 12 months time?
Any advice would be helpful.
How should this transaction be recorded?
I do not want to make it an expense because it is really a change to the shareholder wealth, is it not?
How do i do this?
should I do that?
if i do, then can i do it in bulk?
Please see the other thread for details:https://community.
am i doing something wrong?
These each include PAYE, Kiwisaver Employee deductions, and Kiwisaver Employer deductions.
So I'm guessing it should go against "Income Tax Expense", but that doesn't sound right either.
My question is, is there anyway I can convert my spend money to an expense claim without redoing the whole entry again.
Any ideas anyone?
Am I missing something?
If you are interested I can send you a PDF of the instructions.
Here is another question to allow me to close this year out:Stocktake - i have a figure for what we were holding at the year end.
So where and how do i post this figure, to boost profit (and the balance sheet) for the year?
I think this part is correct?
Am I right?
Has anyone else been in a similar situation?
Any ideas?
Is there an issue at the moment?
How do I reconcile them?
If Yodlee can work with FastNet Classic then there shouldn't be any reason why it can't work with FastNet Business as well.
At the moment we have to export the whole list which is time consuming.
Any advice?
So I pull the GL into Excel and gave them this.
', 'What is your memorable name?
Thanx for any advice you can offer.
Please note that my priority is to record these entries (about 200) correctly, the time that it will take me is not important to me, as long as it is entered correctly, I will be happy - Cheers
What am I doing wrong?
It doesn't represent revenue or equity.
Any thoughts?
How is it best to input the data into the bill for reconciling the purchase of this item and how should I set up tracked inventory to sell it singularly?
The only down side is that when we purchase, we have to ensure the quantity is put in correctly.
Can't see how to change the view.
One of the owners created the company website which should have a fair market value of about 1080 USD based on how much it would cost a customer.
Is it possible to merge these?
We have money available in our company, my husband is director and I am shareholder and we are both "employees" on an annual income.
can we loan it to ourselves (employees) and repay through our weekly salary?
Could anyone please guide me on best practices for NYC?
Please can anyone offer me any advice on how to get over this problem.
How can I do this, please?
Create a bill but do not send it?
Getting really frustrated by this as there is a considerable amount of money involved.
Question is -I can only seem to 'Refund' an overpayment but obviously I am not going to do this.
It is strange that there isn't an option to input the QTY when I'm inputting the inventory itemThanks, Barret
I have recently refinanced to St George from NAB and have been advised that St George can not send data feeds for standard loans.
Has anyone got a work around other than uploading Statements
It is saying there have not been any which is incorrect.
Is there a time period over which this occurs and has anyone else had this problem?
Can we do this?
-Do you have a large 'basket of goods' which you order?
-Do you order from multiple wholesalers/suppliers?
io if you have any questions.
We are now at a level were it is very hard to keep track of all the customers so any feedback is much appreciated!
Any ideas?
I'm running into this more and more as I primarily work with growing small business owners.
I have clients that sell items and have a very limited number of them on-hand if any.
Has anyone else had this problem?
Company currently run a small fleet of 7 or so vans.
Is there a benefit to having more codes over using tracking?
To me fuel costs (or whatever) are fuel costs and then it can be drilled down if required.
Is anyone willing to chat about this?
Any suggestions?
Could you anyone explain to me?
Is there anything similar in Singapore?
Of course, cost, ease of use in the app are necessary.
However I don't see how I can record a 'declaration' of the shareholder salary in the system.
Are there any other options for this?
au in year 2015. due to the nature of his business he perform in his investment property.
Can anyone suggest why this might be happening?
This has not happened before, I have no idea what to do - any ideas?
And, if this is possible, can this feature be switched on and off.
I do not understand exactly how is this working.
I can do it individually on each expense by putting 0.
Maybe it has been there before, but this is the first time that I have noticed it.
Has anyone else seen this before and am I missing something?
Overheads (regular expenses that are fixed amounts over time such as rent, insurance, wages, car loans and licencing), 3.
Has anyone got any advice on how to achieve this?
What am I doing wrong?
Is there a solution to this?
Can anyone tell us how or why it would have stopped?
What tax codes do I chose for each line in the Journal entry?
Anyone else having this problem?
I am on a Samsung Galaxy S4, so maybe it's my old hardware
I have no approved any expenses so can still change it but i'm not sure what I am meant to do.
Do i enter this as a asset or loan.
How do i do this?
I have tried speaking to Santander Business Banking about this and the response was totally not helpful (it was as if I was asking for the moon on a plate! )
Can anyone recommend a Global Gateway system that will do the job?
Is this correct?
How do I reconcile part payments?
What am I missing?
How should I handle this?
Any thoughts?
How do I sort this and stop the feed first (de-activating?
Once de-activated how would I get the feeds working correctly?
I am a bit disappointed this has happened.
Please can you call me on 0437 070 233 ASAP to discuss.
Is there any explanation for this.
If somebody can give me an idea how to fix this that would be much appreciated.
Is there any hope for me?
It would be easier for parents to understand if it is a date range, not a week number.
Is this possible?
How do i fix this?
I am a start-up.
Is this possible?
Apologies if this has been asked before, but I searched with my very primitive accounting terminology, and couldn't find what I was after.
Do I somehow do a split transaction?
How do I go about removing my old accountant from my instance?
Currently I have to do a manual check to ensure all rent is paid.
Any suggestions?
Will I be informed of any changes made outside of my own?
What am I missing?
Am I off track?
Same for phone or water charges.
What is the best method to use, to reconcile these items?
How do I get the correct beginning balance entered?
Surely this can be included in the options somewhere.
Do I take my accounting else where?
or is there actually a solution to this, what should be simple, problem?
Then I can transfer the funds from Merchant Services to Checking.
(*In case you're wondering - it has to be a limited company because no-one will consider grant / social tech funding for sole traders/individuals).
Any ideas what's gone wrong please?
We have already used both of the tracking categories which are needed for sales categories, unfortunately these can't be removed.
How do I avoid this?
My company is delivering value to customers progressively throughout this process.
How do I clear these off?
No matter where I go I cannot get back to the page where I added the column so I can edit/delete it.
I would presume it is the theme but that doesn't seem to be it.
Is this normal?
Also on related note where do I enter customer's ABN number?
HiCan anyone give me a ballpark figure on what you would charge to setup the unleashed inventory system for a client?
How can I do this?
SO basically I didn't claim any expenses for that quester.
How do I amend that previous BAS and can that BAS be submitted again to the ATO?
How I can do that?
I can do it via an expense claim but it is a big amount around 10K going back to original investor.
HiI am in process of set up a new customer, who has tracked inventory.
So the above sounds very clunky - what should I be doing to simplify ?
This means the totals are not based on what I require as a weekly amount.
How do other sole traders workout their earnings and expenditure so they can draw out a wage accurately?
How can I do this?
How do we save the customised layout that is in progress?
What the what?
If you do not take care when matching transfers as above you end up with this problem.
These receipts can relate to one or more events.
Can't reconcile either line 1 or 2.
Has anyone resolved this issue?
Any advice please?
I am completely puzzled.
Any ideas?
How do I reconcile money in from an equipment hire company that is a refund of the deposit we paid?
How do other manage this?
I do believe its happening for a reason.
Has anyone else had this problem?
how to change the opening balance please
Is this something I can do myself ?
I don't ever post any.
Can anyone make a recommendation?
This is INCORRECT.
Our business is in South Africa, so VAT management is critical, I am the manager, accountant, payroll, no other person is here.
Question is what is the other side of that manual journal entry to balance the $100k?
Is this a bug?
How should I reconcile this transaction?
Pension cost or pension payable?
My understanding is that you can only create a maximum of 100 instances within a category so we will get to a point soon where this is no longer an option.
Perhaps I am not doing it correctly so appreciate advice.
I keep around $100 in there to cover the cost of a fuel fill up.
How would you class these to make sure they sum up right in the reports AND/OR the business performance?
I'm hoping this covers it all or is there anything else I should be doing?
Apologies if this is all basic stuff, but new to all this!
Can anyone tell me how to enter a petrol receipt.
I am a sole trader and do not claim expenses.
Ie Netflix, take out food etc, Do I allocate those to owner drawings?
How and where do I allocate these?
Why do they not match.
I am not sure how has this happened but assuming someone within the company has done this, we ran a test to see if we can detect this.
I can not believe such a flaw exist in the system.
Has anyone set this up successfully?
Some of these say 'Turned Off'Some say 'Turned Off For Contact'What is the difference?
Anyone have any input?
How can I get the feed going into the correct business?
How do I do this and then reconcile against the refund?
How ever upon looking at the Trial Balance i have noticed that an amount of &#163;1337.
Any ideas of how should I go about this?
1% say they have not experienced any benefits.
How do I mark bills as paid?
I have a sole trader consulting business which involves travel I can bill to my client.
Am I right about this?
However, it seems that I have to do some sort of conversion from my previous accounting software (which I don't have).
Am I doing something wrong?
Is there anyway to either undo this, or reset the balance to be shown as of the latest tax period?
As anyone experienced this before and how can I fix it?
Any thoughts?
Appreciate any input.
I created a number of credit notes for customers earlier in the year.
how do i fix this?
Or will it be due annually when filed if owed?
How do I bring this cash into Petty Cash.
Any ideas?
I cannot seem to see how i can search for a specific expense claim, either on a supplier or reference basis.
Here is where I saw something very strangeAll expenses are shown as credit and sales are shown as debit.
Is this a bug?
My question is how do I separate the percentage from the total amount?
Is there a video I can watch?
Am I going mad?
Any advice or assistance would be helpful.
Curious how others do it?
This is not my first year of trading, but first using any kind of accounting software.
I don't have any business assets per se.
I have a number of small imports which I am charged for by the post office on delivery.
How do you all handle this and what's recommended?
We manufacture food with the components all in the same category, 001 Ingredients which is what goes against the COGs.
Now I've realised that I should do a blank entry for stock on hand and seperate line items for manufacturing and packaging costs.
How the hell do I fix all this?
This is a really critical error, and .
How are other users recording expenses, which are paid out of the cash register in a retail store?
Let's say:Is this doable?
What i should i do with them ?
I now have to go back and edit a year's worth of data and am wondering what code I should use.
Can anyone suggest something please?
How do we find the information about their product?
I'm assuming lots of multi site contractors must have similar problems and I'd really welcome any feedback from success stories.
Would welcome anyone's thoughts.
Seems odd to put down how many units I'm selling without saying what a unit is.
On a monthly basis I am always chasing my kitchen staff for missing receipts (credit/debit card).
Is there a best practice?
How do I do this?
How do I enter this new bill or modify the old one so that everything is accurate?
Is this right?
This can be up to $5000 at a time.
Then there is also the GST side of it all.
Any suggestions?
How do I enter and reconcile that.
Can anyone else give examples of how they show R&D on there balance sheets?
I am using American Express.
How do I record a transaction where I would use tracked inventory on hand for a job w/o directly billing the customer for that inventory?
Basically a use tax and that's what the state calls it.
Also what do I code purchases of materials that will be resold to the customer?
the tax rates, what is advisable for this type of expense?
But that for me is where the ease endsIssue 1.
At the end of the day we may have taken &#163;525 in cash (&#163;475 in notes and &#163;50 in variouse denominations of coins).
Any experience with such a client/system?
Did not have any a list of Fixed Assets completed.
How do I manage the every growing list of contacts year after year (maybe 1,000 new ones a year) ?
Very grateful for any ideas
And then code as Directors remuneration or salaries?
Any ideas how to do this?
What is the current best practice for the Contact Name field for a non-business type customer?
So I added some parts to inventory today for the first time and made several New Adjustments.
Is there anything?
I have a small sideline business where any money made that month is split two ways.
How do i enter this transaction in ?
This is is spite of them being supplied with full statements going back to the last nil balance.
How do I sort this out?
Any thoughts?
Any ideas?
How do we record this to write off completely under the immediate write off for investment under $20k?
Do I:Record as asset (motor vehicle) : gst on capital expenses : Depreciate it at 100% immediately?
So all sales are done via our epos till system and either paid for in cash or debit card machine.
When I looked at timetable of scheduled feed there is nothing under Paypal Australia.
Or am I missing something?
Any ideas?
Any advice on providers and ability to do both would be awesome!
Our solution saves time and reduces errors while also giving you one consistent user interface.
Or would this cause issues as I am not at arms length?
If not what is the next step for me?
e. g. there is a line item for $800 GST on a $1000 bill.
Any ideas?
Are they Assets or Liabilities?
Should this be filed as an overhead?
Has anyone encountered a similar issue and how do you manage it?
csv or .
Any thoughts?
#2: So far, having chosen not to link it, this is what I'm doing.
is this a bad idea?
Is this wrong headed of me?
How can he change the template so they don't show the VAT and VAT line?
There is a tax called Retención en la Fuente that is payable by the buyer on certain goods and services - there are different rates depending on the type of good/service (for example, for property it's 1% while for professional fees it's 10%).
What are the consequences?
Is there a better solution?
Sometimes a client cancels a day or week, so I would delete those dates for that week or day.
Any ideas?
any reporting i want to do is for my customer ("A").
Is that still the only solution?
I was wondering can it be modified to show their hours instead.
What is the definition of a direct cost?
Do I ignore it?
Is there a fix for this?
I can't seem to reverse the overpayment or edit the dates.
HiCan anyone recommend a reliable debt collection agency?
this is very time consuming.
any ideas?
Our credit control is excellent (not a single bad debt in 3 years) and debtor days of less than 20.
Thank you for any replies.
Has anyone else had this issue?
My client do work for a management company, who has many sub branches.
Then this is paid again.
If I want to re-print them, do I have to go back into re-preparing them?
That is now not happening i. e. the "sent" is not changing to "viewed".
Is there a setting issue ?
Any answers?
I can't believe there isn't a contact number for the support team or even the sales department.
However, there is no simple relationship between individual daily sales and the amount we actually receive from the card company.
Any advice would be most welcome.
This means that what I’m claiming as mileage allowance (45p / mile expense) is being cancelled out by the travel expenses I charge to my client (50p / mile income)!
Our company registered for VAT in the middle of the business year.
This is MYOB level of crappiness.
Anyone with more accounting savvy than me (which should be everyone on here! )
thought it might be a one off, but there is a second one missing for another company.
I can export data out but where do I import it in?
Can anyone advise of training options on the gold coast for utilising workflowmax?
What I want to do is be able to drill down to work out what individual budget line items feed the overall budget figure.
Is there a plug in for this sort of thing?
I'm researching how we can go about putting a paperless system into place and am a bit stumped on something.
This is where I become stumped though.
Any suggestion would be fantastic.
Is this do-able?
Do retentions properly to accounting standards - both client & sub-contractor sides.
Looking to bring on a restaurant client - any bombs we should be concerned?
Or are they Direct Costs?
I am a member of a barter club.
How do I do this?
Any suggestions?
Other than writing quotes the package is light on with CRM tools.
Is there a trick I'm missing in terms of "Contacts"?
- "General travel"  for any tram, bus, rail, taxi expense?
how do you do that?
I've got an expense that has several portions to it, that I want to track, but there is also a discount on the expense.
Any thoughts/suggestions/best practice ideas would be great.
Cannot access and get an error screen that says:We're sorry, a problem has occurred.
Please either click the back button or click this link to return to the previous screen and try again.
What You Can Expect From The Famous 5 Step Guide To Local SEO Your endless head scratching is over.
How can I do this?
Any ideas how I can change this?
is this at all possible?
This could you save you a lot of manual effort and reduce data entry errors.
Here's one I  am pretty darned sure I already entered.
How can I search, say on the seller's name, or on the receipt date or total, to see if it pops up?
Any suggestions?
I have no idea where to go to fix this - any answers?
Can anyone recommend a supplier to me please?
Is this possible?
A friend loaned me some money to start the company.
How can I do this?
My dilemma is to work out what price would I put as cost price?
How do I deal with this issue?
Any suggestions, please.
Can anyone please provide any suggestions?
If that is the case then how should it be recorded within the Asset Register for depreciation, etc.
Has anyone out there had trouble importing CSV files from MAC?
Anyone I could talk to for advice?
Is there are website featuring a reseller I can look at?
Thank you in advance for any suggestions.
However, I am unsure how to handle the GST claim for the items purchased individually before incorporation.
Any feedback most welcome!
I am seeking something that will link with a CRM so we can track donors and donations.
Any charities who have done it would welcome some ideas.
Any change you can create an alias email for us to send files to.
Am I missing something, or do I have to research each customer's tax rate before I create a quote for them?
Could anyone recommend an automated cost effective solution to my problem?
How would i do that.
How do I do that to so the full sale amount of $1150 but include the certegy fee?
This is all that is written under description at the moment - &#171;TableStart:LineItem&#187; &#171;Description&#187;
We are a wholesaler and some customers provide us with their permit so we don't charge them sales tax.
How can we make it so based on the customer type we have different pricing?
If I'm in the wrong place please refer me.
I also do wholesaling (basic invoicing) and provide design services.
It also seems there's a heavy bias in the profession to Quickbooks because of it's near monopoly in accounting software as well as it's great features.
We're do private label manufacturing and design for multiple clients.
But what typically happens is that instead of getting 1,000 tshirts, we get 980 or 1,020.
Is this doable?
I'm sure I'm missing something and would appreciate any insight.
Any advice?
Can someone please send me a good format to follow that works in the industry
We was informed you can do this.
Can someone advise as to why this could be?
I can't seem to be able to find the connection on the Kiwibank site.
Please bear with me, this (and the following questions! )
I am looking into starting a bookkeeping business.
I'm in the process of changing my business in the US from a sole proprietor to an LLC.
But is there some reason I should not do that?
:0Are there any other innovative ways out there for improving this area?
Any other ideas out there?
So it begs the question, is there a time lag in Zero to record theseBill Smith
Anyone experienced in how these should be handled?
I can make this issue re-occur by:- Editing the first line.
- Deleting some of the template text.
This may sound a little daft but I would rather ask and avoid any future issues.
Any ideas?
com/business/discussion/159720/)But where do I start?
Anyone else done this?
Am I doing something wrong?
Any Ideas?
Any other solutions anyone got working?
This is where I get stuck.
How do I distinguish incomes for between the two businesses?
My books in QuickBooks are reconciled up to the 22nd of July.
This is fine.
How do I best approach this?
I'd really greatly appreciate and welcome anybody's comments, thoughts, experience, etc.
Any ideas?
I imagine most others would do this too so they have some idea of a Financial position.
But this is skimmed over in all the "how to's " that I've seen.
I am using Adviser + Manage User permissions.
Am I missing something?
I am a sole trader company and recently bought a second hand van for AUD 6000 which is used for business purposes only.
However, if I go into the reports section, there it is.
So my question is do I use Purchases/Bills or Expense Claims for putting my expenses in?
Think parcel tracking, should be simple right?
Otherwise can you suggest any other packages?
I am stuck with how to display my line items as subtotals (quantity x unit price) without the discount being taken out.
How do enter into a new line in the reference part?
My client is changing from a sole trader to a company.
Their only suggestion is to run both subscriptions, which obviously suits them as we are paying for   two subscriptions with 15% discount.
Shop will only take cash or credit/debit card payments.
And a quote may be a quote for month and might then or might not turn into a real job.
Anyone?
There is no drop down at all.
I'm wondering if there are any other alternatives that I'm not aware of?
Any other ideas?
Is there a setting I'm missing somewhere?
My sole trader status has changed not a long ago and now I am registered for GST (I wasn't before).
anyone no how this can be done
Any ideas?
Any ideas?
What am I missing here?
Any suggestions?
What am I missing?
I can't see anything in the dashboard.
If I purchase the monthly subscription, is there any limit to the number of clients files I can have?
How do you claim total GST credits on hire purchase during the quarter ?
I work in the office of my parents' company, a special effects company in South Africa.
The question is, how can I move forward?
Any takers?
Any thoughts, as I say its not a complicated business, no discounts, no inventory etc etc.
This is no joke.
You can text me there or email me, rick@discountelectronics.
Can some one guide me what is the solution for it?
Any ideas?
Suggestions would be appreciated.
Is this possible?
Any ideas?
One thing that bugs me though, is the customer contact addresses.
So, for example, I'll have an order from a customer in Dublin, with the country allocated to Dominican Republic; or a customer in Cork will be Croatia, Antrim will be Armenia etc etc.
The rest of the address that the customer inputs is all correct.
Anybody have any idea how to fix this?
Today's announcement of blistering bonuses all round was the final nail in the coffin.
In the first few years of operation, my business and I were interchangeable.
Do there exist any dire consequences to this approach?
Have a lot of casual staff working in 2 or 3 different cost centres - "categories" but cannot work out how to setup this in the payroll.
They've given me the amount of overpayment and advised that I include this in box 4 of my next return.
Also, how should I record the relevant Insurance Expense in accrual basis?
Can anyone kindly answer my questions?
We do cash-based accounting.
I do this every day and AccountEdge makes it easy.
What do you guys do?
Can anyone provide further guidance on this.
Am I missing something?
If this is the case what do I use for a tax code as I am not registered for GST.
Any suggestions or guidance to this topic elsewhere.
How should we go about entering this dummy order?
How can I do this?
I have managed to get one back to where it should be but I cannot work out the rest.
But if they don’t, they should!
I cannot find the answer as to whether this is possible and if there is an extra charge.
One thing that we're finding is that the data flowing from these banks is quite inconsistent.
i. e. the data showing up in the feed is different from what is displayed when data is exported through any other mechanism.
Can anyone point me in the right direction.
Any suggestions?
I welcome anyone's thoughts or suggestions.
Any ideas.
How do I setup a USD budget if my home currency is AUD?
I am not registered for GST either.
Because I am Not-Reportable for GST/Tax.
Has anyone done this?
What category should I label this cash out transaction?
Unsure what to do, I then marked them as paid through a new category called "Shoeboxed Receipts".
Also how do I import receipts from Shoeboxed as already paid?
Please update the mapping below.
so say i received $1,000 dollars in the week  for work carried out how do i get it to record super deducted from that amount and the correct tax amount.
Any advise greatly appreicated ;-)
)To fix, open in Notepad or other text editor:Remove the lines below and remember to save with .
I wish that you can remove the mandatory registering for customers.
What do others think?
Any suggestions?
Is there away we can undo awaiting for approval but still have the quote in the draft section?
I want to be able to include to components used in manufacture in our inventory so we can easily see how many are on hand.
can I do this?
is this possible.
Is this true and is there anything on the road map that would allow us who can't be trusted to still access reporting?
How do I fix this?
Your adviser goes off to another part of the world and you can’t get hold of him/her and the bills stop being paid.
Anyone else with experience with these sort of problems?
I read both of these forum answers and am now in a muddle.
Any ideas?
Any ideas on how to get around this?
(We do most leisure driving in my Wife's SUV. )
The problem is, I've no idea how I figure depreciation on a 2005 carAnyone got any ideas?
How should I correctly enter it, so that I get the right deductions?
This is mainly to share files with contractors.
We charge our clients a fixed fee and also reimburse our consultants' expenses.
How do I remove one URL reference for ONE customer that has been issued.
The answers I'm getting are how to remove the option globally for all customers, I don't want that.
com Any idea how to make this setting?
If not, any plans to?
Anyone keen to take it for a spin?
How do I prevent this from being listed as a liability.
Take a look, watch the video, try the quiz and see how your answer stacks up :)
it might go into early 2013.
Any thoughts?
What we're trying to figure out is how to reconcile expenses.
Any ideas?
Is there any other/better ways people are doing this?
All suggestions would be greatly received.
There is also an issue with sales tax for small companies - this thread
Any ideas on how to minimise the manual effort to sync repeats with a calendar?
Do credit card and eftpos sales go through as a separate receive money transaction?
Anyone got any experience of Australian pick &pack warehouse service firms?
Any ideas anyone?
How do we ensure we have the required documentation for ATO compliance.
In that I can't reconcile the amount against the statement as have had a credit debt for the period, how can I clear this up?
Can I delete or void the overpayment?
Do most small businesses not require this?
I. e. is monthly comparison more important than trying to get overview for tax returns?
* for SEO metrics -- my other hat in life is a digital consultant, that tool crosses the divide.
Can anyone assist?
How do I do this?
Is it possible to delete notes against a contact?
Further, is it possible to delete a contact altogether?
Also if there is no activity in the period it won't show the opening & Closing balance either  - can this be changed?
I do regular garden work for 4 units/flats.
Is this a bug or is there a fix for this?
I would love to hear what your overall purchase process is.
Do others have similar situations?
All of this is fine.
:)   Any information would be helpful,,Cheers
I am in the processing of setting up a web business and would appreciate opinions on what services I should be using.
1) Is it possible to import expense claims?
(e. g. csv file)2) Can expense claim be marked as billable to a customer?
Anybody had any previous experience of this - it would be great to hear from you!
Anyone recommend anything?
So thinking i was being clever (and obviously not thinking! )
However, some emails aren't directly from the contact in question.
It would be much handier if there was a selection box next to each repeating journal so that multiple journals could be deleted with ease.
Also, possibly a default start date that can be set per client or possibly linked to the start of the financial year.
or both?
The entire 'Reciepts' process on the apps is heavily biased to an employee  'claims' process that as a sole operator is not something I use.
This is poor software design.
Please contact me to advise of how it could be used meantime until it is up and running on your system
However, you can do this only for one contact at a time, so although helpful, it is of limited use.
Is there a work around?
Surely under the leave tab of the app you can have one page for approved leave, and one page for pending requests?
If there were a page where you could view all uploaded files such as 'Upload History' page this would make it easy to see what has been uploaded.
I'm paying Office 365, Skype, Ebay, Telstra using Paypal, as it's easier for me to do reconciliation.
In some cases this reduces the stock to zero.
There is NO indication of which item, so it becomes necessary to check each item which is being reduced to 0.
4960 or 1.
5000 or 1.
What I have done is to post a manual adjustment – adding 1 to the stock on the date of the credit note.
(for each item with this condition)Then the credit note can be approved.
Our small business includes psychologists employed by our company (Site 1) and sole trading psychologists (Site 2).
It is an easy task, but a monotonous one that occupies about half an hour a week at present.
The problem with the current template is that it doesn't import the primary person/s' name so that the email will be addressed to "Dear (blank)" (where NO contact is imported into the email template), or "Dear North Wales Police Force" (where the *ContactName is imported if it is a company name).
I understand its been available in the US for some time now.
At the end of the month or week or what ever period.
Once a quote is accepted it would be nice if there was:A.
Of course this is possible with any item from any period that has not been closed, but I see it as much more likely to happen accidentally with quotes.
What do you think?
Or the total Profit of all 10 organizations at any point in time.
Or the total Debtors & Creditors of all 10 Organzations at any point in timeOr total Assets & Liabilities at any point in time .
Can you please stop merging cells in reports exported to Excel.
If you want to centre something across several cells there is a command for that, but I have even seen empty cells merged.
Can we have the send payslips feature available before "processing payroll" that send the FPS to the HMRC.
Maybe it will be better to be enabled only if there is a Contact chosen in the Contact dropdown.
The idea is to be able to click and print, and see how was the evolution since January, February, March, until now.
How can I do that?
This would reduce the amount of time I spend now entering them.
We had been previously advised to put a "-" in between it to fix the issue, but this is ridiculous.
With some emails being forwarded to the inbox, up to 9 (in one case) pictures can be added to the inbox separately.
This also creates the potential for error if this contact needs updating in future - it will take a long time to update in the first place, and then you might miss one or two of the versions while updating.
This column is essential.
Why is there no day placeholder?
Or "Current Date" placeholder?
**** When this feature was created were any small businesses asked about this feature ?
- The Business Directory is there to improves our user's experience, reduce business costs and ensure the accuracy of data.
Currently we can  easily using the "adjustments" section.
Please allow the option to have delivery contact and details at the top of a purchase order.
Or please allow us the option to customize our documents as a whole a little bit more.
Please allow us to move the location of the delivery details.
It makes it hard to see what the staff are working on when.
Can this not been setup to be done automatically after any editing and approval?
That is not a smooth action right now, as the supplier name in the 'edit bill' page is a text field, not a hyperlink.
This is huge!
Hey guys, Hopefully this wouldn't be too much of a fix but could you please make it so that I could click into the supporting document of a matched transaction, before I click ok.
If possible, please create one more function which can sum up the working days automatically by each employees.
Is there currently any planned feature or exiting feature I could use for that?
Would anyone else find this useful?
There should be an explanation of what caused the error.
staff could note the basis upon which items have been changed, or how a prediction has been made.
This is ridiculously oblique for modern software!
No explanation or staff training would be required.
This is how software should work.
Hello - I'm surprised there is no parse function for e-receipts - i. e. Uber, air bnb, facebook ads etc.
Although as a manager I can reject the request it would make sense for the individual to be able to withdraw or amend their own leave requests
Can this be looked into from the appropriate team?
Please can you show the USI number at an employees superannuation membership details.
Please change it so I can do so.
This would assist in keeping track of these extra payments in the tax management section.
The email is received as a simple text email, with a link to the bill.
Can you please look at making tracking an editable feature in fixed assets without having to unlock periods?
gst or perhaps income in one column and gst in the next, specifically on the dashboard.
This could be achieved by either making the currency symbol a stand alone sortable column in the purchases table (i. e. sorting payments by clicking on the currency heading) or by adding a currency search option in the search dialog.
Is it possible to transfer attachments when converting a purchase order to a bill?
This is quite time consuming considering the volume of assets that we would have to upload.
Can you please include columns for the tax depreciation information to make this process easier for us?
How do others deal with this ?
It would be useful for "standard user" to edit approved POs, so they can insert the "delivery" date and create a bill from the purchase order.
Unfortunately since doing this the Fortnightly Total hours in the top right corner of the timesheets includes both the say 6 hours base hourly rate plus the penalty rate  which results in an indication the staff have worked 12 hours instead of 6.
Is there yet a '12 month rolling' income total that we can place on the dashboard?
Is this possible?
Can we get the search feature built in?
Quickbooks has this feature and is a significant time saver.
In New Zealand or in some other countries, every year NFP organisations have to issue donation tax receipts to their members so the latter can claim from inland revenue a third of their contribution as tax refund.
signature line of a treasurer or general secretary.
I have had an employee ask if i could send his payslip to 2 email addresses; is this possible - if not is it possible to make it so?
if Two software can do this Job, Why not one?
This will become a problem if we have ceased trading and/or cancelled our subscription.
Can we get a system to send them all as attachments in one email?
As of right now, it is locked the moment it is added to any PO in any status.
Our books close on the last day of February (the standard financial year end in South Africa).
I guess  this question is also relevant to 1st year discounts.
Currently I have to use a calculator which is totally unsatisfactory.
Or have another column that states what is missing next to the "Missing Details. "
This would be a great feature, as in some companies, benefits differ between staff members, and privacy would be maintained.
Or totals on each Deductions made for all employess per month eg: ACC, NPF, PAYE etc.
OR, have a separate section for Employees in the contacts, which has security settings around it.
Can we please have a pop-up warning that we are entering a date into the future.
This is really awful, and we can't now reconstruct what was in the last VAT return for this client.
Please do this changes as soon as possible it helps a lot of your customers.
Some of the older generation are unaware that the 3 dots equates to a menu or more details.
This is messy as statements no longer match what has previously been sent to clients.
This would save an unnecessary 2 page loads and at least 2 page interactions.
I prefer putting all purchases there instead of as a direct expense because I do not want to inflate revenue or expenses.
It is more likely that you will be removing a client from a group rather than deleting an entire group so why is the deleting option so readily available?
Sometimes there are dozens of purchases a month, which is inefficient and impractical for some of the busier clients I have.
This would also be helpful in the case of DBAs.
I see that the suggestion is to use the Reference field.
Frankly,  I’m surprised there isn’t a customer PO field already that is tracked through the whole process.
This feature would be great if it could be extended to iOS systems as well.
This would extend to any type of approved leave.
It is the same calendar widget that is currently available to the payroll administrator role.
This is a common mistake, please make it easier to correct our mistakes.
But this is a problem when going from a high-denomination currency to a low-denomination one.
A quick solution is to allow more digits.
It is really time consuming to upload multiple expenses.
This should be part of the custom notifications we can set up in HQ.
What I'm looking for is similar to how software developers typically have a mailing list for commits to their software repositories.
I believe currently one always has to actively go to review recent activity, which is tedious.
On most other software we use or have used in the past, you can put in a Quantity and a final Total and the Units will be calculated automatically.
Unless I am missing something?
When sending an Activity Statement to a client for signing, can there be a field for sending a copy of the AS to the clients' bookeeper/director?
This is especially an issue when entering claim items which do not attract VAT, such as train fares.
Please can we have transaction numbers or unique identifiers for each transaction.
Can you please make the 'Take Photo' function available in Safari too please?
05 or +/- &#163;0.
If not, can this post be moved to the feature request forum please?
At the moment clients with manage user permissions can change their role to advisor and then inadvertently overwrite dates etc without realising the implications.
Some of the expense items are rechargeable to the client.
I can see no slot on the template for this.
what the!
Can you please put this on agenda to discuss for further improvements going forward?
Please look at increasing the boundaries.
Maybe I am not familiar with customizing reports enough to show this, if it is already available?
Most of the people use H&R block for their taxes, which can't be completely accurate, becauseXero gives the most accurate financial information about the business 24/7.
This can be time consuming finding the line with the issue.
Currently have to enter these manually and if there are changes they could easily be overlooked.
I think this is a much needed feature, as there are many instances in which my contacts and such are different than the actual company for whom they are associated with, or from time to time a check needs to be made payable to an name/company other than what we have in the system.
When Print is selected an additional option box needs to be added to this screen, as pre-populating every return with {{_es_:signer1:signature}} is highly frustrating when preparing group packs.
This is a problem, as my income and expenses do not get allocated to a department.
Some come up correctly automatically  ie Depreciation, Insurance, Interest, Repairs & Maintenance etc and would save time when mapping.
Have spoken to the team and there is no allowance for this at present.
This is unnecessary waste of time.
Do it now.
What would be helpful is if the auto prompt to "allocate credit notes" could have the option to be suspended/active.
or similar.
Currently we cannot do so.
I acknowledge the fact that this is to secure our client data from "Identity theft" but there are countless other ways for someone to hack in and steal our clients information.
If you can make it so that we can turn the feature on/off as we please, that would be most appreciated.
Maybe there should be a "suspend" option?
We sell online then deliver, as far as I can tell I cannot print a list of orders inc items and contact details.
Why should we have to manually fill in a form to amend a TPAR when the original can be so easily created at the push of a button.
This is really handy when we have a client that is switching from reporting GST on a cash to an accruals basis.
if possible, is there an option to turn off real-time search on inventory?
Would be great to have a field specifically for notes that can stretch across the entire width of the page, easing readability and reducing chances of a note spilling onto a second page.
My initial thoughts on how this would work would be to use the current "Allocate Credit Note? "
This could be linked to customers, or certain orders, or particular items.
If this is correct, you can disregard this email.
Is there any news on making the barclays.
This can only be done if the expenses are added via the PC initially.
Although we can create an extra line to show the actual amount of discount given or promised as a workaround, it defeats the whole purpose of having the Discount function in the Invoicing module in the first place.
If you're hearing impaired as I am, it's can be a struggle to follow audio instructions.
It isn't hard to bring in a captioning feature on the videos, can you consider getting them added please.
Can you do this please?
Problem is that in the UK that will cost me £22 per month which is prohibitively expensive.
Indeed, if it were free it might well attract self-employed people, or people who run SME businesses who aren't currently (for some strange reason) using it.
ie Either RDI or RDI - Ballance fertiliser.
At the moment, you can do this only if you manually put in depreciation rate on the first time you register the asset.
Currently, can only compare the previous 11 periods.
It would be good to have a 12 period option at least because then can run the 12 period comparison and delete the months between.
This is very time-consuming.
When will you fix this as when we re-import CSV files any manual line-breaks are lost.
I don't ever post any.
Can we talk to CBA and get this fixed please?
Is there anyway we can open a "local" version which  means changes can be updated directly without having to resave?
Both are really useful, but could you rename one of them to make it clear which is which?
It would be very useful to be able to attach sipporting documents to each Item number in the tax returns so that a reviewer can access these documents which will assit in the review process.
Ability to be able to edit note if there is a typing error once saved to the contact.
Is this a possibility?
At the moment, I can upload my receipts or document into the folders.
Then I can attached the file from the folder in the library.
I would be great if we can do that.
The current method is I have to enter each condition manually: Hilton, Hertz, Southwest as part of my "Travel" rule for every client.
Once the Family Trust Election has been made or inputted into a return, it should be rolled over with the other data that is rolled over - when that option is taken.
Creating receipts is what I do most on the go.
So an administrator of the company can get a quick overview of what's been processed throughout the day / week / month.
The check number can be voided and AUTOMATICALLY REASSIGNED?
BASIC ACCOUNTING function should allow the user to change the number to an accurate one.
This can't be hard to achieve.
It could be in the same row as the gross wages total to show how many hours the employee.
Can this be aligned to the decimal point.
I'm aware there are new training concepts coming in so that people can train in more relevant topics to meet their usage needs, but surely if you can view our login and transaction history, that indicates a substantial knowledge base.
Please can you make it possible to link items in the inventory  to contacts for procurement, as if using suppliers product codes for the item code, for simplicity, a problem arises when two different suppliers have the same product codes, either for different products, which confuses or the same, which means you cant see a price comparison, this would aid greatly when completing purchase orders, to mirror supplier quotations.
com/obvious-but-overlooked/For tech companies, even small ones, this is a method of disclosure that VCs are MUCH more attracted to.
Keeping track of all those possible payments when we have to ask for various purchase orders that could be traced to one quote has brought about various mixups.
This is quite a key element to our process .
Could this be added to Draft Manual Journals?
The Search function is great but doesn't work with numbers.
41, why can't the reconciliation screen when put 2 and 2 together when a few days later there is a withdrawal of $52,654.
If other employees have requested leave at the some time and their is enough staff coverage,If other Approvers have approved leave (sick ) ect to make sure all leave is recorded.
===Please do not merge this into the community discussion forum.
This may come through as a action or reminder or even code up a draft transaction.
Is there any plan in the pipeline for this or are the "new reports" considered finished at this time?
to select which decimal place is used.
Is this too much to ask for?
There is so much mucking around before the schedule transfers ,, it is horrible.
One of our client organisations operates under HMRC Flat Rate scheme and has two separate trading divisions.
One should be operating at 14.
Can the VAT Return be modified to operate both VAT rates?
Of course, if I've missed something obvious, I'd be delighted if someone could point me in the right direction!
Hello all,There is a feature that needs to happen as at the moment - it is rather clunky.
Our Product Team do consider feedback and votes alongside other factors when deciding on features to develop next.
Or is there a work around?
Can we put these on the drop down and skip the  All Reports   step
Anyone else want this feature added?
What is the maximum amount of time I will have to wait?
How long until the TaxTouch app will be available for Android users?
Dear Support Team,Is there any possibility to have a column where I can write a comment?
Having to manually process is not optimal.
Therefore these should not be included in the opening and closing cash balances in the Statement of Cashflows.
Can a "year to date option" be given?
I would love a feature that I could enable/disable which would send contacts into a "cleansing que" for me to later review.
It could recommend to me if there is a close match based on other items that I've mapped in the past.
We have been advised that if you select a Contact THEIR email will sync (so in theory it's straightforward to action), but this is useless for us as the primary email we enter in the clients email is the one that is relevant to the accounting.
Please can we have an option to show the formula answer as a percentage?
This is awesome.
This is also awesome .
This is not so awesome.
It is really frustrating not being able to track how we are doing by job.
Frankly, I am surprised this has not been done already.
I understand that freeform HTML in there is probably not the best idea, which is why implementing a formatted plain-text syntax might be a good compromise.
NCF is a sequencing numbering system most latin american countries use to bill their clients.
The government use it to monitor taxes and offer some privileges to task payers.
It would be good if there is:1.
An option to filter what is displayed (and exported on the CSV) based on the quantity.
Please give the feature to print them out and mail them.
Please consider removing the hourly rate from the payslip.
Can that be fixed so the buttons don't move on a refresh?
It would be really helpful if a control was put in place to alert the user if a balance in the Balance Sheet, P&L or in the Equity etc.
OR if the equity balance in the Movements in Equity doesn't match the equity note.
I can't even see June 2016 in the drop down.
00 or 16.
At minimum if wages and supplier payments can at least be combined this would save time.
I get my Bartercard feed once a month but there is no option to set up a feed for BBX.
There should be an excel template which we can use to put in data then import to a tax return
Is their away to retrieve.
I checked out some of the new reports that are coming.
This data is quite critical to a lot of data analysis and would be great if you could put it in there.
An audit log can be generated to follow these steps for proper documentation.
For example the exit button could be an open door and the delete button could be a trash can as these are commonly used icons.
This is not good enough!
This could take a ten minute task to a few seconds.
Can we please have this feature a priority as I do not believe we would be the only ones benefiting from this.
Scrolling in this area is extremely cumbersome.
This is very time consuming!
Is there the possibility that we can select individual options within the tracking option?
Would be great if when you are creating a new bill or sale from the inbox if it opened in a new window.
Any chance of adding these?
This is annoying and completely unnecessary.
BTW, can you put the unicorn on the tracking options screen too!
Currently if a client has the subscription in their name they can produce SPFR whereby they can incorporate the Accountant's details and logo.
This could very easily be passed off as a legitimate set of financial reports in circumstances where the Accountant hasn't created them.
Is there anyway we could have a global archive feature?
Please make it so that the drop-down options disappear if clicked outside.
Please make it so that if I reselect the same option, the subject and describe boxes do not delete the data.
Please consider making the table header fixed at the top when the user scrolls down.
When entering a receipt on iOS app the first line is "What was it for" with some suggestions for popular receipts.
I feel that the ability to extract specific customer information is extremely limited.
However, there are many cases when this is not correct.
Or a FBT adjustment is non cash but there is GST on the "income".
Or having to manually enter the business name in each time.
I can't see the rationale behind hiding both the Cashflow and Performance Graphs from Managed Client Dashboards?
This is linked to another request for much better user role admin - as a bureau we want to set-up our managed client dashboard with every facility - in fact our constant updating of the client dashboard is a major selling point of our service.
Positive adjustment means increase in the inventory wherein i can also enter the price manually.
It is adding hours to my work.
can you make the default when you go to print reports more than the current 25 lines.
I want to select tracking categories on my fixed assets, so that the depreciation can be allocated to the different categories as specified.
Can this feature be added to XPM to increase productivity in managing documents?
This enables my client to see what job this is for and further details.
My client is strongly considering going back to Sage because of this lack of information!
At the moment, you can view the Find & Recode History for each individual session by clicking into the summary from the Find & Recode page.
What is the use of assigning a branding to a customer and then the system not using it through the complete process?
This is great.
Until the additional fields can be built in, perhaps the template could at least be edited so that it reads "individual or company name".
Can this be incorporated into user profiles as an option for Standard users to be able to have?
This will save a lot of time and having migrated from another cloud operator am suprised this feature is not supported as other competitors have such an option.
Instead of having the overdue date showing as the original date, can we have an option to adjust the date to what they are paid up to?
If the workpapers are printed, it makes sense to have the supporting documentation directly behind the main workpaper, as that's how you would normally create a workpaper file.
Any ideas and suggestions welcomed.
the whole expenses item needs some work to it.
can this be done in the current release?
This is very time consuming.
Why can't I tick the box at the left of the transaction, then have a "mark as reconciled" button, and do them all together?
Is there any plans to introduce this?
Is there likely to be a HubSpot CRM integration any time soon?
There is big problem with the personal contact information becoming out of date.
Please please please allow the Practice database to be able to remain open whilst you move between databases.
In particular this affects the signing dates, and year end date within the body of the reports.
I understand currently we cannot search within the payroll fields but can you please turn on the search icon and "/" whilst in the payroll menu.
Can we have an option for Annual Leave to be displayed in days?
Can we please have the same for email addresses?
At the moment the only update that flows through is the email.
Why can't the batch deposit list be printed from the same screen that prepares the batch deposit?
We are frequently getting staff creating new Bills when they should be creating a PO!
We sell a range of zero rated, exempt, taxable and second hand goods so our inventory can get quite confusing.
Thank you and I thank anybody in advance for any suggestion.
I've posted a link below to this page where you can start a new feature request. "
What do others think?
Can we customise the form for contacts?
If not, can we rename/re-purpose fields in the table and have those changes reflected on the front end?
It would be helpful if, as an Expense Approver, I could update an expense and save prior to approving.
Some of the later tabs depend on information from the earlier tabs.
You'll be prompted if you're missing any information.
It bothers me that once I am logged in, I can click through to any of my clients files with ease and without passwords.
What's the likelyhood of getting this added?
On a wide desktop screen there is alot of unused space to the left and right of the dashboard.
As it is now, I have to scroll to see all my dashboard content.
P. s. Please do not let them have turn off reminder button.
This would be handy to see what other people are currently discussing as opposed to simply the most popular things of all time.
Before a transaction can be reconciled, I prefer the workflow of checking that the receipt has been received and attached to the bill.
Show customer location with optional route finding (handy if you do your own deliveries) 2.
This makes it difficult to approve expense claims without following up with the staff member to see if they have correctly allocated them to the right client.
Coupled with Excel and Access, I can pretty much do anything, and my clients love it.
BUT, please can you display the edit link by default.
Please do a minor change that once a bill has been created from the inbox, and saved the screen reverts back to the inbox.
Either don't ask me for my password in the dialog window, or dont force me to login using the normal login with both email and password.
So the user can go to the inventory screen and click a button to "Process Inventory".
We have several clients that write at lot of manual checks each month so the data input is slow.
The only thing it is missing is a notes section against each tracking item.
When in practice manager (or Tax) you click the tax tab, then Returns.
When I enter my email address and password on the first screen, I can press enter after the password, which takes me to the authentication code page.
This could be strictly only available to SMSFs, as evidenced by a trust deed/etc.
There is an ability to apply a Brand Theme to a selected Group of clients, but where any of the clients have used both Brands it will not deliver 2 Statements that is one under each brand/theme.
Can we get the expense claim functionality into XeroMe?
For the love of God, why do you not have the ability to view the Category and Notes on each transaction without having to click into each transaction?
Please fill out the 1120s (for S-Corporation, different forms for other corporate structures) for me and file it along with the other forms.
Then there are optional start and stop date calendar controls that can be used to create other reporting periods.
This is incredibly annoying.
From a usability point of view please make this INFO BOX disappear when the mouse clicks on another item.
Can the individual notes in the notes to the financial statements have a hide function rather than a delete function.
It would be a great addition if XPM could have a "Place of Birth" field for individuals (probably next to client's Date of Birth) .
At the moment you can only set up 5 reminders.
Can direct feeds support be added for ANZ Credit Cards as there is for other NZ banks (such as BNZ or Kiwibank)
Could you sort this so you can do this?
At present you can not adjust balance of contacts by passing a manual Journal entry.
Is this a known issue?
Why is this?
Our legal entity is not known to them.
I can't believe such a simple feature (to re-trigger the draft bills) is not even there.
Please can you apply this to quotes as well?
Can't print the result in a format that at least replicate the page.
If you too want this then please click on the Vote button.
Please display the Business's ABN under the Business name on the Dashboard.
Of course this is only an issue if there is multiple trading statements.
Which could then be exported to PDF or excel.
Why is the new aged receivables is landscape, aged payable is portrait.
Also - please reduce the amount of white space on these reports so they fit on less sheets of paper
Multiple people collaborating in the cloud on the one org means that this sort of thing can happen a lot more than it once would have.
This is not beautiful.
Please adjust so that the logo is on the actual right.
An option to select to charge a full year's depreciation in the year of purchase.
or not possible?
There are myriad problems with the user roles in how they are currently set up.
It is fundamental to all businesses.
Currently, our database tells me that a number has already been registered, but I don't have a record for who that number is attached to and since I can't search it, I'm left digging through my entire contacts list- very unnecessarily time consuming.
I would LOVE to see the option of adding a file to a New Contact please!
Is it possible to have negative purchase discounts.
I'd love to see a history in a 'notes' section for the lock date so that we can see which users have changed the lock dates, and what they changed it from/to.
Is it possible for you to bring this feature back?
It is a great feature to be able to set default settings for contacts.
However, the process can be a little long winded.
Not accountants or accounting firms.
With a lot of things recently released, and more in the pipeline, it has meant our teams are pretty busy!
Even MULTI-CURRENCY TO WFM, which may fix a lot of things for most real life users and day to day actual operations.
Any suggestions?
They do not have to enter a six-digit code each time - although that is also an option.
- In summary, can we please get increased functionality to setup payroll for individual clients.
For example, payroll entries are automatically posted to 'Exempt', but 'Exempt' is some Jurisdictions is defined by the law of that Jurisdiction.
Is this really global?
Alternatively the documents can be attached from the library.
This is not possible at this point in time as you can only choose one item or all.
However this specific issue could be much better I think;I enter draft receipts in during the month, at the end of the month, I bundle them in a expense claim and approve this.
This is very confusing.
e. g. Receipt 1: $500Receipt 2: $1000Receipt 3: $75These can be bundled in one expense claim, that is approved and has an amount paid of $1000, with $575 due.
When I do cancel, it asks for my login details (which take too long to type in).
Too many clicks to obtain what we could see with one click beforehand.
It would be useful to new startup business owners to easily see some profit, loss, revenue / turnover / y1, y2, y3, with some this week, this month, orders in the pipe might be a nice touch.
Find and recode is really useful, but has limitations if you are not quite sure what the person before you has been up to :)
Please allow up to 200 assets to be visable on a page, it is currently only 50.
BIG BUMMER TO DISCOVER THIS IS NOT TRUE.
The Contacts page has changed (w/c 21st December) and you can now no longer copy text from the customer notes to other applications (e. g. we use the notes section to store relevant customer information that we can copy to email or Fedex etc as and when necessary).
), the user can click anywhere on the line, and the system takes you to that transaction.
This would make receipts a lot easier to read, greatly reduce the mobile bandwidth (and time) required to transmit them, and significantly reduce inbox file sizes.
This would then mean the ARR would be a great 'go to' place to see who the recalcitrants are and get another statement out to them.
So that I can process a manual journal and then quickly go back to the profit and loss or balance sheet and refresh so I can see the effect of that journal entry on Profit or their net assets.
From what I can see this functionality is available under the NZ Tax system.
At the moment you can only recode to another code.
Inventory description should not be a compulsory column
"New reports" do not have.
"New Reports" do.
Unless I am missing something?
This is EXTREMELY urgent                                              WISH LIST/ 1.
ADMIN can decide whether to give them DRAFT only access.
AND THE TOTAL OF THE WHOLE IN THE BOTTOM.
Can you please make a feature where you can roll your previous years actuals over to your current years budget.
When you set up a new client you are able to say what type of organization it is.
Anyone else use it?
What do you use it for?
This is very time consuming when you are doing this everyday.
This means, whilst the payroll is correct for a full year, it is incorrect on a month by month basis.
It would be great if we could do a search on a manual journal description or date, (as you currently can), and then be able to bulk void these journals.
This functionality is available for archiving.
This is hugely time consuming.
Please amend the app to make it easier to enter the monetary amount.
This is an inefficient use of my time.
This would retain the audit trail on that purchase order in the event of dispute and inhibits fraud.
Or if this already exists could someone point me in the right direction.
Please can we have an Alipay icon and option in the Billing Services for Stripe?
As clients inventory lists change over time there will be items that become obsolete and will never be used again.
Can we please have the ability to exclude inactive inventory from reports?
Its would be good to have this box that you can type the amount in and it discounts the total that amount and shows how much has been discounted.
Charge expenses - enable expenses to be included in period total (e. g. monthly) on invoices5.
Can we please have an option to default these questions to what we choose as a practice?
I often have to go through our clients GST returns one by one and this is very time consuming because this function is missing.
should consider integrating with mPesa.
When do you think this feature would be available?
Someone commented recently upon viewing the standard contents page that prints with the new reports:"What is this, a contents page for ants?
I've suggested this a few times now so am hoping it may get some traction this time.
i. e. : 'L/Acc – Home Loan' or 'Telstra Mobiles' or 'IP Insurance'.
Technically right by the law but not how businesses operate.
Anyone else?
Anyone else out there have a similar issue (and has come up with a solution)?
we have over 1,000 inventory items, and it would be really helpful if this could be automatically ordered from best seller to worst seller, by volume and $$ etc.
The details differ so can't use 'repeat' feature.
New FRs could require selection of the menu item if it exists, so they end up in the right place.
At the moment it is almost unusable how you have designed it which makes me wonder whether I am doing something wrong.
How can I do this without doubling up payments?
Within Payroll, we have no visibility, so the payroll administrator can override a leave request submitted to a manager without history notes referring to whom actually approved the leave.
Can we have a separate field to populate with a remittance email address?
It would be great if they could be deleted once they are no longer attached to an asset.
It would make life so much easier if you could search by either surname or address or phone number.
At present the search has to be too exact therefore if you get any little thing wrong you can't find the person.
So we can see the value of our total works in progress.
The paperwork and information needed to be kept for FBT of a vehicle say can be a nuisance.
Could we please have a flag or number appear when there are documents uploaded and sitting in the folder inbox (similar to the email inbox)?
Can we please have an area in the Financial details for Company Registration Details or Sole Trader Address.
There is a place for VAT number but no Company Registration etc.
Terrible waste of time and not something one sees in the U. S.
If a note is removed that shouldn't have been, or is now required, it can be very time consuming putting it back in to extent that it can be quicker to start from the template again.
I would leave votes on requests marked NEVER, as I do believe that once enough accumulated votes are collected, that comment could change.
Our trainers go off site regularly and their expenses are recharged so this would be very helpful.
Then there can be profit & loss month by month and also year to date.
how many times did individual customers actually pick up the phone to us!
Please advise if this is in your development plans?
Therefore, this needs to be manually adjusted when it is exported out to Excel.
Please, please, please can this field be wider to allow the whole field to be visible?
In Australia a Trial Balance should have up to 3 standard columns of figures:The last full financial year.
I am not sure if there is a feature for this but I cannot find it.
After I've done the tests, I can note the results and then undo everything by simply turning off the simulation/test mode.
For example, one job may include profession stucco repair/patching and another won't, or one job may require a larger deposit then usual while others may not require a deposit.
Due to 9 month filing deadlines the last CT600s can be submited one year out from now.
Any solid dates?
Also, is there flexibility to customise the payroll email?
This feature should be available when entering Purchase Orders.
In particular those in the address or reference fields.
I find that our clients addresses or project descriptions end up with words hanging or not making sense.
It would be great to have an option of 100% Write Off for Depreciation in the Fixed Assets register.
Are there any plans to bring this into future releases?
In almost every other tax platform on the planet you can do a dry run.
How to fined a quotation is impossible.
Is there something blocking this functionality?
This is a very important field and helps to show any 'double up' contacts.
Please correct the rounding issue in the new reports.
Please can you set up the Annual VAT return feature to submit online filing returns to the Inland Revenue.
Be able to see at a glance how you are performing each month against budget and last year sales on the dashboard.
ThanksNeilPLEASE VOTE FOR THIS SO WE CAN GET THIS TO WORK---
For my Quotes, the Item Description from Inventory is a basic description that is heavily modified for each quote.
At present I am reconciling multiple payments on a business credit card statement.
There is a lack of reports on expense claims.
Any field which has a character limit (e. g. Leave Description) should present a "countdown" of remaining characters.
On the PC you can.
I can't get it to work.
I do not want to have to go and speak to 20 plus individuals to check on their progress
Individual sales are payable immediately or upon delivery so therefore do not get send statements however.
This is important.
This would be particularly good for credit cards as there is no running balance on transaction listings.
Again, a basic of any GL system.
How soon can you do the International dealings schedule for the tax return.
Hoping I've put this in the correct section as I can't find anything with the keywords.
Essentially, what you do to your subscribers who are overdue, but direct control from our billing profile.
We are currently getting around this by using the attention block in the customer details (not the same, but it's the best there is).
All needed is to accept Arabic text input.
Please retain the descriptions.
There is nothing worse that re entering information you have already taken the time to put in.
Do you have a time line you may share with us?
There is a work-around, I can change the file extension and it passes the validation.
Killing two(or ∞) birds with one stone.
Often when i am doing spend money and entering new bills i have several item lines.
can you please create a new field which simply contains the generated custom URL we have specified for that service.
The business owner could have customisation over this page allowing them to prompt their clients for as much or as little honesty as they would prefer.
Is this possibility moving forward?
So between me highlighting on a return email - that there were screen shots on the first email, response time is blowing out.
This area is of no business of theirs & they should not be able to access totals of sales.
Is this something that can be fixed?
While I can send them a statement, it would handy to be able to filter the statements based on the reference field.
In the old reports area, you can compare year to date income statement with the prior year to date.
Anyone have any views on this?
How do I do this?
Please offer PGP encryption for secure email submission so only the intended recipient can view the sensitive information in a filled form.
There should be be a simple drop down box with your email selection
Or if there was a link to the desktop version, even if it is not optimised of mobile.
I was wondering if there was any interest in making this customisable also?
This is something that Sage is able to automate via the recurring entries system.
If you should have any queries with regards to the above please contact me.
and I can select which to include in the email.
Now I will probably be given some reason why this is not possible or not viable (as usual) however I feel that this is the thing holding find and recode back from being a rather useful tool!
MYOB allows the suppliers to be viewed and shows in total how much they are owed.
It would be really helpful if you could book time to a job that wasn't in your job list.
This could be a feature that can be switched on or off to suit.
I can then amend any particular detail, such as the job date before approving this one.
•And to be able to sort the table in the order of JE numbers.
Is there anything in the settings to change this?
to at least keep the option of 1000 lines open for the session until I logout if it can't be a permanent option?
Do you think you guys can work around on this?
These are unnecessarily large and slow to open - can you please resample these JPEGs down to a "reasonable" size?
Or offer a downsampled preview first?
Currently we can only see the total due amount up to the date the statement generated to.
And can it stay on my settings so when I open it next time I don't have to change again?
s. this post won't let me format any tags so I've replaced square brackets with rounded.
At the moment we can only see this information in the item screen.
What do you think?
Please can we have a total column in the new reports - particularly the profit and loss.
com</span></h1>Any ideas?
I am re-creating accounting records for my client and going back one full year.
Is there a comprehensive database?
Can this been changed so that the online version shows the exact same view as what they print?
Currently you can export reports to Excel/pdf and google Docs.
When I hover over the graph in the vendor's file, I can see the month and the amount of money outgoing.
When adding a new Bill, there is a second total field in the top right.
What is the reason for this field?
Currently you can only set one default theme per contact, and this applies to both.
When I send an online quote I can include the [Online Quote Link] merge tag in the email so that people can view and accept or decline the quote online.
what am I doing wrong.
This is time consuming.
Would be great to be able to hyperlink text in the description field of Quotes.
Please can we get it changed to suppliers only, or some other improvement please?
I am not sure how this feature would work but it certainly would be very useful.
There are many other things that could be a lot easier to manage as well.
It is taking ages as I have to go back to bills then to drafts each time.
At present any notes get lost with useless history facts.
Can the logout always come to the screen where the user/pass are available so I can login straight away?
Can be "so easy to make more mistakes" me thinks.
This feature would be similar to the existing Contact Groups, obviously in the area of Inventory management.
We often deal with different individuals in one organisation and increasingly we use their mobile telephone numbers.
Any chance?
that can then be inserted into for eg, a minute or letter
How about a couple of useful reports please:*A summary with totals with a line for each employee included in the payroll.
3 or 4 fields per client would be perfect.
There should be Standard Format that assumes no paper - no printing, no scissors, no mailing.
The basic response to us has been use a third-party application for now.
I can't revert them to untracked, I can't edit them to use a different inventory code,I can't do a zero value (change inventory count but not dollar value) and I can't delete them.
HiI see there was a thread in 2012 regarding this but it is closed.
From what I can see the top 10 priority fixes identified by the thread don't seem to have been implemented.
Can we have the ability to recode journals please?
Can the support replies please be changed to include the name of the entity?
This is illogical - from a clients perspective also as things progress you move from left to right.
Frequently, with large amounts, this can throw the transaction out by several cents.
It would be great to be able to set up a Placeholder for our company logo so we can include it on emails.
When I can choose which things to Import from the statement (great feature! )
Anyone else think this would be great?
Can an additional security feature be added so that when an invitation is accepted, there is some form of final approval sought from the original sender so that they can confirm the person they sent the invitation to is the same as the one who now has access?
This is not fun when you have over 1000 assets to import.
Would be great to see some more improvements to the mobile apps.
For contractors working in the field a couple of common requests per below:1.
The actuall burn rate in terms of real dollars for the selected period as well as the run rate in terms of the selected period.
However, Find & Recode is TERRIBLE in not working based on any text field.
I believe what most of us small business want is to have a quick view on stocks balance only.
Maybe the community can answer this.
I am doing something wrong here?
What is the chance of the repeating journal being updated with the last recorded content?
For example my prepayments repeating journal shows me what I posted months ago rather than what I posted last month which makes it pointless as I have to make so many changes to this journal it defeats the purpose.
As statements come in toward the end of the current period and these amounts are checked against whats been loaded can checked amounts then be coloured to allow directors an immediate visual as to whats a payable amount, what's being queried, what statements are still needed.
When there is a long list - the save option doesn't seem to work the first time - again the page flickers around.
should be last y/e by default.
There seems to be a glitch with the use of accented characters in the title.
Can the ability be added that allows you to hide text blocks from showing rather than delete them?
Can you extend the options you offer for setting up staff access?
I'd prefer to select what the user can see.
is anyone using it?
Well for some cash based organisations the following may be the answer.
And how do you define between Full time, part time and casual employees?
Currently we can only use the default set up.
I am Colour Blind.
they should carry forward.
Please tell me Im stupid and Ive missed something or theres a paid addon or an update that fixes this.
Some Totals created when you create your own layout do not read well as "Total.
Would it be possible to edit what is printed in the reference section of the check stub?
What do you think?
Also, if I were to use the old reporting system and show the expense tracking categories in columnar format, I can't then see the different types of revenue without having the 6 combinations of program/support x unrestricted/temp/permanent.
This is a long winded process.
or any other design or word-processor app really.
Or even use an existing pdf template from our old software for continuity.
I hope this is helpful.
Therefore, the workaround (which is painful) is to submit each receipt as a separate expense claim.
I could ask to make individual receipts available for on-charging as they are in my old MYOB version, but this is too much functionality to ask for, and so I’d be happy with a .
There are two specific related features that I would find extremely helpful in speeding up the entry of my bills and general reconciliations.
It'd be much quicker and easier if the cell could handle some simple calculations.
In a competing accounting package, I could simply press "=" when in the cell value of the next line item (that in this case represents the 45 GST exclusive products) and the balance would be automatically calculated and entered as the value of the cell.
Likewise, when editing a schedule within the subscription for an entity, there is  option to control the font size of the name of the schedule.
The schedule name should therefore be in the same or a smaller size font than the note item heading.
Some of my customers call and place a phone orders where they give me their credit card information.
Despite the box being ticked on later VAT returns, the items that should have been late claims on the return for which the box was unticked never came through on the current return.
I fell that this will be an important piece in the automation of SME business process puzzle.
The new aged Receivable reports are much better, (I have already asked for a tweak so that the "Today" option can be saved as a Template).
This edition doesn't have the VAT moss reporting (The UK Version has) Could this functionality please be added to the Global version.
If your internet is slow this can be a painful experience.
It's only another 2 clicks, but it's annoying that there is no consistency between modules.
Apparently this is no longer supported and cannot be run with this version of windows.
Please, please make the text black.
Off white text is hard to read when you are older.
I would suspect that BoA is not the only one who's doing this.
Some of our client's heavily rely on the creation and approving of Purchase Order's within their organisation.
i can't take it off as a line discount, it's a form of "tax" and needs to appear as such.
Very minor, but please can we have consistency across the modules.
However we often do a quote for a service that will be billed on a recurring basis.
But there is no next stage, the approval and sending are done at the same time.
At the moment you can not navigate between the cells using navigation arrows.
We use a rather long reference field that is critical to our customers and that reference field is truncated in the current portrait statement format.
For example, we do a lot of branding work.
Are there any plans to comply with local regulations here by offering facturas?
Its a big pain, because I often forget and end up over-quoting some customers.
There should be expirations as well as email alerts for occasions where a dismissed employee is trying there closed acct.
Guess how many times I've had to explain why a single receipt did not reflect the actual amount the client submitted.
Condition Fix:We are limited to 57 conditions in one rule when selecting ANY .
Could we have an option it so that the quote is marked as 'Sent' if it is printed out?
Some of my clients still don't 'do email'.
Any chance of opening up field lists available for transaction reports?
This is not useful.
Could either email link to interactive purchase order template or embed as a portal in business website.
Feedback on feasibility or projected times frames for something similar would be appreciated.
If the user's leave is given pro-rata, applying for future leave can make it hard to see how much they currently have.
This is essentially true but makes it confusing.
If this goes over weekends or public holidays it can be hard to figure out exactly how much leave you are taking.
These arrive directly from the supplier or indirectly after being scanned in-house.
I have a number of customers that are not always on the same rate for the same service.
In particular, the clients in the building and construction industry have turnover that can vary quite significantly depending on the size of the jobs at that time so it is hard to determine a correct budgeted $ figure for materials/contractors because of this.
I want to use the feature in the balance sheet, for a builder who has stages in construction, and if we can get a summary of the tracking, then it would make it suitable for a construction company, or even for work in progress for time allocations in a service based company.
I suspect this is a simple fixable UI buglet.
This is hosted on their servers.
link I get all of the detail - the bit of the reference that actually identifies what it is0112 AUD000000001234;RETAIL PURCHASE;It's a big slow down because I can't see what a purchase was for without moving the mouse and interacting for every single item!
Preferably, the date would show in an additional column on the LHS of Current.
Is this possible?
You already do this for expense receipts so why not for uploading files to inbox?
Can we have a Reference box on the reconciliation screen please.
I also note that it can be quite slow to generate, especially when working on a large files.
(Think screws and bolts or electronic components. )
This seems so obvious that I am surprised that it has not been listed before.
This XML format is called PAIN.
Any other takers on this?
Please provide the option to use one of (say) 10 standard colours as a theme for an organisation: red, orange, green, blue, purple, etc.
Can net movement for the period selected not be included?
We can sometimes reconcile a transaction and sometimes we can't.
Can you please confirm if this is going to happen soon?
Is this so?
Any ideas?
Couldn't find any related comments on this suggestion, so please excuse me if it has been previously requested.
This is basic.
Please consider this for the future.
This is any business's most sacred list that took years to build and a lot of negotiation to obtain these prices.
they should be well protected !
Or allow syncing with some external provider - Google, Linkedin, Full Contact - issue with this is usually the addressing format is not as easily interchangeable.
I am an accountant with some customers who have single corporations with multiple divisions.
Can we please have the ability to only include our Practice logo on the front cover of our client's Financial Statements, rather than each page.
There are many others in Spain, of which I believe the largest are Santander, La Caixa, BBVA.
Can we have the option to default the calendar pop-up to display Monday to Sunday instead of the default Sunday to Saturday.
So whenever a new transaction is created there is an automatic, unchangable code added to the transaction.
Please, please, please put this on your to do list.
I am aware that multiple contacts can be easily merged but surely this option is merely a fix-it rather than a long term solution?
Any ideas?
a contact or multiple contacts4.
Will be interesting if any other charities are looking for something similar - or maybe someone has a better idea?
Therefore, if income is bigger than budget, you have a positive variance (or negative if the actual is lower).
Please change the variance calculation for expenses to be budget value less actual value.
Is this something planned?
The second situation is US withholding tax, which is deducted from payments to my company by a US company that we work with.
This would remind me what the symbols mean.
Can we please have a function where a general journal entry lines can be made in a single manual journal and not default to the one date.
Could we have a option to select discount recieved?
Not sure what other people think, but having a cloud based solution defeats the purpose if this is going to happen.
It would be very handy to have a column within purchase orders, to note any items that are on backorder, then for that purchase order to automatically update with a new PO (same number perhaps with &#228; on the end etc) that contains those items on backorder.
- There should be an option to show GST and/or the GST code in a column.
any chance of implementing this export feature?
I think it would make more sense if the files stayed in your library instead of being removed.
Is this feasible to be  looked at soon?
An option to exclude more than one row (some banks prefix the file with 3-5 lines of header which forces users to edit the file before importing, which can create errors).
csv or .
It is crucial to be able to change tax rate percentages from time to time as they can change.
This makes it an unusable system for anyone that has to update tax rate percentages.
I notice that it is there already in Payroll, but no where else.
I can't be the only one who wants this, please vote if you agree.
It would be simpler for all concerned if you made a template showing all the likely requirements and then the user can delete whatever they not require.
14 and it should automatically enter 05/06/14then the cursor should be waiting in the next box for entry - or tab to the next box - it takes too much time to get the mouse and click in each area.
Please note that we’ve closed off the big , and found the top 10 requested roles.
I’ve raised this as a separate feature request so we can see the demand for restricted access/editing rights to a Contact’s financial information - relative to the other requested roles.
Feel free to vote for any other User Role you want, or  if it’s not here.
The new detailed reports are great, but what would be even better is if there was a total outstanding for each customer/supplier.
I’ve created this thread, and a few others, so we can get an idea of what User Roles, out of the top 10, are needed the most.
We could finally do away with PO books, which I have to constantly chase up and cross check manually.
Can we look at adding the ability to accept ACH or e-checks via the gateway now?
Any ideas?
Please bring back the timer!
I can only seem to fix it for every individual day?
It is similar to reverse charge billing.
At the moment we can rename files that are sitting in the Inbox.
Please allow us to rename the files once they have been attached.
What are the chances of having monthly trans.
from the 16 year old lawnmowing entrepreneur to the fat cat CEO's, one can become the other in a blink.
Instead of the fancy new style formatting, how about a simple check box to make it possible to bukk send one of the pre-formatted email letters?
Anyone else found this a problem?
Are there any plans to introduce this feature?
I actually have no idea what is is doing when it refreshes the page but I can't see it saved anywhere so I guess that all is being cancelled.
The investment holdings are ignored, which is what I want.
)It's a small but important improvement - please do this.
It would be a great feature to have an additional field for company names so that both can be captured.
An opening and closing balance with running balance would be very useful.
Why is there no warning to avoid posting to a supposed 'locked' period!
It doesn't do very much.
The developers of this piece of work have assumed that there is a one-to-one relationship between PO's and bills.
Which will change if you change the order of what is the default theme.
Would anyone else find this useful?
Can you please create an option that allows you to choose which groups are showing on the homepage?
Please allow for the ability of rounding to be disabled.
At the moment you can only see one years worth of information in the schedule.
Can this be added to the reports discussed earlier?
In Sage you can enter the bill in full and then set up a PP schedule saying spread &#163;2k over the next 12 months.
"Is this possible?
Whilst I appreciate that Fixed Assets are accrual items, I and some of my clients use Cash Basis reporting.
, And there is no audit trail that I am aware of identifying any change?
There is no flexibility to reformat this.
There is no reason not to use HTML5 on the desktop as well.
So I think there is a gap in client/accountant communication, one which can possibly be filled with a To Do list.
I added one date to a batch of entries in the Schedule of Planned Payments.
For example, in order for my law firm employees to do some of the most basic tasks (ie.
This can cause confusion when reconciling tax codes to the P&L.
Am I missing something?
This is simply too many clicks.
Would be great to have previews flicking up quickly, so we can scroll thru a group of search result images.
Also any reason why you can't pick actual by month?
Also a pretty big problem for those of us in the US.
However, you could only do that until 12/8/13, as it then became $70 a month.
Yes, in this case ALL CAPS means I am really YELLING!
The corresponding price for the AccountantsWorld payroll, which we can easily integrate, would be under $20, regardless of the number of employees.
Can you please allow all employees with the basic payroll employee permission level to also have access to submitting their own expense reports?
Would be great to have previews flicking up quickly, so we can scroll thru a group of search result images.
For accountants this is overly cumbersome and expensive.
Is this something that's on the roadmap ?
If I enter a contact's ABN, could this not be used to: 1.
It would be great if we can bind different email address to each brand theme we setup.
Would be good if when they sign in any unapproved PO's appear on their dashboard.
There is no search function for History & Notes.
Can you please look at creating a function that you can export the attachments for the financial year into one PDF?
In regards to the files function, can you please look at putting in a feature so that you can see how much storage capacity that you have left?
Previous entry OR 2.
This would eliminate an important human step in the workflow and capture the customer's approval electronically right within the system (handy in case of disputes).
When I apply batch payments I am usually using credits for suppliers.
Any ideas?
If anyone has any good solutions I would love to hear them.
There are times when having the journal entry track to a customer or vendor is necessary.
Don't want to have to wade through thousands of tracking numbers to find what is required.
Why is this restricted?
We find this is too restrictive, especially since this also includes dashes and other non-alphanumeric signs.
Upon further observation from what I can see I think it's the converting what you see on your screen, using the word doc template, into a PDF format, that is taking up so much time.
I hope you consider adding some of the above.
But that is not offered.
Any further thoughts or suggestions?
Cheers(have no idea how big a migraine this would cause with the Dev team, but what a challenge! )
How about being able to drag & drop the file as an alternative to the current attach file dialog box?
I believe this is a no brainer!
Ideally, this would be a DEFAULT setting and could be overridden if required by entering a discount value.
This often results in small rounding errors of 1c due to the tax calculations.
It is time consuming to have to go into the inventory section to update this whenever a price goes up, even if it is only by a few cents.
Any ideas?
Please include fields other than names into the search bars.
It is quite frustrating that you can only allocate it to a sale but not actually email or print it for the clientIf there is a work around for this I would appreciate knowing how to do it!
Companies regularly use this - particularly SMEs in their first year's trading - in order to align their financial year with the calendar year, the tax year or other group companies' financial year.
Do they get save in Outlook once sent?
At the moment the tax rate can only be changed if the transaction is unreconciled and this takes considerable time to make what should be a simple change.
what do you think?
I only have Monthly or Annual options.
It would be much, much faster if you could select multiple items, and then click on a "Mark as Reconciled" button to take care of them all at once, without losing your page.
I am still finding end users are using incorrect GST codes particularly BAS Excluded.
This is very usefull so everyone knows this is the real worl; customer not allways paid on an due date and probablly you can not paid bill on due date.
What do you think ?
A footer that I can enter 'The accompanying notes form part of these financial statements.
Would be great to have built in to the Fixed Asset register the ability to sell part of an asset.
The payments are all variable so we can't set up recurring/repeating bills.
Could you confirm this is a bug?
Anyway,  has all kinds of advantages over many of the other services; in particular, you can integrate with it (and accept card numbers directly on your site) without subjecting yourself to the full PCI-DSS dance.
I wanted to do a bulk delete to start with a clean sheet, but can't be done.
In my case the date entered by accident was 2212 instead of 2012.
But only for a specific region or contact group.
It is sad to see many Feature Requests with no votes.
I could not even vote on several of my requests because I am out of votes.
I can't think why I'd want to send a statement that was a month out of date.
It will mean that I can adjust and correct any mistakes or adjustments without removing the nice format that can be easily compared to the previous one.
This functionality would allow users to adapt the check printing feature to their current check stock or preferred check stock, rather than force them to use the only template provided.
This is extraordinary useful for capturing my "real terms" position as currency fluctuation is taken into consideration over time, but it's extremely unhelpful for gaining an actual position in the non-base currency.
Please change this function, so that if the original item is de-selected if it's not not reconciled, when "other possible matches found" is clicked on.
This is BAD!
This app works online or offline.
I am sure we can my daughter to organise the event - http://www.
What do you think?
This is something that could be considered.
Let me explain: Prior to this recent change, users could delete statement lines.
So there was never any permanent damage done.
PLEASE bring back the ability to delete statement lines.
It is so confusing looking at the Sales reports and trying to figure out whats what.
However, there is no confirmation of action.
My client is a wholesaler supplying to retail stores Australia Wide.
Adding another VAT registration is actually simple to do:1.
The functionality is already there.
Could you please enable the cell to mouseover the full value?
"So, instead of using prepayments, we use overpayments, as these do work in multiple currencies.
Is there any other work around that people can suggest?
Workflow Max will obviously do advanced customer reporting but it's a bit of a sledge to crack a nut for my small clients.
"When will this be available or is there a workaround for this.
Why is this a issue?
Did they get any exclusivity?
Please check the rules on HRMC website at the following link: http://www.
But what it doesn't distinguish is whether a company is a Corporation or not (there is no field in the Contact area to clarify who is/isn't so have to manually go through and create a group for all non corporations. )
And what about the instance where a vendor is paid by check one month and credit card the next.
There are more requests to use votes on, but I hope this is something that the development team picks up and has a discussion about.
Any suggestions?
At the present time there is only the option to run from the beginning of the year up to a chosen point in time.
The purchase order details are either in the body of the email or as an attachment.
Email updates of this nature could be applied to payments, remittances, purchases and so on.
Any chance of this feature being added?
In most continental Europe we do not use comma as list separator, but instead we use semi-colon.
This is a major issue.
There are a lot of requests here that are arguably bug fixes or small gap closure requests, would it not be better for all concerned if there were a separate bug fix area.
I can't see any user roles that would allow this configuration.
This is annoying.
I find him very annoying when I am logging into my accountThanks---
I've noticed that there aren't merge fields available for customer mobile, fax, or direct dial numbers.
Surely it can't be too difficult to implement a few more fields, so can we have some more please?
This is a very simple thing.
If I could schedule them to be emailed out at say 10am rather than midnight that would make a big difference.
Is this expected behaviour?
Any ideas how to delete them all?
Is anyone able to make any suggestions on how to get around this?
For general discussion on , how it's specifically different to what we've implemented for US customers, please leave comments on the thread:
This should not be a locked field.
It should be able to be changed and used for printing at any time.
Why what is the point of that3.
These fields should also be searchable.
This would save me a lot of time at the end of each month, trying to remember what each line item is whilst reconciling them.
Spend money, receive money, transfer, AR, other documents, not only AP.
Can we have the ability to create our own vat codes and say where they will appear on the vat return.
Some of these are already scheduled into the future.
I believe this field already exists, but is currently hidden (the facility is present to import into a second ref field via text import).
On a related front, on the expense claims "Approved" tab, there is no total for the claims.
And the revenue (or costs) would turn up in that month.
We do a lot of our invoicing every Monday.
Would be great if you could enter a default tracking code for an inventory item (or contact).
Automatically enter whatever is left to allocate, and allow you to amend that amount if it is wrong Please match on name as well as amount.
-Even better, have the error explain what *specifically* is wrong with the file being uploaded.
Is there an ability to be able to customise your inventory pricing for an individual customer?
Many other accounting systems do this by default.
I am a sole trader.
I do monthly stock checks.
htmThey too show only purchases and don't show a closing stock.
I think this is incorrect.
The one on the left is what I use at the moment.
, can any users confirm this?
Apologies if this has been discussed to death but could really do with an up to date answer.
That would be really handy for including courier or Express Post tracking numbers for orders as well as photos of receipts.
Would be great to hear this can be a option in the near future.
Should this be happening?
This is hard to type about but it's a part of UX design.
Please review the following threads and offer additional votes and input if you find this necessary.
However the processes involving credit notes can not be fully managed via the API because of the above mentioned gap in functionality.
I hope I made clear my point, it is a bit hard to explain this suggestion :)Regards
Is this possible?
Is it likely that this will be automated any time soon?
Downloading a local copy every now and then would certainly make me feel much more comfortable!
but I sure do feel extremely UNcomfortable not having ANY kind of personal backup insurance here.
Has anyone got a workaround as this is going to take me additional time each month.
This is very frustrating when looking down a list of items when trying to find something.
Please can you allow long reports to have the horizontal scroll visible on the screen wherever you may be.
Am I missing something?
as well as there is still no Android app.
The replies doesn't necessarily show how many people are supporting the request.
there are withholding tax deductions on domestic payments, for example, rent, marketing or professional services.
Therefore one of the key factors for many companies and accountants when selecting an accounting software in these countries will be how the software can handle the withholding tax deductions.
I can contribute with investigation resources, development and/or cash.
reports have amounts rounded - can we have a setting to choose rounded or full numbers?
I quote a summary from an ATO publication: Do you anticipate having something in place to allow this additional reporting?
If you search for several key words, it gives you every page that has ANY of them.
Changing this should be a top priority.
Would be keen to hear whether others feel this is useful or have workarounds.
There is no reason we should have to click OK for each transaction matching a Rule.
Or be configurable per user?
---Note: this is a request for .
Any chance of including it soon?
Any comments, experience, suggestions on this?
Often the detail on the credit note can be important.
If, for, example, that popup is sitting over the dashboard, all the info on the dashboard is still visible.
So please may I make a request for functionality to allow the generation and management of purchase orders ASAP?
This is a very basic request and one that is likely to be affecting everyone to one degree or another.
It would be helpful you could price items in the unit price column in fractions of cents i. e. $0.
At the moment you can seem to do this .
Can we please have a real quotation system to complement the invoicing?
Statement lines can only be deleted from within the view statement screen.
It would be great if we could click e. g. G11 to see a detailed page of every individual transaction that went into that G11 cell.
This is quite a basic feature that I have seen in many of the competitions packages (Zoho Books, Saasu etc).
Anyone else Newcastle based that have clients who would also love this?
Please correct this so that the details of the tax or BAS agent completing the EMPDUPE are what is populated in this field.
Can we have automated reminders via email to employees to fill in timesheets when they are due?
One of the things stopping us from using them is that there is very limited functionality in them.
My client is only able to withhold at an hourly rate.
This is very frustrating.
This client has many employees and has had some choose a higher level so that they can be paid more.
Given wages are the biggest expense for many organisations, it seems odd that we can't track wages according to both the tracking categories we have created.
Exporting to xlsx would be very useful, as this sorting could then be done in Excel.
Is there an easier workflow to make sure these get paid and that I don't type the values incorrectly?
This cash is not available to withhold from so many instances a server is left with a zeroed out check due to tax withholding.
At present, if you look at approved leave forms, there is nothing to show who the approver was.
This can become very time consuming depending on the number of employees.
Currently only one person can be registered to receive an SMS to approve super payments.
This information would assist the payroll administrator to be able to follow up with the "Requested" leave so that it can be "Approved" or "Declined".
This would save employers from having to print and manually hand them out, or split the combined pdf and email them.
Is there a printable form to provide employees to collect their direct deposit information?
It is only the line manager who approves the leave that can do this.
Public holidays should be automatic - what is the point of having the public holidays in there if they don't do anything.
I can see that this issue has been raised several times, is there any indication when this will be dealt with?
So I am still going to have to do manual workings for our payroll clients.
Regardless, when the employee looks at the time off history the request only shows the hours requested, which can be misleading if the request was approved with a different number.
Legislation in the C&K / school industry requires 2 signatures on all payments / outgoings which means they can't use the Xerp auto super.
Currently this can't be done without giving full admin rights to all payroll.
Can't there be a hierarchy of permissions so the OM can enter leave requests only?
Would be great if this can be added to the Super payments automation
As it is very unlikely a US user would vote for a UK or AU payroll feature then separating them into country specific feature requests would make for a better user experience here.
It would also be helpful to have an instalment rate field in the financial settings so the rate can also auto-populate the BAS.
Of course Click super is making it easier but employers still do part payments ie.
part of a quarter payments which can make it fiddly to tie back.
At the moment we have to make manual adjustments in the payroll on the Employer Additional Super line if an employee earns over the required amount on the last payroll for the month.
I feel that manual adjustments can lead to mistakes and omissions being made in payroll.
I would be very happy if the templates that can be setup for the Timesheets could be automatically associated with Employees.
It would be great if we could have a save and next button when entering employee timesheets rather than having to go back and forth between menu boxes.
Would welcome any advice and comments.
I can't see anywhere to tell the system which days employees actually work.
Can we please get a 'SAVE AND CLOSE' button added to payroll instead of either 'save', 'close' (which doesnt save) or 'Save and Next' So frustrating to have to click 'save' and then 'close' each time, because the roster i am paying from doesnt have the names in alphabetical order!
I have to fold up the paper & then fold in one side so that it comes across enough to show in the address window of the envelop.
There is no FBT liability.
What are we supposed to do for items that don't naturally hit a liability?
Health insurance, advance repays, uniforms, any number of things.
Within our industry (Real Estate) PAYG is figured over a period of weeks as commissions are not always paid weekly.
Can we put forward the following for consideration:1.
THEY SHOULD NOT!
so I feel sure you could do something similar for CT!
This is very frustrating.
Is there such a beast?
Currently, once approved, the timesheet is no longer accessible unless one is a payroll admin.
What do you think?
Another example is that Directors have an automatic super transfer setup on a fortnightly basis in line with the payroll.
5) rateWeek 2 has 30 Hours regular payPaycheck would read -70 hours regular pay15 hours OvertimeThe current set up makes the accountant look at each employee who is hourly and verify which hours were overtime and which were not.
Without the choice of APO,AP we can't run our payroll process.
It would be really helpful if these could be uploaded into the note section of the payroll please.
Hello everyone,I can see on the Timesheet area that the employee can only enter the total hours worked for each day and has to manually determine and enter extra hours worked (TIL), if any.
hrs = 9 to 5 pm ( worked up to 5:48 PM, therefore, accrue 48 minutes TIL)                          2) LESS THAN 30 minutes, then NO TIL is accrued.
hrs = 9 to 5 pm ( worked up to 5:18 PM, therefore, NO TIL ACCRUED)This is my dream project guys.
Can you please bring back the ability to sort leave by date, leave type etc on the employee leave tab.
Is it possible to set up a batch of reports?
If I can save this to do it all at once it would be much less tedious getting these reports done and emailed.
Very quick fix - saving every business potentially 30 minutes to 10 hours in set-up of Australian payroll.
These are all available in the "Taxes & Filings" page of Payroll.
Any ideas?
Or a regular leave application.
Changes to a project could be included in this second category.
May be I am missing something?
Could you please consider an option to turn off payroll journals (perhaps hidden though).
*  option under  menu not inside  or as well as.
Any other suggestions out there?
I do not think that this needs to be common knowledge to all who approve the holidays, so could this please be restricted.
It would be very handy (and less error-prone) if we could "Export RTI to Excel (cleaned-up)" from Payroll.
Could the Employee Leave Applications Screen please  have a column added to it showing the number of Hours per Leave application.
For ease of entry, it would be great if each Week Entry was ending on Friday or Sunday.
There is no real reason a user should have to click a button to perform this manually.
Is there anything in the pipeline for developing a function for properly accruing payroll time in lieu?
I assume that the email address that is used for the receipt is the email address set up in the organisational settings but this is not necessarily the payroll processor.
I cannot understand why employees can't be allowed to access items of different units.
), then adding an on-call allowance for one or two days, KMs for car-travel, or a cash amount for whatever (piecework or specialist work done).
I am printing off Individual Payroll Activity Summaries for staff.
Is there a solution?
At the moment it shows: - Total Earnings - PAYG - Super - Net PayWhich is misleading for beginner business owners, as they mistakenly will think that this total earnings figure is the total cost of their payrun, which from a gross wages stance is correct, but as it doesn't include super, regularly catches business owners off guard.
Is this a common requirement?
Would anyone else find this useful?
When I click into Payroll -> Employees, it shows all of the current employees, and separates the finished workers in History.
Is that a possibility in the future?
Is there an ETA for this?
Of course a SME should always seek expert advice in these matters.
Overtime (Double Time)appears ahead of Overtime Hours (exempt from super)I am not sure what controls the order
This is common  practise with pharmacist.
This should be standard so that employers don't miss due dates and incur late filing penalties.
This is preferred to having to "undo termination" is we rehire a staff member after 6 months or a year, where their start date would be incorrect and cause problems with accurals for various entitlements.
8 hours (not 8) as it is assuming that the 12 hours per week is over 5 days.
How do I get the holiday to reflect correctly?
See belowLegal ObligationsFailing to comply with payslip obligations can be very expensive.
The same mandatory information must be included regardless of how the payslip is produced.
Yes there is a BACS txt file but that means nothing, I have tried to import it into Excel.
I also suspect that some of our clients who do their own payroll would likely find this difficult.
This is not correct
How do I set up a tool allowance paid out as a rate per hour worked.
The modern world of mobility all details on the run when looking for Staff for a job in the cleaning bus.
Anyone else think this function would be useful?
Is it possible to include a working with children check field for an employee?
In conjunction with that, the administrator for the books can not see password for employee in order to log in as that person to complete the time card.
However, their leave balances do not appear under their employee leave tab.
Can a feature be added that allows leave types to appear under the employee leave tab at the discretion of the subscriber or user, regardless of the employment basis of their employees?
The new UK payroll is set up with time off balances in hours.
Some categories appear to be mis allocated in the general ledger.
I think this should be really easy.
Anyway I can select each group and print 3 reports for the 3 groups we have in the company.
I've noticed that the payroll overview screen is constantly being upgraded which is great.
We run an RDO system where we enter 8 hours per day base hours and enter negative 0.
I'm processing payroll for several clients and occasionally get sidetracked and then forget if I've sent them or not.
We've noticed that the entry process is quite cumbersome.
Happy to chat further if more info is needed.
So it's a shame I have to run a spreadsheet so I can read them.
Also the character length is only 50 characters, it is possible that in the future some of the syntax require to be longer than that.
The admin receives an email when they are done, and reviews and approves what they entered.
The admin can also print out pre-filled out I-9, W-2, and direct deposit authorization forms for the employee to sign (+1 if this was online too!
Have you sustained any work injuries during this period?
Do you have any safety or other concerns with this workplace?
There is no pop up or alert to notify the employee or payroll processor.
When you a number of employees all with different hours it becomes very tricky to keep track of everyones leave relevant to the hours they have submitted on their timesheet for approval.
The only benefit of the new public holiday feature (as I see it) is that it calculates the number of actual hours when the employee requests leave (although having said that, it doesn't indicate that it has done so, it merely presents the net hours that it thinks is correct - this is something that should also be corrected with Public Holidays shown as a separate line item).
I would suggest a simple feature wherein the payroll reports can be emailed, same as the payslips can be emailed to various employees with the click of a button.
It would be helpful to be able to show an employee if there is any doubt in how much leave then have!
As this is used extensively to track profit centres within a business, there now appears to be no ability to allocate wages to different categories, which will diminish the reporting that is available with tracking categories.
6 hour days (you can simply overwrite the hours automatically included).
In these cases where in both clients and us the provider will be able to see the changes and updates and we can easily tell what has been done and not.
Can you please improve the payroll feature that each payslip shows the YTD earnings for each income category (earnings, overtime, allowances etc).
Wouldn't it be great if you could select to print superannuation reports as separate pages for each employee / fund at one time rather than having to do so individually one at a time.
In the US, you create quarterly 941s and end-of-the-year W-2s based on actual cash numbers, not accrual.
Staff flip between many projects and checking their timesheets by multiple people is important.
Can this be increased to 200?
au/Rates/Key-superannuation-rates-and-thresholds/?
com/#PayrollHDILeaveTerminationAnnual leave payable on termination is not subject to superannuation.
(no check box is available to exclude super)Leave payable on termination has different PAYG withholding rates applicable2.
This has caused us to receive multiple inquiries, complaints, conspiracy theories for employees who don't understand what is going on.
What do you think?
The staff can only see time sheets they have submitted for approval, not the ones created by employer.
Is this coming, devs?
As an example, for a client,  the permanent sunday rate is double time for overtime whereas for a casual it is 1.
Are any other firms having these issues?
This is to pickup employees not paid out leave.
The information is all in there, it would be great if somehow a reminder could appear.
It can only be changed to another code.
On another note, I see there is no bugs list on the community site.
Where leave being requested is for less than a standard day, (ie: 3 hours), there is no option for the employee to stipulate this amount.
Please make it autofill in a interface and we could tick the suitable into the right calender.
I can not seem to find the import option.
ExampleWe sold land lord a car for $5000Our monthly rent to land lord is $6500How  do I transfer/reconcile say $5000 for our rent , which will then show us still owing land lord $1500Thank youJez
Has this happened to anyone else?
What am I doing wrong?
Any advice?
Has anyone else dealt with this?
Any advice?
anyone else had issues or a workaround?
What is the best approach moving forwards if I want to switch over to automatic feeds.
Or can i convert the existing one?
We are noticing that for some contacts the information is available on the details page for the contact, but on some contact that field is not shown.
Am I missing something?
It's not disastrous, but is so close to being a thoughtless process!
However, yesterday it came to light that they can now see everyone's expenses.
Why is this?
Can someone guide me to a development map / updates page?
Has anyone else had this issue or is this normal?
I am continually coming up with many features that do not work in Firefox, my preferred browser.
Disclaimer: An accountant I am definitely not!
I am having trouble working out paypal set up.
What is this new feature actually doing in the background?
Is our privacy being pilfered to a third party?
Is it really too much to ask?
Any advice much appreciatedRegardsDaniel
Use case: Say I'm in the midst of email discussion with my client.
This is annoying.
Can someone please point me in the right direction?
How do I do this?
ie Your Company logo + any associations your company belongs to or sponsors.
What is the best option here?
Can anyone shed some light on this please?
And any ideas?
I do have adviser rights.
What am I missing?
Is there anyway to send a remittance with the body of the purchase showing?
Are we purchasing incorrectly?
I'm trying to explain it as best I can.
There's nothing labled tax forms and none of reports seem to make any sense.
I can't find anything under the canned advice and customer service seems to be non-existent.
The purchased items are some goods for resale.
How can I test the billing functionality and have the opportunity to reset to a "clean slate" in regards to billing and inventory levels after the testing?
Printing/Previewing templates from Chrome is fine but MS Edge creates a yellow background as opposed to transparent on our logo.
Could you point me in the direction please ?
or maybe not?
Would welcome any thoughts on an approach from similar retailers.
I wanted to take some training videos but it is telling me that I am not practice staff.
What can I do to learn the program?
We sell various spares, is there a feature where we can input a product with a picture and it will appear on the quotation?
We also use the company's logo when we quote so is there a field when we upload a customer to upload there logo?
Is there anyway of setting an email template to a customer or a branding theme?
Is there any solutions to this.
This of course doesn’t solve the problem of us not developing what’s been requested.
- completed, your vote is returned which you can spend elsewhereNo plans - voting has been closed off and votes returned as this isn’t likely to be worked on Hopefully these make more sense, and set a better expectation around what we are/aren’t doing.
It is the best place for you to leave your feedback and to hear from the horse’s mouth directly on what we’re/aren’t working on.
Forgive me if I am missing something.
This is very necessary!
on my dashboard and to maybe do a very simple setup for ecommerce that I can follow.
I am in USA.
Then I have to delete it and re-write it quicker than it can read it.
Has anyone come across this as well or is it something I have done?
We do a lot of drop shipping.
How do i review all my entered reconciliations ?
Is this possible?
Is this something I am not doing correctly in order for this to save?
What am I doing wrong?
In the words of a Google Authenticator user in the thread about this issue:Wait what?
This is plain sad.
This is obviously incorrect.
Please can we have amounts instead or at least a drop down to change percentage to amount.
Am I close?
com/business/discussion/464732362: Create a credit note so I can reconcile the money received to that.
I am treasurer of a small nonprofit.
Is there a method?
If not how do I enter this tax refund amount?
How should we enter the Employer's Allowance?
3Is this do-able?
E. g. can you allocate staff to each cost code such as the above?
Reconcile "who" field will remember and auto fill what was entered on a previous transaction thats the same.
Anyone got any ideas?
How can I send a monthly statement to a customer without the payments of a previous month being included and thereby not reflecting what they actually owe?
Is there something I am missing?
any other suggestions?
Any suggestions?
But I don't see any option to print or export that page.
On the P&L there is no option to select "Previous Financial Year" as a one click date range.
I am an agency.
How do I make reports that separate the two?
It is my end of year accounting and I want to see what money the company has outstanding.
This could work similarly to merging contacts together.
Are there any other section I missed ?
What has happened over the weekend?
What am I missing?
but a couple of months we did go over our limit of 20 and we can no longer reconcile these.
What set of products or what integrated portal do you use?
There are some expenses that do not seem to have a reasonable code to assign them.
You can have a send receipt to customer checkbox I would think.
How do i get these unlocked?
There is a large unfiled number on the GST rec?
I'm wondering why I can't arrange a data feed from a credit card with the CBA.
Or am I thinking wrong.
Please check the file and import again.
still wraps the Email address, when there is a particurlary large email address.
This is not transferring to barclays.
If you sign up for either the standard or premium plans, is there any limit on the number of users?
And is their any limits on simultaneous user logins
How can I do this?
If not, is there a work around i could try to get the desired result?
Any ideas?
From what i have been able to see, it is something to do with the opening balance on the VAT Owing section that is causing this issue.
I do however have a number of expenses that are $USD.
Some stores calculate tax to the second decimal, others to the fourth.
I assume this is what it is for.
Is this OK?
What code do I use for HMRC payments?
I have a direct debit set that goes out monthly and I am not sure what it should be.
Is there an easy solution to this?
However if in replying the recipient instead chooses to forward/copy the source address, replies can end up getting sent into the abyss at "messaging-service@post.
com"The original sender is then blissfully unaware that a reply has been sent.
How do I fix this issue to remove the duplicates?
What else can I do?
Anyone have any suggestions?
Can anyone point me to the correct place?
If you want to get serious, what is, or what are, the tax implications of doing this?
I can't get the .
At the moment, you can only select 1, 2, 3, 6 and 12 month periods from the date.
Can we please have two extra boxes where we can record the suppliers name and maybe one for open text
has anyone else encountered this problem?
Is it possible to share a Supplier record between multiple organizations?
Is this possible?
When inputting your overall budget is it meant to include GST or not?
Is anyone else experiencing this issue?
Is this possible?
Are there any limitations?
Any ideas how to clean this one up ?
Why do I only have £5, not £20 in my Cost of Goods Sold?
I'm really confused as to why this is happening.
This could be made a lot better, most desktop accounting software has been able to do this for years - even Sage!
What am i doing wrong?
The trouble is, I now end up with one transaction being reconciled, against the bill under Professional Fees and under Direct Expenses too, so the transaction is counted twice in my expenses.
Can we please change the default zoom size of excel exported files form 150% to 100%?
How do I put this through ?
How do I do that?
Should that be right?
xls or .
Is anyone actively managing a revolving line of credit?
Any input would be welcome.
Can we have different names for them please, even if it means incorporating the word "Old" or "New" into one of the names?
What should I be doing to fix this auto amendments?
1) Can you tell the CSV whether something has been paid?
Any ideas?
Is this possible?
Here is my suggest request: eg: To: ABC Pte LtdBlk 123 Ang Mo Kio Ave 4#01-01 Singapore 123456Attn: Mr Johny
I do a Square charge, either cash or credit.
Is anyone using the mobile app/Spend Money with off-site staff and what User role have you had to assign to accomplish this?
I am new to this and not physically present so not sure what the problem is.
Would appreciate any advice.
We may as well not import at all and create all new products one by one.
Is this correct?
Is it possible to have + & - function to enter dates outside current date?
For some reason all figures will transfer except in the column for Dec-16 which is what I'm trying to update.
Any thoughts on why this happening?
I can't use the regular 'Expense' tools because the currency can't be changed from GBP.
Anyone else having this problem?
Or maybe a loan and interest expense split.
I would love to see an "Unsent Receipts" feature (perhaps there IS one?
There are no indications of any errors.
how can I put "october" automatically in the description and then following month it be automatically "november" and so on.
is this possible?
24 or .
Can anyone advise me of a work around .
Is this possible?
not 100% sure, but it is too robust of a solution to a problem that is basically integrating Google Sheets/.
Are any other iPhone users having similar issues?
Or had any luck fixing this?
Am I missing something here?
Is there an option to allow this again or is it gone?
Is this possible?
how do I send a customer a statement every month automatically please?
What do financial planners do as a workaround?
Some transaction are indeed money that we received, but many should be money "spent".
How do I fix this?
So the question is: how do I import overpayments?
There is a bug since an update sometime this year.
Is this possible somehow?
XXCompressed versionBedroom 1 : Includes 7 sockets, 1 light switch, and a light                      &#163;xx.
xxBedroom 2 : Includes 7 sockets, 1 light switch, and a light                      &#163;xx.
It says it happens automatically, but when will it do this?
What I'm hoping for is a graph where I can compare the receivables from a certain date of the month, compared to other months historically.
Has anyone a solution to this problem or a workaround?
For Permanent part time employees can i allocate days of week worked to their profile?
Is this something that will be able to happen in the future?
How do i reconcile this?
On the occasion we receive an overpayment or have to refund a customer for any other reason, it really would be useful for it to appear in the "Awaiting Payments" list.
Anyone got any ideas on this one please?
, but the only thing the comes up is a description box telling me what remove and redo is about, can you please tell me what I'm doing wrong, or is there some thing i should be doing,RegardsJacki
How do I process the refund?
We do have Authorize.
Is this possible?
The receipt was claimed as one of many in an expense claim.
This is long since processed.
Any ideas?
How do I find and resolve these accidentally reconciled "matches".
Or am I missing a trick?
Anyone else have issues?
Do I delete this company and re-setup again?
This obviously defeats the purpose of importing the credit memo in the first place.
The line that reads:  “From your online bill you can print a PDF….
Please identify the correct solution, check that non-computer savvy candidates can act on it (don't use experts please) and then share that advice to your users.
What I want is to be able to see the Drs and Crs for each transaction.
Is this a error on your side of the programme or is there somewhere where I can update this?
Or should I journal the details and date it in the next VAT period?
Has anyone else had this issue?
Same for journals or any input field where a simple formulae could be entered.
99 or $1000.
How do I reset so I can do it again please?
Am I missing something?
Is this a possibility?
This is completely unacceptable.
I would request one single case manager, rather than back and forth with different people every time.
I have one main customer, for whom I do many separate billable jobs.
This is a display bug.
Is there an additional cost for this functionality?
Has anyone used www.
Has anyone come across this issue?
Can anyone offer any insight into how I can resolve this?
Is it possible to un-publish a return for a forward period?
Any ways to solve this situation ?
Nobody wants to use a software that their trusted advisor can't back up personally.
Any ideas?
Can the audit trail be deleted?
Am I doing something wrong?
Was there a problem on this date for anyone else?
Am I also sorting these purchases correctly?
I cannot see any errors or anything that is obviously missing.
What do I do?
What's the best solution to this?
I am putting in my expense, but all of my codes are not listed.
any idea?
Has anyone else successfully added Barclaycard recently with new details?
or G11 boxes, and showing no transaction!
, are there any settings I should change!
Anyone's thoughts are much appreciated.
This is a bug and should be fixed immediately.
So I can use them - or can I?
Any ideas what is causing the difference and how can it be reconciled?
I am unable to void a cheque as is is explained here.
Any idea?
Usually I can delete the USD transaction lines in the csv.
spreadsheet before importing as there is the conversion amount in AUD that gets imported.
Basically the only thing that changes is the date.
Sometimes I want to give this option to customers, but often I do not.
How do i pull a list of non/deleted non voided credit notes?
How do i delete all of these without having to go into each statement manually, scrolling down the bottom and hitting delete.
Any ideas?
wont let us log in or do anything.
”   No indication of timing of fix and no response to email requesting timing for fix.
What is going on?
Is there something else im doing wrong?
This is no use to my AU customers who will be paying in AUD.
Any ideas or advice please?
But how do I mark as paid historical?
When clicking an inventory item the screen that loads is blank.
Therefore it is not possible to edit an inventory item?
Has anyone else noticed any similar problems?
Are there any possible solutions?
Also, is there any support I can contact by phone?
As far as I am aware I haven't changed any settings and I am not sure why this is now happening.
Anyone else has this problem or did I click somewhere I shouldn't have?
Can I do this?
Has anyone else had this issue?
It would be very useful if we could attach documents to a contacts details page.
How can I prevent my customers viewing the stripe fees I am being charged.
I can only do monthly, quarterly or annual filings.
Is this right?
Is there anything I should be adjusting in the settings?
How do I show a partial refund from the cancellation of one of our vehicles insurance due to selling the vehicle?
How do I now allocate the remainder on the credit note to my own profits?
How do I go about this?
Anyone else having this issue?
Is there someway i can get it back?
When I use the "Find & Match" functionality to do that I can't find the incoming statements.
but since this is a huge change in procedure I imagine this will involve a fair amount of work to make it compliant if it is not already.
Any suggestions?
However, is there any other alternative to speed up the process?
Is this possible and if so how can I do it?
How do I obtain the correct figure?
61Whatever combination I try I can't get all three to display the exact totals.
Any idea how to enter the premium, GST and Stamp duty so that all the correct totals are showing?
How do I set the due date in this situation?
Any idea how to resolve this?
Has anyone had this problem or am I setting up something wrong?
Any suggestions?
I want to be able to use the iPhone app to record these as I can take a photo of the receipt there and then.
Can anyone shed any light on why not?
Am I recording these incorrectly?
Has anyone had any success and if so what did you use?
He is going to Sage 100 Contractor edition.
What do you think.
What tax rate should I use for the *TaxType column?
HiI am running CashBook for a couple of client.
How is this done in CashBook?
Is this possible?
Any ideas?
SHould this work ?
Or is this not a feature?
I understand from reading the Community boards that , but how do I record it in the meantime?
Why would they do this?
Has anyone else had this before and is there a solution.
I put in an email support request two days ago and haven't yet heard back a response.
Can anyone shed some light on what might be the issue and how I can go about solving it please?
How can I treat this as stock when technically I am selling them before I buy them?
I'm thinking it may not be an option - but wondering if any of you Xer-iacs have any thoughts or suggestions?
Any ideas on how to rectify?
Has anyone came across this issue and how was it fixed?
How do I change the file extension so I can import it?
I've been trying to figure out how to do the following typical tasks:1.
Of course, customs stopped the shipment and charged me, let's say, NZ$ 150 in GST and fees.
I am hoping for a bit of advise and best practice.
How do I change that?
Good morning everyoneI am looking at another system principally for its integration with time clock systems.
Any suggestions?
Hope I can get the answer for this, Thank you
Is this a known issue?
What am I doing wrong?
Community is managed by and , and we do read every comment!
This is a tricky one.
I tried to answer this question in a Blog post - which you can read about .
We'd love to develop everything at once - but it can't be done.
This isn't live chat, and us Community Managers won't answer every question.
How i can do this?
Hello there,Unfortunately a message you sent could not be delivered to one or more recipients.
what am I missing in the docx?
it is obviously achievable if it is done in the standard branding theme
How do i reconcile the refund transaction?
Can anyone give me the absolute idiots guide?
How do I do that without duplicating the info that the third party is pulling in ( ie sales / transaction fees ).
Is there a known issue?
There are a few expenses that I want to reflect in the cost of these inventory.
However, i am struggling to enter the second and third bills so I can reflect these costs in the inventory costs.
Am i missing something here?
This i thought, should not happen until year end has been completed.
Am wondering if I have a system blip.
Am I missing something here?
HiI'm hoping there is an easy answer to this one.
Am I missing something?
Any ideas?
Hope I am making sense?
Anyone else seeing this?
How do we do that?
Am I missing something?
I am becoming so overwhelmed with this issue.
I am aware that I can deselect individual purchases and this is what I'll have to do to the purchases that were credited.
Am I doing something wrong?
What should I do?
Has anyone else had this and is there a fix?
Am I missing it or not understanding.
Why can't we get a YTD comparison to prior year same period?
Anyone else experienced this or have a suggestion on how to correct it?
I'm sure this is simple but i'm stuck.
Is there somewhere to record cheque details in the client file as MYOB has?
Has anyone else had this happen before?
any ideas
How can I do that?
Is this possible?
Am i missing something ?
or leave them?
Can someone please advise how to deal with this
On this screen, at the top I can see my Statement Balance.
Is this a setting that can be turned on?
Has anyone had this issue before?
Sorry if this is a daft question.
PLEEEEAAAASSSSEEEEECan someone tell me how to obtain the adviser user role?
How do I include these in June return?
Why is there a reference field in the header and then one more in the body?
Of course there could have been cash and CC payments as well, and I would have to look in those two other places to find those as well.
There are going to be other times when I want to do this, and currently I'm having to cobble information together.
Hello,I am importing a .
To test what I am doing wrong I duplicated the csv file and imported a file with only a header and one transaction.
Please see the  for further explanation.
The document is then marked that it is associated with Spend Money.
Can they be deleted from the In Box and not removed from the transaction.
Any functionality issues?
What's the workaround?
Is there any reason for this.
The execution order field is currently there, so it should be fairly easy to do this.
Any suggestions welcome
How do we fix this?
Feel we may have a big operation to fix this mess.
How do I best apply that credit note?
Is there anything I should do differently?
I understand a cheque can simply be recognised by the reference no.
but how do you differentiate Cash and EFTPOS.
Hello - is anyone able to work out if any existing reports could easily show what I'm after?
However, my main issue is with the Read Only role.
Can anyone else with a similar issue explain their scenario and why Read Only access requires Expense Claims?
Or can someone suggest another role that would work for him?
I'm guessing that the built-in app will be fine at this stage, but what I'm really wondering is what the transition point is?
We do reconciliation fortnightly, sometimes monthly.
Any idea how to differentiate bills which has been paid but not reconciled yet?
Or treat them differently?
Could someone explain how this works please as I am assuming I am doing something wrong.
Please contact the website owners to inform them of this problem.
Can you give me any explanation as to why this bogus transaction has appeared.
What am I missing or doing wrong?
Is someone able to advise me?
)The payroll is a bit of a mess with incorrect leave calculations, weird set up of salary sacrificing etc.
Please have the attention field put in the name (for emails) at least.
I am really fed up with it.
In the meantime, how do others handle this sort of thing for tracked inventory?
This will now be quite a difficult job as none of us live in a perfect world where people process their expenses timely and correctly.
Where do I find this feature?
There are about 100 of them - why do I have to credit these out when they are marked as paid?
Am I doing something wrong ?
We had a bill from our Chinese provider in Chinese RMB or USD (they made two currencies in total amount so we could choose 28,000RMB or $4,300USD. )
Any fixes?
or tricks I could try?
or is there known issues?
Has anyone run into this issue before?
Some of the space between columns also seems over generous.
so what is it?
Do you choose BAS Excluded?
Then how do you also stop it being a deduction come tax time?
I am quite surprised there aren't more howls of protest about such a fundamental issue.
How do I set this up?
My invoicing and my billable expenses no longer have any link.
This means that the newer bill is still to be paid.
The auditor suggests it would be easier to start with a fresh set of data in the new financial year (01 June).
Any suggestions on how to adjust the opening balances for the new financial year would be appreciated.
Not sure how I should handle these.
Any guidance would be cool.
Can anyone offer any advice please and whether this has been successful for them.
382b6979"If this error has been reported is there any ETR at this stage?
Am I doing something wrong?
I suspect there is a quite few hours work in this.
How do i fix this?
Any advice would be great.
I can't allocate payments to clients as the amounts are wrong.
However, this is not working.
I have looked online but there doesn't appear to be any useful user guides?
What can't it do, what are it's limitations?
It is now painful to process any transaction.
I am in the startup phase of an ecommerce business.
comI WOULD APPRECIATE AN URGENT REPLY PLEASE - WE ARE A SMALL BUSINESS AND DO NOT HAVE TIME TO WAIT FOR A SLOW RESPONSE FROM YOURSELVES.
Is this possible?
How can you access an individual category without going through the income statement?
Can anyone offer any solutions or comments as to why this might be happening?
OK Situation is this.
I'm going to follow up with Sales/Support, but I wanted see if I could get some input from actual users.
Surprisingly I can't seem to find any discussion on this, but please point me in the right direction if I've missed it.
Can this be done, and if so, what are the hidden merge <<FieldNames>> that I've missed, or whatever?
Sorry if this is a basic question.
Which is what you do with the software every day.
Appreciate any support/instructions here.
Is this possible in this format, or another?
The system we are using operationally can create .
I cant seem to find such a field to enter - any ideas?
I think this is my lack of knowledge of CSV files that is causing the problem.
Any advise welcome.
It is starting to happen every 5 minutes making it very difficult to work.
I am using Google Chrome.
Any thoughts?
is this something that is in the pipeline to be looked at.
Is anyone else having problems?
any suggestions would be helpful.
I am sure there must be many people who require this feature.
Any one have any good referrals?
This is not good enough.
I tried to look for them everywhere but could not figure out why they're there.
Is there code for this or is this even possible?
Any ideas?
For example, today it is defaulting to 20/04/2015!
Is anyone else getting this problem?
Each time, we check our statement from Citibank (online banking and monthly), these duplicates don't exist!
Any idea would be greatful.
Can anyone advise how to get around this?
or do we have to void / delete and re-enter them all?
Can anyone point me in the right direction?
Is there something I am missing here?
How do I resolve this?
but there is no Tax category for it.
These checks for whatever reason DO NOT show up in spending reports for that contact.
How do I remove the asterisk so the check will show in reports?
Anyone else having this issue?
How do I handle the refunds?
I could create bills but is that a best practice?
Is this possible?
I have used the services of one of my suppliers on a job for one of my clients.
I can then delve to to those folders and deal with each supplier.
Anyone got any ideas?
Hey all anyone had problems with error 500?
Am I missing something?
Therefore I would love to be able to sort the posts/requests based on the number of votes as this would permit me to review and use them wisely.
How do we rectify this?
There is nothing in the MANAGE dropdown to perform an update.
The issue I am facing is that  decimals are not enough to express the official rate in colones per 1 USD.
What is the reason for this?
How do i stop it happening again?
Please excuse the newbie question - but why is there a distinction?
What is the advantage of having these 2 distinct types expenses / outgoings?
Has anyone else had a similar problem?
Can anyone give me an idea why this is happening?
Any ideas on how to change this?
I switch ALL to ANY, it works, but then it overlaps with other rules I have.
I am finding this to be extremely frustrating and I think there is something completely different occurring that is stopping it from working, but I can't see anything else wrong further down the rule page.
Question: how do I reconcile these, please?
Is there an option in between ?
We also could not access any dropdown menu so we could not do JE, Billing, AP, or view any customer or vendor data.
Only the people who set up the network at the site which hosts the Web server can fix this problem.
Support can you look into this as its getting to be pointless using this now.
Any assistance will be greatly appreciatedRegardsPaul
Is anyone else having this problem?
Anyone have experience with this card?
Is there anyway you can force a feed through?
Any ideas?
what types of transaction is it specifically referring to?
So, my question is: is there another separator than a point or comma?
I do not find any option of Fixed Assets under features.
How do I delete the entires made prior to 1st July so I have a clean set of books?
We want to hear from you too, so please do keep the feedback coming.
How can I delete them without affecting the locked period?
- it doesn't balance any more because we (happily) made a profit!
Any suggestions?
Appreciate any supportKevin
Is there anyway of making the placeholder (month +1)?
i have read a few things but don't seem to be finding a concrete yes/no/this is how you do it, answer
I'm sure that the figures are probably correct but could someone please explain to me why these figures would / could change after the month has passed?
png)What am I doing wrong?
I've looked high and low, Googled and cannot see how to do it.
Is this possible?
I am Paul
Is this possible?
How do you folks do it?
Is there a work around?
Is there a limit to the number of search criteria you can use in Find and Recode?
HiI am looking for a solution for capturing payments.
When i open the credit note - there is NO allocate credit option?
Please either click the back button or click this link to return to the previous screen and try again.
This is incredibly frustrating.
Sorry customers, I can't print out the sales description?
If a client owes/or we owe a supplier £22.
Is there any reason for this or is it a bug in the system?
After changing rule to use Reference as Reference, it is working.
Is this a user-wide error?
This software is great except for when there's a problem, and it's a goose chase to get any type of resolution.
The issue is that the fields come wrongly sorted.
Any chance of this being looked at?
PS Here is a link to what I am referring to.
Suggestions?
I am not sure which one should I use.
Is this possible?
or better still be automatically voided?
I can't seem to find my specific issue anywhere in the forums.
Here you can see the last transaction, the running total for that period, and the resulting closing balance:https://www.
Has anyone else hit this ?
Is there indeed some process time limit in operation set at roughly 2 minutes ?
The alternative is to have to go back into each entry individually  to change the VAT rate.
How do I get the reconciliation summary to not change after reconciling deposits or withdrawals after the end of a period?
There is another option to 'contact customer care'.
Can some body make a comment to solve this issue or guide me the real process?
I cant do this until I upgrade my subscription.
Is this at all possible?
If I select that transaction and try to remove and redo, it comes up with the following error: How do I solve this error?
Has anyone had any experience on this type of migration projects?
Any thoughts/ideas?
It says that the item is not in stock.
Also is this field able to be set on a per bill basis?
i. e. the reference number of the bill being paid in the batch would be nice.
How do I reconcile this now?
How do I remedy this?
How do u reconcile a deposit made by a client that has not been invoiced?
any suggestions?
What am I missing?
with Sage I can manually adjust the total VAT toensure what I am claiming is th same as what I paid.
I only do consulting as a service.
My guess is it is not pulling in the custom template at all, but it is also not giving me any kind of error information to indicate if there is a problem with my template.
Any ideas?
And if not, can we remove items we may have allocated against (perhaps only once or twice for example) safely too?
I would really appreciate any feedback as an user of this software in Spain.
Please, any ideas?
Any reason why this might be?
Any clues or is this down for everyone?
How do I do this?
I'm sure its simple but can't seem to figure it out.
Could you please advise on how to proceed with this?
We can provide you with links to our organisation to give examples so we can resolve why this happens so it won't occur again in future.
Any reason why?
Is there away I can change where the Vat element is posted?
How do i track this in the inventory every time i sell a device?
What do you do?
or any suggestion that will make this simpler?
Has anyone else noticed how the auto search function isn't working properly?
I have over 1600 products and therefore do not think it will be a wise idea to replace them individually.
Or any other thoughts.
Not sure if this has been discussed before, I searched and couldn't find.
Has anyone else experienced this?
Is there away to track the emails for example read and delivery receipts?
Any ideas?
How do i find it again?
It would be really helpful if dates could be added as numeric only rather than alpha and numeric - much quicker to input date as 12.
But I have not taken any draws nor made any contributions.
So should I zero them out into Retained Earnings as of 1/1/2016?
I am an independent consultant.
If this is the route, how do I attach receipts?
Is there another intended mechanism?
Has anyone had this problem?
Or has anyone got a solution.
I've searched through the videos and guides and can't find any example screens.
Is there away to fix the opening balances only - I don't want to delete 6 months of data entry and re-do.
Delete or redo?
I can not use Find and Recode as there isn't a blank option in Tracking Categories.
I have been taking owner's draws during the year of 2015, but now I am curious how to square that with the retained earnings in 2016.
We use Square POS so I understand how the Square integration works.
Any answers would be greatly received.
Login works as I can do so via a web browser with 2FA turned on.
Once its their I cant do anything with it.
Any ideas?
On October 1st, I didn't owe anybody any money.
Is this correct?
Any suggestions?
This is very strange.
What I'm suggesting is that when the upload button is activated, there is a camera option in addition to the browse option.
Ie if I'm looking for a Customer who starts with BEnter B into the SearchIt will not bring up my B CustomersSo other option is to scroll through each page until I get to the B'sDONT WANT THIS UPDATE XEROTake me back to the good waysAnd Tell whoever is doing your latest updates to THINK MORE!
Can I still attach a file or photo to the paid expense claim?
Any ideas on how to change it to an overall bigger font?
Any ideas?
Hello there,Unfortunately a message you sent could not be delivered to one or more recipients.
How do I deal with this?
Any ideas?
So, here I am.
What can I do?
I am a food producer who bottles infused honeys.
Is this feature there already?
What do you think about that one?
I simply want to be able to assign a yearly budget figure, for arguments sake I'll say:$ 700,000, then break that down into monthly budgets, ie.
But if I try to select Start = Dec 16 Actuals  = 6 months, Period = 6 months I get a year going Jun-May which is not our financial year so the total is meaningless.
This is extremely long-winded by comparison.
this is also happening with other employees, how do i fix this?
What is the best workflow in this situation?
As it is, the re-reconciliation is an unnecessarily time consuming task.
I trialed Zapier however they do not work for Credit notes/refunds.
Suggestions?
I am in Australia.
If anyone knows could they please give me the code and name.
51Not sure what to look for or where to start to correct the problem.
any idea would be very helpful.
Any recommendations on how to enter this in my inventory accurately?
Has anyone got this feed to work?
What am I doing wrong?
or is there a filed or option for "cost-of-sale"?
I can't remember but I think I may have reconciled this as I recognised the entryI think I may have a misunderstanding of how to use spend money and reconcile?
Is this possible?
Am I missing something obvious?
Anyone have any ideas?
This is sooooo FRUSTRATING.
How do I remove the last import and start again OR fix this!
I can't find the difference.
That is normally how expense is reimbursed at most companies here in the US.
Is this possible?
Am I missing something?
So I don't see how I can create any fixed asset types.
But nothing to do with 'fixed assets'anyone?
Any advice?
For further information or to enroll please see the Glenfield Community College website.
How should I handle this properly?
I don't want to be rude about Ben and the rears of his cows - but please can we have those nice ladies back?
Any information would be very helpful
Are any response time issues encountered.
Can I suggest that instead of having a button on screen to enable selection of a file to support a transaction, that there is an area where a file can be dragged to, or pasted.
am I missing something?
Am I missing something here?
Is there a calendar to schedule reminders for VAT returns, etc.
If so, how do you do it?
Or: is there a doable work around?
Or: Do we have to treat those expenses as "bills" in order to assign them to a customer?
Within the company there is a new person, who actually has an accounting degree, but is also quite an open-source software fan.
How do I reconcile the two separate lines as the totals don't match on the right hand side?
any ideas?
How do you amend  Debtor notes please?
We do various events each year, each of which is a 'Project'.
Am I making sense?
For more information related to this Free Financial Training Course you can visit to Website:-
has this happened with anyone else?
Such as can I change the top margin?
These discounts are not tracked on the day due to time and the items can be any from our range.
Is there any setting we can use to prevent the same bill has been entered again and again?
and I then can't save the edited transaction.
Is anyone else having this problem?
Any assistance would be greatly appreciatedJohn W P
How do I get it to accept the payments and reconcile these when the numbers don't match.
Thus, I doubt any actual support is coming.
Why is this happening?
but how in the world do I print a check for this amount then?
How can I export the Fixed Assets-registered list so I can see the key fields(such as asset name, asset number , serial number)  in an excel document ?
If i switch to Firefox the documents can be viewed.
How do I adjust the sales tax due?
I'm not even sure I can undo all the individual changes to get back to the default.
Thank you in advance for any adviceJane
Or do I have to manually change each and every expense code in the Chart so that it links through?
How do I reconcile this?
I'm not an accountant - is there a reason why this happens.
or is this a bug?
often when we reconcile there is some rounding, is it possible to draw the rounding out of a separate pool of deposit?
Has anyone else experienced a similar problem?
However, can I restrict each business's user access, so that users from "Business A" cannot view "Company B"s affairs (and vice versa), while the accountant and I can access both, via two log-ins or whatever?
Am I missing something?
Finish registering the asset -> Error "This field can't be blank".
This blank uneditable field is blank.
Finally you can now go back and start creating that asset again.
It's not obvious what the purpose of this field is.
It could be one or two or it could be two dozen, depending on your client.
And how do you "mark as billed" when you've only received a portion of the order?
Any ideas?
So how can I go about reversing the expense claim in the previous financial year and reprocessing it in the current financial year?
Anyone else encountered this?
I can't seem to delete the comparative balances tabs.
Is this a system bug?
In the second scenario, I can't reconcile the £31.
Anyone got any solutions?
Do I have to create each company separately before group it under 1 name?
How do I fix this or refresh it?
HiHow do you all handle your employees' kilometers?
Is this how it works and if so what are the steps, or am I misunderstanding how it works?
Hello all,I accidentally applied 'interest income' to a set of monthly expense payments.
Also, In terms of changing the codes, will this mess up the reports.
Is there usually a delay?
In MYOB we could use identifiers to group our customers, such as those who paid by credit card each month.
Anyone else have this issue?
Am I doing something wrong?
Regardless of what discount I give on an item, the column would always show "1.
00" for all line items, even if there is no discount given at all!
And can not run this functionin the client until the action has been completed?
How do I reconcile this ?
For example, I had an employee go in and do several manual adjustments that did not require any level of approval.
Is this possible?
How should this actually be handled?
What is the difference between these two fields with respect to their intended use?
Is it possible to have Items then select whether or not they are Inventory or Expenses?
Problem is it is showing an amount in the opening balance as follows when it should be nil.
The question is how do I assign costs to a job?
Is there a bug or am I missing something?
So let’s start off with the  What's yours?
yes, you can change the start and end dates at the top.
but this is clunky.
Can anyone assist in how to do this?
any unused amount can be refunded.
Can you again please provide us a longer time for your servers to generate the reports.
This is then reconciled.
How do we deal with this please?
Is this possible?
In Contact Details what is the "Find Address" field used for?
So, firstly, can I undo the void action?
Secondly, how can I change the reporting date?
Am I missing something?
Is this possible?
This is very frustrating as I have done it 3 times already and it has not saved any of them.
I am sure there is something very simple I am missing.
How do I change the date when I am doing a transfer on the reconciliation screen?
You can find the group at https://www.
However, is there a clever work around whilst this important enhancement is being considered.
If there is a clever workaround for the above outstanding requirement I would be very happy to receive such information.
should this work?
I can't find any information on how to do this.
How do I start using zero for this type of book keeping.
Please call me if you can on 07715602793, I want to subscribe, but before I want to familiarize with the software to gain confidence.
I see in some posts that this is done automatically once the first asset is imported.
This should be  in  letters somewhere as it impacts point two below very seriously because if you do not set up each acc dep prior to a large import, you can write the rest of the day off.
I often wonder whether there is an accountant who has been in financial management on the design team.
Any suggestions please?
How do other people handle this?
Are there any hardware / software solutions out there that you would recommend?
how do i send a receipt?
It is very easy when entering data to enter the incorrect information including the date so maybe this is something that could be addressed.
Here's how the transaction went:Item Sold for £47.
Can anyone advise on this please?
jpgCan anyone comment on this?
What am I doing wrong ?
Please restore it or otherwise advise.
As it is now there is absolutely none
Let's say as a builder , I want to have a P&L for Project A which is done already, and with Project B which is an ongoing project.
I am importing from Quickbooks 2010, and I have been in business since 2012.
qbb or .
Am I missing something here?
But due to system changes, this is no longer possible.
What if you used the 'spend money'feature to record a transaction?
I am a new user.
However, I can't work out how to create an online quote.
I can send an email with a pdf of the quote attached.
With every other date picker, you have the option of simply typing in the date, e. g. , 31/3/2015.
Could you please put the name of the contact on statements.
dl=0What am I missing?
This is a bug that should be fixed.
It is confusing to not be able to see all purchases under "purchases"!
Is there some setting I'm missing?
Any ideas?
Is there a DOCX field for embedding the uploaded image?
I have managed to get  a rough approximation of what I want, but still have some gripes - for instance double line spacing where our business address is and the footer text defaulting back to Times Roman (I think) even though it is set to my preferred Century Gothic in Word.
HelloI have set up a budget but I confess I am left wanting here.
For example, do I re visit the budget each month and well, do what?
How do I declare them anyway?
If so, then is this correct?
I understand that only the one who added the feed can refresh it - how can I be that person instead of my accountant?
Suggestions?
How do I correct this?
what is recommended?
Any suggestions?
Is it possible to have a particular date to get a balance sheet - rather than by month?
How can I create a separate Chase credit card feed using the new login credentials?
I have seen articles on how to use the profit and loss reports but it is not showing up anywhere in the reports.
This is SUPER annoying when there are 20+ payments in the batch with the incorrect tax rate.
Is there something I'm missing?
Can we have the ability to choose a different email to send quotes to please!
I decided to post here so that when it gets resolved I get notified (along with anyone else who is experiencing this).
HelloI am a certified Chartered Accountant.
Am I missing something here?
This is a feature that I use almost daily, especially when I am not sure what has been happening with a certain contact.
Am I missing something?
However when I do this I get an error message saying;What am I doing wrong?
Can anyone advise on the correct procedure for writing off stock?
What am I doing wrong?
It's only letting me do a max of 4 entries.
Has anyone experienced this problem and how can I fix it?
is this possible?
Note you can pass the savings to your clients or provide the code directly to them if they are managing their own subscription - completely up to you.
There is no one to chat with, to work through such an issue, there used to be?
If I do it on Apple's Safari it renders OK.  My preference is to use Chrome - so what is going on?
)Is there anyway i can do a bulk ok?
Any advice welcome.
What is the trick to get "split" to appear?
Are there any better ways of handling this scenario?
What do people use this for?
Am I missing something basic?
Is there anything to be done to create a payStub?
If you do, this will impact your balances and reports.
Could we have a banner size logo as this would be very good for use of additional advertising or promoting additional products or services
You are in fact complicating the crap out of things.
your aren't going to confuse anyone .
I noticed that Manual Journals do not automatically create/assign Journal numbers.
Any replies would be helpful.
Am I being stupid?
The other $7,000 can be used for anything.
Is this possible?
The API docs seem to indicate that it's not, as there is no currency field for line items:http://developer.
Do you have any suggestions on making sure this doesn't happen?
Grateful for any assistance
Should I be concerned?
How do I get a space between 'David' and 'and'.
Given all this, has anyone else managed an effective work-around to this problem?
Any questions, or answers - post away!
any ideas
Any hints?
Is this possible?
Has anyone else experienced this and have a solution?
Where can i get access to "Reminder Email"?
Am I missing something obvious?
Any advice would be greatly received.
If contact group is a contact attribute that is accessible via API, I can make my app do the work for me.
How do people deal with this?
I can't be the only person running a SaaS business that takes credit card payments monthly.
Has anyone worked out how this can be done?
Anyone else having this problem, or found a work around?
How can I edit the disposal of a fixed asset.
Any suggestions to improve performance?
How can I change the date format throughout the program to read dd/mm/yyyy.
On one of them there is 2 pages with the second being blank, how do I remove this page?
I couldn't quite work out the best place to post this, any developers interested please get in touch.
Please can we have a warning box appear with a yes/no option to ensure that we don't accidently void by mistake
So for me, the unit price is my hourly rate, and the quantity is how many hours and minutes I spent on the job.
Is it possible to alter the allocation of transaction data fields (as is possible in a csv or qif download)?
That is great, but now I have a transaction of $44.
Can you please tell me how to correctly process this type of transaction, or if this is a glitch please apply a fix.
What am I missing?
If you are interested in being part of the design and beta programme please email me: peter@business-express.
Please contact me for qualified accounting and business support:  or phone +64-4-282-0306 or +1-647-367-0876.
Sort on Any/All to see where All is wrong (example: Texaco, Shell and Hess in one Auto Expense Rule).
It also creates your choice of compound rules (Any Rules with many keys) or separate Rules for each key (each Payee equals one key).
Please ask me all your questions about anything you do not understand.
How can this be added to the standard template?
Why is no one replying to me?
Is it correct to have purchases under cost of sales?
Am I missing something?
I made some purchases in the demo company and it changed the gross profit!
I get about 100 odd sales per day how can i look them up in another program if the details don't show?
Has anyone any experience importing these?
Anyone had and solved similar issues?
Usually the filename tells me what transaction type it is.
• In the create transaction window, click the attached file so that it opens in an overlay window, from where I can put the details into the new transaction.
Other systems can do this process with ease.
The problem is there are times when they overlap.
The question is if there is any implication for using the VAT reconciliation facility.
Anyone have any ideas?
com if you have any questions.
This event is hosted by AddOnSuccess and Wayne Schmidt.
Is there a look-up feature or some database?
How can I switch to Accrual basis and what would be its implication?
Please prevent duplicate reconciliation of the same item.
Is there something I am doing wrong?
Any ideas?
Can anyone tell me how I can attain more achievements?
This is a huge time-waster.
I do a lot of work through Elance and occasionally other freelance sites such as freelancer.
Any ideas?
can anyone tell me what the difference is between a contact and a customer?
What am I doing wrong here?
Is it possible to prevent users from creating new inventory items?
Do I have to manually mark each one as paid, or is there a better option?
Any ideas how to do this?
What could the problem be?
What do you think?
Customer is added to mailChimp + any segments/groups based on rules I've setup in this integration.
The logic behind this is obvious but the problem is that the data remains visible to our staff.
Is there anyway to permanently delete these lines?
ThanksAaronNB: I am well aware of the accounting issue in removing this data and am comfortable with putting the necessary journals in manually to reconcile.
00 on the:However when i click through, i can see the figures.
Am i mising something?
I am looking for some UX.
"How do I do this?
Is it possible to remove it?
Is it possible to schedule part payments?
No matter what you enter the Item is stuck at 0.
You can see this in the web site.
Updating the Quantity in the app from "1" to "1" fixes it up but that is pretty unintuitive.
Hopefully this is a small bugfix.
I am sure SOMEONE would want that level of reporting.
I've gone to comparative balances for 2012 but there is nothing there.
Which should be $70.
Is this possible?
How should I reconcile those amounts?
I can assure you that in reality, that is not the case.
Part of the budget to our branches is earmarked for capital expenditure, and there'll also be more transparency with regards to real income.
Anyone else solved this mystery?
Why is this, and how can I change this?
Dear AllI am currently using Clearbooks.
Anyone have experience with this?
Any ideas what's going on here?
Any suggestions on how to handle this?
The reason for this is that my letterhead already contains my logo, address etc, but the email version has to have these added in.
Is this possible?
Join me for a live free 1hr review & demonstration of all the new features and updates in the core systems I specialise in.
Why is this not possible?
Is this included?
If you attend the roadshow and have any feedback or questions about what was presented or you want to engage further with the speakers, please post below!
I cancelled my organization a few weeks ago and i am still being charged for something i don't have.
Is anyone else having this issue?
Hello,How I can use the multi line function to bulk reconcile in the cash coding section.
Or is there a work around or a CSV template which includes the currency to be imported.
Any ideas what this means?
How do i do it?
What have I don't wrong, or how can i fix this.
My apologies if this is a simple question, but I am not sure on how to approach this.
They billed us $750 this week and thus only paid $4250 this week.
How do I process this?
Any thoughts?
Anyone else have a solid process for this?
However there are some pages where the header, including the menu, completely disappears -- for example, the budgeting pages.
Any ideas?
If not, what do I do about paying her superannuation?
Hello, I am having some sales paid by paypal.
The recent change in the Organisation Settings screen to prepare for the business directory has removed reference to a company's Registered Address (or Registered Office in UK speak).
And also probably cross charge some of the overheads from head office How do we do this please?
or a PO# box?
Any suggestions as to how to upload file?
Anyone else come across this?
Thank you in advance for any contributions.
Square can export CSVs of every detail or summations.
You can then create some pivot tables for some other ways to look at your data.
* I'm currently trying to decide if I want every item in its summation, or if all the details are better.
It is so confusing to work.
I will be eternally grateful if anyone can suggest how we can set up our users and internal processes to achieve this simply!
For example, the GST amount in bills from Telstra is less than 10% (presumably because a component of their service is exempt); e. g. in a $99.
What am I doing wrong?
or.
Can anyone advise how we can correct this please?
Anyone else see this or had to deal with this?
Can someone please inform me whether this is actually correct, and if so how easy is it for this information to be seen.
How am i suppose to figure out what is not being imported?
Any idea how we can achieve this?
We used to be able to do this in Quickbooks as it had a whole Estimates section.
HiHas anyone sucessfully imported MYOB AccountRight Plus Version 2012.
If you have any comments or questions about the improvements and new reports please leave them below.
If you have specific feature requests, please raise them in the .
Therefore, once a contact is in a group, I'm unable to remove it.
Or, would that unwittingly double my assets?
Using MYOB we can print Tax Receipts to individuals/companies that gave financial and/or in-kind donations.
net/solutions/merchantsolutions/merchantservices/automatedrecurringbilling/Anyone any advice on what works best for them?
I would really appreciate any feedback.
Is this possible?
I understand from the back story that the unreconcile button has proven to be troublesome to some users.
how can i do so?
I am unaware of some of the options available.
How can i keep a record related to every single project ?
Is there a reason why this would be happening.
Any receipts larger than A5 tend to be undecipherable.
Has anyone else encountered the same problem and can give me some pointers.
is this going to be possible?
is this going to be possible?
The only thing I can figure out how to do is delete the line item and then create 3 new ones totalling the amount of the original item.
Any thoughts on why/how to fix this?
Are you reconciling even before you get out of bed in the morning?
Or on your morning commute?
Or somewhere else?
Either I'm missing a trick, or this feature doesn't exist?
When I setup my business I filled in the Registered Office details with address where my company is registered (which is my accountants address).
I want to be able to see the profitability of a specific job by seeing what specific expenses it created.
Am I missing something?
Is there no repeating version of the "spend money" process?
Maybe attach the Excel to that reimbursement transaction (if that is possible).
Is there a recommended workflow?
Can anyone please advise?
This is what my old fashioned brain calls a prepayment!
I printed a bunch of tests and got the alignment adjusted so that the check prints correctly (Quickbooks style voucher checks), however the problem now is that the check prints correctly, the voucher/stubs do not.
or is this part of the Reporting issues that are unavailable.
I am currently having to set one up on each new client to ensure box 6 on the VAT return shows the correct figure and can not use exempt or zero rated because this would cause difficulties with partial exemption calculations
I haven't been but as they seem to be so any issues I am going to start.
In the meantime, any guidance on how other firms are producing the reports to clients would be appreciated.
can gives us a list of the charts we would require.
Dear all,I'm stuck with a more complex situation and hoping someone is already using something similar.
What is the likelihood of this being update?
Can I use one instance of the $39 p. m. package to manage this multi-company structure?
When I enter the print now a window will pop up asking what do you want to do with InvoiceDownloader_ASPX?
If I try to save the file there is no response.
Am I getting this all wrong?
If that method is correct then what on earth is the point of the automatic CC feed?
Any pointers would be extremely welcomed!
i. e. the bookkeeper, accountant, business owner, and staff or is there a limit?
What is the effect of publishing them again?
Is this possible?
Please can you change this so we dont have to touch the mouse once we are in the data entry screen
Eg a Red/Green style or Positive/Negative style for each property on a rolling 30 day's, or a current month's, basis.
How do I achieve this?
What differences in terminology do you find most difficult to translate to what we are used to working with?
How do you work around these issues?
What do people think about this?
Any other suggestions?
If you write checks/cheques in your business, we'd love your input about when, how often and in what format - please comment below!
So I've searched everywhere but I can't seem to find an answer to this basic question: how do you delete contacts?
We've started a  especially from users in other regions about whether or not this would work for you so we can get on to rolling this out to you as soon as we can.
For the full details and links to how to use these great new features, check out the
Everything else should be standard balances.
I can not see anything in the reports section that would do this.
How can I do this?
Obviously it is going to take us hours to hand key these in.
It’s still turned on and set up, but is not pulling any data.
Also, the client user can refresh the feed - is there a limit on how many users can do this?
Anyone got any suggestions?
An option to disable this feature would be great as it is becoming quite irritating.
Anyone else coming across this issue?
However, when I go to view them I can't see them?
We're unsure why we can't see the claims that we both have entered.
Can anyone assist?
How do we accomplish this?
Any suggestions or am I missing something fundamental here?
com/, but wonder if there is any other options?
What is the best method for doing this?
)What am I doing wrong?
I would be inputting several a day, would this be ok, and secondly how safe is the data I enter?
Has anyone else had this problem?
Any ideas?
The award he is employed under states that the leave loading is to be calculated as 17.
Any ideas?
in the salaries & wages there is a total , can it be extended to include hours?
Do we have something set up wrong?
Is this expected behaviour?
There is an "Employees" group in the Contacts admin that is empty.
Some of the things I'm wondering include:1) Assigning default earning rates (and allowances possibly).
Is there anything I can do?
How can I do that?
I am wondering how I get rid of the leave now!
How do I unassign the leave types?
I can't find any details if there are or aren't any costs incurred.
Am I right in thinking that changing the name from 'Ordinary Hours' was the cause of this?
Please note that I reside in the NT and have the long service leave ACT.
I am aware of how long service leave accrues and on what basis (exemptions etc).
Wot did I do wrong ?
Any idea what's going on?
How can I set this up so there is no PAYG involved.
Really weird issue but the leave accruing for one employee is exactly double what it should be.
Any ideas!
For some reason, the leave that is accruing for the 2 new employees is not accruing correctly.
Any suggestions as to why this could be happening?
How do I do this?
How can i do it?
There is no starting balance at this point.
53hrs pw is to set it as a fixed amount, but this will not then create a leave accrual for any extra hours worked.
That fund have kindly agreed to return the contribution to us so I can forward it to the employee's correct fund.
How do we then input an ACN/ABN?
Any ideas on how to do this?
He has asked how the leave requests should work?
do i use salary sacrifice here and how?
How do I change this and can I amend past payruns/payslips to reflect correct accrual?
I am only given two choices it seems.
I would have thought this would have been a fixed rate but when in payroll settings there is no box to put the hours worked.
Is there a reason why we can't edit this box?
This is a 'first'!
Is this possible?
Also how do I get it to show on the payslip the annual leave accrued?
Can anyone assist with this please?
Any ideas please?
Currently to reconcile the wages on the P/L to the payroll activity summary I have to take gross wages on the P/L and reduce the sacrificed amount on the payroll activity summary to get an accurate depiction of how much was spent on wages and how much was spent on super.
how do I now do this automatically for part time staff etc?
How do I rectify this?
Can someone please explain to me what I'm doing wrong or how can I get this option?
They want me to input all payroll data dating back to the start of the financial year and run off old payslips so they can use these to apply for personal finance etc.
Can I go and now revert the processed payroll to a draft and fix the errors.
For TOIL or flexible working.
Any ideas please?
Has anyone ever done this before?
Has anyone had this problem before, and how do we fix it?
The system seems to not allow me to touch this so it is showing that she is owed nearly 80 hours of annual leave when it should be about 20.
Has anyone else encountered this problem?
Doing this manually for a large number of offices is only going to breed human error.
I am using timesheets in payroll with tracking by location.
Or do a manual journal?
Any suggestions to fix this issue?
Can anyone tell me how I can get the Long Service Leave payout, as a result of a bona fide redundancy to show at Lump Sum A.
If Not Should I go to HOSTPLUS to do this manually?
Is it able to be changed or is it in the locked section which I would've thought I had access to but don't see what it is that I can't get into to change.
How can I clear the names and choose all employees?
However when they login through this invite received they end up back at their original emplopyee record and cannot access leave payslips etc.
I can't delete or backspace the fields and there is no '&#225;ll employees' option on the drop down menu to select.
Is there a simple fix for this?
Is there site maintenance currently on?
Can't find anything in the "user manual".
An employee can claim exemption from the Medicare Levy, complete form NAT 0929, and submit with employer.
Employer is then required to reduce the PAYGW in accordance with the software formulas contained in NAT 1004.
Sometimes it flashes on for a second or two.
Any ideas on how to "give it back"?
Any thoughts on how I can correct this or identify what is causing the rounding issue?
Has anyone heard of this process with MYOB?
Any suggestions please?
Or must that be done manually?
Hello,I think it would be great if we could assign a job code to wages in Payroll.
Any advice please!
Is there something else I can check?
If we don't already use the payroll system can I still enter employees and use auto super without paying them through the payroll system?
HiApologies if this is a dumb question.
How do I associate a supervisor/manager to an employee, so that the Team Managment tab shows a manager their sub-ordinates only ?
Next When i run a monthly balance sheet my wages 804  are double what the total of 477,  how can i fix this or is it normal?
When setting up Twice Monthly Payroll how do you show set hours and a set hourly rate on the payslip.
I can't get my head around how an employee will choose from either midweek rate or weekend rate or manager rate if i can't allocate it to their profile.
In saying so, PLEASE make available the following options  1.
What may be the reason for this ?
Is anyone else out there in Australia having the same problem?
For example, Last week of May 2016 has 2 days in May and rest of the days in June.
How do i back date the accrual annual leave to the starting date and how to do manually calculate this and update it into the current payslip?
I am not sure what the input value is, could you advise please?
When I go into the payslip template there is only the one tax deduction line.
Can anyone tell me what I am missing?
How do I reconcile the employee portion against the bulk transfer amount?
Hope I am making sense?
Is there away for this to not come up?
And seeing how I didn't, how do I clear it now?
Has any one come across a similar issue?
Is this possible please?
Is there anyway to split so the business isn't paying an extra 9.
Can anyone advise what I am doing wrong please?
I can't find any details of how this works.
If so - what is the cycle/timetable for auto super?
Am I thinking this through correctly?
This could then be used to automatically adjust PAYGW for staff in such situations.
No guarantees they will do it but better then me walking away with lists of changes.
How do I adjust this manually please?
I am launching a new company on 1 july and in the process of setting up payroll.
How should i set this up in payroll?
Is there anything else i should be aware of?
How do I fix this?
HiJust wondering if it is possible to record annual leave in Days rather than in Hours?
It would do good.
I will fix up any minor adjustments in July.
What do other people think on these include or exclude?
I am furious.
Has anyone else had this problem.
Any ideas how i can fix this?
What effect will it make if I change the payroll template for each employee from 40 to 38 hours?
Should this leave be renamed
How do you record inclement weather in payroll.
Is there super paid on IW payments etc.
The awards are very sketchy with details(probably on purpose) How do you record the depletion of allowed hours of inclement weather?
During the 2015 year an employee was 'moved' from the payroll of one company to the other - or should I rather say, the employee was stopped being paid in one company, and started being paid in the other (no proper transfer was done).
Tax for this person dropped from to $754 (what was deducted at the time) down to $606 (what is now being deducted).
I'm checking if this is how Revert to Draft is designed or whether this is a bug?
Hello allA staff member is taking the 25th April to 9th May which is 64 hours, she only has 38.
Can someone please point me in the right direction.
We both work normal jobs and run our side company.
Anyone else have this problem?
What happened was, in lastest payrun, hours in annual leave and personal leave show as 0.
what is the issue?
Is there anyway to access a timesheet once it's been deleted?
How do I change it so they don;t accrue anymore but still hold their entitlements?
How do I go about filling in their time sheets for the weeks preceding this first run?
It will be great to hear from anyone who have uploaded an ABA file to CBA internet banking.
Has anyone set this up previously?
Are the deductions pre or post tax and can I get them to come up on the PAYG summaries?
If this is unavailable, has there been any discussion about modifying the current mobile app to be able to view the My Payroll/Employee portal information?
I am very confused at this stage.
Can anyone advise what I am supposed to reconcile the reimbursement to.
Can anyone offer some guidance on what I should do next?
How do you remove superannuation from the payslip as it is not payable on paid parental leave.
"Payslips for employees aged 18 years or over must include a Superannuation Guarantee Contribution line with a calculation rate of Percentage or Statutory Rate".
How do I process this?
Any suggestions?
Has anyone done this before?
Has this happened to anyone and how do i resolve it?
Any hints how I can fix this?
How do I get the reimbursement amount to show?
Sorry, I am totally confused by this process!
this is fine, it's not convenient but i can handle this.
Any ideas what the problem is?
Can anyone confirm?
According to wageline WA LSL is calculated on .
How do I establish the hours accrued annually.
I have an employee who is entitled to 152 A/l units annually and is also entitled to leave loading.
He should be accruing 2.
How do I fix this so that the leave entitlement balance is correct?
Please advise us whether we can edit opening balance or delete all the payroll information.
If so, how do I do this?
Would appreciate any assistance that is on offer!
I am going to set up a unpaid Maternity Leave type for her, but i was wondering if i should follow any particular guidelines for this please?
In the Employment page I can't enter anything into the Ordinary Earnings Rate field.
I am using a custom Earnings Rate for each employee.
can you tell me what the ".
If not there tax is calculated as a Foreign resident.
my Payroll Activity Summary for Jul 2014 - Sep 2014 is wrong almost double when I compare to P&L, I think P&L is right, but not sure why the Payroll Activity Summary is wrong.
and can automatically enter the next payrun.
Initially we set him up as full time, ie accruing personal and annual leave.
But it worked out that he is only working on a casual basis.
I am pulling my hair out.
There's no such thing for what we do (design and television).
Employee has worked full year and not taken any Annnual Leave.
Any ideas why this is happening?
Hello,We had a sale of business in Feb of this year and a legal requirement in Victoria states that the new owners must take on all staff entitlements including long service leave.
3. this is a business expense for her, so I wanted to give her an invoice4.
There is not a "rejected" Timesheet nothing!
This is confusing because we sometimes have returning staff where we set up another profile - now the staff's name is showing up twice.
Thank you for any assistance.
Is this capable?
Any thoughts would be great.
how do i set this?
Is there any problems associated with leaving a terminated employee with access to the portal?
What possible harm could it do?
Any steer?
How do I do this on the payslip to deduct the correct gross/tax/net?
when setting up a part time employee's leave lines, which option do i choose?
how do I enter half a day of leave?
Unless someone advises I should.
Any ideas how I can make this work?
I also can't manually enter leave directly to the payslip (such as unpaid leave) and have it back flow to the employee record.
Have not done any set up for personal / carer's leave : how do i do that please?
Has anyone else checked this?
How do I get rid of the second Saturday?
How do I put in the Tuesday?
How do we handle the employees.
Any ideas?
This would be similar to paying Leave in advance, but I was not able to find any instructions how to do it.
How do I calculate and do this?
Subsequently, if they added 1 hour of normal base hours and 1 hour of casual loading.
Can you please advise where I am going wrong?
I would appreciate some input from anyone.
Or am I looking in the totally wrong place.
I can find the starting balance but not what is accumulated since then.
)In MYOB I could create a payrun for all staff, but then create two separate banking files to upload.
I can't access any of the base earning items.
What do you suggest?
An amount was incorrectly included as an Allowance rather than Salary on a previous payslip - it is now on the Group Certificate as such and I am wondering is it ok to lodge as is?
Should these appear separately.
HiI have uploaded my EMPDUPE file to the ATO via the business portal but it has been rejected for the following reason:Reason: Please contact your software developer.
It would be very useful if managers could be given access to only time sheets of designated employees.
Can anyone assist.
how do i remove this leave from the payroll overview screen.
Also, is there anyway of removing the huge number of superannuation entries from this form as 90% of them have already been paid.
How do i…?
Maybe I am missing something.
However, their leave balances do not seem to be accurate at all.
How do I correct this or is this a system error?
How can I now advise the ATO of the correct amount?
How do I reinstate these pays or why would this occur?
My General Ledger and Payroll Activity Summary do not match - Ahhh.
I can see I have the option to undo his termination - can I select this option and simply update his termination date to 7th Jul, or will this cause other issues for the client's file?
I am not quite sure and wanted to clarify before I try to make any changes.
I allocate all my expenses and receivables to a job number so I can do job P & L's.
Anyone else have this problem or can suggest a solution?
I'm in the process of doing the EOFY payroll summaries.
What is the difference?
15 transaction how do I process ?
How do we fix this?
Any ideas?
Any ideas?
this is super easy.
Allowances subject to tax withholding earnings rate is a fixed amount, whereas Ordinary Hours is measured in Hours.
For example, you could change 'Allowances subject to tax withholding and super' so that it's measured in hours.
How can I transfer these amounts to the expense where they belong.
Can somebody please tell me how I do this?
Hope someone can understand what I am trying to say :).
Is there any suggestions for when i come to processing this?
Could you explain to me why?
Are there settings to eliminate this line so that I can still process pays?
Am I missing something?
I am guessing I should do a journal entry?
Have I lost my mind and am reading this incorrectly?
How do i create this please?
How do I reconcile this?
It would be useful if this was set up the same as payroll settings where you can start to type the SPIN and the fund automatically populates.
Any ideas?
Is this an error with my setup or is there a bug in the system?
Can you pls advise how to process this ?
5 hours, as there is no Annual Leave Loading accruing, but leave was granted under that heading.
My understanding is it should have come from Annual Leave Loading.
Can I take the 8.
I am wanting a lot more from a roster program that what we currently get from a good old Roster done in Excel.
Any feedback would be great.
Can you please advise how they go about deleting a pending or approved leave request to resubmit with new dates.
Yes, they can deduct them from each other but they wanted to see it straight up.
I am open to explore other methods anyone else may have established to achieve this outcome.
'I understand this means Saturday 'leave loading' should be Saturday penalty rate of 25%.
How can I find & match or create a rule when there is no entry in there to reconcile against?
So new to this world my head is spinning, but here goes.
Any suggestions on how to do this properly would be welcome.
If this is a programming change I can't believe they would do that on a short week.
Can anyone please advise me as to how to make changes to this.
I'm having trouble reconciling this amount as I can not split the figure.
I am experiencing some issues with the tracking categories vis a vis payroll.
How can I easily determine how the amounts in the payroll journal have been broken up by employee?
Is there anyway around this?
They work 37 hours per week (generally 30 hours over weekdays and 7 hours Saturday).
Is anyone able to shed any light on this?
30 hours or 4.
Is this possible?
Any thoughts?
I am getting really frustrated with this.
This is what happens:He gets emailed the inviteClicks the link in the emailClicks the accept buttonClicks the create new log in buttonEnters the passwordConfirms the passwordTicks the T&C boxClicks the OK buttonThen gets this error message every single time no matter what I try!
Please either click the back button or click this link to return to the previous screen and try again.
I can only seem to locate individual files for leave etc.
Some categories appear to be mis allocated in the general ledger.
I have what I think is a simple requirement of payroll, with regards to leave.
Is this possible?
Is this possible?
However, how do make their annual leave and sick leave calculate on days not months?
Can you give me any clues please?
Our employees are on a fixed weekly salary regardless of how many hours they work in the week.
How can I enter varied hours while keeping the weekly salary fixed when it comes to payrun time?
If I change the super calculation type to percentage of earnings and manually put in 9.
If so this requires a manual calculation on each employee, which is particularly tedious when paying casuals who do not work a set pattern of hours.
Anyone have a work around for this?
How do I get leave entitlements to calculate on hrs relating to public holidays?
When staff request leave, there is a box to put in a description.
Do I set up a leave item instead?
Also is there somewhere that I should be putting the year to date earnings.
Any suggestions?
How do I go about making adjustments so that the annual leave and personal leave accruals are now correct?
I want to show my directors in one glance any money due to 'go out' for both liabilities and creditors etc.
Any ideas on any alternatives to do this?
and how do i go about paying this employee?
How do I change his payroll status?
Has anyone encountered this or have any idea what has happened?
Any advice?
I assume this is due to previous year activity.
How do I overcome this ?
Is it possible to assign an approver to a staff member?
How do i set up this as as deduction?
Has anyone else experienced this?
This has meant a large spreadsheet with manual calculations so that I can split the Earnings, Tax, and Superannuation correctly between each location and then manually update the draft bill.
So now that you've taken away the draft bill, how do I adjust the journal entry to record my location expenses accurately?
For this setting do you recommend 365 days or 364 days (52 weeks)?
How would you setup the payroll calendar?
Would it be easier to select fortnightly or twice monthly?
Please advise what should I do in each scenario.
Start and end dates can be the termination date.
Can someone please advise how to go about paying out unused leaves?
How should I do this?
In case I should also adjust the tax, how is the computation?
I couldn't see any immediate reason for this given they earn below $180k per year.
50% on top of the annual leave for you or what do you do?
Since it's the commission for selling a property, there is no particular frequency as it depends on selling a house.
As I did not think it fitted into any other category.
I'm hoping that this is the right avenue to go with?
Apologies if this has been covered before but I searched and couldnt find a similar thread.
It will not accept No TFN or TFN Pending.
Any ideas why this is happening?
The termination date is greyed out and although my cursor blinks there, I cannot change it.
Any suggestions?
How do I fix this?
How do I correct A's opening balances?
Now we are at the end of the next reporting period so I have had to work out how to do the payroll.
Can anyone shed some light on where I am going wrong?
So 76 employees or 154 payments?
I am happy so far.
Has anyone ever encountered this before and how did you solve the problem?
Can anyone assist please.
How do I set them so that they take tax out of the wage?
When running a payroll with a large number of employees (let’s say 50+), the ‘Employees’ screen is difficult to navigate because there is no Searching function at all.
This is rather painful!
Furthermore, I don't want hours worked on their payslips as it is not representative of what they do each week.
Is it possible to use a .
Am I doing something wrong?
(Can you believe IE is the one that works properly?
Any suggestions of how to impove this will be greatfully received.
Our employees are paid inclusive of superannuation so if the salary is $40,000 it is $40,000 inclusive of super and tax.
Or is there a away an expense form can be added?
I am completing our 2012/2013 Annual Reconciliation of Payroll Tax (Victoria).
Is this right?
They wish to do this and I don't see any reason why not.
Another situation is if an employee wanted to trade in some leave for cash.
Where do we set this up?
HiHas anyone deleted an employee in payroll ?
As there is no option for this tax how can I reduce the withholding tax and keep as a standard each Payrun.
Superannuation has not been paid, so that is one reason for the difference, as it is not on the P&L.
I have gone over it several times - can anyone suggest what I am missing?
or what I am doing wrong?
How can I get her onto the payrun?
Can I please remove the journal function?
Why is this?
What is the work-around approach for this?
Any advice for setting this item up so each employee has a balance of five days and they can't accrue more?
Would be great to print out group certificates at the end of the year, Is there an option somewhere that i am missing?
If so, how would you do it?
Is this possible?
Is it possible to redo a submitted payrun?
Is this typical?
Am I missing something?
Has anyone else had this problem and figured out what's wrong?
Can someone direct me to what template I should use to import all payroll related expenses.
Any suggestions.
Any ideas?
How do I get the W-2 that I generated in January 2016 for the 2015 payroll year?
How do I find it?
How can I be sure that she had the correct amount withheld?
Or something.
I can't say the same for the payroll arm of the product.
Any clues?
Any ideas?
Any workaround ideas?
What is the workaround here?
Is there any specific reason for you guys using this method rather than the one prescribed in the IRS' website.
If that's the case, is there any difference between the two methods?
See #88) I can only give Mac instructions for this, I don't have a PC, but any PC users can probably figure out how to apply these instructions, so.
Is anyone else having so much heartache.
Has anyone experienced this and/or have a solution?
Appreciate if any of you are in that situation and how you handled it.
How do I record health insurance premiums that were paid for an s-corp shareholder as greater than 2% shareholder?
I can't do anything about the top dropdown (regular earnings type).
It won't go down.
Please make an alternate selection for the Deposit Requirement.
Please make an alternate selection for the Deposit Requirement.
Anybody has tested what is the optimal settings
How do I set this up?
No more admin, lost email attachments, unhappy HR departments, or former employees asking for documents.
How should the payroll taxes be reconciled?
How do we set-up Payroll to deduct the amount advanced from the employee's payroll check?
What do I do?
Any ideas?
How do I correctly enter the combined amounts?
or do them separately.
What do I do?
What am I missing?
Please can we have an option for bi-monthly with the relevant calculations carried out so we can comply with the NY State requirements?
Downloaded PDFs of tax filings have missing or truncated fields.
Has anyone ever used Zen Payroll before?
What good is an accounting system that can't accurately file the reports.
And what reputable accounting company that acknowledges the issue, not be able to fix it within a five month period.
This puts reporting our tax liability in jeopardy and not properly with-holding this required tax.
Even a week is too long to wait, but 5 months is ridiculous.
Any suggestions?
How can I do this?
There is also Start Date.
Can someone elaborate as to what Electronic Services are not available in Colorado for payroll?
I am having issues marking IRS bills that are "awaiting payments" as paid.
What do I do?
We provide downloadable, pre-populated signature ready forms to ensure you can meet filing obligations.
Our goal is to support all states with electronic services.
We do a lot of business with US Wineries and have a US Company established to work with them.
But since the payments are made manually there is no rush to record it.
Am I missing something?
The focus is on how to distinguish two types of wages: direct and indirect.
Anyone else having this issue?
To fix this issue, please revert the payrun to draft and re-approve the payrun.
In the "Benefits" section of the paystub, the amounts shown do not reflect deductions from the employee's paycheck in the "Deductions" section.
Here is what is currently reflected on the paystub for an employee with dependents:"Deductions"Employee Paid Health Insurance $436.
Is there a long term problem with support?
I am so frustrated.
This is my process each month.
Calculate the employer's pension contribution and override what is on payslip.
Should I create those?
Any ideas?
There is an option to postpone his enrolment date but I can't see that that is the right thing to do.
I cannot see how to do this for overtime and salary sacrifice items - only for standard HMRC categories.
There is no information regarding deduction.
How do I submit RTI filing to show that there is no activity this month?
After taking those out I still have a discrepancy any idea what this could be.
BUT I can't make these payroll submission because there's an EYU that has been submitted for 2016-17 and I can't take it to draft.
I logged into My Payroll to see whether they could access them through this as they do for payslips.
There is a link on the My Payroll page which gives the option to look at their P60 but it is only for FY15-16.
Any ideas as I registered a case with support last Thursday and still have no responseRegardsChris
Has anyone managed to find a work around for pre-tax deductions in payroll?
I'd be grateful for any assistance with this error
How do we get NEST to appear in the Drop Down Box so we can complete the pension sync to NEST?
When I go into payroll --> employees --> taxes then the eligibilty-status, opt out reason and the respective date boxes are greyed out and I can't change them.
Any ideas?
Any hints or pointers welcome.
When I submit the Pension filings from the pension tab I get a rejection message saying "Internal Server Error, please contact payroll support".
Is anyone able to advise?
This is the error message that we received: Value '000000T' doesn't have the correct formatElement 'TaxCode' must only have valid text as its contentThanks in advance,Chris
Has anybody else experienced this, and if so what was the solution?
Yet all of our details are fully completed in all the relevant screens.
As the employee is a family member related to the business, they are paid when they can be, how do i show this?
Please make sure you have the correct HMRC credentials and try again.
Can anyone give advice on how to fix?
She turned 21 in March so I have changed her national insurance code to A from M. The PAYE calculated on a gross salary of £1213.
Do I simply mark him as being in a pension, even though it is not a company pension?
The only option I have in the drop down pension provider box is 'Other' so I have chosen that.
I can't seem to work it out.
Am I missing something?
I am still awaiting information about how this can be corrected or avoided in the future.
Is there a workaround for this?
Or is it possible to make this something where you can select both options rather than either/or?
Any ideas as to how to correct this?
I'm trying to process year end & I can't access any of the payroll reports, except P60's.
Is it something to do with the contribuition %, the dates or something else?
Any one else struggling with it?
However, to date he hasn't employed or paid anyone.
Any suggestions?
Any guidance on how I can amend the date?
As this was a new tax year we didn't include any 2015/16 information.
Is there something we haven't done right in setting up Payroll in the first place.
On attempting to make our payroll submission I noticed that our two employees with a monthly income of &#163;936 were being charged NICs of &#163;112.
Has anyone come across this before?
There is a £2k difference.
Any ideas at all anyone?
Also, how do we get it to show on the payslip?
Could somebody suggest what I am missing.
This is a shitty implementation and UX experience - items in a state of suspended animation, never failed, never submitted.
The payroll system I'm currently using can only deal with holiday entitlement in days.
And can an employee request time off in hours, such as if they're working 8.
I can't seem to find the answer anywhere.
It's frustrating having to use trial and error to find the next number in the sequence, and when you're running payrolls for several hundred clients this can be quite time consuming!
Has anyone else worked out how to get around these barriers?
any suggestion would be great.
Or ALL tax including NICs?
Has anyone else had this problem?
There is no space to enter the deductions made for each NI category.
Has anyone had this problem before?
and any idea how to correct the RTI filing which has now gone off incorrectly without the SMP recovery in it?
I've dismantled all the figures and can see that the software has created a liablity for the NICs Er and Ee and Income Tax from the previous payroll to date into November's Payroll!
We expect balance to be shown: 7 hours  (assuming 63hours of entitlement calculated proportionally for the year)How to see year's holiday balance of the employees?
com/uk/Payroll-AutoEnrolmentCommunications$signatory we are advised that it is possible to "Download Eligibility Letter"Has anyone managed to do this?
I have a payroll which has different lines of reimbursements (expenses, meal allowance, telephone etc) and they do not get reimbursements every week.
Any clues?
Maybe I am missing a trick somewhere?
So my questions are:What code should i be using for wages so they show in the p&L?
I am trying to print my first p45 but it is blank.
Is this correct?
We can’t run payroll until this is resolved.
Can I create my own deduction to cover this (and other situations eg contributions to christmas party).
Can someone give some guidance as how to correct this please.
If manual, what do we do?
33 - it is only the YTD figure that is incorrect.
The P32 is correct and what has been claimed on the EPS is also correct.
Can anyone shed any light on this please?
Any ideas please?
Any one else having troubles.
Is this something I have done incorrectly or another issue with the payroll software last month?
What is the best approach for fixing this problem?
There is no option to delete them.
The following field in the NIC section of the submission:      <AtLELYTD>11648.
Can anyone please advise asap.
Thank you to any helpful experts out there!
Is there a fix for this of shall I find a new payroll system?
This is my problem.
This is my problem.
Also, where can I see the payroll journal that has been posted?
Is anyone else having this problem?
Anyone one how I would, in effect, reinstate the employee on the payroll, then put in 1st May as end date and re-run the P45 please?
Any ideas?
If employees do not have hours in this payrun should I delete the timesheet for them before I process the payrun?
Anyone?
Anyone any ideas how we should proceed?
What are the chances that Ill completely balls it up?
Grateful for any thoughts.
In the Payroll settings I entered the balance of &#163;1220.
is this what HMRC expect and should I be sending them something else that covers the first period?
Have most of the creases been ironed out now or is it still more hassle that it is worth?
Thank you for any thoughts.
We started payroll in June last year and I had opening balances from our other accounting system.
Any suggestions?
How do I change the leaving date?
I can't see an option for anything except printing the P45!
Has anyone worked out what to put in the UK Payroll settings for LEL to PT?
Also what is UAP?
I can't seem to work that out at all.
I appreciate that developing the software can take time but better documentation for what you already have is a real necessity.
I am getting very frustrated looking, as I haven't found it if it is there.
Is this possible?
As HMRC says that you can claim the exemption to cover the expense of an annual function or party of up to &#163;150 per employee or director per annum, so that would be 750.
Can we claim the VAT totally or partially?
Trying to find some clarity on the HMRC website, I found this:http://www.
How this is affecting employees?
Am I submitting twice?
Has anyone else had this problem?
am I doing something wrong?
I am adding a new employee onto the system, who works a basic 17.
Has anyone else come across this?
What am I doing wrong?
Any idea?
I can't see how edit this so all the calculations are now out.
any ideas?
Our holiday year runs Sept - Aug but it seems there is no option to set this up.
Do you think these things through.
If you are going to make our lives easier by providing anything resembling a To Do List then thats what it should be.
Requiring me to click through various coloured dots in a calendar in order to discover what they represent is not helpful.
Sorry for the basic question.
So I am stuck in the middle and not sure how to proceed.
If so, how have you gone about correcting the issue?
uk/new-employee-tax-code/y/you-don-t-have-their-p45/this-is-their-only-job-but-since-last-6-april-2014-they-ve-had-another-job-or-have-received-taxable-jobseeker-s-allowance-employment-and-support-allowance-or-taxable-incapacity-benefit-they-don-t-get-a-state-or-workplace-pension
What can we do?
I can't see anywhere under 'Time off' to allocate unpaid leave?
Sorry I might be being a bit dim here, but how do you change an employees salary?
Any ideas please?
I've put in the tax codes for the new employees (they didn't have P45's so I've gone with the A,B or C selection from the starter pack on HMRC).
Once under Direct Wages and once under Salaries.
Employee earning &#163;1500 per month, student loan deduction should be &#163;4.
This is incorrect.
Any ideas how to correct this?
How do I change this so that I can enter them at the end of the month or on a weekly basis?
we get to reclaim 'x' amount from HMRC which at this point is 747.
Or do we have to put leave requests in for public holidays too for each employee?
Has anyone worked out how you post payments arranged under the new Payroll module, if you made the physical payments manually?
Is it possible to show salary history for each individual employee?
Any ideas guys?
This meant that some employee's PAYE differed by more than 2p compared to the HMRC Tax Calculator.
They both have a tax code of 0T (they don't have any personal tax allowance).
Do they really think I wouldn't have tried before emailed them!
Has anyone else had this or knows how to solve it please?
Has anyone else found that EPS submissions made last night (14th) have been declined.
How do I get them back?
This is a new problem.
And also what is the turnaround time on support tickets at the moment please?
How do I do this?
Which should have been sent last week, which could cause us to be fined.
I can look at the XML and I see the correct HMRC user id in there.
Is there anyone that can push the issue for us?
I am not impressed at all.
Any idea what i am doing wrong?
(Contacted support - but now confirmation email came through so thats why I am submitting this here)
On my time off request there is only "Statutory Sick Leave" (which I thought would be the one to select).
There is no option for paid sick leave on the time off drop down.
If not how do I enter the Payroll details for each employee?
Is anyone else suffering from these issues?
Where can you view the postings of the payroll journal?
Currently it appears that employees can select a manager to approve their leave request.
Please explain this decision and tell us when you are going to fix it.
Also, one employee is on an 0T code so there MUST be PAYE!
So my first attempt to run the payroll by modifying the vales failed as it's now posted who knows what and trying to view those (so that I can reverse/delete and redo) throws an error.
Has anyone managed to figure this lot out?
I also can’t delete the calendar and create a new one.
How do I resubmit?
How do i set up a student loan deduction in UK payroll?
Am I losing my mind?
I have also double checked what the PAYE should be with HMRC and our old payroll system is showing the correct amount.
I cannot see how to set this in the tabs, maybe because I am using the legacy rather than the paid upgrade?
1% entitlement) and regular hours, so standard number of hours/ days a year.
This is not there yet is this a product issue?
Am I missing something?
Hope this is clear!
I can't seem to get the monthly or weekly calendars to work.
As i understand there is an employee NIC due at 12% on payments above the &#163;7956 primary threshold (i. e. a &#163;245 deduction is due).
Can someone guide me as to what i'm doing wrong?
The names do not correspond exactly:I have 2210 - PAYE2211 - National Insurance2220 - Net Wages7000 - Gross Wages7006 - Employers National InsuranceThis is how I think it should be mapped but please correct me if I am wrong.
Is there an addon to accompany the new payroll features in the future for P11D reporting,
Anybody else see any functionality?
So I can email everyone apart from the first 4-5.
Anyone found a work around for this?
Is it possible to allocate a tracking (cost centre) to each employee plus use timesheets.
I am getting double amount as Employer Contribution.
Any one here who can advise.
Can anyone direct me to a video that helps with this, or link.
00  so my records are out in any case.
Is this correct?
How should I enter next Friday, Monday etc?
Has anyone found a workaround?
Is there a step we have missed in setting this up?
885817AL due 64 hrsAL due @> AWE or OWP $3664.
Also there is a public holiday on 5/06/17.
This is where it starts to get murky for us.
This is really frustrating.
What is wrong and how do I sort this now.
HiI've noticed on my payruns that there is a note saying 3 of my employees won't be on the payrun due to opening balances?
What do I do?
How can I delete an approved timesheet which has the incorrect hours?
Is this correct?
It all makes sense to us pen pushers but for the general employee it is really confusing and they are left wondering why their payslip, which should be their go-to point, is always a little misleading.
Could someone please point me in the right direction.
How can I change this to reflect the 35 hours .
Can I revert that payrun and amend to include the leave taken?
Can someone please explain this to me?
I started Payroll July and entered in Annual/Sick leave balances.
Any suggestions anyone?
This is driving me crazy.
How do I claim this an expense?
Do I generate a bill?
This is great however how do we adjust the accrual, many of our staff members have 5 weeks annual leave?
How can I calculate what their average daily hours are and should I have to manually work this out?
How do you remove past employees from the current timesheet list please?
Has anyone come across this error and a potential fix/workaround.
This is quite frustrating.
How can I get a timesheet approved from other employees who are also on the payroll
Large or complex payroll?
As this was last year I am unable to change anything, is there anything I can do to get this back to zero which is the correct amount?
is there anyone i can speak to about this or will this take 24hours to receive a response?
Anyone else had this problem?
This is a bit urgent.
is there anyway this can happen?
Is this able to be done?
Am I missing a crucial link here!
I can see how to create and approve an employees timesheet, but my question is, can the employee fill out and submit the timesheet on a weekly basis and if so, how ?
How do I go about entering one week "cash up" of my employee's annual leave?
Should I wait?
What happens on the anaversiry date?
Am I doing something wrong?
What do I choose for schedule of accrual?
Likewise for annual Leave and sick leave, which one do I choose?
They don't have any deductions from their wages but I have Kiwisaver and Student loan payments.
However, I do not have her hours for this week, and do not require them.
This is a combo of the opening balance of $2240 plus 4 weeks accrual which is correct.
And if so, do you have 2 or 3 digit suffixes?
Any advice?
How do I go about setting this up?
As a last resort I can increase the minimum hourly rate to $15.
Any suggestions on how to set up the payroll where some rates are plus the 8% and some rates include the 8%?
What you do think.
Is this an option that will happen in the near future?
How do we delete one of them?
How do I go about doing all of this please?
How do I reverse the payruns and journals created for April?
Anyone?
I can't see anything in the documentation about it and it would be good to have some direction or insight into how others are handling this?
Can anyone tell me how to change salary rate?
Can payroll do this?
Is it possible to make this scenario work?
Dont make it complex please or the uptake will be poor.
Function Tracker is a calendar based booking software for any venue, school, function space, caterer, pub or club.
Nimbus is a true Cloud Document Management system with effortless integration to a Secure Client Portal.
Sell on Facebook and any website such as Wordpress, GoDaddy, Wix & Squarespace.
Manage jobs, projects, purchases, timesheets, invoicing, reporting and more.
We connect operators with vendors to provide travellers with real time bookings for things to do.
NAB QuickBiz Loan is an unsecured business loan – up to $50K.
Apply online, get an instant answer and funds within 3 days of returning your contract.
Let your customers book jobs with you at any time of day from any device.
Zenefits connects everything HR—benefits, compliance, time-tracking, and more—to your payroll, so it can run itself.
Thomson Reuters provides the integrated Digita Professional Suite that takes care of compliance and automates manual tasks for accountants in practice.
Grow your business with a point of sale app and business portal.
Get an accurate picture of your business without wrestling through financial statements and reports with line after line of data.
SuiteFiles is an easy cloud system to manage all your files, emails & client documents.
Sell products & services with a powerful, cloud-based POS that works on any PC, Mac or iPad.
Manage bookings, models, galleries, your website and more, from any device.
Features include Web Store, POS, Asset Tracking and more.
Link any source (web analytics, social media and others) and publish interactive, real time dashboardsFor more information, check out .
Drag/Drop, E-mail or snap a photo.
There's no fine print, or hidden charges or establishment fee and no penalty for early repayment.
com, submit construction progress claims online, from any device, in seconds.
Create a beautiful website with Mogul and manage your web enquiries with no hassles.
Start with a content-rich website; grow your customer database; communicate with email, SMS and social.
Evopos is powerful all in one business management solution, handling POS, CRM, Workshop, Vehicles, Stock Control, eCommerce and much more.
Manage cash flow and avoid bad debt with free credit risk data.
MechanicDesk is a comprehensive yet easy to use online automotive workshop management software.
Proposify let's you create beautiful, effective proposals, streamline your sales process, and get faster client sign-off!
Cloud based, all inclusive project management solution available online and mobile.
Automated budgeting, planning, cash flow and valuation models to suit any business.
See market values, capital growth, equity, income, expenses and cash flow in real time.
For more information, check out  or .
Guru is Fixed Asset Management for any sized organisation.
Customise polite, persistent credit control emails to reflect what you would do manually.
Eliminate double-entry, get paid faster, impress your customers and your staff.
Provides priceless data about time allocation across employees, clients, tasks and projects.
Easily create beautiful emails and reach your customers where they are every day: their inbox.
Identify, market, sell & deliver realtime business advisory solutions; PANALITIX is powerful & easy to use.
A simple client feedback tool that surveys clients, measures satisfaction and identifies those ‘at risk’ of leaving.
Vextras' app Kiwi keeps your online sales in sync with the rest of your business.
Run your business with free point of sale software and free back office tools.
Financial reporting for businesses of any size.
Franchises can consolidate thousands of locations' data and view reports to improve the bottom line.
Your sales orders, purchase orders, inventory adjustments and contacts are automatically synced.
A free online application that helps businesses, accountants and advisors access business finance.
Sync stock level across all sale channels,share single product catalog and customer information.
Sync stock level across all sale channels,share single product catalog and customer information.
Sync stock level across all sale channels, share single product catalog and customer information.
We make quoting, scheduling and invoicing easy (previously known as Smart Jobs).
Entryless automatically generates an accurate digital general ledger record from bills in any format.
An ERP application designed for companies in manufacturing or demanding material supply.
Practice Happy: Australia’s leading online health practice management software as a service, any time, from anywhere, with any device and browser.
Manage any field service business.
It is designed to provide maximum output for minimum input.
Plan jobs, track progress, spot opportunities and log time intuitively.
Appointment software for clinics, salons or anyone that needs scheduling.
A reservation management system for any SME tourism operations with website booking engine integration and channel management opportunities.
Online 1099-MISC e-file and e-delivery: paper-free & IRS approved.
Designed for tax Pros and businesses - file one or thousands.
With the DotGolf Membership System, clubs can easily manage and control golfing membership subscriptions, check out .
Accelo's smart technology platform streamlines your work into one integrated system with CRM, Projects, Service, and Retainers, check out .
ADP® is a leading provider of business outsourcing solutions offering a wide range of HR, payroll, compliance, tax and benefits administration solutions.
Ideal for businesses with 5 or more users, check out .
Manage contacts, email marketing, lead generation, sales team management, customer communications and projects simply with Communigator CRM, check out .
Stop wasting your valuable time and money chasing debtors, take control of your cash today.
Dremus is a hosted eCommerce platform used to create online shopping websites.
For more information, check out  or .
Full transactional history and payroll set-up from our professional technical support team.
Arming you with a complete, real-time financial overview of your clients and suppliers, check out .
Streamline engagements, billing and workflows starting from your website + collaborate with your clients.
Any business that manages time, equipment, staff & resources can benefit from Tymwise.
Is there maybe any promo running so I can use the code please to buy WFM?
Are there any connected apps that will collect or manage that information?
0212423200 Viv d'Or would be most grateful.
Any idea on what could be the reason behind this?
Have you any advice / thoughts in these areas?
Appreciate any insights.
Can anyone please recommend a Construction CRM program for Estimating and Project Management to use with Zero pleaseThanks
27With over 100 items to reconcile each month this is NOT a slick process!
I am also considering:a) Abandoning Expensify.
Can anyone tell me how this is supposed to work?
Are there any recommendations that I can have from someone who is in a similar situation.
Not sure why this is?
We require it to re book jobs on a weekly fortnightly and monthly service.
Most I have looked at seem to have a lot of extras that we don't require - so any suggestions would be good
Can anyone provide guidance in VERY BASIC terminology?
Any suggestions?
We have a client who is using a freight forwarder to deliver his goods.
He has to track each item in case of recall as it is fresh product.
Could this be done via manual journal to cancel it out?
Has anyone tried integrating with SurePayroll?
Or if there is a work-around?
Anyone have any ideas?
We looking for an app or apps that can streamline things for us and do away with paper dockets, including these features -1.
This is usually non refundable.
Clearly we're making things hard for ourselves so if anyone has any recommendations or experience with an ordering system that is similar to what I've described I'm all ears and open to any suggestions.
What information is shared between the systems?
Is this possible?
Any ideas or will it never work.
We currently integrate with Quickbooks software, any similarities as far as integration.
info) is currently being integrated into accounting systems such as MYOB and a variety of lesser known systems.
They can do 12 months interest-free.
Any suggestions would be greatly welcomed.
I look forward to any suggestions.
Any suggestions ?
Is there anyone in Darwin NT whom I can contact for assistance with my ever growing list of questions?
Is there such a software out there?
Has anyone used either Work Flow Max or Harvest?
Any suggestions would be great.
Ideally be able to save all the costs of each new product quotation and sent quotes in one place.
Or could you point me in the right direction?
Can anyone suggest if there was an application / software that the function is solely for Purchase order and no invoicing?
Cost of goods sold values in the profit and loss only updates if I manually create.
Has anyone else had this issue?
ideally matching up against our POs, work orders, and customer invoicing.
Any suggestions, as we're pulling our hair out trying to find something that's not an analog system.
Has anyone had experience of a rental software that can handle car rentals?
I want the POS be able to advise on the stock I have prepared for the day and ultimately draw down on the 50 and not let me exceed orders over that 50, unless I prepaare additional ribs, to which the 50 will then increase.
This needs to automate the appropriate EDM to re- engage them.
she needs to work out what inventory is available on what day.
Can you please allow the integration ASAP?
We have a client (charitable trust) which is looking to open up an opportunity shop.
Has anyone done this before?
For whatever reason, it gives me an error message "There is a problem importing the file".
Can someone assist me how to rectify this issue?
For the love of god surely someone in cyberspace can give me a cost effective stock control system that simply tracks what I order, ensures material is recorded & received into the factory, checks the price charged versus what was quoted, records how much of the material is actually used & then records left overs from the job & when it was shipped out.
We do a lot of scheduling and unfortunately have quite some cancellations.
Anyone knows something that will do that for us?
Upon discussion with our accountant we do not require this so I want to disable it.
0%) tax rate is not selectedSo I go to the UK Digital goods drop down box, and there is nothing there for me to select.
HiI am looking for a simple but effective CRM for my print and digital magazine.
Any thoughts?
Any assistance?
Suggestions please?
Can expense claims be added to approval max for authorisation.
Hello,We are using Paid Membership Pro on our Wordpress website to get monthly subscriptions from our vendors.
Basically a lot of inefficiencies can slip through the cracks.
Is that possible with any software?
Hopefully I am not asking too much here, but Nothing Ventured - Nothing Gained.
Has anyone else had success with the PowerBI connector or is there a support avenue that we can go down for this?
I'd be grateful for advise or opinions.
Can anyone suggest an app they have worked with that resembles accpick?
Hope that question isn't too long winded and makes some sort of sense.
Is it possible to make that change in the future?
However, in the settings, I can not select the new codeHas anyone set up the shopify integration before for US tax rates that can offer any guidance on what I am doing wrong?
Has anyone any idea how this maybe achieved please?
Are the basic apps for shopify any good for linking to Ebay and Amazon?
Can anyone suggest a service that would meet our needs?
Am I missing something?
Anyone had/having this problem?
In the past they have used Microsoft Money,which has had the function to allow them to do this.
Any recommendations on what we can use?
and how do i fix it
If not, how could I do it?
He needs the ability to give the customer a Delivery Docket to say he has delivered X amount of Litres in fuel.
We are only a small company and specialise in schools so do not deal with tax etc.
Is there an app out there that can do this?
should I be using a different app?
I have an online business, a shop, and do trade shows for my business.
I do part payments, refunds etc.
There is potential for staff in the future.
Is there such an app?
Any advice or leads?
4) How do transaction fees for non Shopify payments (say PayPal for example) sales get sync'ed?
Would really appreciate any input or experiences you may have with this App / Integration.
can the following occur?
it is hard to reconcile with functional foreign currency with source data matched.
I see that there is another service (USD10/mo) to do this but I'm guessing that keeping it all in one place is easier.
We were hoping you had some suggestions on what we can use to improve the automation.
We do have clients with metadata that passes into Stripe.
Or, do you have any suggested applications which can integrate with Stripe to solve this problem?
I am happy to hop on a call to discuss this further with anyone who can be of assistance.
Feel free to reach out with any follow-up questions!
I haven't been in this space for a while, so I was wondering if anyone had comments regarding the suitability of the different addons.
Downstream, an alert is raised for someone to action a credit claim.
Recv'd has transformed this process, taking what was once a task no one wanted to do and automating it; turning it into an efficient and painless experience.
I new to Expensify and haven't gotten any answers yet from their side so I figured I try here.
Dear folks,I am a service based business, and I charge customers based on project.
Any recommendations ?
Has anyone solved this issue?
Can anyone suggest a suitable, but sensibly priced alternative?
Can anyone suggest what i might have overlooked.
I would appreciate any feed backLyn
I am selling physical products exclusively on Amazon at the moment, and have only been doing so for less than a year.
Any suggestions please let me knowThanks
Has anyone used EMAC?
Any comments regarding this would be most helpful.
Any automation in creation of POs will be useful.
net/elavon so in order to match I have to do a lot of research.
Am I missing something?
if so do they integrate with Veterans Affairs and TAC?
Has anyone used twisted gorilla POS/Inventory system?
Any comments?
Any suggestion, please especially for those who are currently using either "Spotlight" or "Fathom".
Any advice would be great.
Can anyone recommend a POS system for a wine bar and restaurant.
Has any one used such a system or have any recommendationsThanksChris OakesOakes accounting
Any advice would be most welcome.
I greatly appreciate any and all assistance
Any suggestions please.
Has anyone done a comparison between Vend and Cin7?
Can anyone suggest a third party app that has this type of capability?
This is not an outlier use case.
Any suggestions?
Anyone overcome this?
Is there anyone out there using EMAC?
Needs to have an app that you can access in airplane mode and syncs later.
We log a lot of time in the field where there is no internet/no cell service.
If you have any suggestions on other time tracking apps I am all for it.
Could anyone suggest a possible product?
Any ideas or referrals would be welcomed.
Can anyone suggest any solutions, apps or work arounds for my situation that I'm missing?
We are a UK distributor looking to implement either of these systems any moment now.
com currently has a live data connector feature, but this only pushes information out of smartsheet and into other analytic programs.
Can you recommend any resources for developing this API?
Has anybody had any good experiences?
Some of you might find it a good learning session, so sharing the registration url here:
You can check out the app .
Anyone got any ideas?
Thoughts, criticisms, suggestions?
Staff can view the roster on PC or via smartphone app.
This is all real world, I’m sorry that this is a bit rambling but I’m not an accountant or bookkeeper so I have to work it through as a layman (read idiot).
what am I missing here?
WHMCS: designed specifically for hosting (which we're not selling), cheap and cheerfulAre there any options I'm missing?
If we could schedule a call to discuss a potential software that would be greatly appreciated.
Are there any Shopify integration apps that allow filtering of orders as they are imported?
Any users of Wodify?
Suggestions?
I am particularly interested in Moving Annual Averages to provide a normalised view of activity as I operate in the highly seasonal tourist arena.
What is JobsDun?
Here is my question:We are about to restructure our business units.
There is some stock for the curtain rails.
Any suggestions would be great thank you
Any recommendations?
My question is what is the RE software requirement?
I used to be able to do this with OneSAAS, but they dropped support for Google Contacts.
If anyone has any suggestion on how to achieve this, I'm all ears.
Can anyone give me any feedback regarding the flow of information or ease of use between the two programs.
I would really appreciate any opinions on this program.
We are a  Reseller for five years and do quite a bit bridging GAPS and salesforce.
My second option is to create a 0.
Be great to hear from others on what their process is.
what is the problem with that?
We would love to hear anyone's feedback and opinion on what we are thinking about doing.
The mobile users can then subscribe to a calendar feed from TRAV to manage their days.
How do you guys handle the shipment with UPS and FedEx?
Has anyone managed to get around this problem?
3) Fax anywhere in the world to one or many recipients.
Any suggestions?
Daily, Monthly sales can be monitored via the web.
Is anyone else using this interface?
Obviously I could do it in excel, but I have excel and it is fairly laborious.
Alternatively I could have my accountant produce some but I want to spend time altering figures, looking at different scenarios etc.
Thoughts or suggestions?
Would anyone be interested in testing with us?
Do you do it manually, wasting 100s of productive hours?
We do it for you in minutes, Yes .
, how do we do it in minutes for you.
If you have any query related to this, feel free to write back.
Is there anything it is missing?
any suggestions?
Interested in any sized company from one or two users upwards.
How do I change this?
New customer records are imported within seconds and existing ones are matched.
It's based around to-do lists for individual projects.
I work with startups, who are looking to integrate Stripe payments into their monthly recurring SaaS services.
Any recomendations?
Any suggestions as to what would work best?
Any ideas please?
If such solution doesn't exist did, how much will a development of a custom solution for an ecommerce startup company cost and what would be the timeframes?
In any business, cash is your lifeline.
), any quality control flags, chargeback memos, etc.
How do these apps deal with PayPal?
Kagazz comes in different flavours depending upon your requirement ranging from you doing it yourself or we doing it for you.
Hopefully there is such a product or something similar.
So what customer are purchasing and what we are purchasing from each supplier etc.
We are a B2B company so we have a relatively consistent customer base, but i do not want a full CRM systemAny Ideas?
Surely there is an answer for this?
Any recommendations on developing a new Addon?
Any Addon Developers want to take this one for me?
Is anyone in a similar situation to us?
Can anyone offer advice about possible solutions?
Any thoughts anyone?
Is it user friendly and what are the pros or cons associated with it.
New customer records are imported within seconds and existing ones are matched.
I am looking for a system that will easily log visits, take photos, issue cards and allow family memberships.
Is anyone aware of anything that would be capable of achieving this?
I guess I am trying to see the benefits (time saving especially) in this integration and utilise them as an opportunity to remove multiple points of processing and increased efficiency.
Any comments/learning welcome :DThanks H
Our October release includes a great looking and functional user interface which fits perfectly with our extensive list of features.
Anyone else experienced this?
Am I blind?
If you can already do this, then SWEET, I should start using it.
comIf anyone has any questions I would be more than happy to assistbdowling@transfermate.
Any suggestions?
bulk and per metre / or per KG  or single units.
Preferably something with a bar graph or?
Can anyone offer suggestions?
Unfortunately, I can't remember the name of the company.
Send us an email on  or visit
What did you do to set it up the integration?
Has anyone used Vend in a Bistro ?
If you have any questions or queries, please do not hesitate to contact me at acotton@satworldwide.
Any advice welcome!
Send us an email on  or visit
Or at least made consistent?
We also what to track what are our most popular items so we can carry more stock of them.
Any ideas?
There are plenty on the market but I don't really want to do the leg work and see which is the best.
Any issues to consider?
What I do see is that I can print the PDF, then click on the link.
How do I go by doing that.
The first month went smoothly aside from some operator error issues.
Has anyone been using an addon for newsagencies for their POS systems?
is this cause I'm using trial version?
or is there a stripe setting?
2) Any quick answers on which cloud cash flow & forecasting app uses multi currency?
For any more queries please contact support@kounta.
Stocks are bar stocks and B&B stocks.
Any ideas how that can be achieved?
I am comparing mint.
Also cant track any profitibility of tradesman
At any time they could be working on 2 to 3 building sites(homes & commercial).
I was hoping to get some feedback from the community regarding US payroll.
From what I can tell so far, Zen really caters to the US market and more specifically, the California market.
State taxes here can be a huge bother and I really don't want to get it wrong.
Any advice?
Hoping someone can email the response to sales@sghbusiness.
e. g. if there are 5-6 different parts of the course, then how do they keep track with each part.
The business has 6 full-time employes on salary, some fortnightly and some monthly.
What options do I have?
Was thinking of an Excel-type solution unless there is an off-the-shelf invoicing app available?
Any feedback welcomed.
Or am I missing something fundamental ?
Or a fatal flaw ?
Is anyone else having similar issues?
Anyone have a solution for this
Currently, they spend large amount of time reconciling payments from customers and orders.
They do not have an inventory system.
any suggestion?
I have looked at Timely, Vend and Retail Express, are there any others to consider
Then the body wash is pumped into bottles as a finished good which is another level of stock.
Can anyone make any suggestions?
Has anyone had similar experiences and any suggestions?
com as this is of some urgency.
Has anyone had experience with these?
Is anyone out there using such a service that they can recommend - I have heard of Huddle, Basecamp.
I have a new client who is starting to run auctions along side his main business which is a second hand goods shop.
We think that at this stage the most important to set up our system properly because that can safe us from lots of problem in the future.
We did our research but still can`t decide that which POS software to use.
We can enter the pallets into a Vend purchase order as -25.
What do I do in this situation?
Anyone have any information?
Interested in any feedback that anyone can offer.
Anyone user that can give us suggestions or share experiences?
Any ideas please?
He needs to be able to identify individual batches in the case of of product recall.
Is there a problem with the Stripe integration?
Any suggestions?
Any recommendations on companies that do provide this or work arounds ?
Can anyone recommend an appropriate inventory system?
If yes, what is the difference?
anyone much wiser than myself able to guide me on what they would do in such a situation?
Has anyone got any suggestions?
Finally in an ideal world some of these sales should be able to be made via some kind of handheld technology face to face that would trigger all the invoicing, stock management, picking notes and CRM updates accordingly.
As you can tell I am not a techie and I am quickly getting out my depth on specifying this out.
Any suggestions?
Has anyone heard any talk of this happening?
What am i doing wrong?
The sequence of discounts that can be applied is:1.
Any thoughts?
Some of the new features in our most recent release are below.
Use the barcode to search and track availability of inventory in the database.
Track batches, or groups, of a specific item.
Billing cycles can be scheduled for any number of monthly increments and set to bill on a preferred processing day.
Can I therefore do without a CRM?
What do people recommend?
anyone interested please email me on jaredsherwood1@gmail.
They are offering to let you try it in beta, which I would be loath to do for obvious reasons!
Any ideas?
There is a lot of CUSTOM FIELDS entered into the system for JOB needed on PO.
Currently it will bring up a list of all jobs and can actually assign to everything.
Create a sub job from main job that has a sequential code AND can be assigned to staff.
Has anyone used HireFox or anything else suitable?
Great if you could give me any advice.
Hope this can be made and reduce the double entry of data.
Has anyone tried integrating?
There seem to be several approaches we could take, can anyone offer any recommendations?
If you are not able to join the discussion at Xerocon, please feel free to: - send along any questions to us at marcomm@batchblue.
com - visit our  for more info- relax with us at one of our Customer Love Parties in  or .
Am I missing some synching option here?
In the UK the best choice for a manual system is a Simplex D cash book ()  which encourages the business owner to balance their cash weekly and check it to the actual cash in hand.
Any recommendations would be welcome.
Any one have any suggestions for me?
---Any of your inventory management partners support consignment functionality and multiple legal entities?
Has anyone had experience of using OneSaas?
Any feedback?
Any thoughts on this?
Would have to sync so all can see everything.
Anyone got any good solutions?
Hello,Has anyone used Quoteroller.
Has anyone used a Sugar CRM online connector tool?
Helpful suggestions welcome
How did you go about setting up the job templates as I cannot seem to understand how you can set up Tasks in a the template but then cannot set up pre-configured due dates for them such as previous task + 3 days or Job start date +14 days.
I want to send them automatically once they are created and approved, and they should be personalized,Using DebtorDaddy's pre-due reminder, could one set this to -30.
Also how do people find this stacks up with WorkFlowMax?
Looking at implementation of XOCashflow - any comments on usability, client reaction, bugs, wording?
Any preferences?
Any problems with either of these solutions?
Am I missing something?
Do they come in as a double-entry?
What's the best process to get this all working together?
Any ideas people?
I can't believe that the company has such a horrible anti-customer policy of not helping new customers.
Is there a problem with the system today please.
PLEASE DO NOT TURN OFF THE DATE STAMPS ON POSTS AND REPLIES ON THIS FORUM!
This makes it very difficult to see how long the issue in question has been outstanding.
Too bad that the competition is not good enough.
What do other people think?
When I have a question about a feature or what the ramifications are of a choice, it's rarely ever answered by the documentation.
I needed to upgrade my subscription, but every link to do so returned a 500 server error.
This is not beautiful business
- When entering a transaction for a new customer or supplier, why not open the contacts setting so all the data can be entered straight away.
My question is related to RTI which I should be doing today.
What can I do?
Can anyone throw any light on this error?
My client is on the verge of changing to MYOB where at least there is telephone support.
How do I get in contact with a higher-up?
This includes payroll so you can still manage payslips, timesheets and auto enrolment.
Please can someone get back to me regarding this.
Is there a cost?
What is the degree of difficulty?
Why cant i do this?
It has been two months and I am still not up and running.
A total lack of respect for customer's time and the harm this can do to a business.
THIS IS UNACCEPTABLE.
I HAVE NEVER EXPERIENCED SUPPORT THIS BAD FROM ANY OTHER COMPANY IN MY LIFE AND I AM 58.
I can clearly see i am not the only one with this issue.
This is how the error looks:  http://i60.
What relevance is an Australian award to UK service ?
What is going on with all the much more important requests?
Is this something that is going to return, we found it very useful and it saved a lot of time.
Is this wrong?
Please click on the link below and read the comments your users have been expressing.
com/business/question/51271#answer42816606Could you also please explain to me why this issue has not or can not be resolved?
It is clearly in your best interest to keep your customer base happy.
And where can I download the Application Form?
Maybe I can go through the Employee's Leave page.
Please can you share the link to this.
Every time I contact your support team they take days to respond and do not have adequate responses.
"This is not support!
Yodlee are still in the process of investigating this issue.
Except that the claim is actually for $4.
I am an ACCA Member setting a small practice to do bookkeeping for couple of specialist doctors based in Zimbabwe.
Or, is there somewhere in the settings that this feature can be turned off from automatically adding items?
"Not sure how long "shortly" is supposed to mean, but this is very frustrating.
Any chance of a rebate on my plan?
but then later want to change your preferences, it's not easy to do so.
This is really important to us because sometimes a quick question can delay progression of a task.
Any practical information would be welcomed.
I hate the fact I can't talk to anyone by picking up the phone.
There needs to be courses set up for new beginners on how to actually set up the entire process, right from the beginning.
Many banks do this; and its weird that you don't!
Has anyone else had this problem and how did it get fixed?
The % calculation is most useful, but is not available should I enter a repeating bill.
Is this temporary, what is going on ?
Or do bulk credit notes at one time for each supplier would be good also.
This has only been happening in the last couple of weeks.
any thoughts?
If we get the page up and try to log in, it then hangs and gives an error message "Can't find the server".
No rhyme or reason.
There has been some back and forth with your technical support team about an issue I was having.
The last thing I want to do is waste my time with frivolous support issues.
what happened to the 24/7 support service commitment?
I'm not sure what's happened in the last month since I completed our sales invoicing.
This is a function I use a lot.
Can someone please contact me with regard to it.
Being able to send it to excel is a big +++.
I am also certified in MYOB online and fresh books and QBO, oh and Sage 1 which is a rip off of Pastel accounting and a host of others.
FYI - Pastel accounting / sage one is a good one to copy off.
Has anyone else done this?
Kind regardsKavithya-----------------------------------What on EARTH is the matter with your useless organisation - what kind of "customer service" is this?
Is anyone else out there in a similar situation and feeling frustrated about this?
Please have a look at this discussion trail and join in if you agree it's importance It's under the heading: "Contacts - Set Contact Credit Limit and alert when exceeded"
Can you please change back to the old buttons.
Any ideas, I am new so may be missing something here.
It would be helpful for cash flow purposes to have upcoming repeating payments added to the new tool showing the schedule of planned payments please.
I am furious!
As if this would do anything.
This is absolutly unacceptable!
OK I have watched things get posted on these boards for the last 3-4 years.
Are there any guidelines about how to ask a question?
Has any one ells had this issue ?
What am I missing?
Is there a scheduled or unscheduled outage?
Your sales guy got me across the line in terms of signing up your product.
Is anyone else having issues?
i. e. so you can keep track of where you are up to with review forum content.
Previously all of the columns fitted neatly under the main menu headers in the centre of the screen.
I realize without a list of bugs I'm seeing this post is useless to you, but honestly there are so many it would take too long.
I don't recall seeing anything about it, is this true?
you can manager what you don't measure, so maybe they only now issue support tickets when the problem is solved?
Do you have a fix for this as I can't see anything that we could be doing wrong here, as when I go back to check the setting it Tax Inclusive is definitely selected and saved.
I hope you guys can do it!
CSR screengrabs the "business owners" button on the XeroU page as if I am somehow mentally incompetent and can't see what they are referring to.
Of which I am one?
Presumably a lot of us do our own bookkeeping?
I am a business owner.
I also do my bookkeeping.
I am, therefore, a bookkeeper.
There is nothing on the XeroU site to indicate I can't access bookkeeping info, until I've clicked 4 levels deep.
Please be aware I am adding this to the complaint I have already drafted to the ACCC in regards to false advertising and failure to deliver.
This is urgent
Is there an ETA on when this will be completed if at all started?
This was 48 hours ago and I am still waiting for an answer.
What is going on?
How do you terminate this nightmare?
Currently I can only run reports for 1 year or 2 years.
If this is intentional forgive my laymens view of all this as overwhelming and confusing.
Come to think of it why are receipts and expense claims labeled differently in the app to the desktop.
Seems a little coherency lacking that any decent UI designer could fix.
so please, what IS the issue?
this is becoming pretty frustrating!
This should be possible, but no its not.
Is this an issue for anyone else ?
I'm unable to search by postcode which is what we used to do in Quickbooks Desktop.
That's all I see on each item and have to click on "More" for each one to see the actual information.
In my opinion, no one is wasting their precious votes on these small niggles compared to new functionality.
Why can't I speak with a customer service representative urgently to resolve?
These settings are ignored and always branding theme 'standard' comes up.
Can this 'update' be reversed to the BLANK DATE FIELD?
I have a question: Why is it that you do not care?
I don't understand - what is the philosophy behind this?
The location of some of the buttons are illogical.
At the very least there should be the option to re-sort items as there is when entering expenses claims!
: NO ACTION TAKEN  to address what is a basic management accounting / essential function.
Tony Grange- a user - or maybe not for long!
Guess what, they can, but the responce is potentially another 36 hours.
any news on when this will change?
How can the data possibly be secure if there are no encryption keys, or if you the vendor are holding all the keys?
Do something about it right now.
Not had any response to my email query.
Can you explain the correlation (if any) between feature requests and timeline for development?
Can we go back a few versions where you could enter a customers Data on one page without having to scroll down?
Can I talk to someone to sort this out.
Why do you not publish a support desk tel no so I can talk to someone?
I have agreed to sign up clients in the space of two months to obtain practice manager.
The fact that we can use a simple password worries me no end.
We should be seeing a more proactive push towards better securing our livelihoods.
Why is there no 2 factor authentication option3.
How do I do as requested?
I also don't see that I, as a user, should ask our customers to do this either.
To say this is embarrassing is an understatement, which is being made even worse because I am unable to speak to anyone about this.
Our sales team raise purchase orders and also sales orders.
Hope you can work some magic on the aboveBest RegardsPaul
00s or so.
There is nothing invalid about the email address.
Is anyone else getting this bug?
Any advice on what we can do other than move to another system?
uncontactable, what the next steps are.
Again this has been explained, that there is no access to the subscriber, but so far not one person seems to understand this.
Claiming on trademark law is easier than this.
Disgusted doesn't even explain how I feel about the service we have received.
DO NOT use this company.
in total i have wasted approximately 1 week of my life because of the faults of the system, backed up by less than mediocre support.
i wonder if there are alternative products where there is a decent response time, and staff who have a little nouse about themselves, whom will check that the solution they are giving will actually work for the customer.
"Find & Recode" is an action and shouldn't really be in the hierarchy i. e. doesn't make sense to be there.
There is also HTML in there for the "recode" that I'm viewing, but it doesn't have a title or URL.
I am not an accountant, nor am I a bookkeeper.
So I do alot myself.
Hope that you guys can do this minor teak to make the experience more flexible :)
I would find it extremely helpful if you actually had people working for you, so that I could talk to them instead of emailing backwards and forwards for days on end.
In today's release the tab order of Bills Data Entry went awry!
Tab order is still really important - especially to accounting professionals.
May I point out what I see as a bug with the "View Recent Bills" link that is provided on a Supplier's Contact page?
I hope that in the midst of your crisis and as you implement temporary work-arounds, that some attention can be given to us.
I've pasted the unhelpful reply to my ticket is at the bottom: BTW, there is nothing about this issue on your Blog , as you suggested there would be below.
Often I'm left with half a name in the box, or only even 3-4 letters.
I love how the message inbox comes up as a pop-up window while staying on the same webpage.
At the moment, the message content can only be read from a narrow window and it puts me off from reading long messages from yourself.
If you could design it to be bigger, that would be appreciated.
Also a bit surprised in the lack of freedom of speech.
But I do feel there is something missing.
I am hoping that someone might have a suggestion because I am stuck.
Who's the genius who thought the least important thing on a payslip was the payee's name?
Why on earth make that section in a smaller print than the majority of the document?
its a hasstle I could do withoutregardsGraeme
Would be great if you could speak to someone instead of leaving messages or sending emails.
They make even simple things feel complicated and are jammed full of jargon.
I was told "this is done primarily to have an audit trail. "
It's not exactly responsive or customer-centric service.
I can re-name it under templates to pretend to be a quotation.
Here is link to other discussion.
Billing and Invoicing is what you do, and you can't even do that right.
Yes my adobe reader is up to date.
Since you got $150M this last year in seed money, you should have paid someone to fix this or bought a company that had a solution that would have worked and integrated it.
Am I missing something here?
This feed would be put into place immeidately, and would be free of charge until August 2015.
That of course means that I can't sent a follow-up statement because it will not be up-to-date.
DO I GET A BOTTLE OF NEW ZEALAND WINE FOR FINDING THIAS
I do, however, purchase and sell more than 20 things (this is an extremely limiting number).
I would say that overall I am satisfied.
The developers of this piece of work have assumed that there is a one-to-one relationship between PO's and bills.
Then when I went back to do my BAS, again no GST credits.
Or am I missing something?
Is this a bug?
I am using Google Chrome on a Windows 8 machine.
Please confirm you guys are working on this to fix it ASAP.
Any plans to address this problem?
Could anyone suggest a solution, thank you.
PLEASE CONSIDER CREATING VIDEOS BASED ON THE SCENARIOS I AM PRESENTING YOU WITH.
How and Where do you record this information ?
The word "refund" seems to﻿ be almost no where to be found in the documentation, so PLEASE consider using "Refund" in the title of your video.
How do you reconcile that ?
I start looking at what I can﻿ do, but I feel unsure of myself so I am looking for guidance and reassurance that I am doing this correctly.
Can the 25% still be honoured?
Refunds Do you what a refund is ?
Design by programmers or business users?
# and name of orderer", or "for deliveries on Thurs/Fri, use Hardware address".
I am not seeking financial compensation (yet it is well within my right to).
So I am asking "Why? "
Is this it?
Anyone else having this problem?
i tried to follow the instructions provided but there is problems with exporting data out of quickbooks to create the import file .
if supplied a product that did not work as intended i would have to refund money or fix it for free.
Is anyone else having this problem?
(ranked development)What are the time frames?
It's really not suitable for larger or complex businesses.
It's difficult to review your comment and make changes when you can only see two lines.
I have read a couple of the "Tell us how we are doing" posts.
##### CLUSTER 3 #####
Has anybody had a problem/are there any 'tricks' to starting bank feeds through Rabo Bank?
This is what the bank charge me every month for a 20 years mortage.
Is anyone successfully using bank feeds or Yodlee with Yorkshire Bank business?
How can we reconcile the credit card processor amounts when they come in on our bank feed?
(statement balance matches bank statement balance and matches my paper statement. )
Or can the intnl fee be expensed immediately as a bank charge?
$700 etc how do I reconcile my bank statements.
Yodlee doesn't actually have a relationship with any bank from what I am being told.
That what is happening if any of you are having the same issue with your bank feed.
The loan money will be taken back out in cash or via a bank transfer.
HiJust wondering why whenever I bank a cheque, it appears 3 times to be reconciled.
How should we do bank reconciliation in this situation please?
But how do I reconcile my bank rec?
Is there anyway to link the two bank payments for £5.
Anyone else not had bank feeds through today?
I've got several bank entries that I can't reconcile because of this and would greatly appreciate some advice.
Is there anything I can do about a loan with bank feeds appearing in the Cash/Asset section of the balance sheet?
15 creditThat is how they appear on the bank feed.
This can take anything from a week to a month to hit the bank.
What effect will this have on my bank reconciliation, since this activity is not represented in either the banking nor credit card downloads?
I can't reconcile the fleetcard payments and merchant fee as the bank feeds have only been set up since March 2016.
I'm unable to obtain bank statements in CSV format so can't manually upload them.
(because we have many sales record every day)Should we use website record or bank statement for revenue data?
Since returning the van we have received a partial refund which is also shown on our bank feed.
Hello Expert,I am creating bank rule but it seem they identify for few and are not identifying with same cases.
Have done my bank rec, I am out by $341.
for the income in April (dating it to the last day of the month) and then reconciling it to the bank statement in May?
The problem is that I don't want to grant this user with a higher privileges so they then have access to the bank balance, etc.
My bank reconciliation lines show two lines (&#163;400 debit and a &#163;60 credit).
I have already issued a refund (which will show in a couple of days on the bank statement).
HiIs anyone else having difficulties with their bank feed for HSBC AU?
I still have the monies already entered from the conversion into our bank acount so this is creating a double entry.
At present my bank is not matching the actual bank statement, is there any reason why?
A remittance file can be transferred to my bank and paid automatically.
How do I reconcile the bank refund?
Can someone please explain how this information can be divulged yet not infringe on the agreement I have with my bank not to divulge such information.
we can't seem to reconcile the bank.
00I then in early March imported my Bank statements and started to reconcile all of the payments, incredibly easy.
Is there a problem with the Bank Feeds coming in from ANZ this morning?
TIABTW - Lloyds bank feed failed 10 days ago and cannot reconnect -any ideas?
How do I deal with these transfers without the bank feed connected?
I only charge what the bank charges the Company, which is 1.
But there is no bank statement line item to reflect the and amount received as cash is all kept in Petty Cash.
Owner draws cash out of bank for expenses in advance in the beginning of the month.
However, it seems we constantly get an error message: "There is a problem with this bank feed. "
Has anyone used M&T Bank feeds before?
I take payments by Paypal, Worldpay and by bank transfer from Amazon.
How do you reconcile multiple cash and EFTPOS bank deposits to one Money Received entry?
If I get paid in cash, I deposit the money into my bank when going home at the end of the day.
At the end of the day I bring up the "Prepare Bank Deposit" screen in AccountEdge.
Yes they can implement 'receipt bank' or something similar to import bills.
How do I undo the paid function on some of these bills to reconcile them with purchases on my credit card or bank debit card?
Has anyone experienced trouble with a Bank of Ireland feed?
Do you incorporate Bank Link?
How do I go about getting rid of this bank statement line?
Please be aware that you cannot sign up to the new One Time Password security feature with Citibank and keep your automatic bank feeds.
Has anyone come across a "Bank Feed Daily Limit"?
There seems to already be some sort of connection built, but I'm not exactly sure how the security and username thing works with bank feed information.
I use Receipt Bank for all my bills so I do not have to do any input.
We only want to give certain users access to certain bank accountsHow can we do thisThanks
screen in the bank please.
Please increase the character limit to import the entire bank transaction description.
Any chance of a bank feed for Square 1 Bank, a division of Pacific Western?
I am wondering if there is any word as to when this bank from British Columbia, Canada, will be added.
Any idea how long until we can see this bank added?
com/Colorado East Bank and Trust was acquired by TBK and we no longer can enable feeds due to the change.
We're co-op bank customers and there isn't a direct feed.
Can I please request activation of bank feeds to the Qantas Cash Mastercard.
So that the total is easily reconciled with the bank statements.
Please consider removing or re-factoring the cluttering "(with a user created bank transaction)" label.
The current function is a safeguard to check that each bank rule is correct.
The bank has fields when you set up a APs or DD so why can the credit card companies not follow suit.
Can we please increase the manual journal entry import limit to at least 1000 lines, similar to that of the bank statement details import limit.
On the bank reconciliation screen it would be great if you could order the details in alphabetical order for the detail or payee and also in numerical order on amount in or out.
Is it possible to have an automatic feed from Clydesdale bank?
Please return the feature that allows for updating of the bank feeds at any time of the day.
Currently we require our customers to publish their Bank Reconciliation Reports among others, in order to do this we have had to set them up as Advisor so they can publish reports, however then they can access other features such as lock dates that we do not want them update or change.
I currently use the 'Export Batch File' and then 'BACS' option to get a file I can import into the bank system (Lloydslink).
It is about time that ANZ Bank credit cards were included on bank feeds, many companies have a credit card for pettycash/general expenses and it is a pain to have to manually input every transaction.
Bank rules do no allow for percentage breakdown.
Please advise when you expect to have the functionality of a deposit slip that can be printed in duplicate and taken to the bank with cash and cheques.
Currently there is no choice of "PAYEE" in "Set the Reference" at No 5. in the Bank Feed edit screen.
There is only one opportunity to MAP fields when you import a bank statement.
Please let us 'RE-MAP' the bank statement fields.
So the dashboard shows that my bank is reconciled to 23 October 2212!
If I put this through as one entry in Receive Money, I then can't match the different payments in the bank statement to this one entry.
This happens when I import my bank statements - this is a true mess.
The recent change of being to assign a create transaction to a tracking option (from the bank rec screen) is excactly what I've always wanted.
When editing a bank rule that has a ' in the title at step 7 this is misrepresented as &#39; .
It would be nice if one can import bank rules, especially when the information from the bank statements are of such nature that only bank rules can be used for easy reconciliation.
Can you make the wages show in the bank rec.
I have done the bank reconciliation, and notice there is a transaction  listed - Bank Transaction Soure - User.
How can you get missing bank feeds to come through?
Why can’t I split the bank rec item then reconcile the 2 smaller amounts?
I bank with CIBC if that makes any difference.
What should I do with that bank entry?
Lately you cannot navigate to the What field on the bank rec when entering data with the Mozilla Firefox browser.
However there is the useful "Get Bank Feed" option using Yodlee.
I do not seem to be able to set up a bank feed for Western Union so have to request statements to import.
How is the bank transfer received reconciles with a refund I send to the customer ?
In QB, I can write a check in the register, then send the transaction via the bank feed to my bank, and the bank will send the check to the recipient.
Due the set up with our bank, there is no "refresh feed" option.
When the bank statement comes in there is a line for each EFTPOS machine each day.
A cash deposit was made at the bank in lieu of fund raising income received.
Due to some confusion the bank teller incorrectly recorded the transaction on the bank computer as 590.
What is the best method, setting up a bank for Amazon?
I bought some equipment for the company with my bank card by mistake.
On the Bank Reconciliation page if the item cant be found then you can created new.
How should i deal with that when doing bank rec?
I can't get my bank feed to reconcile with RBS today.
How do I start my opening bank balance
Paypal Fee - 404 - Bank FeesPayment Completed - 200 - SalesFee Reversal - Completed - Not sure so i marked as sales?
Can anyone tell me how I change it back to ABA as the bank won't let me upload the CSV file.
So there is no bill issued to me by the insurer for excess and the money is transferred from their bank to mine.
I can't find the relevant bank in the list.
HiIf the bank statement display a cancellation transaction of an amount then how do i find and match the entry with each other.
I am reconciling my bank feed.
Anyone else experiencing similar issues with TD Bank.
I am using Commonwealth bank and they provided 3 DE User ID.
Please note I do not think this is a bank feed problem.
But it's still saying that 'A bank feed for this bank is currently in development.
Has anyone had success with setting up batch payments to vendors with Bank of America.
How do I link those 2 separate bank statement lines to her one net paycheck?
There is no automatic bank feed, the bank statement is imported manually each month.
However the Bank Balance is no where near what it should be.
How do I process this, it is in bank feed as incoming funds.
There is nothing in the Bank Exceptions tab, and nothing in the bank reconciliation summary.
How on earth the balance in Bank Reconciliation summary is different from bank statement?
If a bank rule can do this, that would be great.
I did notice an adjustment button, but how do I do this retrospectively with using the reconciliation tool & bank feed
I'm currently going through and reconciling all imported bank statements and one statement in particular I am struggling with.
Our organisation is not a bank or financial institution but we do organise a service to look after our employees effectively.
Is there a 'bug' in the cash coding section when you try and manually apply a bank rule?
Most banks have paying in machines that take an image of any cheques paid in and it would be handy to attach these banking receipts to the corresponding bank statement line.
Has anyone else got a problem with bank feeds from Bendigo Bank not updating?
How do I get rid of the pre start date unreconciled bank statement lines?
Also how do you transfer a bank balance total?
Could such a feature be implemented whereby items in the bank feed could be ignored or hidden?
I'd love to see a total of what I've spent and what I've received at the very end of the bank reconcile.
I do not import bank statements manually, so every transaction were sent through bank feed.
Where do I reconcile this bank statement line?
I want the exact amounts to sit there waiting to clear as it is my check that the right amount is clearing the bank.
Hello,Our bank feed has multi-factor authentication and so only the person who set up the bank feed and entered their banking credentials can do this.
What we typically do is make a single bank transfer with an amount equal to the sum of all outstanding bills.
This helps you create Bank Rules much faster and gives clients a much shorter list of unknown entries.
Extract Bank Rules to Excel:You really should extract Bank Rules to Excel, so you quickly find and fix errors.
Is there a function when doing the bank rec to easily match an existing Bank Rule against a transaction?
Now when I try to re-activate the feed I get the initial feed login screen, otp questions, login, get the otp which I enter ok,, then eventually times out with error:"There was a problem connecting to Citibank (AU) bank feeds" please try again later, well later has been 2 weeks and still the same issue.
So what should I do about the bank reversal that needs to be reconciled?
This means there is nothing to reconcile the debit against in the bank.
(Not for payments on bills, bank transfers, overpayments or prepayments. )
How do we adjust the Bank Statement so that it has the correct opening balance?
I am doing the bank reconciliation and there is a receipt into the bank that I cant allocate.
I can download from the actual bank site fine.
Any suggestions on how to resolve this (other than change to a bank that doesn't have this arbitrary restriction).
This was all great until I relised that one of the employees bank details had been typed in incorrectly.
How do I make the software not show the second bank holiday?
I am having trouble reconciling wages in my imported bank statement.
Around the right time there is a bank transaction "INT'L 0048290562STARBUCKS STORE 07 NEW YORK" for the amount UK£5.
i. e. would there be more detail about what makes up that $3000 than I get with the bank feed?
Looking for some feedback on the Receipt Bank integration .
I can not  see to be able to select bank nor wage payable to deduct amount.
Can you reconcile bank line items with the manual journals?
As far as I can see, there is little to choose feature-wise between Entryless & Receipt Bank.
Is it possible to only reconcile part of a bank receipt?
Most businesses will not bank the balance of the cash (and cheques) daily so I can’t see how an element of control could be applied to the entries.
I am contacting my bank as well.
At least can someone provide a more detailed update on Bank Feed Status as to what's going on?
Hello,When completing the bank security page (to refresh a feed), please implement some next input focus to move the cursor.
I have contacted my bank,and there is no record of any attempt to charge my debit card or even validate the card details.
Can you send a message to all that use Bendigo Bank for example?
I am having some terrible trouble with bank feeds from HSBC (UK) lately.
HiWe are having constant delays with ANZ bank feeds,  its happening nearly every day and very frustrating.
##### CLUSTER 4 #####
Please add a Print and Export function to the list of staff for the Superannuation Payment Details.
Please add this as an option for the Stripe payment service.
So, is it possible to add the same "Cheque Payment" feature that Canadian organizations has to Argentina&#180;s organizations?
Presently we can add a link to a custom payment gateway via the PaymentMessageAndUr field.
How do you go back and add in the super contribution payment and correct this?
##### CLUSTER 5 #####
Hi all,How do you go back and edit payslips that has already been paid to adjust the annual leave taken?
Hi, First I should disclose that I am not a bookkeeper, so please excuse me if this question has an obvious answer.
Hi there,please could anyone advise me regarding year end stock journals?
Hi all,I am working as a Bookkeeper on a VAT non registered businesses.
Hi,I am adding money that I received in Amazon in sales.
Hi,I have lent my car sales buisness (Ltd company) some money to buy some stock cars to keep the ball rolling, I intend to take this money back in a couple of weeks when the cars sell.
Hi, I've done my first VAT return but there is no option to file it with HMRC.
Hi I am trying to insert a statement line and was wondering if there is anyway to do that?
Hi, I am trying to provide my client with a list of Key Performance Indicators, within their annual / monthly reports.
Hi Community,1 question, where do I book Equipment rental?
Hi all,I am really stuck here.
Hi guys, I'm sure this is very simple but I haven't been able to find any clarification on other discussions or in Guides.
Hi what is the best code to use for HMRC penalities (late filing due to a fire ! )
Hi,How do I go about reconciling commission?
Hi,Could someone please give me advice on how to purchase a vehicle that is listed under the business assets without the exchange of money.
Hi,I am after some advice.
Hi,I've searched to see if this issue has come up before but can't see anything, so apologies if this question  has already been answered elsewhere.
Hi folks,I have been doing  end of period journals for my inventory and was happy with the figures showing on P&L and Balance sheet.
Hi -How do I run Balance Sheets that are not ending on calendar months i. e. 4 Jan 15
Hi Everyone,Is anyone else experiencing this issue please?
Hi all,I've read up on this subject as much as possible and I am still not 100% there on all details.
Hi all, How do I reconcile a refund processed via EFTPOS please?
Hi I am confused.
Hi all,We operate a small company who do not employ any personnel however we are using various contractors daily.
Hi, a question for any Australian users about GST.
Hi,We have a client which sells services to countries in the EC and I am not sure how I should be entering them.
Hi, Could anyone with experience of factoring for a business on the cash VAT scheme please comment on this.
Hi everyone,  I am very new so I hope I make sense!
Hi all,I can't seem to find the answer to this one anywhere.
Hi here is my situation:My first financial year started from Feb 2010 to Jan 2011.
Hi All,Apologies but I am a total novice.
Hi All,I wish to provide my accountant with some reports / summaries they can use to do my BAS.
HiRegarding, reverse charge VAT accounting, I have been posting purchases with a EC Purchase VAT code of 20%, and on the bottom line posting a negative VAT reverse charge to the VAT code, per the instructions for Reverse Charges so that it then appears correctly on the VAT return boxes.
Hi, wondering if someone can tell me how I create the opening balance (quantity) of my inventory items.
Hi, I am trying to fix a mistake I made back in July.
Hi, Sorry if an answer for this is elsewhere, but I can't seem to find it.
HI everyoneI am preparing our latest GST return and I have a couple of items that have come up in late claims.
Hi there,Can anyone point me in the right direction.
hi we have multiple (200 customers), can we set up so for each client we can track individual profit, costs and/or losses at a customer level?
Hi All,Has anyone seen this feature for Odoo?
Hi all, How do you handle your retention / withholding tax?
Hi there,I am a sole trader.
Hi guys,tl;drI withdrawal $1000 cash, paid $330 and deposit $670, what to do with reconciliation?
HI , how do i input opening balances for my customers without importing them ?
Hi Guys,How do I reinstate a previously deleted user/email address.
Hi, I have received a refund from the ATO on my WET and GST purchases for my stock purchases of wine.
Hi all - how are people accounting for the UK employment allowance on NIC?
Hi I am in the process of creating a custom statement for sending to clients.
Hi thereCan you please look at adding a feature for the production of extra-ordinary tax letters, for the likes of voluntary payments outside the predefined provisional and terminal tax dates.
Hi Can I suggest an extra field for information in the customer contact information a space to put Referral Information please
Hi,I am currently processing super payments for a client monthly.
Hi AllMy feature request here is to do with the "All Reports" page.
Hi thereAt the moment there is no audit trail function for changes to the budget manager.
Hi,on the cash coding screen, when you scroll down you can't see the table header any more.
Hi,Is it possible to have an accumulated balance column in customer statement - outstanding?
Hi,Only a few of our suppliers require remittance advices but it is hard to remember which ones when sending them out.
Hi guys,Love the new quote facility, only there is no search bar!
Hi, when emailing the payslips to the staff, can we have some form of password protection please?
Hi Could we change a leave request to include different Leave Types.
Hi, When I mark a receipt as paid there is an option to then send a receipt.
Hi Could anyone tell me how I can restrict staff access to a specific client.
HI,Could I please put an example of what has happened to me so that I can see what I should have done / should be doing?
Hi, I'm sure I'm missing something simple but I can't see how the paypal fees for a transaction are imported.
Hi I'm trying to import an excel spreadsheet to do a re-forecast on budget manager.
Hi All, i'm an Electrician so will use that as an example however it can be applied to every trade.
Hi,Trying to get my BAS activity statement running, and I can't see the "GST worksheet" tab, only the BAS and GSTAudit tabs?
Hi allI've tried to find this already answered here, but still unsure of what to do.
Hi,Maybe Ive missed it, but where/how do I set up a daily recurring transaction?
Hi,Can someone please tell me how to fix deleted statement exceptions?
Hi,Has anyone experienced this?
Hi everyone,I am an event manager, and recently managed an event for a charity.
Hi,Can someone explain the following?
Hi, I am a freelance writer, not registered for GST, and bill magazines etc using a gross per-word amount, e. g $350, no tax added.
Hi I am sure this has been requested a million times but is this any nearer to be implemented?
Hi there,I'm a freelance copywriter, and for a lot of jobs I charge by the hour (in 15-minute increments).
Hi, I see there is a new release due this weekend.
Hi thereI accidentally paid a casual employee last week when he hadn't worked any hours.
Hi All Starting to look for things to do and see in NZ after Xerocon - will be North Island (only this trip)So we have 9 day to do and see things Going to hire a van as there will be six of us And suggestion would be most helpful and appreciated John - Canberra
Hi,We come across the issue where with particular banks, Westpac & NAB and others where when the feed comes in it displays the "Internet Transfer" or other similar words or even nothing in the Payee Field.
Hi Due to the new Awards and changes to penalty rates there is now new % used to calculate penalty rates.
Hi When setting up a new employee and assigning their super details you can't see the SPIN or USI when selecting the fund.
Hi,Can't find solution to this in the forums.
Hi there,There is the increase of super contribution from 01July from 9.
Hi, I have entered the leave we owe the employee that is leaving so he now shows 0 hours owing.
Hi, how do i process a payrun that has annual leave and public holiday.
Hi,This is probably going to sound really silly.
Hi,Why is it the only leave I can approve is Parental Leave, I'm only given those four options to approve.
Hi there,Is there away to stop the leave balances going Negative if the employee doesn't have enough accumulated leave?
Hi,We have a payroll where the annual leave accrual is set up to Calculate on Ordinary Earnings.
Hi,I am having trouble with one of our employees settings not registering PAYG accumulation.
Hi,Can anyone explain how to set up an Annual Leave Accrual item for Part-Time employees.
Hi,I am having an issue with reconciling year end payroll.
Hi,If an employee is off sick for a day or so (not enough to be entitled to statutory sick) how is this recorded?
Hi all,I am having some issues with RTI filing.
Hi, I'm working with a client that outsources their payroll including all RTI and year end filing.
Hi thereI have a query regarding how to treat Staff Entertainment when it&#180;s over the HMRC tax allowance limit.
Hi there, Is there any chance of adding a column to time sheets that employees can write down the details of where they worked and what work they did each day.
Hi One of our employees has started and finished in the same week.
Hi,I am in the process of setting up the first employee, but stuck as how to migrate over existing holiday data and allowances.
Hi EveryoneWe are in the final stages of implementing Ento for rosters and time recording for approx.
Hi There,I am a part owner of an importing company in Australia.
Hi thereMay i ask if anyone could advise or recommend a CRM system, our business is vehicle & asset finance so our leads are by prospecting / referral or inbound.
Hi I am setting up or integration with Deputy.
Hi , We are a small company with 4 sales people , mainly B2B sales and around 1000 products.
Hi, I am looking for a job tracking and clocking in system all in one.
Hi Everyone,I have done some research on this and haven't had any luck so far.
Hi ,I am from Prout partners.
Hi,can you please contact me regarding ticket reference number CX0005139737 as it was logged on 22/06/17 (2 weeks ago today) and I have since followed up by email on the 26th June and yesterday but have not had a response yet.
Hi,I am quite concern how slow my queries are being addressed.
Hi,Is it normal practice for customers to wait over 48 hours for a response?
Hi,Is there a problem with the server today?
Hi XeroPlease check the Purchase order form for a slot to fill in or populate an email address for the supplier?
##### CLUSTER 6 #####
Can anyone tell me how the Xero data is backed up?
Morning, Where do I book Establishments costs in Xero?
Please can you advise how to put this into Xero?
It won't set up on Xero.
My Xero knowledge is not advanced.
Is there are limit to how many customers I have on xero?
We are using Xero in conjunction with Tradegeko's stock / inventory management system.
But on Xero?
From the numerous posts on Xero forums I still can't find clarity.
What do I put into Xero.
I can get reports out of XERO on sales per customer.
How should we be posting these sales onto Xero i n order to avoid messing up the UK VAT return.
Everything I'm finding about how to do the accounting for this is through Quickbooks, which is enough different from Xero that I am completely lost.
How do I make these corrections simply and swiftly in the xero ?
How do I reconcile these in Xero?
Is there any recourse to get my money back from Xero?
or I am asking Xero to fix their bug?
What is the rational for Xero's choice?
Because these deductions are not payable so how I can record it in Xero?
In Xero, this traansaction is only represented with a single line.
Using Fixed Assets in Xero.
In Xero, I've separated these by using DBAs as a tracking category.
I am new to Xero and not sure what to do with overpayments and refunds.
This has resulted in an inflated amount of cash on hand in Xero.
How should I handle this in Xero?
00                              transaction in xero    2166.
Keep in mind I'm a novice, so the more details on specific steps the better since I’m still learning how to do stuff using Xero.
2) Shopify deducts a fee which I see in my Xero income statement as an expense under 6330-Professional Fees.
How do I reconcile these in xero?
I instead spent the money on personal things, how should I deal with these in Xero?
Given that the video is a bit old, am I to assume that Xero will inform HMRC that this PAYE submission is the last of the year?
How can I let Xero create an asset including the sales tax?
Dear Xero community,How do I fix my statements balance in Xero if it do not match with my original statement balance?
How do I record this and handle this in Xero?
I am more looking for general bookkeeping/Accounting advice on this procedure, as opposed to specifics on how to do things in Xero (although that is welcome too).
One statement line, (one amount for £500), is on Paypal but hasn't been imported over into Xero.
What would be the best procedure to follow in xero for the following example?
In my case you get double trapped, because if you want to leave Xero none of the files i. e. .
How should I categorize these in Xero?
Where do I enter salaries and internship allowance in Xero?
If XERO can give any further guidance in regard to a resolution it would also be great to hear.
I recently unreconciled a transaction on Xero.
Could anyone tell me how to enter it into Xero?
I then import them into Xero.
Good MorningWe are in the process of installing Opera Cloud as the PMS for our apartment hotel business and also use Xero as our accounting package.
When a ecommerce transaction happens, how do i record it in xero?
How do we record this in Xero?
How would I record these in xero?
I have over 10k products in my inventory is this too much for Xero to handle?
How do we do this in Xero?
What is the best method of accounting for chargebacks in Xero?
Come across a problem with Xero, there's not many but this is a grey area for us.
But how on earth do I do this in Xero?
How do I track this income in Xero?
How do you get the info from the QB POS system into Xero?
HiI recently started using Xero, and I'm having some issues with the reconciling.
Is there anyway to get Xero to acknowledge the overpayment of VAT?
xero down, no client accessnot good - againany reasons for this outage againthis is happening once a weekwe can assume you are updating again in NZ overnight?
A bill with 0 qty and only value can not be entered as Xero multiplies the qty with the value for the final value.
HiI have a client who currently is running 5 companies through Xero.
I've read  Xero blog post about some of the new Contact Transaction reports.
Rather than use the Payroll Module and cut a check for myself, my CPA (who is unfortunately not well versed in Xero) wants me to simply do journal entries as follows (Q3 scenario below):Debit: "Officer's Compensation" – $15,000Debit: "Payroll Tax Expense" $1,147.
Xero keeps seeing the 2 payments as 1:1 ($1AUD = 1$USD) and I can't seem to change the ex rate.
How do I mark this down in Xero?
We can now use the multiple currency in XERO.
Under the tab Adviser a user can run Annual Reports in the format prescribed by Xero.
What do I do in Xero?
Base currency in xero GBP.
How should this IRD transaction be recorded in Xero?
How would this be recorded in Xero?
How do I create such a list in Xero?
Anyones experience of running intercompany recharges on Xero would be gratefully received.
Goodwill is set up as a "Non-Current Asset" in Xero, or I can create a new asset type if desired.
In Xero I created two separate bills for each transaction.
How do I enter a similar scenario in Xero?
Quick question, is Xero planning to update their depreciation module to accommodate using SBE Pools for Australian clients?
How do I modify my Xero file settings for GST from 1st July onwards?
I filed a client's VAT return on Friday afternoon via Xero.
Is our proposed accounting treatment for this type of transaction would be correct on Xero?
I am fairly new to Xero, and to the world of book keeping, so still trying to get my head around everything, please go gently!
I want the balance in Xero to show a true reflection of what the business is doing.
Is it possible in Xero to create a backup as of a particular date.
How do I set this up within Xero?
It is the first time this has happened and I was wondering if there was some problem with the ASB (or Xero) on that particular day.
Can anyone lend some advice on how I should deal with this in Xero.
How would I process the vehicle purchase from the business through Xero?
How do i remove this amount from Xero?
N. B - I'm not using the multi-currency reporting xero plan, as I really can't afford it this early in the business, and I'm not sure if this will resolve my problems here for me.
How do I do the same GJ entry in xero?
This exercise creates numerous manual JEs posted in Xero.
is anyone can recommend accountant with Xero experience in Dubai?
First: I created all the additional codes and banks required (in this case the Xero entity did not have property and the merging entity did) and we created a separate code for brought on creditor balances.
Can i do that with xero?
How is this accomplished in Xero?
i. e. will Xero nofollow them so we don't get any SEO benefit - or will they pass link juice?
What options do we have with Xero and Auth.
HelloCan someone advise how I create an entry in Xero for a purchase of a vehicle.
gov/Government-Entities/Federal,-State-&-Local-Governments/Federal-Agency-Frequently-Asked-QuestionsAny ideas on a work around until Xero fixes this?
I am looking for a supplier who can convert Quickbooks Pro Multi Currency to Xero.
i am doing our end of the year taxes and comparing the sales in Xero to the sales in Square, they are quite different.
Some I have an EU VAT number for, some I do not, how are people booking these in Xero in terms of the VAT code selection?
And how can I get Squarespace sales that come into Xero automatically to show volume sold?
70 in my Xero.
Box 1 is correct, but box 6 has the wrong figure and I can't workout how Xero has calculated it.
As this is the first time this is happened since I have been using Xero, I require a bit of assistance.
Once adding those at the end of the month, how can I have these showing up on our P&L reports on Xero before I publish them?
How do I implement this scheme in Xero?
How do I put it in Xero?
But how do we record the sales and track inventory since we cannot do composite products in Xero?
HiI am looking to use Xero but am not sure how to raise an expense for a bill from Fedex that represents the GST for an imported shipment from the US.
I have been given a TB from an accountant to set up a client on Xero and I am in the process of posting the conversion balances.
Can someone advise me how to enter this partial refund into xero.
The issue I'm running into is that the 200% depreciation method in Xero is not the same schedule as what I used to declare on my taxes (MACRS).
Has anybody had experience accounting for Groupon deal payments in Xero?
But how can I record both depreciations values in Xero?
How can I reconcile this in xero.
I can only assume Xero is using different days currencies for some things, which sucks anyway because there is no transparency on this.
So what I'm doing is entering a bill in xero to "Purchase" the inventory (which is all tracked, and entered into the bill with the correct qty, etc.
I cannot see how to create the return from Xero.
I have a bill entered in Xero, eg INV0052 - Meat Supplier - £50.
How do I do this with Xero?
Are there any problems with this approach (Xero technical, accountancy or UK tax authorities) ?
I have an online store running Shopify, which is connected to TradeGecko for Inventory, which is in turn connected to Xero.
PayPal appears in our feed in Xero, fees already deducted.
I doubt that I'm the only person in the world with this issue - though a cursory Xero search didn't really dig up what I was after.
Is this the Achilles heel of Xero?
So what am I doing wrong that means all I can show in Xero is the Tax Code and its Tax Total?
Is there anyone in the Xero community that can put me straight, please?
How can such billing be done in Xero (invoicing) to reflect the quantity issued in cubic meters, the days spent in the warehouse, and the rate per day?
This is a technical issue from Xero side.
I've set-up Xero for our small business (based in AU).
If this is the case, how do I set this up in Xero?
In Xero, I can't make a $0 check.
How do I convince Xero of this?
#1 - How is the statement balance calculated in Xero?
How do I enter this in Xero?
We have set up our first client in xero for budgeting.
How can I export all items created in Xero company and import them into a new company?
Has anyone converted sage one historical data into Xero and is so how?
How do I record this in Xero?
How can I correct this in Xero to be deducted off our next VAT return but not affect previous financial years?
I'm new to Xero and wondering how people integrate their share trading into Xero.
How should I record this scenario in Xero?
I am keen to hear any thoughts on Xero for personal use (not small business use).
They were purchased on a credit card which I have linked with Xero.
I was looking for some advice on Xero's capabilities in this area.
Can anyone advise how to post such a transaction in Xero.
I am entering some purchases and have ran in to a situation where the receipt's calculation of the sales tax and Xero's are different.
How do I handle this in Xero?
How do I record this transaction in Xero?
How do I record this transaction in Xero?
My question is, can Xero support this uploading / downloading of information?
com/documentation/api-guides/how-to-integrate-my-pos-system-with-xero/That was working fine when I banked all of the cash takings.
Only found Xero today but it looks to be exactly what is needed.
How do I transfer cash into Square Register from Xero?
How do I reconcile that withdrawal in Xero?
so, how should I record this in Xero?
I'm a sole proprietor, so the line between what's in Xero and what's personal is a little fuzzy.
Now the following, I'm not sure how to enter into Xero:4.
So - how should I actually enter the refund in Xero, and match it all up appropriately?
How is this best to be managed in XERO.
CSV format as Xero asks for but it is not a compatible layout.
I've set my public profile ON in Xero, but when i try to search advisor based on country "indonesia" my name is not there.
I published my BAS in Xero without adding some payments for the quarter.
Or how Xero deducts 100% of the Meals & Entertainment category, when the IRS only counts 50% of it as a deduction.
Is there any ways I can modify Xero's reports so that the numbers more accurately reflect how the government will see it?
I want to bring those parts into inventory but I'm unsure of how to do this in Xero.
can XERO do this?
can this be tracked in XERO?
Please can someone tell me how I would go about doing this in Xero.
What I can't fully grasp is how to treat this in Xero.
Can this be done in Xero reports?
I am struggling with how to enter this into Xero, and I cant seem to find any postings on it.
We are doing a transaction in Canadian dollars, but all of our accounting (as far as Xero is concerned) is strictly US dollars.
The sales data is there in Xero but it's not coming through in the BAS.
The question - can anyone advise how this is treated in Xero as a tax rate.
HiI'm very new to Xero, and am getting ready to do my first set of BAS's!
As a new user to Xero, I'm a little frustrated at some of the unwieldy functionality.
I can't find any information from Xero on a recommended work flow.
Imported goods have not been received so bill has not been processed in Xero.
The Bill will only be processed in Xero when the goods are received which they have not beenIs it possible to process the Overpayment before the Bill is processed, and how?
We have multiple related organizations in Xero.
How do I show this in xero.
What I'm trying to figure out is what is the proper method during reconciling to denote that my Xero charge needs Use Tax to be paid?
Is there anywhere on the web where there is information on which tax code to use in Xero?
I have a bill in Xero for 35USD.
How do other people handle this in Xero?
Has anyone tried using it, is it too good to be true & will Xero be doing something similar?
If the expense is posted against the Post Office, how can i track what an employee has spent on their card within Xero?
What is the state of UBL in Xero and have you even heard about this international standard from Oasis?
it sits there as a current claim on the iphone but is not showing up under expense claims in xero so i can reimburse the employee.
How do I go about doing it right in Xero?
I am new to Xero, so I am not sure how common this is.
We at Xero aren’t in a position to give accounting advice, but Xero users can be.
We at Xero aren’t in a position to give accounting advice, but Xero users can be.
We at Xero aren’t in a position to give accounting advice, but Xero users can be.
We at Xero aren’t in a position to give accounting advice, but Xero users can be.
We at Xero aren’t in a position to give accounting advice, but Xero users can be.
Is this being looked at as variation to Xero?
I have staff sat here who cannot do any work, Xero support are not being helpful at all.
How do I go about setting up a loan in Xero from my business to outside person in ?
Can Xero be set up to calculate the depreciation / FBT for the vehicle?
If I enter is as 'No GST' in Xero, I won't be able to claim it - am I correct?
I was wondering if I can do mass reclassification of expenses already posted in Xero history.
70			How do i put this into Xero?
How should I go about it, as I cannot find any 'adjustment' feature in Xero.
There is a useful Xero guide here.
How do I classify these two items in Xero?
After realising that Xero fires all of my receipts into the "Expense" bucket, I'm now left with the task of downloading 2 months worth of receipt images and recreating each expense item into a bill, so that I can reconcile it.
HiI have set a user up in Xero as inv only/draft.
I am setting up my first nonprofit in Xero.
From the xero essentials video it is noted that there is a 'ledger' partner edition subscription for the purposes of maintaining access.
Do I use the tax setting in Xero for this to happen automatically (currently I have all of them set to 0% b/c I thought they were for sales tax only)?
I could try emailing Xero but they aren't always prompt in replies.
So in Xero there are three Liability types:   Current LiabilityLiabilityNon-current LiabilityCurrent Liability is pretty strait forward.
Has anyone had good/bad experience with importing journals from MYOB Payroll into Xero?
How do I combine payments into one deposit in Xero?
Happy to assist any one in Australia, with Xero implementation and bookkeeping, as well as training.
branch managers), is this possible in Xero business?
How Xero calculates how much I've saved if the application doesn't have visibility of the VAT that I would otherwise have been able to include within my VAT return in the normal regime?
How do a reconcile this in xero?
Can anyone tell me how to do it on Xero?
They only ever had a single transaction in xero, which a funds transfer into them.
How is the community on Xero managing royalty payments?
Unfortunately I am unable to decode how xero calculates what goes into box 6 and box 7 of the UK VAT return.
I'm wondering how I might deal with this in Xero?
How do i record that in Xero so that we get reminded at the end of the lease to collect it.
Now here is my problem - Xero is calculating the total VAT on purchases from  purchase.
Defeats the purpose of having a reporting function in Xero if not possible.
If not, then how do I properly create this transaction in Xero?
We started with Xero on Jan 1st, 2013.
started using xero not long after, what do I put these funds down as ?
I've added a Xero landing page on our website but was hoping that some of you nice people would take a look and give us some constructive feedback please.
Is it normal in Xero?
Can anyone offer some insight as to why Xero considers a debt an asset?
Current liabilities in Xero you can't spend money out of.
Further, if this is how Xero behaves, how then do we calculate T1 on a cash basis?
How do I get the depreciation correct in Xero to show only the 40% on some assets.
Please could we have one in Xero?
I can't access my staff's business credit cards via FastNet Classic and therefore cannot get a feed for them into Xero.
How would one set up xero to show the total number of fares for each driver collect, then transferring that to the driver less his commision.
The only thing I can think of is I am still "trialling" Xero - is there a restriction on the important files (number of lines) while in trial mode ?
Can I achieve this in Xero?
I'm wondering if we should continue to do this, or if Xero's multi-currency feature would be a better option.
I was wondering, as a general accounting question whether or not in Xero I can classify income as undeposited funds.
They are also both different users in Xero.
how do I do this through Xero?
I have tried contacting both Xero and iZettle and neither can offer me a solution and say they will refer it to the Development Team.
I'm looking for some assistance please with managing a loan in Xero.
Wondered if there were any accountants or businesses in the area that would be willing to give me a little time to coaching me through getting the best out of Xero either in person, over the phone, email support or Skype.
Metro is stating that the problem is with Xero.
5 in flat rate, XERO will calculate 16.
I spent money on flights and accommodation that were then reimbursed by my client, but I can't figure out how to create this situation in Xero.
If I used some of the stock for marketing purpose, how should I book the transaction and reduce the inventory in Xero?
As usual, I do not expect a prompt reply from Xero.
Xero is clearly not showing withdrawals.
I'm looking for advice from anyone who has moved from Sage to Xero.
Our accountant wants us to move from Sage (which I have been using for over 6 years) to Xero and I am in the middle of a month long free trial on Xero and to be honest I am hating everything about it.
Aside from each countries has different sales tax requirements, can you also post or comment to our fellow business owners why Xero has this kind of monthly plans?
Is this possible in Xero?
I made the jump to Xero and truly enjoy using Xero, what a great application!
I have used xero to file my VAT since day one, this time it popped up asking me for my gateway username and password which I entered (I checked I could use it for logging on to the Government gateway so I am 99% sure it is correct) and the filing failed with the error message :The Gateway ID, Password or VAT Number submitted was incorrectLast time I logged on to the gateway it offered me two step authentication via mobile phone text message and I set this up, has this broken Xeros filing?
How can we achieve the same thing in Xero?
Any ideas Xero?
So, I was looking for some kind of wish list here in Xero but couldn't find it.
C/C payments to be recorded, sales by items, stock control etcWho has or is using Xero that can provide me feedback.
Is this possible in Xero?
If it is not directly available through Xero is it available through a 3rd party application?
I have two businesses in Xero.
Hello,Is there anyway I can work out the Customer Lifetime Value in Xero.
Can xero be recommended to NGO's or its strictly for small and medium sized businesses?
If so what can be the best key features to market xero to an NGO?
Is it possible to group expenses against stock in Xero & how it can be done please?
Can anyone explain how I can group expenses in Xero against one item/stock to calculate total cost of that item?
My gut feel is Xero invoicing is excellent for invoicing if you've got admin staff able to spend all day on it.
How should this be processed on Xero.
Do any of the "super" xero users have advice on how they stay up to date with the xero feature requests?
How do I record this in Xero.
I do have to manually create 'Tasks' when I take a phone order and there is a lot of jumping from Xero to Insightly.
How would you best enter them in Xero?
How do we go about recording our sales in Xero to avoid this problems in the future as I will be doing the BAS's from now on.
How can I make the 'Balance in Xero match up again?
I'm wondering if there is a setting that allows a copy of the emails sent from Xero to copy across to Outlook?
My question is; how do you reconcile that in xero?
How would you go about invoicing this and would you use any of the other Xero tools.
My question relates to how Xero uses the Contact Name field throughout the program.
However there is a huge issue getting the information out of Xero.
That always works which indicates to me there is a glitch in the Xero email system.
HiI am looking to use Xero but am not sure how to raise an expense for a bill from Fedex that represents the GST for an imported shipment from the US.
I hope this makes sense and if Xero can handle this without going to an outside source to integrate, that would be awesome.
Why is seller fees not considered as a cost of sale in xero?
Can you please advise how we amend this in Xero?
How should this cash flow be handled in xero ?
How should this be handled in Xero ?
I added an inventory for 1 of the trucks but the prices will change constantly with the different fees, can I please get some advice how I would go about adding this into xero.
With regards to Xero, can I export the current Sole Trader file, reports, etc, wipe all the data in Xero and do a brand new setup for the company, under the existing subscription?
How do I handle this in Xero?
Xero creates a customer call "fuel expense" which employees seeing on contacts.
Can anyone recommend any Xero experts/accountants in Spain?
It seems on Xero that instead of being able to look at a Sales Order and seeing what has been allocated against it that I will have to manually go back and look at all Packing Lists against the original order to see what is still outstanding?
How do you all use, if you can Xero for a CRM?
My xero is saying positive balance what it means .
Xero is down.
Is this available in xero?
So far in my journeys around Xero, I've found most areas woefully lacking in search boxes.
How can we make this automatically change to what is set up in Xero?
I am trying to find a print supplier in the uk who can provide pre-printed stationery that will match the standard or docx templates on Xero.
I read that Xero is integrating with Metrobank in the UK, how will this differ to the existing integration that is possible with existing banks?
I got the impression that the Metrobank/Xero integration is something unique.
Our bookkeepers can provide basic Xero training so you can take on some of the bookkeeping load.
Our bookkeepers can train you in Xero and provide basic support where required to suit your budget.
How should I handle the GST return in Xero for these items?
I have now got most of my supplies to email directly to xero which is very handy.
My year end inventory value in 2014 lets say was $10,000 which I entered and is in xero in my Inventory Asset column.
I'm not sure I want to do leave it unallocated in xero as it could be months before a booking proceeds.
I won't create a new set of Xero contacts or be constantly exporting/importing them.
Is there some Xero accounting method for reporting a business loss?
This is more a small business query rather than Xero-specific, but we'often get hit with a $7.
Having manually plugged in the figures from Xero on excel to check the totals, I find a balance of  -3372.
On Xero this balance is -10,356.
I finally started trading in Xero on the 23rd of July.
Much is made of easy, click 'OK" reconciling with prompts in Xero, but the actual reality is not that straight-forward.
This is my first year of using Xero, so please bear with me!
Xero support is saying that its an issue with the Yodlee service.
I don't mind this, but how do I balance it in Xero?
I have two organisations set up in Xero.
What is the correct process for recording this in Xero?
What other advantages do you see Xero offering over MYOB?
What is the setup on Xero?
How do I deal with this entry in Xero?
As the USA is outside the scope of VAT what Box on the VAT return should this show in and do we choose Zero Rated Income for the Tax Code in Xero or NO VAT?
Are there any Xero users in NE UK I can talk to, and see how this system works?
Can any other Xero small business users recommend commercial software for HMRC online filing?
I am facing a problem on recording Prepaid Insurance using Xero business pack.
Is there a common place to make errors in these settings, or am I the dumbest person to ever take up Xero?
I was wondering if there is this functionality on Xero?
I see that consistency with this data is a MUST as Xero pushes more into the cashbook space.
As Xero now own Workflowmax wouldn't this be a priority feature for better integration of their family of products?
This can then be sent back to us by our driver and stored back into Xero.
How do I find this in Xero?
Is there anyway of adding these statement lines to the one transaction in Xero (my payrun of 400).
Hello *newbie alert*I run a small tour operating company and am in the process of moving over to xero (yay!
With what banks do Xero work well ?
Hello,I'm about to set up a couple of medical practitioners on Xero in the coming week, a small doctors clinic and a remedial massager business.
Can anyone tell me how I would record this in Xero?
Is this possible with Xero?
is this possible to import a sage backed up file to a new company in xero?
How can I show the immediate deduction of a low cost asset in Xero?
Is anyone using Xero for quotations?
I’m using the basic Xero version for professional services.
)What's the best practice for this in Xero?
In Sept 2012 we hired a certified XERO adviser from their website (www.
Make sure if you hire a consultant you can delete their ID from your XERO at ANY time.
It seems that XERO allows their VARs (Value Added Retailers) enormous amount of power including switching you off without any notice.
When I enter this receipt in xero, I click on spend money, and it brings up a screen where I can enter the items, one I categorize as Computer Equimpent, the other as Office equipment.
I'm a Sole Trader, I have no tax set on my Xero as I'm not registered for GST.
It connect through Xero API but not integrating on Xero end.
I've searched threads and found a few others looking for enhancements to Xero reporting, but wondering if I'm missing something that already exists.
Is there a timesheeting system in Xero?
Share stories of what you've been doing with your advisors now you're collaborating together on Xero.
Once of my client's has a company set up in Xero for eg.
Is anyone using Xero with their e-commerce business.
Should I give them all access to xero so they can do their expenses?
I'm guessing there is no such thing, as there are no other options in the Xero Addons area.
Also, would be helpful if Xero would carry over a due date onto the check from the bill instead of the date the check is printed on.
Can xero please fix the calculation logic at the intersection of formula rows and formula columns or provide an option to suppress this value?
Xero, I won't even say please on this one.
I think Xero is a great product.
HiThis is a limitation of a product we use but xero could make it easier.
It'd be great if Xero knew about accounting firms, for log-in purposes.
If the asset depreciation start date could be set to July 1 regardless of purchase date (before or after), then depreciation in Xero would match that following the IRS MACRS "half-year convention", which happens to be the default method in TurboTax.
I haven't had this experience with any other companies in or outside of the Xero ecosystem, or in the cloud-based space - it seems very illogical that Xero would opt for such.
It'd be great if Groups in XPM would sync with Groups in Xero.
I realise it is more aesthetic but it really puts me off using Xero's featureThanks
Is there any chance that this sort of option would be available in Xero?
Any chance Xero could incorporate this?
HiIt is my understand Xero tax only allows for 1 business schedules when preparing a 2016 ITR.
HiThis is our first season of using Xero tax.
Please can you put a search tool in Xero for the link with Gmail.
Because it is a third party app It can not update status in Xero tax.
Could you PLEASE look into adding the Sync between the tracking mechanism for ADP and Xero.
Could you switch that back on please Xero, or at least give us the option as to what we see when we log in?
Please can we have a separate address field in Xero Company Settings for the Registered Office as well as those for the Postal Address and the Physical Address.
Please can we have support in Xero for HMRC exchange rates for VAT reporting.
So firstly, I want to warn people of another weakness in the VAT processing in Xero.
Currently in Xero HQ, there aren't notifications or an area to see if comments have been left in the Discuss tab within client organisations.
I hope this is coming as part Xero HQ development.
Xero support the SAF-T OECD Standard for exchange of accounting and audit data, which was introduced in 2008 and are now implemented across Europe?
This can be particularly useful when many people are regularly doing things in Xero.
Suggesting Xero create an automated field for Receipt Numbers on receipts.
Feature request: Xero prompts me to select a department when reconciling if my prompt is turned ON.
Is there some reason that Xero can't receive them at the same time as BankLink?
If Freeagent could do it then Xero can do it.
It would be extremely helpful if we could make changes to files and save them while working in Xero.
Xero is meant to be servicing an unlimited range of companies who require a professional approach to their business.
What is Xero plans for this.
So, I was looking for some kind of wish list here in Xero but couldn't find it.
Allow dividend & interest schedule in a company to be linked to the trust or individual if they are on Xero Tax.
Also the item code being visible on the default xero template, as there is no margin for error on the suppliers end as they have the codesI believe your procurement/purchase order system would be unrivalled if these were implemented, and would encourage xero users who don't use any kind of purchase system to adopt this, as it would be very "cut and dry" no margin for error from either parties
I run 2 companies on Xero, one a software start up.
My accountant says she doesn't think Xero can do this?
So it is good if Xero can create a search function in Description field of all Manual Journals.
It would be fantastic if Xero could be expanded to cover this.
It would be very handy and I would imagine easy to implement that an email is sent from Xero to a nominated email address on the day a bill is due to serve as a reminder.
Can the number of lines for upload be increase to one thousand (1000) or at least make the system recognise new information and so update instead of replacing exist information held in Xero.
Could we get a "Remember Me" checkbox placed on the Xero login page please - saves having to type it in every time Xero logs me out.
Please make the 'description' field not a compulsory section to complete when entering expense claims into Xero.
I'm not sure why Xero doesn't do it, it's very manual.
Xero Quotes aren't complex enough for our business, so we use 3rd party software for creating them.
Why can't business owners and payroll officers sit for the test to receive Xero U Credits?
I love that there are the automated placeholders that can be inserted into emails to clients to further automate the use of Xero.
There are a few snap on options in the Xero marketplace, they fall very short of being remotely good or useful.
I hope others on this forum would consider voting to have Xero build a rental management platform, which could also be used in a variety of industries worldwide.
The current Xero Search (in the navigation bar) has a limit of 12 characters.
THANK YOU Xero - you do a great job !
Can you make it so that the email in the contact details of a client in Xero Practice Manager syncs with the email in Xero?
Could a pop-up saying "do you want us to update the date field - yes / no" be put in, to give the option, rather than Xero assuming this to be relevant, please?
Hello Xero Team,We are company based on Singapore, while our reporting currency is in .
Could be an option which allows to choose contacts for syncing with Google by clicking a checkbox in Xero for each contact that shall also be synced with Google.
These are setup as repeating bills in Xero, which makes life easy.
Xero Tax/XPM is fantastic!
Is there any plans to support this in Xero.
Xero is great for business, but current pricing plans don't really suit a SMSF.
ANY App/Accounting software has this feature except Xero.
I would rather see it on my Xero dashboard than look for it in a mobile app.
This makes the app fairly useless to us as most of the time we can't reconcile the transaction on Xero Touch.
I have several companies in Xero.
Please give us back this old feature Xero!
We run lots of Xero training courses using the Demo company and can't show trainees this great feature.
Would Xero consider an Annual Fee Option as opposed to paying a monthly fee for "ledger only' client?
If they are meant to be indicative of Xero experience then it is wrong to count prepaid licences.
Xero is fantastic software.
Xero is 99% there to working as a POS system as it is - with this implemented it would be 100%
Can someone please explain with Xero and WFM being owned by the same group, how there cannot be some real action and implementation of features from both of them to the other.
However on Xero Touch this is not shown properly at all.
How hard would it be for Xero to include my name or my company name in the email text?
Xero is supposed to be beautiful.
There is a horrible data silo problem that pervasive to the entire Xero Ecosystem.
We love working with Xero but cannot understand that a basic missing relationship is for "siblings" where this is so commonly used in our practice.
There are tons of Xero users requesting very slightly different User permissions as feature requests.
A step up in pricing would suit so many of my new Xero clients of $20/month.
It is logical that Xero has to have an exchange rate to work on for any non base currency entry.
Can we eliminate Ezidebit fees by paying Xero subscription in advance for the full year?
Sage had the last resort option of restoring a backup over client data, Xero takes various back ups throughout the day, can we have a role back feature?
Now it would really be great if we could enter those into WorkflowMax as a job cost and link them into Xero by Job.
Xero workpapers: Is xero considering adding specialised workpapers for Superfunds?
If there was an option to insert period dates (not mandatory), then Xero could automatically calculate accruals and prepayments.
Currently Xero shows turnover per customer as a month on month comparison.
I've recently come up with the necessity to test a few of my planned actions in Xero.
Also, on Xero workpapers there is not a total down the bottom which shows a Variance amount.
Could this also be put in place on Xero work papers?
Currently I can only see on Xero that we can only have it as one person on there.
We can do MYOB to Xero Debtors outstanding balances why not Xero  to Xero.
We utilise industry specific software for Debtors and then create a monthly sales invoive in Xero to match.
When importing bills there is no column for the ABN to also be imported (only when importing contacts) so when Xero automatically adds a new contact from the import there is no ABN set up.
It would be awesome to have a Xero feed so you could combine your Xero data with other business & bigdata sources.
It would be very useful if standard users could create groups in My Xero.
HiThis is how to apply a returned customer cheque in Xero.
My boss needs to approve all the credit notes I create, however when he's working remotely, he can't do it on the Xero App.
Xero support is aware of this issue.
Even better if Xero could recognise it was loaded and automatically show as an attachment when reconciliations are done to this contact.
Please Xero can you introduce this feature?
I hope that Xero can get this up and running asap, it doesn't seem to be too difficult given that all the information for the reports would already be within the software?
I am looking detailed reports on sales aspects of Xero.
We have only started using Xero Auto Super in this calendar year.
Can this be changed to eithergo to the inventory page I was on when i saved the item so I can continueorWhen I click the back button XERO goes back to where I was and my settings not the default.
It worked well in Quickbooks, why not in xero?
Is there an option to have all your appointments within Xero?
If this is made available by Xero.
Unfortunately, (to my knowledge) they can't set up the Xero to xero connect with our clients as the staff don't have access to the Xero network key.
I'm sure that Xero developers could code an auto response to Date of input.
Is there a possibility that there could be an intergration of withdrawal / transfer from inventory in Xero to WorkflowMax as we use items from inventory?
We are in the real estate business and have many different entities within xero so simplifying/reducing set up is really what I am asking for.
After a certain amount of time Xero logs me out - which is fine.
The problem though is that this would have to be done manually because Xero doesn't have a feature to allocate freight costs to inventory items.
Any intention by Xero for online purchase orders in the mould of the recent online quotes upgrade?
Find & Recode is a terrific Xero advance.
Is there anyway of adding our company logo to the dashboard in Xero ?
What would really make me come to Xero indefinitely is if you could connect with Banque Populaire des Alpes.
I thought Xero had added a feature that stores the reference details in the database or browser.
The current user levels within Xero assist organisations with the "what" an employee is able to perform, but not the "$" limit of their authority.
(After all MYOB can do this, so why not Xero!
At present Xero will only generate these reports in pounds sterling.
At the moment we have to check this in a different website which is quite time consuming and lengthy but if Xero incorporated this into their system it means clients would feel a lot safer when submitting their EC Sales lists.
We store our VAT receipts in Xero.
It is great that there is now the functionality to prepare quotes in Xero.
I hope there is a built-in complete Xero CRM.
This is a common reporting format requested by banks but is not currently available in Xero.
com/articles/news/netsuite-delivers-eu-vat-solutionAre Xero working on a solution?
Can Xero PLEASE round the amount showing at T11 to whole dollars only?
This is the only feature that has not made me use XERO yet.
Residual values in Xero for fixed assets (now it is always 0).
Sometimes we make a mistake, even though Xero is so user friendly.
Please could Xero fix it for Aged Payables, when converted to a pdf, to show the pence owing, and not to round to the nearest whole number (& possibly Receivables although not so crucial for ARs).
For some reason Xero allows you to create a new contact on the run.
There are some logic, which can be applied to and we can utilise the Pooling in XERO.
Why do Xero think we would want all staff to see our whole company income?
I recently had to search Xero to look for bookkeepers familiar with Xero around a clients location, to give them suggestions, the Map is a great idea but is still a bit limiting.
Currently you can only have a maximum of 5 additional email addresses for each contact in Xero.
Unless I'm missing something Xero completely ignores GST in the sale of assets, leaving it up to us accountants to compensate.
Please Xero, bring back the timer for timesheet entry.
Please could you bring these above features to Xero.
I do not see this option in Xero.
Currently you can only set one email address which Xero uses to send all emails.
Would love for non-office staff to be able to enter their purchase orders via Xero Touch so managers can track what orders have been placed.
Can published reports in Xero be integrated to documents used to support workpapers?
Is any of this being thought about in Xero?
When entering in a second email address, separated by a comma, Xero throws back an error saying it's not a valid email address.
In xero I have two options.
The HTML5 code is there as proven when you bring Xero up on an iPad (in Safari, not the app).
Is this possible in Xero?
They can enter all the details later through the Xero web site when they submit the claim.
It is also essential because no one should now enroll any new clients (or renew existing clients) in Xero payroll.
PLEASE VOTE for Per Employee Xero Pricing (not the RIDICULOUS ALTERNATIVE) to change this quickly and share using  http://bit.
When entering a new contact, can xero show similar contacts at the start so I don't enter all the details a second time?
Simply formalising the blog comments from others to have Import functionality added to PO's and Xero's &quot;if there is sufficient demand&quot;.
I heard that there is a new Xero Touch for Android in the making - is this something that can be considered upon opening the app, some form of search option or button?
What would be fantastic is if Xero implemented the option to connect third party repositories such as SharePoint, Alfresco, Dropbox, Google Drive etc.
The computer that I primarily access Xero on is in a secured location.
When a client has multiple interrelated companies I wonder if the Xero to Xero network can be leveraged further?
Xero is mostly used by quite a number of small to medium sized innovative businesses in Hong Kong.
The code behind this new button would call something similar to the image transfer protocol TWAIN or a similar windows system or Mac local API to grab whatever document is in the scanner at that time, pass it straight to Xero through this protocol/API in 1 click.
Since WorkflowMax is Xero owned, this should be quite simple ?
One of the biggest barriers for us to get our BankLink farmers onto Xero is that the Quantity column is not available in the Cash Coding screen.
Xero should implement ip restrictions so that the software can only be used and accessed in designated areas if selected.
Also, each client of mine has an ID which I can't replicate on Xero.
If I delete something I do not want it to still have an effect on my data in Xero!
It would be really good if Xero could provide some settings regarding the tracking catagories.
I am using Xero happily for my business in Europe.
I don't want them being able to edit any transaction in Xero.
Is this being worked on already perhaps by Xero?
For a number of clients I am the one posting the EOFY journals in Xero not the accountant.
Please Xero, don't force us to reach for the calculator each time we review a P&L summary, the margins should be there for us already!
To us, stock functionality in Xero is only half-complete at this stage.
Are there any plans to offer Xero in Germany (ie.
is there anyway I can change the amount of time it takes before xero 'times-out' & I have to log back in.
Is this likely to be an option in Xero any time soon?
As a practice based in Ireland we have moved a lot of our clients to Xero with hugely positive feedback however there is one area that is causing some frustration.
Are there any plans to implement a withholding tax deduction functionality in the Global version of Xero?
If I am to convert any rural/primary producers to Xero, this feature is very important.
Are you also so frustrated that Xero is not adapted to the Swedish market?
Can Xero be set to a different language (e. g. Dutch, French, German,.
On a couple of the contacts, the name was spelled a little different (a period at the end of Ltd in Xero and not in the CRM).
After all, speed is what Xero is all about.
Is this able to be done with Xero or is it an upcoming (really soon) feature?
I am new to xero and still finding out what it can and can not do.
com, the quicker I can make Xero my exclusive system for my clients all over the freakin' US.
Don't get me wrong I love Xero but come on guys when is it coming?
As Xero is written in .
Or is this already in Xero because i could not find it.
Please could Xero be updated to support the payrolling of expenses, which HMRC introduced in April 2016?
Xero payroll can't calculate this because for a casual employee days or hours per week is set to 0.
For some reason Xero calculates the daily rate using 252 days.
Xero developers: can you please either change it so that it calculates the daily rate by dividing the annual salary by 260 days, or please provide a feature to select how many working days you wish to use in the calculation?
For every other expense in Xero, we can track by 2 categories.
So the lack of this function (which myob can do) has limited some of the clients that we are able to convert to Xero
Stillwater has a lot of small businesses that could really benefit from using Xero, but then they would have to go a different route for payroll.
which may hinder them in choosing Xero as their accounting option.
This is difficult to accept for a product as mature as xero in my opinion.
Please can Xero consider incorporating a "Copy Employee" function that can be used for staff who have had their employment ended, so that details do not have to be re-entered if they restart employment or change their contract type?
Can XERO place a red cross to the employee with the error?
How about allowing some of the important features of Xero Payroll to show on the standard Xero Dashboard?
Unless I am missing the point, this is another feature that I have lost since moving from Reckon to Xero.
For Example:Start Time          Finish Time         Break          Details of work performed               Total hours worked         9am                    5pm              30mins        Worked on new Xero feature                     7.
What I hadn't noticed was that Xero was not making an allowance for the 0.
Please can Xero assist where you would you be able to receive notifications for employees on their anniversary dates?
If this cant be automated, is it possible for Advisors to have a pathway whereby Xero can be contacted and a temporary subscription increase be approved (24-48 hours), at no cost to the client (as they had already paid for the relevant subscription), so that corrections to payruns can be made.
I'm looking at moving our payroll in-house, preferably using Xero.
Is this something xero can work with or are there any workarounds?
Hope Xero and everyone else can contribute ideas to make it happen!
Can XERO look at establishing a calendar reminder in Employee's contacts on the note section.
would be great if xero could have this feature with their payroll as well.
Dear Xero Team, I have noticed that if a company has one employee on the payroll and eventually leaves the company and after issuing a P45, a Nil EPS submission can not be submitted to HMRC.
It is only possible if on Xero, at least one employee is still in the records.
Therefore Xero knows how many hours the employees work each day, the traking category and how much they are paid for each of these hours.
The addition of this feature would allow for basic job costing built right into Xero.
I want to recommend Xero to my clients but the current subscription levels are not competitive plus this is a new addition with lots of teething problems so it seems wrong that Xero is charging more than software providers that have been around for years!
Once signed in to Xero there is full access to Payroll.
After completing two payruns in Xero I'm analysing our budget variance.
The ATO is bringing in Super Stream, is Xero going to provide an update to be able to use this feature.
Can Xero please advise when the "ETP" process will be incorporated into the software and not be a manual process?
Client who uses many casuals have huge turnover of staff so employee list in Xero is very long.
It would be good if a number of different Xero users could prepare payroll but be able to send out payslips from a generic email address, for example payroll@company.
It would be very helpfull if this feature could be made available in Xero.
When a supplier requires a deposit up front with the balance to be paid on delivery, how can duplicate fixed assets in Xero be avoided?
Is this possible in Xero?
How do I go about posting this in Xero?
Xero's Budget Manager is great for month-to-month budgets, which is what most businesses would find useful.
I have seen xero has an import feature.
(as it is if we set it under equity, but for a limited company with new financials it is set under current liabilities)Maybe it is something that Xero NZ could look into it to fix?
HiCould you please consider a new feature that provides a monthly/quarterly email to people who have subscribed to a list which sends out details of Xero feature updates and improvements during the period.
We have a few dozen teams who are all working on different parts of Xero.
, but is still incredibly relevant in giving you an insight of how we make things happen at Xero!
All the other xero running PC's in my firm can do without having to do any association of programs.
Is this a Xero setting or Firefox?
I assume all that is necessary is a confirmed email address rather than details of a Xero Organisation etc?
Do I enter this into Xero as revenue?
When a customer record is created, Xero allows adding a few contact names.
It has been entered in Xero in "Other Revenue" but that means it is showing up on our Profit & Loss which I don't want as it is not really Sales.
Can any one please explain me how will I be able to do that on Xero.
I am guessing that this is a limitation of either the trial, or it is a limitation of xero.
But Xero will not let me reconcile them.
However there is no option to reconcile multiple statement lines to individual Xero entries.
Got the usual '24 hours or quicker' auto-reply (with an unwanted & unwarranted smartass addition of how to send Support Requests from within Xero).
Can this be done on Xero?
It is only the dot & number that throws Xero into a tizz!
Is this something I can do in Xero?
I have contacted , and they suggested some marketplace apps, couldn't officially recommend any, but did 'mention'  which is owned by Xero.
So could you please assign some Xero Support in NZ which can more efficient for provide service to us?
Is there a limit on the number of contact groups you can create in Xero?
As a result I have one bill in Xero but two payments.
How do I change the functional currency in Xero?
Is there an option of entering a gst inclusive amount and Xero working out the gst on that?
Can you send checks in a similar fashion when using Xero?
co. nz in conjunction with Xero.
In general, when formulas in rows and columns cross each other, will Xero pick up the row formula, or the column formula?
i am unable to login to xero again on any browserthe status doesnt have any issues reportedwhat is happening.
In our sales system each day one transaction totaling both EFTPOS machines is posted to Xero.
How do I enter into Xero the new limit so that they match?
Is Xero payroll currently down?
I moved to Xero as I thought I could avoid manual entry as I was already doing manual statement changes from our current system.
Any chance to have some general setting for EU VAT system in standard Xero?
Is this something Xero is working on?
What is the best course of Xero-action to take to record this transaction correctly?
however considering i my company was set up in April and my first VAT filing period is 31/August (i. e my first VAT period is April/2016 to August/2016)Now it is getting very trickier to assign a custom VAT period in Xero.
When this was discovered the un-finalised GST return in Xero was different to what had been filed with the IRD.
Anyone else having issue login to Xero?
can we in anyway re set Xero either in the system somewhere so we can start afresh from the beginning of this financial year?
If this can't be done, how do I delete Xero so I resume with MYOB accountsThanks
From last month, I can't use my email address to login in Xero, once I login, it shows a demo company.
How do I capture this in XERO?
Do I essentially record the deposit return as a partial refund of the bill, and if so, how do I do this in Xero?
Any advice where I should code it to Xero?
Anyone using Xero in Finland?
How can I set both companies up in XERO under one business without being charged for both?
I have a client who is going to move from Xero to Sage.
This is usually fine to Reconcile in Xero until I get a Refund thrown in then I'm a bit lost?
Can there be a new option to allow you to re-file a return that has not gone to Xero.
I am in the middle of converting to tracked inventory in Xero.
Has anyone else been having issues with Xero being unresponsive and slow.
How can I do this in Xero?
How on earth do I enter that into Xero?
Been all over both sites - can anyone tell me how to import timesheets from TSheets into Xero?
in Xero don't match my balances in Chase.
(all done before I set them up on Xero) They asked me to offset this to the next expense claim.
hasn't appeared in Xero.
Obviously in Xero this results in an inflated receipt of funds.
This was showing as in progress when I joined Xero, but still not finished?
jpg(Please go the link to see the screen shot of the remittance advice template)Could anyone please advise me that can i do it in XERO same as that where my suppliers can see the full details?
If i can't do it in XERO, than is there any other tools that can do?
(In Xero only, not for external use or reporting!
I don't expect Xero "Support" to respond any time soon, as we are one of those hugely dissatisfied Xero customers that Xero ignores.
I have started using Xero for my business starting on 1st June as it's our new financial year.
This is something that I could do easily in Sage by ticking/unticking the exclude later payments checkbox but I cannot see how to do this in Xero.
Is this a Xero problem.
Any information Xero has I think must be buried deep for me to not have found it yet.
This means my balance in Xero is wildly different to my balance on online banking!
Can you do this in Xero?
How do i reconcile this through Xero!
Are there any ANZ representatives on here, or Xero experts with ANZ, who can explain why this is such a hot mess right now?
I am new to Xero so apologies if this is an obvious fix.
Is anyone using Xero in Taiwan?
Do any banks provide direct feeds into Xero?
Cause any impact on how Xero responds from a response viewpoint
How am I able to match the two payments to the single xero transaction?
Is this possible with Xero?
Do you run a tight sync where every last detail is imported to Xero, or is there something to be said for keeping all of that data out of the system.
This is my first time on Xero after coming from QuickBooks.
Hey Xero and the community,I ran into a problem i can't undo.
Very frustrated since I thought Xero was for small businesses, yet, this defaulting all "back-end" journals as accrual, obviously is designed for larger companies (this is how its done when you make an inventory adjustment in tracked inventory).
New Xero user so apologies if this is a simple question.
How in Xero can I set this invoicing system up?
Can I modify the list available on the mobile app from within desktop xero?
Question is related to the first part of this post, which is how do I reconcile the costs associated with property purchase in Xero ?
I'm using an edited word doc to map fields based on the Xero templates - I can't see anything in the original that would pick up the Overpayment / Credit note?
Is anyone else having this issue and how would this be handled correctly for Xero?
If there is someone who use Xero previously in their company from Turkey ,  can we contact with them, we will be I would be appreciate much more.
)is it feasible to prepare two sets of financial statements  in XERO?
I am new in xero.
How can I get separate usernames and password to "stick" in Xero so I can have both feeds working?
Our main concern is if Xero is capable of producing the right reports for Spanish tax authorities?
It seems that this is something to do with reconciling in statement lines into Xero, as when a transaction is made, then unreconciled, then re-reconciled.
Is deliverability of Xero email generally pretty reliable?
In this instance I would not create a bill in Xero for my telephone services.
So if there are no Xero bills from my telephone vendor, how do I see all of my purchases that I have made to them?
What is the purpose of having the separate community topics Accounting, Small Business, and Using Xero?
Can anyone think of a reason why I wouldn't do the same in Xero?
I've got about 100 receipt in Xero that don't have the description, is there a watch to batch edit these?
Is there somewhere that the default values for &#171;InvoiceTitle&#187; can be modified within Xero settings?
00 and moved it into my petty cash (not recorded or transferred this in Xero)No this is where my problem is.
The question is, how can I upload all of this data into Xero without losing any of it.
I started using Xero on November 1st.
For some reason Xero is now in very small font - in all pages.
Currently I have my Xero set up so that COGS is based on the calculations I've done and is a lump of all my costs put together in one COGS bucket.
In mapping to Xero's import engine, there is only one tag for transaction value.
i. e they have not been listed in Xero by us before.
I am in the process of converting my payroll from Wave to Xero.
What nominal code is best used in expenses for Xero subscriptions?
We have an introductory course in Xero coming up soon at Glenfield College on Saturday 21st November.
So my question is - why is Xero better?
I am pretty new to xero and I can see that this question has been answered before but with no definite results that I can see.
How should I do with this difference in Xero?
HiI'm looking to import a historical file (CSV) of expense claims from another system (fuel costs/hotel accommodation etc) which I have always entered in Xero under expensesI dont think you can bulk import expense receipts in Xero, so I am wondering if I can import them through the bills/purchases import functionality instead, and what difference this makes if any?
Having read in the news today that the Safe Harbour agreement has been ruled invalid, I wondered what Xero's response to this is going to be?
Currently, I got 4 clients who want to move to Xero but I can not offer them any discount ?
Xero is a beautiful accounting software.
Is anyone else having trouble opening attachment on Xero.
How is this done in Xero?
I have been using Paypal "integration" on Xero for a while, now.
Please could someone tell me how I can change the integration setting such that this works properly, as per the Xero video?
Is there any functionality to do this within Xero?
82 in Xero but this still leaves me 0.
How do I proceed in Xero?
Ultimately this doesn't matter too much to us as we intend to do all ordering in another application which will transfer into Xero.
Is anyone aware of a method that can be used to import data from Quickbooks Online to Xero?
My problem is that when I upload a new trial balance there still seems to be data in Xero from the previous client.
My question is, how do I show this in Xero?
for some reason my reports have started printing in a much larger font than anything else I print from Xero.
My workflow is: Shopify --> StitchLabs --> Xero.
I was wondering if any users in the community were using Xero for accounting for defined benefit or contribution pension scheme records in the UK and any issues faced, as it seems to offer a good solution?
Can anyone offer to do Xero book keeping?
How can I associate the receipt/expense claim line item with the Bill in Xero so that the Bill shows as paid on the date the Employee paid it?
How do I input this into Xero?
HiThis is how to apply a returned customer cheque in Xero.
When I run it for end of June I get the followingBalance in Xero = XXStatement Balance = XXImported Statement Balance = YYBalance out by = 2155.
How can I rectify this in Xero?
Has anyone had any experience in posting this into Xero?
My client has been requesting sales orders in XERO since early 2012, however this function is not on the drawing board which is disappointing.
Can I do that in Xero?
96, there is no record in Xero of our outgoings that were part of the sale.
For some stupid reason you cannot login from the xero.
If not, which payroll system is available for Xero integration.
Is this a limitation of Xero's import function with regards to credit-notes?
Anyone invested in meeting up in New York for an informal Xero session?
Looking to migrate over to Xero, but there is one feature that is absolutely mandatory for us.
Please tell me Xero has this functionality built in.
eg A transaction in my paypal is showing as 27/04/15 but when i look in xero that same transaction is dated 26/04/15 which is throwing things out for us, the transaction actually took place at 17:45 AEST 27/04/15 but xero shows the transaction occurring as at 26/04/15.
Can this be done in Xero?
it shouldn't matter how I create the Xero entry it is still a purchase.
However, Xero seems set on sorting everything alphabetically, i. e. Benefits, then Payroll Taxes, then Salaries.
In XERO, however, I have getting very frustrated in finding a similar function.
I think I must be missing something here as it is difficult to imagine XERO is missing such an essential and basic feature.
XERO HAS SOME INTEREST FOR THE ITALY MARKET SME AND ADVISOR?
How do we record our daily takings in Xero?
Is anyone else finding xero extremely hard to use on an Ipad?
csv file never appear in Xero. )
Good evening,Is it possible to set up a company on Xero with three tracking categories, each with different currencies (AUS$, HK$, GBP).
I'm not sure how advanced the tracking facility is, or where I should set up three separate companies on Xero.
I am Trying to use the Fixed asset module in xero starting from current financial year, Is there any method where I can enter the accumulated depreciation as at the last financial year, so that I can automate the depreciationThanks
Our Xero customers are mirrored in Salesforce and we keep them synced with an app we built.
Could someone please tell us how we can remove the contact number from a Xero contact.
(Obviously 'transfer' will not work as this acc is not added into xero).
I was wondering whether it's possible to approve these on Xero Touch.
I also notice there is no bills feature in Xero Touch?
I have both of them in Xero.
I am in the process of switching from sage to Xero and all in all its going smoothly.
I can reconcile normal business expenses in Xero.
So pulling our baking into Xero is not going to be an option it would appear.
I'm setting up Xero for the first time, and so far I have most of the historical data in place .
Xero might consider the addition of a warning to avoid what happened in this event.
I setup a new customer in Xero.
I could save them in Harvest which I already use or maybe sign up for another service but I'd prefer having them in Xero.
HiI am interested in using Xero.
Seriously, Xero seems great so far but calling this clunky is an understatement.
Is this sort of budget possible in Xero?
Can anyone suggest how to get around this, or can Xero by updated to allow different shape logos.
Is there a method for transfering my data from clearbooks to Xero?
Are you are struggling to keep up with all the releases and updates of cloud software in the Xero ecosystem?
Can someone from Xero shed any light on the contents of the next release?
Feeling a bit miffed :-(C'mon Xero - this is easy stuff.
Can I link the two companies on Xero and transfer data between them?
Is Xero able to set up a superfund for her through my chosen default superannuation institution?
In my old MYOB program I had the ability to date each day of service eg;Date    Description       AmountAm i able to do this in xero or do I have to include the date in in the description field?
Assume Xero must be truncating them?
I would be very interested to hear of any Xero business users with have applied and used Xero global edition in Norway, and whether there are any specific issues or things to take bear in mind.
I don't understand why this didn't happen in Xero.
Given this, it makes sense if they can simply log some detail about each line item in Xero.
How should bills with partially exempt GST components be handled in Xero?
09 as calculated in Xero.
Basically what is happening is my paypal feed in xero seems to record the date incorrect if i have a sale in the early hours of the morning.
I have been informed that one of the concerns with Xero is that if your laptop is lost/stolen it is possible for someone to see your Xero financials from your cached information.
I started using Xero in October.
How do I stop Xero from sometimes displaying registered office instead of physical address?
As far as I can tell, I can't set this up in Xero to be recorded without manual intervention.
HiI am new to Xero and I am wondering how I should deal with per diems.
Is this simple function available with xero?
Now my problem is how do I manage this situation within Xero?
I am in the process of setting a business on xero.
3- How many users are allowed into the Xero file at one time?
I am new to Xero, having come from MYOB, and was wondering if i am missing something?
Please could I request the ability to import monthly comparatives for the first year of using xero, currently you can only enter the whole year
What specific issues have US Xero users come across in regards to using Xero in the US?
What issues do you hope to see resolved so more users are comfortable adopting Xero in their US Business?
Xero manages check numbering, voiding, deleting, styling and provides a full audit history of any changes.
Xero is now centered in your browser – this was a really popular request!
You can have multiple windows in Xero too though.
xero on a small screen.
We have our staff under two different EBA's and each attracts "Employer" expenses but I can't see anywhere where this can be added in Xero and then applied to specific employees only.
What costs are injured for using the Xero Super Clearing House?
Any ideas of how I can handle this in Xero?
How do I record in Xero to make it equate the correct tax and super?
How can I get Xero to accrue leave on other ordinary time earnings rates?
How do i get xero to calculate the superannuation amount?
each commission amount paid needs to be assigned to an existing tracking code "job number", how can this be done in Xero?
so how Xero calculate the hour of the leave?
How do I process this in XERO?
org/2001/XMLSchema-instance">  <ErrorNumber>500</ErrorNumber>  <Type>UnknownErrorException</Type>  <Message>An error occurred in Xero.
How can you give somebody permission to authorise the auto super payments with the code sent by xero
Some of the guys in company are long-term contractors, so they are not in “Employees” list in Xero, in this case, how do I handle super for them in the system?
Any clues to what I have done  I am new to Xero of course!
Hello fellow Xero users,This little issue is playing havoc with my head.
but I now can't find a record of this anywhere in Xero.
How do I reconcile the employee portion against the XERO payrun?
I have asked Xero Support to look at this and they have indicated that this is not yet possible.
BUT Xero is still adding this HECS tax onto their payslip.
I have herd that Xero now can do this for us.
I started work in new company recently which works on Xero.
How do I process this in Xero
Can you transfer the payroll data from one Xero file to another.
Has anyone had experience entering historical payroll into Xero and how did you do it?
This employee is not new and xero has previously calculated this.
Hello peeps,I have setup Xero for individual employees as their own earnings rate and titled them as their name.
How is this done in Xero?
Has anyone been able to achieve this in Xero?
We have tested Xero’s payroll in July 2015 but stopped using it since them.
I understand the numbers that I have been given and how to calculate it, my issue is how do I manage it in Xero and on my payslips.
Under Tax declaration in Xero's Payroll, there is a list of check lists.
Has anyone else experienced that Xero calculates an incorrect hourly rate?
i don't see anywhere to specify the type of employment for the staff in xero.
I am in the process of moving a client to Xero and am now at the Payroll section.
Is there something I might not have done to have Xero not take a public holiday from someone?
10 is calculating PAYG tax in Xero at $696.
The timesheet for an employee that is generated by Xero is incorrect.
In Xero I have all the employees set up as Casual with no annual or sick leave entitlements.
I am new to Xero (and accounting) and can't find the answer to this question.
If my employee has an hourly rate which includes superannuation, how can I set this up in Xero?
I'm far from an expert in Xero so if there is a solution a simple run down of how to implement it would be great.
Is anyone else having issues with getting in contact with anyone from Xero?
A new Xero user - ran first payroll on 1.
In fact, it is almost a deal breaker as far as Xero is concerned.
(my manual calculation based on tax thresholds is less than what is Xero is calculating).
What is interesting, even one of Xero's video's spoke about adding a uniform allowance but didn't show it on the video itself.
Is there something similar to smartpayrol settings in xero?
(since 1 July until about March) so I could quickly allocate amounts in Xero.
I have checked payslips that have previously been emailed and they are all correct, but when I check them in Xero they are now incorrect.
How can I do this in Xero?
In the first month of a new business, before Xero was properly set up, the Director paid himself twice via EFT (he paid himself net of PAYE and super) - this was in Feb.
From what I understand of the various user roles in Xero, we can only give employees the access to fill out their own timesheets OR full payroll access.
I have been going backwards and forwards with Xero support - however they are not able to fix it as yet.
Is someone using payroll in xero for over 100 employees?
Is Xero suitable for over 100 employees?
After completing two payruns in Xero I'm analysing our budget variance.
Can anyone advise me how to do this in Xero with correct ramifications on tax, super and accrued AL hours?
Our company is changing from MYOB to Xero.
I am setting up Xero for a client, and the business has loaned a sum of money to an employee in the past.
We have 2 companies with Xero & one was set up by them.
This issue has occurred twice in different Xero files.
When the Xero ledger allows the usage of 2 Tracking Categories for each debit or credit, it is strange that the Payroll GL postings are limited to only one, which is the one potentially assigned to each employee as a member of an Employee Group, assuming that at least one of the Tracking Categories is being used for Employee Grouping purposes.
I cannot seem to work out how to treat this in xero as the super isn't taken off the balance to be paid to the staff.
Should xero automatically do this?
do you have a clock on & off payroll program that communicates with xero payroll ?
So no matter what the mandatory SGC percentage is, we'll always have Xero up to date to use the right percentage.
How do I enter/accrue CoInvest in Xero so it shows on the payslip and I can draw reports out of the system for it?
How is it possible to get priority support for issues with Xero?
Has anyone seen or come up with a method of migrating payroll data from quickbooks into XERO / Paycycle?
I'm hoping that I can use Xero to track timesheet for both employees and contractors.
My question is if anyone has any suggestions as to how I can tidy it up in xero.
How is this done in Xero?
Found Xero and absolutely love the interface and functionality however can't figure out how to make the earnings work on the payroll.
It has already been paid in Xero.
<sarcastic>Xero's US Payroll is such a joy to work with!
When I am printing a check in Xero Payroll, the Employer tax is lumped with Employes tax  (there is no space between these sections.
I believe I have set everything up correctly in Xero.
Is Zen Payroll a replacement for Xero Payroll functionality?
We are now manually calculating and filing our quarterly taxes, but we can't record them in Xero.
Again, Xero says they are working on it.
Why can't Xero recognize the urgency in these tax matters.
Three of them are based in CA and on Xero Payroll.
Xero asks for all my data during January-March, but never asks about what I've done in this quarter so far.
Payroll in Xero is .
While we can’t offer detailed timeframes about the expansion schedule we're committed to US Payroll in Xero.
Moving to tax to input manually, it insists I enter a location, but xero is too broken to figure this out.
Recheck all payslips to check XERO hasn't ignored some change or done something completely unpredictable at any point.
I can't find a work around with this in Xero.
I'm a great fan of Xero accounting software but feel their payroll side it really letting them down.
At this point I also get an e-mail saying that Xero couldn't connect to the People's Pension, despite the fact Xero is telling me that it is.
What could be the reason Xero is not allocating any of the employees 8.
In my old software I had to send a reason for the extra submission but I am not aware of how re-submitting should be carried out via Xero.
I have set up basic information in Xero Payroll in preparation for him taking someone on this month.
Is anyone else having an issue with Xero Support lack of a communication?
So the question is, to Xero Support and Community;Say we set a 1% employee's contribution, is this what Xero payroll deducts.
How do I enter the  salary in Xero.
)Now expecting a letter/fine from HMRC  - is anyone from Xero listening to these forums, some assistance would be much appreciated?
Not in Xero.
Any idea how to do SMP in xero payroll?
Has anyone tried to set up auto-enrollment in xero from "smart pension" pension provider?
Employee who is working from the beginning  of the year:we set 168 hours accrued annuallyEmployee has 160 hours of leave entered (and approved) in Xero for 2016 (plus 8 hours for 2017)Balance shown in Xero: -168 hours ?
employee who has started on 3-Junwe set 168 hours accrued annuallyEmployee has 60 hours of leave entered (and approved) in Xero for 2016 (plus 60 hours for 2017)Balance shown is Xero: -140 ?
The figure they are showing for month 3 is significantly more than what we have submitted from Xero.
Xero, any suggestions?
In April / May / June payruns, Xero correctly calculated the pension contribution (of 6%) on the qualifying salary.
This feels so basic but I can't for love or money find it in Xero or in support forums/pages.
My question is, how do I go about it on Xero?
But Xero is still not picking him up as eligible for autoenrolment.
Can someone please confirm the steps to mark someone taking unpaid leave (e. g. sick day) and have Xero automatically deduct the appropriate amount from the paycheck?
Also, could someone at Xero confirm I have completed my 201/16 Payroll Year End correctly as there doesn't seem to be anything that tells me I have done this!
Is it easier on Xero or HMRC's Basic PAYE tools package?
We starting using Xero in May 2015 so our first payroll was done outside of Xero.
Has Xero got any advice at all about completing Payroll Year End at all?
Is there a time sheet facility on xero?
Our employees are all part time and their entitlement is accrued based on the hours they work - is this possible to do in Xero for people on 0 hour contracts who work irregular hours?
Is it a Xero problem or HMRC issue?
Has anyone else had enough of Xero payroll?
All of our payrolls not already on My PAYE will now be moved from Xero.
XERO can allow you to submit and final FPS however it cant cease the scheme - after a day from hell back and forth on phone to HMRC and trying to communicate with XERO - the end result I have to set every employee up in the HMRC RTI software and transfer over all of the data for every employee so that I can cease the scheme.
Hey Xero, any thoughts on this?
Read for yourselvesWe recently became aware of an issue where Xero was miscalculating an employee's Employment Allowance based on their Tax Code.
I'm nervous about payroll in Xero because of the problems it's had and with my very limited experience I'm unsure how this is going to go!
Xero wont provide an HMRC response when you click the link so I can't see the reason for the submission failing.
I'm in the process of testing out Xero PAYE (currently using mypaye.
I am a payroll manager with lots of experience, using several different types of payroll software,  but have given up on Xero today.
Can you confirm how Xero calculates Annual Leave and if it uses the days paid field to do that?
Can you advise on how to put those figure into Xero?
The main calculation they give is 20% of gross wages (which is what Xero uses) or a $$ figure being 10% of the debt, with the lessor of these the amount to deduct each week, plus a third variable for protected earnings.
Q1) How do I show stat holidays in the timesheet/payroll section of Xero?
The first issue that we are aware of is that what displays for each employee on their payslip for "Annual Leave (Hours including leave available to take in advance)" is effectively running behind what I see as the Leave Balance in Xero.
What code do I put the wages to in Xero.
Shouldn't Xero do this automatically?
Am I doing something wrong or is Xero payroll not quite there yet?
How would we go about this in Xero payroll?
Question is this an option to import staff time sheets from Workflowmax into NZ Xero payroll?
Is there anywhere on Xero that I can find the current rates (by employee) at which annual leave is paid?
I have swapped the scheduled around now but Xero still says that there is annual leave available and no sick leave.
How do I change this in Xero Payroll?
I use clunky Flexitime payroll but at this point it is far better than Xero Payroll.
After you’ve created Xero enabled documents, you can locate them in your My Documents list.
With the relevant financial data in the Xero cloud, Fuelled can drastically simplify the process of funding your cash flow.
If you are a user of Xero and The Good Till, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
In a matter of days you are fully functional on Xero with transaction history.
Xero customers can apply online in less than 2 minutes.
Automatically create fully dissected Activity Statement bills in Xero, sharpen your cash flow, groom your reporting – your accountant will love you!
Connect Xero with 100+ web applications in minutes.
And with OzForex's integration to Xero, small businesses can enjoy a fast, secure money transfer service that's even simpler to use.
Download Xero data & create your custom reports directly in Excel.
If you are a user of Xero and The Service Manager, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Automated backup for Xero, so you can focus on more important things.
com is a low cost, easy to use, scheduled backup service for your Xero Organisations.
Reliable & automated on-going Xero data imports from any other system, tailored specifically to your data.
Syncs with Xero so your forecast is up to date in seconds.
If you are a user of Xero and BigCommerce by Carry The One, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Simple data backup - protect your business info with weekly or monthly backups of your Xero data sent directly to your inbox.
Document management designed specifically with Xero in mind.
ProWorkflow is an online project management, time tracking tool designed to work perfectly with Xero.
Save hours in administration with our Magento-Xero integration options.
If you are a user of Xero and Carry The One, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Carry The One for Salesforce, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Wish you could make Google Docs and Xero talk to each other?
If you are a user of Xero and Loaded Commerce by Carry The One, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Magento by Carry The One, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Opencart by Carry The One, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and OSCommerce by Carry The One, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
If you are a user of Xero and Shopify by Carry The One, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Automatically updates everything in Xero - check out .
If you are a user of Xero and The Payroll Site, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Connect Xero to hundreds of the best in breed SaaS applications on the web - drag and drop to create integrations between your favourite applications, check out .
If you are a user of Xero and Zencart by Carry The One, tell us how you are getting on and your experience so far.
Most of our clients are not Xero users so xero to xero is no use.
Is there an app in the Marketplace that allows Microsoft Dynamics 365 to talk to Xero?
Is it because there is only a small subset of the entire US based Xero users that wants this "cash basis accounting" reports?
(I read there is only 400K Xero users in the US compared to 1.
When I click "match" I am presented with EVERY so-far-unreconciled Spend-Money transaction on Xero, most of which are from Expensify.
search through ALL the unmatched Expensify records in Xero looking for an amount which is similar (how similar? )
Can anyone recommend a great software that integrates with Xero, for job and cost tracking.
Is there a program that will do delivery dockets and inventory trace-ability, manifest and all link back to XERO.
Anyone out there using Xero as their accounting system for a Water Supply Company?
Xero is great.
We are changing over to Xero and was wondering if this was compatible and if anyone else uses Midsoft and imports directly into Xero.
Hello Xero CommunityWe are planning a multi-organisation Project- I am querying whether there is out there, an app or similar, which can handle the Purchasing Requisition process, from various locations, where there is central approval control and complete transparency with the Purchasing Process, AND ideally can "talk" to Xero.
We have an issue where reports, when exported to Xero from Expensify, do not carry across client information.
I am in charge of the payroll and am having trouble exporting time sheets from Deputy to XERO.
When a Purchase Order is made in TG, it's pushed forward to Xero as a bill.
I'm testing out Xero as a possible user and partner for them.
If a Xero Staff member or expert is able to call me to discuss it would be much appreciated!
Is there a Xero connected app that allows the clients to approve time-sheets online?
One is now working fineShopify said it may be possible for xero to set this up as a custom feature?
If the expense is a bill that needs to be paid (and recorded in Xero) in the meantime, how should that be entered?
Any other best practices for entering client-billable bills and receipts in Xero/Clio?
Is there any app that will export this into Xero?
I was wondering if there are any Xero UK users who have successfully integrated Big Commerce with Xero?
I have a new client on Xero who runs a wedding sytling/event hire business.
Currently they don’t have a booking system attached to Xero so everything is in the owners head when she is booking weddings in….
Questions:1) Can MS Access send and receive information to and from Xero?
Has anyone else had issues with connecting iZettle to Xero?
How can I find my published transaction in Xero?
Can anybody recommend a really good, comprehensive and easy-to-use Xero compatible app for Cash Flow Forecasting and Management?
Needs to be integrated with Xero that can be updated daily.
(We do use Xero repeating bills, which helps a great deal.
Is Xero a good program as central data file for products?
It forces me to re-enter the same parts in Xero and removes the convience of auto-generating orders.
Is there any online apps that can track his mileage movement through his Ipad/Iphone etc that you could recommend for him to use or if there is any apps that data can extracted straight into xero from?
So can Xero advise me how to fix this so this integration works and saves times rather than doubles my time doing a VAT return?
I could do it with spotlight, but it is far too expensive for a small business, costing three times as much as Xero!
How can this be achieved best in Xero?
This info is also imported from Cliniko to Xero.
Stitch is currently posting every single Amazon transaction to Xero (as draft).
I can't think of a good reason to have all this piecemeal sales data in Xero.
Currently any integration between Xero and Infusionsoft is through Zapier.
Changing of details in the system will automatically or systematically update the correspond records in Xero and vice versa.
I have a client with a Hair Product Wholesale business who is switching to XERO.
How best managing such events in Xero?
Is there a tool that can consolidate Xero companies and the tracking categories that go with each company.
Once entered against a job, how do we get these costs into Xero?
This carries a risk of what is being reported in WFM not matching Xero.
Is there any benefit to using both with Xero?
We are considering using one of these inventory packages, is there anyone who has experience using both systems who can comment on which one integrates better with Xero?
Specifically, I am interested in creating a API conversation between xero.
Chargify: similar, even more expensive in our case, in-house Xero integration3.
So what I can see Xero will never agree to DEAR?
How are you utilizing to the reporting to integrate with Xero?
I want to track costs on each Jewellery repair we do and link back to xero.
Is this a Xero or Stripe issue?
However, Xero is unable to print cheques using a NUMERIC format (MM/DD/YYYY - IE; 09/16/2015).
Is there an ODBC link available to connect Excel to the Xero gl balances data tables?
This leaves us looking for a solution to the recording of sales in Xero.
Has anyone successfully integrated Retail Express with Xero?
Can anyone recommend a good point of sale system for a Bar/Restaurant that integrates with Xero?
How do I do this in Xero?
Print off a packing slip from Xero with customer address included that can be fixed to parcel when sent?
Can I update the order information from In Xero or do I have to still do this in the website backend (parcel sent, order complete emails etc)There may be other things I can do and that you guys may suggest.
My main questions:- How often do you export from Expensify to Xero?
- How do you reconcile expenses in Xero that have been imported from Expensify?
My question is, do I enter in inventory into Square and then expect it to import automatically to Xero?
Or do I enter it into Xero and have it sync with Square?
Any external solutions for recognizing revenue that integrate easily with Xero?
We have been using Xero and expensify for the last 5 years and have mostly been pleased with how the two systems support our expense reimbursement process.
Hello, I'm currently in the process of implementing Xero as our accounting software.
com/business/discussion/8752472#answer9354704 18May2015:Xero 'take-on' complete.
Using Xero for accounting, and one big draw is the fact that there is an interface/connection to iZettle.
Interested to hear from any law firms using Xero integration with other systems.
I can see how the use of Smart Lists within Xero will be useful to extract the client data, it is what we do next that poses the questions.
Anyone else experiencing POs not being transmitted to Xero from Workflow Max?
com/zapbook/stripe/xero/Has anyone had experiences with this that they can share?
I am wandering if it is possible to integrate Xero directly with Linnworks platform?
Did anyone have success connecting Xero with Linnworks?
Xero doesn't process payroll in Colorado so we're using Zen.
Is this a Xero issue?
Can anyone shed any light on the Xero - Console ability to link?
When they come through to Xero, they do not show as being sent.
How will this be updated in Xero.
Is anyone aware of a LIMS that either integrates with Xero or may have the potential to integrate with Xero?
I have not run across a similar feature in Xero.
Xero support have basically thrown it back onto Ozbiz to solve, but before I discuss this with them, I was wondering if any other bookkeepers has experience etc;
I do have totals in Xero against particular stock items.
How did you ensure stock items sold via Vend were updated in Xero?
How did you align the totals in Vend to the totals in Xero?
phpCan anyone provide any insights into their experience with Hotelogix/Xero integration?
It is now showing in xero in my bills for approval.
This is our second month to sync client bills created in CLIO with XERO.
Employees don't have access to Xero so right now this is a very manual process.
Their production is largely determined by their sales orders which are entered into Xero as a draft Sale.
After completely messing up my first go around at payroll in Xero, I am starting fresh.
Has anyone out there integrated IMIS with Xero?
We are having an issue with how the sales tax codes are coming into Xero.
Not sure if I am doing something wrong or if it is a Xero or a a RB issue?
This is currently stopping us moving to Xero.
Anyone selling on Amazon and using Xero who can give suggestions?
Any ideas where I get these two bits of info from Xero?
com Please note that we're in the process of copying the Xero tool over to production, so the links still point to our test server.
any thoughts or experiences in getting a shopping cart setup with Xero would be extremely helpful!
Preference is of course to integrate with XERO.
And consider this for the roll out of purchase orders in Xero when finally released in the year 2040.
Most of them might be using Xero as their accounting system.
Would appreciate if one or more Xero customers who do EDI messaging respond to this post and we could take it forward.
I think we have a choice of going via Xero or WFM direct (but I get the impression that Xero is the most common integration with RB).
Has anyone come across clients using Expensify with Xero?
Wondering if anyone has any ideas or knows of software for travel agents that integrates with Xero?
Has anyone used Klixmedia's SugarCRM connector to Xero?
I noticed WorkflowMax is Xero-owned.
I see so many great addons to Xero but so very very few of them I can afford.
We have been using Capsule CRM integrated with Xero for a few weeks now without any problems.
can xero get these links to csv files?
is anyone aware whether xero integrates with Job Bag?
Any suggestions regarding management software for creatives that integrate with xero?
Has anyone worked with Xero and Chase PaymenTech?
Has anyone managed to write an export routine from CommitCRM to Xero?
We are Quickbooks as there is an import from Comitt but the client really wants to use Xero.
I can only assume that this has been done because it's embarrassing for xero to acknowledge that it has consistently ignored that request for over 5 years now.
Please don't turn the dates off anymore Xero.
(Unless it's keyed on not having logged into Xero Personal for ages, but that's a different problem)
Not sure why XERO would do this when there are so many URGENT requests for changes that they don't have time to spend on.
This is not a one-off, but my most recent instance is where I asked a question, to which Xero eventually responded that they needed access and I have to ask a colleague to grant them access to our system.
Has anyone ever used Smart Pensions in conjunction with Xero?
I hate this feature in Xero as I cannot easily figure out what changed.
(CX0004857743)This is not the first time we have had to wait days for a reply, we find it extremely frustrating that there are no contact numbers for Xero.
Xero is a complete zero.
HiI have not received my usual Xero bill for April (due 2nd) Where can I get a copy of the same please?
I even searched for "how do I contact xero support" and still nothing!
Xero's terminology of financial years is also confusing.
It's a good job Xero saves time in other areas because it deals with this really badly!
this is again a failure in Xero which is basic accounting but totally omitted from your features.
- What is in place to protect our information should Xero cease to exist?
I am experiencing a loss of functionality when using Xero in Google Chrome on a Mac.
Come on XERO up your game this is not good enough!
since a week ago, xero is very slow.
We have a couple of years worth of data in Xero now.
Even I knew, they may working in UK, so would Xero arrange another Support Team in NZ or other region?
## I have send email ""Xero Support"" for this question, but its feedback is so slow which is over 24 hours.
In my opinion Xero in its current form is not designed with SMEs or B2C enterprises in mind.
I do appreciate that Xero is constantly changing and updating and hope that some of these issues will be addressed.
Now I can't receipt, expense or any other function and have contacted Xero support twice with no reply.
Any ideas Xero?
In my view, one can still be a pretty great user of Xero without knowing anything about these areas.
Have you got any experience with integration of Xero and BambooHr with Workato?
not sure if it is an issue at my end, or something with Xero.
I responded back along with a bunch of technical information in my findings as to what I believe the problem might be with Xero.
As I have told you on countless occasions, this is a pseudo email address we used *only* to log into Xero.
Reason is that xero is caclulating total VAT based on each line, not base on the total net amount.
This is especially frustrating as there seems to be a fix in an UK Version of xero.
Xero is awesome!
Come on xero can I have a fix !
He could not tell me, this is basic feature stuff, he says I should speak to my accountant (on how to do this in Xero, your product).
For goodness and logic sake, pls can Xero step up and someone commit in simple customerspeak tangible steps how to use your product.
Here is another example of how XERO takes you down the wrong path.
so was wondering whether anyone in Malaysia using Xero in their business.
Clicked on "Xero Essentials".
XERO is doing shit!
Hello Xero TeamI'm sending this in as honest feedback.
I can't get any support from Xero.
Woolamai Surf Life Saving Club in Phillip Island (Victoria, Australia) is currently using Xero.
Xero is a great online accounting system.
Xero is supposed to be beautiful.
If someone doesn't have something to do, don't give them a job of making Xero more long winded to use.
I'm offering these comments in order to invite further ideas, and to bring these to the attention of Xero.
Please Xero some consistency here is MUCH appreciated, some of us have work to do
At this page there is a header (blue in color) with the xero logo and "Logout".
XERO YOUR CUSTOMER SUPPORT IN MY EXPERIENCE IS ZERO!
Or Xero can contact the subscriber directly.
I'm not going to write review about how great Xero functionality is, as sure lots of people have already covered this.
So far, based on our experience, there is nothing innovative or simple about moving Quickbooks to Xero.
I read the responses to very similar unhappy comments from various Community Managers on these Forums and they do not make me feel any more confident that, having been convinced by my Accountants to opt for Xero of QB Online, I have made the right decision.
Is Xero migrating to Google's new authorization API?
Has anyone else noticed that Xero is taking up huge amounts of memory and then freezing?
So if you are having similar issues please reply below so Xero we can demonstrate it is a wider issue.
It would be nice if this could be added back in or are Xero trying to make it a bit harder for those on the Starter plan in the hope that they'll get a few more users switching to the Standard plan?
This is a multi national company, who may have 100 -500 xero users in the next 6-12 months.
Xero's customer service policy is strange - no phone number on their website?
My experience with Xero customer service is that they're polite and technically capable - but lack any finesse in how to manage a relationship.
I have no idea what is going on in the backend of Xero but no one with ANY common sense has been allowed to work on the system.
What I asked is will Xero *fully* support them?
My concern - or prediction if you will - is that Xero will drop support for the Yodlee feed after the direct feed is implemented.
I have limited needs however I decided on Xero as Wave, while great, had some glaring issues in functionality that render it usable but not much more than that.
Xero, thus far, is a great product.
Can we have this workflow in Xero?
I hope Xero can come to an agreement with American Express SOON and offer us direct partner feeds.
I'm quite certain a fix for this would be very well received by users, and in some cases critical for them to continue using xero.
I wanted to capture the experience here in case it saves anyone else some time and frustration, and to highlight some issues to the Xero developers.
I urge the Xero developers to review how FreeAgent have managed their data feed connectivity and recommend that this more secure method is used.
You'll be helping us test some updated designs for the Xero touch app.
XERO offers no "Technical & Current Status" on their website/software that are effecting users.
Please consider the following scenarios as problems that the typical new or old user maybe confronted with in Xero.
We could then check the boxes for what module in Xero each person is able to access and if they access is "view only" or "full access".
However, Xero sees them as a colloquial institution and thinks it simply caters for UK only based firms.
In theory, XERO is a fantastic system if it stays up.
if xero cant do what quickbooks can do or yawn myob what point is there.
I see a big future for Xero, but only if they can fill in these holes.
I use Xero Touch on my iPhone.
I'm impressed with the product, the support, the communities, the video's and how flexible Xero is to use.
My only concern is how applicable Xero is to larger organisations.
##### CLUSTER 7 #####
Does anyone know how to do this?
Does anyone know how we'd be able to enter this transaction?
Does anyone know anything about this?
Does anyone know which box I should use?
Does anyone know which Tax Rate I should put these under?
2 - I have 1 employee who has been paid living away from home allowance does anyone know where i should put this?
Does anyone know how I can merge these together?
Does anyone know how to do this please?
Does anyone know how to stop this from happening and for it to automatically copy the description entered in the transaction narration?
Does anyone know a fix for this.
Does anyone know how I can do it?
Does anyone know how to make the entry?
Does anyone know what I would be doing in these two circumstances.
Does anyone know where i can locate a sample file?
Does anyone know how to change this?
Is anyone else having this problem, or does anyone know how to resolve this without having to also perform a manual reconciliation to check the balance is correct?
Does anyone know any good workarounds for this?
Does anyone know how I can claim this back from HMRC?
Does anyone know how to escalate an issue?
Has anyone else had this issue and does anyone know how to fix this?
Does anyone know whether it's possible to customise the Bill template?
Does anyone know how to fix this?
Does anyone know of any accountants in Wellington who have an expertise in US tax issues that I might be able to discuss this with?
Does anyone know any percentages?
Does anyone know how to do this.
Does anyone know how to journal to these codes or is there a workaround?
Does anyone know how to remedy this?
does anyone know what is going on?
mdoes that make sense and does anyone know how to do this pleases?
Does anyone know how to go back and find the one transaction so I can undo and redo it properly?
Does anyone know how we could achieve that?
Does anyone know how to correct this problem?
Does anyone know of a useful workaround to this?
Does anyone know if there is a limit to the number of characters i can input in any one section.
Does anyone know how I may be able to fix this?
Does anyone know of an AU based provider of a similar service?
Does anyone know how you export the Employee Contact Details as a CSV?
How does a partner or user know who has a particular credential or is a member of a particular professional association?
Does anyone know how to archive an inventory item?
Does anyone know how to do this?
Does anyone know of a work around?
Does anyone know a workaround?
Does anyone know how I might resolve this?
Does anyone know why is that?
Does anyone know how I would do this ?
Does anyone know of a solution?
Does anyone know what needs to be done to sort this out?
Does any one know?
Does anyone know whether there's an issue with Assets currently and when it's anticipated that it be rectified?
Does anyone know why she wouldn't be receiving these each month?
Does anyone know how this can be done?
Does anyone know how that happened?
Does anyone know if this is possible or if there is anything else I can do to recover the lost information?
Does anyone know how to do this.
Does anyone know how I can refresh the feed?
Does anyone know how to get the partner pricing set up?
Does anyone know how to do this?
Does anyone know where I can get any of these?
Does anyone know what this means and how I can fix it up?
Does anyone know how to do this with import files?
Does anybody know of a comprehensive list of ALL fields that can be used in the docx templates?
00	20% (VAT on Income)Does anyone know what I am doing wrong?
Does anyone know what i am doing wrong.
Does anyone know how to do that.
Does anyone know how to resolve this?
Does anyone know when leave balances are updated?
does anyone out there know?
Does anyone know why?
Does anyone know how I record the refund so it cancels the overpayment out?
Does anyone know how to process a manual adjustment to auto superannuation process.
Does anyone know how to fix it ?
Does anyone know how to set this up?
Does anyone know why I can't save this salary & wages schedule when setting up an employee in Payroll ?
Does anyone know how to remove a scheduled EPS for a PAYE nil return that will not submit?
Does anyone know how to make this work or is it another bug?
does anyone know which references the attached error refers to?
Does anyone know what this means when I do my RTI and it declines it from the government and how to correct itHelen
Does any one know if you can email an employee their payslips directly from their profile?
Does anyone know how I can fix this issue?
Does anyone know if there are any apps that might service our needs please?
Does anyone know an app which can handle this automatically?
Does anyone know ?
Does anybody know if:1. the information I have been given by Leap is correct;2. there are any work arounds; or3.
Does anyone know of one?
Does anyone here know who it is?
Does anyone know how to solve my problem.
I am based in the UK so I know that there is the Australian timesheeting payroll product but even if I could use that it still does not cover tracking categories.
##### CLUSTER 8 #####
Anyone can please help.
Could you please help point out where I am going wrong.
Can anyone help with this?
Can anyone help?
Thank you for any help you can offer.
Any help please, very urgent.
Can anyone help the entries required?
Can anyone help with this.
Can anyone help?
Can anyone help with this?
com/Settings_ConversionBalancesIf anyone can help me remove these journal entries, I will be eternally grateful.
Can anyone help?
Any help will be much appreciatedCheersNathanael
can anyone help?
He has reached a point in his knowledge where he can not help us.
Please can anyone provide help on how to fix this?
Appreciate some help clarifying how Xero is calculating this.
Help anyone?
Can someone please advise how to do this as I am flummoxed and am going around in circles using the help guides and discussion groups.
Any one can help?
When i enter "recieve money" for $500 Cash, it then says the difference between what i'm reconciling is $1000 :-( Please help!
Any apps which help provide this reporting level are welcome!
Your help with this is much appreciated.
hmmmThanks for any help!
I have read this response below however can't find any help on where to : "2.
Can anyone help me please ?
help me achieve my goal and donate as much as you can to this worth while cause.
Any help would be much appreciatedThank you
I've been looking to see if this is possible but have hit a road blockAny help or suggestions would be appreciatedThanksAidan
Anyone here can help to clarify and shorten the above?
Any help would be great!
Any suggestions or help?
I am looking for a bookkeeper to help with this if you have any suggestions.
Thank you very much for any help you can offer.
Would appreciate any help anyone can give.
Hey guys, Any help for my scenario would be great!
Any help is great!
Is there something above and beyond what's listed in the help docs that any of these accountants or programs are doing that is not already detailed in the help docs?
anyone help me?
Anyone have a simple solution they can offer to help me with this?
Thank you in advance for any help.
Any help would be appreciatedThanks
I simply cannot find the list,can any one help?
Any help is welcome.
I'd be really grateful for any help.
my boss logged me on to Xero as 'Advisor' so I can help set it up for our client.
Can anyone help?
Hey guys,Hope somebody is willing to help a newbie.
Can anyone help?
any help
I was trying to revalue some assets based on the advice I found on the help center.
Can anyone help?
Can anyone help us?
Anyone can help!
Appreciate any help or advice on how I can move forward and resolve this!
I appreciate any help with this!
Grateful anyone's help!
Anyone help please?
Can anyone please help me?
Any help?
Can anyone please help?
Someone maybe can help me to solve this problem.
com/ -  Xero can be integrate with the help of veeqo and stitchlabs please see the link below for those:.
Any help would be most welcomed!
I am using Xero to help a friend who is running a motel in New Zealand.
I'm new to Xero and hoping the community can help with a question around entering sales.
I am looking for some help and advice please, my head hurts with pondering thing one!
Please help if you have any ideas or this has happened to you.
Could anyone help?
Really confused here and appreciate any help.
Grateful for any help here.
Help anyone?
I am hoping that someone can help me see the error of our ways?
Can anyone help me?
Any help is appreciatedThanks
Can anyone help?
If somebody could help in how to go about treating such a transaction it would be really appreciated.
I could really do with some help on this.
Can anyone help ?
Appreciate any help and advice.
Can anyone help?
Any help will be truly appreciatedThanks Brett
Any help greatfully receivedCaroline
I can find nothing on this in any help category.
Can someone help me with the setting in VAT return?
Any help is welcome.
Can anyone help?
Can anyone help me with this?
Can anyone help me please.
Any help here would be very helpful!
Appreciate any help.
I hope that makes sense any help would be great, Thank you
Can anyone help please.
Can anyone help?
Cheers for any help.
Can anyone help?
Hello ,Can anyone help me with the setup of hero?
I would appreciate any help as once I have done one month I will be find from then on!
much better than what the Xero help pages suggest.
Can anyone please help me understand how do I reconcile that?
I've looked in the help text, and can't see any help for this.
Any help is welcome.
Any help or advise for me?
com or by navigating back to a screen in Xero where there is a link to Contact Support directly from the Help menu.
Please help me, hubby wants to throw Xero out the window!
Can anyone help me?
Anyone willing to help?
Any help would be assume .
Can anyone help me in setting up a hire purchase in Xero.
Any help with this would be great.
Can anyone help me with what this means?
I would appreciate any help.
This would help me have a more accurate view of:- Money foreseen to be coming in each month for the next few months.
I am looking for some help in this area as it is beyond my Xero knowledge.
Can anyone help please?
:-PThanks for any and all help!
Is there any functionality within Xero that would help track how much has been invoiced, paid, and what is left to be invoiced for a particular project?
I can't seem to find any directions on how to do thisI'm sure there out there somewhere Help!
Anyone help with this?
Can ANYONE help me?
I will greatly appreciate any help that you can provide.
I am not really sure where to go with this & hope you can help.
Any help very greatefully received.
Please can anyone help?
Hai,Please help us to consider: if you can make a flexibility in adding new fields and/or delete fields in a Placeholder for each Email templates.
This would help easily identify any late adjustments.
Can anyone help me please?
please, can we have some sort of date indication on the tear off strip which would help enormously in allocating per customer intentions to save time in later "remove and undo" and then, of course, "redo"?
Then for some reason you have to do 8 more steps to print a receipt as detailed here https://help.
Can anyone help with this?
It would be of great help if DXF/DWG files are supported in the related files.
Additionally, <Item Name> is a valid field we can use in our branding themes but this field is not shown in the following help page:
This radio button is explained clearly in Help but I think the label for this radio button is misleading.
More especially so if a some form detection, text recognition was deployed to help speed the review process.
tried already different reports and smart lists, found nothing useful; pls help, thx in advance
Can you please provide a facility to be able to copy contacts to help speed up this process?
Please look in to the possibility of introducing this as it will help us immensly.
Any chance you could incorporate a bookmark / watch / favourite / star help topics?
This will help in gaining better understanding of where expenses are coming from and the details being used to submit them.
Xero is a fantastic software but this is one thing I think it's missing to help their customers receive their payments faster!
It is the same with the screenshots from this Xero help page: http://help.
This would help for simple reporting or more detailed reporting.
having Xero do this for you would save SO MUCH time and more importantly help employers remain LEGAL!
This can be confusing for employees and it would help clear up any confusion if these were shown separately.
Can any one help on this, or is it something that is planned for the future.
What would really help me (and maybe other users) is if I could have a menu on the side that is customisable to my preferences.
I am at the end of my thether with Xero today and hoping someone can help.
Can anyone help?
Can anyone help?
Any help very much appreciatedGyles
Hello, can anyone help us integrate Google Sheets with Xero Quotes?
Can anyone help?
Any help from someone at Xero?
Can anyone help/advise me, what I could do?
Thank you to anyone who can help xx
Can anyone help with a work around for this?
Can any one help with this?
Can anyone help me?
Anyone can help regarding with this problem?
Any chance you could help me on that?
This is to help facilitate conversations between Xero users.
Anyone able to help?
Can anyone help?
Can anyone help me please?
Cheers for any help anyone can offer.
Can any one help.
I was hoping someone could help me out, i'm trying to reconcile with last nights balance and last nights feed however its about &#163;20 out.
Instead of investing so much in marketing, can you spend a little in R&D to help your existing loyal customers, please?
Please help if anyone has any guidance for me.
Any ideas as I can't find it in any discussions or help topics.
Any help anyone?
Can someone kindly take a few minutes to help me?
I've emailed help desk a while ago, and of course can't find a help phone number.
Can anyone help?
Except from help guide is there anything else I should read before I start?
More detail can be found in the Help Centre articles, below.
com or by navigating back to a screen in Xero where there is a link to Contact Support directly from the Help menu.
I am hoping someone can help.
Any help would be great please!
Can anyone help?
Help anyone?
Can anyone help me with this query ?
Hello, I am wondering if somebody can please help me.
I have tried to find this button, but there is nothing in Help about it apart from the instruction go to Help > Enable Mark as Reconciled.
I have tried this, but there is no link as stated on the instructions , no sign of Enable Mark as Reconciled under the Help Centre.
Thank you in advance for any help!
Good day,I wonder whether anyone can help me.
Can anyone please help ?
com) (original email address I set up in Xero) Subject: David Johnson has invited you to manage the subscription for xxxIf you have any problems, please contact us at: help@xero.
There's no indication what this means, either in the Asset Type screen or in the help section.
Any ideas and help please?
Appreciate any help.
Can anyone help?
78	Can anyone help?
Help anyone?
can anyone help me out?
Can anyone help / provide feedbackThanks
Can anyone help?
The help implies that you can create a quote that a customer can accept/reject online.
Can anyone help me with the budget manager please?
Can you help me with how to set this up?
I've reviewed the instructions from the Help Center to make sure I'm entering it correctly: What am I missing?
There is no option to allocate as described in the Help Centre.
How to get Xero to operate in accordance with the teaser instructions contained in the Help Centre?
Some figures from my recent problem might help with the explanation:I had to refund a customer $45.
Can anyone help me out with this?
Any recommendations would help.
It also appears the entries in the conversion balance page have the opposite effect as intended - a credit value has the effect of a debit and vice versaHopefully someone can help explain this.
Can anyone help me out on this?
As a trainer, I dedicate my life to learning the systems I train on at expert level and I can help you do the same.
Any help on this would be greatly received,Many ThanksPaula
Any help please?
More details about this feature on our blog and in our Help Centre:Xero Blog (includes video): Detailed Blog Post (includes screenshot walkthrough):
Can anyone help.
I can't find any guidance on this topic in the Xero Help files.
Can anyone help?
Any help/ useful advice/pitfalls to be aware of would be great.
Could someone help me please, I have recently added the superannuation feature which allows me to auto our superannuation payments clearing but when xero did this they had it starting from the very beginning which I have already paid.
Someone please help me as I going crazy, trying this over and over again.
Anyone able to help with this?
Hello Can anyone help me please as I have a tricky problem?
I'm not sure where to put in his 20% loading which has to be added, can anyone help.
Any help would be greatLachy
Please will you kindly help with the following:1.
Help anyone
Any help or comments would be great.
The public holiday section in the help centre is a bit confusing so needing a bit of help on how to set up correctly please.
I can't find any help on this.
can anyone help?
Can anyone help?
Can anyone help?
Any help in this area would be awesome.
Your help and guidance here would be very helpful as I'm totally stumped on what to do.
Can anyone please help with this?
Can anyone help me with proper recording for Saturday annual leave loading 25.
com or by navigating back to a screen in Xero where there is a link to Contact Support directly from the Help menu.
It doesn't matter what figures I try, I can't get it to generate correctly in accordance with Fair Work (what they are actually entitled to) Can anyone please help?
Has anyone else had this problem or can help me?
Any help would be greatly appreciatedLam
I tried searching help and community but could not locate any help.
Could anyone kindly help to point out how to apply this on Xero?
Can anyone help or tell me what I am missing ThanksVicky
Can anyone help here?
Can anyone help ?
Any help please.
Can anyone help me?
Can anyone help please?
Can anyone help.
Can anyone help in getting these payruns in last financial year?
But it has to show up on their payslips, can anyone help with how to do this.
I am fairly new to Xero, so I'm hoping someone can help me.
There's some more information in our help sectionApologies for any inconvenience.
Can't find ANY help on PAYG issues in the support section.
Can anyone help me with this?
For full help using Xero Payroll please see Get started with payroll in Xero in our Help Centre: If you have any specific questions involving numbers or names or other private things, please contact our Customer Care team on support@xero.
If you've made it this far and can help, please please respond or reach out to me.
Thank you for any help out there!
Any help please?
Help please, I am completely new to this, I haven't been doing the wages for long and not really had any training!
Anyone have any help?
Any one Help pleaseHMRC could not validate your credentials.
Can someone help me work out how to set it up?
Can anyone help?
8% - which is what some of the help notes suggest  we should do.
We are not CIS but Help said do it, so I did.
How do I go about this as I cannot find anything directly on the help topics.
Hello, I am new in this but can anyone help me?
Any help?
Can anyone help here?
Can you please help to run the trial payroll on Xero without submitting the RTI Details.
Can anyone help me?
can anyone help?
Is it anyone can help me how to set up?
Could somebody please help me map over the correct values.
Any help would be great.
Any help would be great!
Can anyone help?
Can anyone else help!
Infoodle can help you reduce administration, improve communication and track donations within your church or not-for-profit organisation.
Any help warmly welcome!
Any help or suggestions much appreciatedSimon
Can any one help me?
Can API or any addon integration help?
I am looking for Xero compatible Apps that can do the following, if anyone can help:  1.
Any help and advice will be very much welcomed.
Once again Tradify is not able to help.
Would really appreciate any help with suggestions anyone can make!
Can anyone help for this?
Please help with this, any addon for such ?
I am keen for individual managers to be self sufficient so can anyone help with an solution.
Dear allI am looking for a system that will help us manage sales at major sporting events.
I appreciate any help or advice you can offer.
Any help will be goodThanks
Any help would be greatly appreciatedMany ThanksSteve MullenCarbon Business Systems
We are looking for up to 10 users to help us trial the integration so that we can achieve full Partner status and offer an even tighter link between the two systems.
Any help here would be really welcome.
Can anyone help me?
Can anyone help with this?
Can anyone help with suggesting a complete package to replace MYOB RM?
Any help at all, I'll take it.
I am having issues since vend changed their register closures and I am not getting any help from them.
Would anyone help me?
This forum is Xero community which is supposed to be the voice of their customers coming together to help build a better product.
I can't access XERO Help Center/Community using my XERO log in credential.
Please help, is there anything I can do to reduce the width of these columns as I use these screens constantly and this is awful !
I can't see anyone in my area at all, but there is no map to help me.
"Hide Help" doesn't persist for Find & Recode, I haven't had this problem with any other in-software help banner.
Any one can help?
There is one thing that would help with part time employees and that is a standard time sheet in the employee details.
We all have ideas to improve the program and I love it how i can send an email in the feedback box and someone always emails me straight back to help out.
##### CLUSTER 9 #####
(in settings option) Sometimes there is other vendors payment.
Is there anyway to use Xero for credit card payment reminders/amounts?
Therefore the WHT can only be posted when we record the payment.
Am I doing this correct or should I split the payment coming in to sales and vat input?
How do I correctly record for payment processing fees in Xero?
How do I get this payment correctly into Xero?
We were wondering though how other companies deal with putting money aside for the payment?
if so how do you plan & code for the payment?
Can I post a supplier payment without a bill to allocate it to?
How do I reconcile the insurance payment received?
What about the outward payment?
This is perhaps because such a transfer is essentially a payment or a deposit, not a transfer in Xero sense.
It is okay as it is a pre-payment revenue which is a negative current asset to us.
On Total Cash In & Out on the dashboard when a payment is made to HMRC for VAT it is showing as money going out.
Others are split over 4 weeks and some total payment in one hit.
when we receive payment it could be for a single client or 40 at one hit.
How do I allocate the refund to the payment I made?
How do I apply this credit to the payment I made?
Can I do I direct payment?
When I go to reconcile this batch payment I can't bring up the credit note in the "Find and Match".
Cannot for the life of me work out how to process the payment/refund.
How can I ensure Xero reflects the payment to the customer and that the VAT is included and will show on my VAT returns etc?
Is it possible to change the settings so that the sale is added into the period when payment is received?
Xero seems to be a bit weak when it comes to managing payment batches - or, is it me?
so how do i balance up the payment?
As there is no payment going out for the claim?
How should we deal with these two payments to ensure that we can reconcile the expenses claim against the expenses payment?
If the whole lot how do I show the part payment?
After I make the monthly payment for that credit card, how do I code that payment?
My question is, how should I classify this payment?
In reconciliation I can't figure out how to allocate each payment to that 1 invoiceThanks
The topic in the link below shows that the payment can be split into ATM fee and Directors Drawingshttps://community.
If we can use the expense claim, can anyone tell me what are the actual entries Xero makes as I want to make sure the credit entry goes to the DLA as we will not be receiving payment any time soon.
To make things slightly more complicated, I have overpaid as there was an error in the quote, so a third payment is also in the mix.
What do I do with the payment?
Please can you advise how I should record a contra payment between customers?
How do i reconcile this payment.
How do I then split the bill to allocate 5% as a withholding tax payment I am required to make direct to the ATO?
If I do the latter, how I do categorize the payment?
How do I enter this into XERO as a contractor payment?
How do you ensure that its taken up correctly over the 12 months, not the 10 months the payment is occurring.
When I file my quarterly sales tax return (US, CA) how do I record the payment in Xero?
When I do a bpay to my card, what do I code the payment as?
once a bill has been authorised and sits in awaiting payment, can it then be moved back to draft situation?
Recently I have stumbled onto an issue: How to deal with exchange rate discrepancy, for instance I order goods from overseas, and create a bill and make a payment from USD to EUR with an exchange rate on a given date, however, when the shipment is delivered, the customs apply VAT on the consignment with a different exchange rate on EUR.
Also, it appears that you can only ever select from a list of 200 items to run a batch payment.
I'm struggling to see how I could get around this issue other than splitting a batch payment into several smaller payments (self-defeating?
Xero allocates the payment received to each of the lines in proportion.
8) Those that are do not opt in for automatic payment are not invoiced at all in PaySimple.
How do I record the payment so that Xero schedules it?
What is the preferred method for entering a credit card payment in Xero?
I am having a little bit of trouble with when people come in and trade in there car as a form of payment.
How do i display that there is a trade in on the payment section?
How do I apply the residual in XERO so that I can then reconcile the payment?
How do i reconcile something where there has been a double up in payment which i reconciled using the over payment technique.
Or is there another solution to locate specific expense claims that are awaiting payment by the term that's in the description field?
How do I remove the payment then delete the claim?
I have no idea how to receive the PO into Xero, match against the payment I made and then sell the items.
Originally I though this was an innocent accounting practice but now I am sure it can be a deliberate ploy to avoid payment.
They could then email it direct to xero with their authoriisation stamp on it and I can enter and set up for payment.
How can I track their retainer payment in Xero?
Hello All, what I want to do is have my banking details down in the payment advice cutaway.
One is payment for share capital, the other is an interest free shareholder loan.
My base currency in paypal is USD but from time to time I receive payment in Sterling.
We're trying to use Expense, but the only problem is that it is marking the payment as going to the purchaser, not the business entity.
Why is it so hard for there to be a little "print check" button where the state tax payment section is?
Also, can each payment be processed individually, not in a batch, so that they can be reconciled more easily?
Quick books allows vendor/bill payment and payroll integration with RBC Canada.
Competitive fees – Interac Online is priced as a low cost payment method compared to other payment options.
This would save quite a bit time from uploading them under the individual contacts if they were saved at the batch payment point.
For instance if you have a dispute with the supplier that needs to be resolved before the payment is sorted how best to manage this.
It is far too easy when we try allocate a payment or receipt to a contact that a new contact is created by misspelling their name.
If not approved for payment a credit note will be issued or some other such arrangement which will be entered at a later date.
This also adds in some duplication as they then have to process the client payment on Xero separately also.
It would be great to have a section in the Contacts that allows payment information to be stored so I can run a customer's credit card without having to contact them every time for the payment info.
This could mean a huge difference in time frame to a business and the option to have a choice of "Calendar" or "Working" days for payment in the "Contacts" section would be most desirable.
Is it possible to have the payment amount in the 'Payment Options' section to reinforce to the client what is payable.
com/blog/checkout-new-featuresThe Xero/Stripe payment screen doesn't include Stripe's Remember Me feature.
The Payment Advise is a possible tear off section, so the currency should really be in there.
sort by supplier and then alter any part payment amounts5.
Whilst much of Xero is really great a very big omission in their list of features is not being able to produce supplier remittances that include all the credit notes against any payment as unallocated.
Can we please have "Create Payment" as an option under the "+ New.
Xero is generally pretty awesome but one area where I think it is quite weak compared to the competition is on managing customer payment performance.
There should be some sort of document to verify that the payment has been received by the supplier .
I can not allocate these as I do a batch payment, this is a pain
Should read "Receive a Payment".
When I am inputting bills, I sometimes struggle to remember what the usual payment method is to my supplier (it's not always written on the bill).
e. g. BACSDirect DebitStanding OrderChequeCashIt would be great if we could record what the usual payment method is against each of our contacts.
It's frustrating that only with xero do we have to maintain separate database to monitor staggered payment dates.
there is a great spot to record and check when we can expect payment, but there is no where to see when we should be ringing the customer to see when we can expect payment.
This could coincide with a date to send the payslip as many companies prepare their payroll a couple of days in advance of payment and do not wish to send the payslips on the day it is prepared but the day it is paid.
I could enter each payment type as a separate entry, but it would be much more efficient to put them in one entry.
Even though I've how pushed the payment date out to next year, it's still clicking around.
Could someone  spend an hour or so tweaking script so that instead of saying "Payment received from {Customer} on {Date} for {Amount}. "
This would allow us to at a glance keep the "Bad debts" in view and managed (via debt collection, or other opportunities to gain payment).
share the transaction link (taken care by a payment portal, hopefully Xero owned) and the customer can enter credit card details or even recurring payments, e. g. leasing?
net or another payment gateway we could move to using xero exclusively and cut out one more step for our employees.
At present there is no reference to indicate what the payment was for except for the amount.
The year to date figures in the payment section of the payslip only show the earning lines currently being used.
Can Xero please provide an automated email confirmation to employees during the Automatic Superannuation Payment process once approved?
HelloI am trying to do a payment run for a client and one of their members of staff has taken holiday this month.
Please consider adding partial payment option - it is essential to our business
Hello,I read through guides and discussions, but I couldn't find any direct answer on how the refund to a payment should be made.
At present in Xero I have to make the payment first and then match to the bills afterwards which means a lot of manual adding up before I can start.
I work in the film industry, on the last project I took part payment as investment in the film (actually invoiced to me as "ownership of copyright) .
but I haven't been able to find any batch payment files on my device since.
There is no option to set a tax code when booking a payment.
If not if I allocate the payment to our parking nominal code what will happen to the parking paid for?
Then when I reconcile, despite the value, I can assign each payment to that generic bill.
I am not sure how I can make this payment in Xero and be ale to reconcile the payment and keep correct GST records.
How do I apply this part payment?
How can I teach Xero to recognize this payment?
How can I record the 'payment received'?
I could use some expertise related to an over payment I received from a customer.
There is no option other than edit on the over payment.
How do I handle this over payment?
They were titled "Batch Deposit" which I thought was odd as it was a batch payment not a batch deposit.
Now this was all fine but what it has done is place a receive payment on the 13 and 18 for $407.
I can not fit my legally required payment terms in the area provided.
You must provide the payment schedule to the payee within the time required by the construction contract or, if the construction contract does not set out a time for responding to the payment claim, then within 20 working days after the payment claim is served on you.
When we manually code them up as a RECEIVE money transaction (with 3 or 4 lines in it), we can't SPLIT the payment reconciliation when the EFT comes in.
I've taken a look in Sales > Awaiting Payment and can't see anything wrong here either.
What I'm having trouble finding (if it exists) better summary reports on what I'm expecting to payout and holding mutliple electroinic payments ready for payment at the end of the month.
has xero added other on line methods of payment other than paypal
How can I determine if the payment summaries are published?
How to do similar invoicing where the client then makes out the full payment directly to the underwriters.
Can anyone tell me how I can remove it from the payment summaries?
How can I make sure that leave loading is calculated on 'Ordinary Hours' only and not also the 'Over-Award Payment'?
How can this be rectified prior to running the payment summaries?
Or at least how to remove them from the RESC column of the Payment Summary?
How do I resubmit the payment to Clicksuper, when my superannuation liability has already been reconciled and no payments exist for this employee?
Dear Xero supporter,One of our employee’s super payment paid on 2/8/2016 has been returned back on 7/8/2016  .
Can't work out why it is showing as a lump sum payment in the payment summary, and/or how to rectify this.
Therefore the key question I have is can I delete a payrun after is has been used to provide information for a superannuation batch payment?
How can i clear out the super that has been paid in the past without a payment to reconcile off
Can somebody please advise if wages will be recorded on the employee payment summary net of the salary sacrifice.
Can somebody please advise if the wages will be recorded on the employee payment summary net of the salary sacrifice.
How can I change this, do I have to undo each payment & re process or is there an easier option?
I have also made a payment of $350  which is an ATO PAYG Income Tax Instalment amount against T7 in the BAS.
HiI'm trying to reconcile the Detailed Payroll Activity Statement with actual wages paid for the FY 14/15 so I can produce the Payment Summaries for our employees.
My most recent attempt has yielded the following response "The opening balance date can't be changed because this employee has a published payment summary".
However, Xero treats them as though they never happened and to this date (end of October) the Employees listing shows Next Payment Date as 2 Aug, 9 Aug, 19 Jul, 26 Jul.
I can confirm that payment summaries have not been published and that the employee's start dates are prior to the payrun date.
Payment date should be 15 August.
There is no one-off payment option.
But if I did submit the tax payment first, then cut a check for that period, What is the expected behavior in Xero?
Understandable if Xero is generating the payment, but since it is not it should not care what date I use.
When we reconcile, there is no "bill" to assign the payment to so our processor has been assigning the payments to a new "spend" entry.
What code should i be using for the monthly payment to HMRC?
Keep track of cash, credit card and other forms of payment as well as tax liabilities.
Get paid via PayPal or a payment gateway.
Hello,I am a consultant working with many companies using a subscription business model with varying payment terms (e. g. 1-month, 3-month, etc.
If a part payment is put through on xero and a payment is put through on workshop software it shows as two payments as you cannot reconcile workshop software payments.
If so how do you allow for the percentage up front along with the remaining element when the payment is made by the customer.
Loaded with features including recurring payments, payment reminders and branded customer portal.
HiHas anyone used Commweb as their 3rd party payment gateway for Xero using Custom Payment Urls?
My Bills Screen (the one with the All, Draft, Awaiting Approval, Awaiting Payment, Paid, & Repeating Tabs) is now spread right across my screen (as is each screen under these tabs).
22-5 - we first submitted a support ticket as we were required to update payment information so billing could be processed.
##### CLUSTER 10 #####
Like, there is a payment made to a supplier (transport company) on behalf of an employee.
I've searched the forums to find out how to deal with this and 'people' say the following: "Record the original payment on the balance sheet as something like a 'rent deposit'"But how do I do this?
com/Q_DishonouredPaymentI'd like to do as suggested above but for a batch payment item.
I have seen there is an old request like this referring to payment terms.
I would like to to see the function of exporting the batch payment details in a NACHA approved file format.
This Leave should be treated like normal leave (with SGC and leave accrual unlike termination payment).
Why can't the payment summaries be sent out like payslips or remittance advices which have something in the subject like: '2016 payment summary from XYZ Company Pty Ltd'?
This Leave should be treated like normal leave (with SGC and leave accrual unlike termination payment).
I like PayPal except for the fact that you can't take a CC payment over the phone without having the customer's address and name and all that other stuff.
##### CLUSTER 11 #####
Please add support for the new browser.
If I export my Inventory items and add items, how will the duplicates be handled when I import that csv?
Either make this field multi-purpose so sole traders can add Unique Taxpayer References or add a new field that is only visible when the Org type is Sole Trader/Self-Employed.
How do I add the accumulated depreciation of an existing asset onto the Fixed Asset register?
I can't edit them, or add new ones.
Are there any other add-on softwares which could do this?
How do you add company director and registered address details.
If there is no facility - Xero developers, this is a good one to add!
Is it worth attempting to use Xero for inventory or to look at another system, are there any recommended add-ons?
I have been asked to add groupings of expenses in a P&L, one of those groupings is to be named Operating Costs.
The categories are as follows (I can't seem to add an image)OBDEBIT OBCREDIT	TRANSDEBIT TRANSCREDIT	CBDEBIT	CBCREDITWhich do I use?
If xero doesnt have it, is there any addons that I can add in ?
Has anyone come across an add-on or software that could assist with this?
Under Payroll Settings in Xero, add a new benefit type (name: "Gym Membership”, category: “Other”, type: Fixed Amount, amount: £13.
Is there an add-on or option which I am missing to enter indirect exchange rates?
Im not sure how to add them or whether my accountant or book keeper should do it.
Oh, and lastly, I'm hoping that I can do this without a third party add-on.
Please add that, as I often found myself needing to modify the note for the approver, but there is no feature to do so.
How do we add in other expenses that come from a property manager?
Xero could you please add the following features to Inventory:Supplier Product Numbers so they appear on purchase orders along with the item description.
Are there any Add ons out there?
or an add-on possibly?
where do I add opening balances, can't find in FAQJanet
If not, are there any add-ons that can do this?
How do I add the Openning Balance to make the balance match between the hard copy and Xero?
Is it possible to 'Add An Organisation' so I can start again?
I thought I would share a list (and maybe others could add more) of banks that connect well to Xero and provide useful statement line information.
9%So as a result, I want to add a liability named "John Smith Share Capital" with 1000, how can I do this?
000How can I add the negative tax in the "New Tax Rate" window?
It seems to make more sense as a 'Receive Money' transaction however you can't add inventory into these.
or add-ons that would be helpful?
Please could you add this to one of your updates as soon as possible :)ThanksHeather
Do I add a cash refund?
I am the treasurer for a Registered Charity and want to add the registration number to the organisation setting so it appears on receipts for donations so the donors can claim back on their tax returns.
I was wondering if there was a bulk add process of purchases to be marked an a client expense without edited every single item.
Is there a Xero add-on that sends you a reminder when a customer hasn't been invoiced for X number of days?
Do I simply add it all as "Fixed Assets? "
or any add-ons that we should look into?
can any experienced user please give me advise on how to add this in xero?
Here's the full post: Do you have any other benefit to add which is not there in this post?
com with the subject line: Xero add-on betaOnce I receive your email I will provide you details on how to sign-up and connect the add-on.
Can anyone recommend any good add-ons please?
Where do I go to add the stock I'm holding on hand please?
I have looked at add-ons and there doesn't seem to be anything that can do this without having to purchase a really expensive addon only to use the 1% of its features that the above requires.
How can I manually add the previously submitted filed returns in Xero.
Maybe you can add an option to re-submit bill for approval aside from the Update button?
Please add columns of where it was spent, and if it might be billed against a client then the client.
Please could Xero add this feature also.
When setting up new customers in the "contacts" tab can you please enable the "+ add new tracking option".
Please can you fix the Lloyds Business banking feed to add charge cards.
Would you please make the tracking category an allowable field for transferring data from an add-on?
Please can you add an  'Edited'  tab for all the system generated statements / things amended etc.
It would be great if you could add to inventory without losing Bills that you're partway through.
Could you add a feature which allows us to insert a symbol when invoicing?
Can we add an additional line under the customer VAT nr pls?
__LANG=enIs there any chance you to add it?
A current work-around is to add a task to remind each staff member to clone the job for the following period, but this still only allows us to be one period in advance, rather than allowing for more regular tasks to be allocated.
Please add Gobank to list of banks that can be imported.
It means I have to reconcile each transaction then locate them in  in order to add any attachment.
Can you please add the "Quotes" direct link (same as "See All") somewhere in the front page?
Please add in the options a , (That Xero users can switch on or off) so we have to allocate income or expenses to a department (if we want to) when reconciling.
I would highly recommend that Xero gives us the ability to chose whether our cashbook clients can add to the chart.
Please can you add Reference to that list?
Can you please add another column to the Bills page showing who the billable expense has been charged to?
Can you please add the ability to resize and delete online columns we see.
How can I add the photo from my phone?
Please add the function of "add attached file" at the "reconciling" process on the app
Will it be part of standard Xero, a separate add-on or even separate software.
In the file Library, currently the columns display the file name only - there is no facility to comment or add metadata.
Is there anything I can "tick" to make this a compulsory entry or is this something to add to the Xero list of improvements?
Please add an company setting option defining the rounding rule for tax calculation .
Can you add Custom and Draft options to Reports Menu dropdown?
In the meantime, if you wish, you can create a feature request and add your vote.
It would be really handy if you could add   Drafts    and    Published to reports menu.
Please add the full expense claim feature to payroll.
For tax reconciliation and loss purposes this is not very effective or efficient as I have to do the P&L for each business separately on a spreadsheet then do calcs to add them all together then to work out which amounts are deferred and which they relate to in the ITR.
Could you please add this functionality so we can use it on the screen - regardless where we navigated to it from.
It has a dropdown list where you can choose to "approve and add another" .
Now, this could be achieved with other apps, solutions, and add-ons that has proven to be expensive.
When you a entering in the suppliers or customers name a function to say add new supplier or customer.
This is very useful future to add please vote and consider this.
Can you add 'Month plus one' to the place holders features please.
However, could you please add a feature that allows one to add a naration to the line items in a note to the financial statements?
Add a button to each item to choose if this purchase is eligible for "use tax. "
Xero Workpapers - Can you create the workpapers with say tickbox options so we can add additional columns, mainly the ability to have prior years shown on all workpapers, so you can be reviewing the balance sheet and compare the current year with the prior year balances, as well as supporting information.
If (for some reason) both fields had values in them then Xero could simply add them together.
In the message area of send invoicecould we please have proper English spelling - not Americanplease add cheque to dictionary
Any suggestions / ideas welcomed or any Xero add on partners can assist, please get in touch.
Hence the suggestion to post here is there's any recommended Xero add on partners that can assist in this issue.
Is it not possible to add a feature whereby we can specify which areas we cover.
Please add the ability to see estimated quarterly taxes due on the dashboard similar to the feature provided by Tax Touch.
Can you please add an option to display only the bill total (not the item amount) in the check voucher?
Please do add it in soon!
Please add this feature as soon as possible as my clients expect to see these details on the lodged BAS.
Being able to merge in extra contact details, currently it only gives the contact name, it would be handy to add the VAT number (required to give in every quarter for vat charges you made) and/or country, email address, .
I use Xero on the iPhone to do some reconciling in the morning and add  receipts for reimbursements during the day.
Could you please make it possible to add the group info when you create a contact?
It will really appreciable if you can add more option in search command for search any description whether it is processed by spend or received money command or use " Who " , "What " or " Why "command.
"Old reports" do not have ability to add amount, tax amount, total.
Also is there a keyboard short to add new lines?
Please add a feature, that can clone the setup of an established Xero file to a new one.
Can Xero please add a Box on the Dash Board for CLIENT NOTES for the Adviser Logon  only.
There is currently no field to add an item line in a manual journal.
Is there a possibility to add the same for outstanding quotes?
HiPlease could you add a feature to allow filtering of records in reports?
When users enter each receipt and its details and click on "add" they're given 2 options - "save draft" or "submit for approval".
Can you please add the email/print remittance advice feature to find and Match payments?
ATM you can only ADD 1 Customer to Billable ExpensesThanks
Could you please add cash coding to the Starter Version of Xero.
Please add this feature and also a warning when the ABN already exists attached to another contact already.
Can Xero offer an option to filter the "Review Add-ons" section of the community by country?
Please add the ability for a user to configure email reminders (and other channels, such as phone text, push notifications, etc. )
but I hate data entry with a passion so can you please create an OCR or Text reader for the Expenses section (If they exists please add them in this thread).
Can't see it would be difficult to add to Xero, but save a lot of time etc.
We have noticed there is an option to add a link for customers to see the quote and have additional buttons of 'accept' 'decline' and 'comment'.
Is there anyway to add this.
Please would you add an additional date parameter option in the Smart Lists so that we can search 'previous month'.
Is there a chance to add a field into Xero to allow adding hourly rates to clients?
Could you please add 2 filters in addition to the tracking categories for  and ?
As a client's situation changes, you don't have to remember to add a note pertaining to it, rather un-hide a note instead; a note which you can see when in edit mode but can't see when not in edit mode.
Hello,Is it possible to add serial numbers to inventory items?
Can a remittance advice flag please be set in the contact details page you could also add a field that included the preferred email address a remittance advice should be sent to.
It would be useful to add a field for a 'tax file number pending' do enter in anticipated date for further action.
As far as I can tell, you cannot currently do this, please could you add this option?
This should also be available in the quoting section so we can add relevant documents at the same time, rather sending them separately.
Please add the ability to print 1099s on preprinted forms and ability to print the 1096 form.
PLEASE, PLEASE can you add the facility for QUOTES to NOT total!
Please add a separate alignment option for the payee address.
To add additional lines requires click, scroll, click, scroll, click, scroll, (etc) No big deal, but when you're processing a lot of orders with a lot of line items, that is time, and time is money.
PLEASE add a birthday field to the customer's contact record.
Sniper team, can you please add the calculator function into the fields of the conversion balances?
Can you add this feature and allow us more flexibility with the logos?
Is this difficult to add?
Please vote for this so we can get the ball rolling on an Etsy Add on!
You can currently only add up to 12 Rules in the 1099 configuration.
I think this is a worth while feature to add in Xero.
Currently you can select yourself at the bottom of the template or manually add the address in the recipient box at the top of the template.
Is it possible to add HIGHLIGHT &/or BOLD/ITALICS etc.
Please add this feature, in the name of expenditure monitoring!
Can we please have a feature to add pdf copies of documents to journals and payments for cash basis clients.
Can that option be made available if we wish to add further details to a title page.
if this is the right value (plus the abilty to total the print the GST amounts) can we please add STATEMENTS to the list of documents that can use this and the ability to have a column on the statement to show these amounts.
Menu > Contacts > Add NewDoes anyone else think this would be handy?
Can we please have the ability to add notes on the Xero Dashboard or add 'sticky notes' so that we can add reminders there.
Some UI improvements -Add a Hero or Showcase module position to the Dashboard.
Right now it seems I can only add an employee withholding for workers comp at a fixed amount or a % of gross income.
At the mome I have to manually add each 'earnings line' which is a pain considering everyone has the same template.
When sending out payslips to clients, is it possible to add a second email address (CC'd) that is copied in on each email, we have had a few instances where we have sent Payslips to our clients from Xero and they have confirmed none receipt?
Why can't Xero add a feature for Company Contributions.
Please add the feature so that RDO's can be done automatically.
Can you add the auto super function to the demo company?
Please add the ability to enter an employee's drivers licence and its expiry date.
Please add the ability to Schedule Leave for more than 1 employee at a time.
Can you add an accumulator to the payroll please?
Any chance that Xero can add tooling or loan balances for each employees.
Can Xero add this feature?
If Xero could change to colours or processed runs to that of those that are merely posted that could be a helpful solution, or add a column 'Processed'.
It would be nice when my employees add there hours to their time sheet that they could show which jobs they were on.
This would be huge for users in states without Xero-friendly payroll support, I'm in PA so there are SO many clients I can't add until this happens.
In the odd case they are not it would be quicker to delete what isn't required rather than add what is.
How do I add categories?
HelloJust wondering if you could please add the Last Year End comparative as an option on the new balance sheet reports.
Can you please make it so that if you choose 'Approve and add another' and then 'Skip' allocating a credit to the bill that you do actually end up in the right place to ADD ANOTHER.
I am trying to complete the screen "Add your organisation to start using Xero now", but I am unable to proceed due to form validation telling me:Please select your previous accounting softwareThe dropdown list for question "What was your previous accounting software? "
Can you add this logo please to the other logos
It would be great to add the number of a product ordered so a business can see the real item order peaks and lows independently of the value.
Can I add a column "Tax Rate" and set it to "0%"?
From my research:- you can only add formulas to certain reports- you can only add fields to a formula if they are part of the same reportWhat I'm trying to do is actually very simple - get the value of all my fixed assets and subtract liabilities and expenses.
Can you add this as an option in Xero please?
How can I add an additional name and email address to multiple contacts?
What is the latest add-on for fixing errors?
The categories are as follows (I can't seem to add an image)OBDEBIT 	OBCREDIT	TRANSDEBIT 	   TRANSCREDIT	CBDEBIT	    CBCREDITWhich do I use?
Is anyone aware of how this could be done - or are there any apps/Add-Ons which can give us this functionality - lots can import but are there any that can export?
Copying and pasting don't add any value and are boring and time consuming tasks to have to perform.
Is it possible to add optional line items to a quote e. g. so if a user views the quote online and there is an item in the quote they wish to remove before accepting - is it possible to do so?
PLEASE XERO can you add this feature whereby I can deduct an amount already received/invoiced?
sometimes Om tyint to contact the XERO support thought the online  form, and It would be very handy to add some screenshots so I can make my case clear.
So my question is how can I manage my personal transaction for the business so that they add to the expenses of the company?
They add all the information required to register a fixed asset, except what is this Asset Type box?
Can you please add the ability to select the day for a balance sheet versus only a month.
You can only add a line at the end.
Is this a difficult feature to add as it would certainly save us some pain.
Furthermore, I have the add-on workflowmax which is a good example of what I'm looking for but it only works for jobs.
a) How do I firstly add the money coming in as clearly it isn't a sale?
In tracking, how do I add a job number with a sub category?
What is the maximum amount of inventory items that we can store in Xero, without an add-on?
Any idea / add-on to remedy this problem?
There are so many add-ons, so many solutions and so little time.
Is there a shortcut to adding a line to a journal entry without having to mouse down to the add new line button?
More details here on our blog: Any feedback or comments on the app, or about reconciling on the go, please add them below.
Would consider using an add-on from Xero partners as well.
HiPayroll is not working it comes up with no payroll history and when you go to add a payrun it is not responding
How do we add employer top-up super payments (not the SCG) to employees who have previously worked with us?
Where in Xero do you add the APCA Id or the Direct Entry User Id?
I can only add the ORDINARY EARNINGS which i added after the fact and for some reason it was the only one in the drop down box?
How do I add this so it's a permanent addition please?
I was able to put in their opening balance's for each of their earnings rate, super & tax and the opening balance of their leave accruals however not the actual dollar value of the leave the have taken so their final payslip for the year is missing the dollar value of all the leave they have taken for the fin year while under the myob system,Can someone please advise how i add this info in?
I am also wondering if it would be possible to add notes for each days timesheet for what their shift entailed.
Do I add it as a deduction?
How will my end of year reports handle this if I do add it as a deduction?
I cannot do my staff pays until this is fixed as it will not let me add in their hours for Tuesday.
I cannot add an earnings line either, so can't work around not being able to edit.
I am about to go live with Xero on 1st July and was wondering if I can add a payroll number to the staff details in the Payroll program?
How do you add a days holiday if a worker worked on a stat day.
or is there an aftermarket add on someone could recommend that will do this?
Has anyone had to set up or add an employee with a SMSF?
under payroll settings i am trying to create a new calendar, when i click add calendar nothing is happening/responding.
I am based in UK and one of my employees is based in USA, How do I add him to payroll?
Are there any plans to add this facility on ?
But I can not see how to add her timesheet to her details?
Has anyone had to add SSP on a payrun?
What app or add on do we use that is relevant for gallery stock and will operate on the 2nd hand margin scheme.
Has anyone used a Xero Add-on app for both "Budgeting/Forecasting and Reporting" that enables "Cash Based Accounting"?
Is there any add-on/system that can deal with this?
com/ to see if there is an add on ?
Also is there any app to add intercompany journals feature?
Looking for a direct store delivery (DSD) add on for Xero.
I suggest separating time-tracking add-ons into programs that are primarily HR oriented and programs that are primarily billing oriented.
I have seen this capability in NetSuite OpenAir; but have not been able to find it in any add-on for Xero so far.
Is there a customer service portal add on for Xero?
Can anyone recommend a Xero add-on for a pub in the UK?
I am looking for an add-on that allows negative stock / Drop shipping.
Can anyone recommend an add in which will enable GL detailed transaction reports to show supplier name as a separate field?
is there any add on that will do this?
It's great you have an add-on for Azure AD for Xero now (https://azure.
Hello,I am looking for Xero add-on inventory control system.
What I want to do with add-on is control inventory in several warehouses including ordering.
Can anyone share their experiences ( both positive and negative) from using any of the CRM add-ons?
Any suggestions for another 'add on' provider that we could be looking at to provide this service or perhaps other alternatives?
Any other Ebay/Xero users have any suggestions or ideas of how they successfully use 'add ons' and/or manage your business with integration's?
I am looking for an add-on that mirrors this.
Is there an add-on out there that provides the dynamic reports of QBD's "Sales by Customer Detail"?
Can anyone recommend a relatively inexpensive add on that only needs 2 x licenses .
On a more advanced level: Xero would be able to perform budget check in the background as part of the approval process Would anyone be able to advise if there is any add on for this functionality.
HelloI am looking for an inventory add on that has these features.
I would welcome any comments or advice from people who have had experience in using any add-ons in relation to Online retailers.
Can someone recommend a payroll add-on that will be willing to customize/work with us to create a specific payroll for Papua New Guinea.
Is there an inventory add on that would allow us to appropriately deal with both hires and sales of stock and track this across the locations?
I am currently looking for an add on to Xero for a Pharmaceutical distributor who is currently using Sage Accpac.
Looking for 3rd party that can easily and affordable customize a Purchase Order; for multi store retailer so can write purchase orders to vendors that will allow us to add style/color/size without having to type in line by line for every variation.
I have always used Sage Line 50 and the aforementioned functionality was standard so I am wondering a) why Xero have failed to implement what I consider to be a fundamental feature and more importantly b) what the best add-on is.
What would be the best add-on?
Basically we build kitchens/cabinets from MDF board, screws, handles, brackets, runners etc, then we add labour, installation and freight costs.
All of the forecasting add ons that I can find take existing Xero trading data and simply expand on this.
HelloMy client is looking for an add-on to Xero for creating dockets for a green-waste dumping operation.
Is there any add-on out there that would provide this sort of information?
Our existing integration with Shopify is 5-star rated Xero Add on.
Questions1) What would be the best "Add On" for the purposes of preparing P&L Statement for each of the job?
Has anyone used either of these add-ons?
Is anyone aware of such an add-on or are they dreaming?
Can anyone suggest an add-on?
Can anyone recommend an add-on which they use, or advise on something similar?
Can this be done automatically in xero or with an add on?
Do you use any add ons?
I cannot see how to add the GST component to the property management fee (and show it on the management statement).
HiJust wanted to get some feedback/comments/experiences on what is recommended as an add on for the hair salon industry.
What do people recommend and the pros & cons of the add on.
I can't find anything in the Add Ons list.
I am looking at an add-on reporting tool.
Has anyone had experience with a Xero Add-On for Petrol Service Stations in Aus called OzBiz Solutions?
Has anyone come across an add-on for taking care of intercompany journals?
Trying to determine what is the best combination of add-ons for an IT consultancy/development company.
You can sign up to the add-on by visiting http://www.
It also nolonger appears in the directory of add ons.
For more information, you can see the add-on here http://www.
co. uk/fx where you can sign up and start using the add-on.
I run a car bodyshop and am wondering what is the best add-on/front end to use with Xero, are any of you out there using it running a bodyshop?
None of the existing Xero approved add-ons can handle the day-to-day management of a hotel and thus we've broadened our search - in the process coming across Hotelogix.
Although Hotelogix are not listed as an approved add-on partner on Xero.
Has anyone had experience with Sky Street Retail and being an Add-On to Xero?
I liked the sound of this Add-on where you can use the one application for AP Bills (including having scanned images of the document) and also for managing your expense claims and Customer/Debtor Management.
I am looking for an add on for a POS System for a newsagency.
Can anyone recommend a job/ invoicing add-on for Xero for a Chauffeur business?
Can anyone recommend a stock control add-on to Xero, please.
Is anyone aware of a cloud based Xero add on that could perform this (pretty simple) role for us.
Would you recommend any other add ons?
And also which debtors add-on do you prefer?
Is there an add-on which would smooth the admin for either/both parts of the business?
I am looking for a sales add on for Xero.
Are there any add-ons specifically for dentists?
I have a client in the transport industry who has asked if there is an add-on to xero that would produce a consignment note for him.
I can't see anything in the add-on directory.
Can anyone suggest an add-on (or two) that would be simple but meet our needs please?
I would be interested in finding out what add-ons are suitable for a fairly large firm of solicitors who are looking into Xero as a possible solution for their accounting needs.
I am looking at moving to Xero, but only if I can get an inventory add-on that works for us.
Is MenuMate an add on for Xero?
Any add-on suggestions?
any suggestions what inventory add on to use that integrates with Xero that supports a multi-level bill of materials?
I am looking to add the above and wondered what add ons others are using and what their experience is?
Can anyone recommend an add-on application to manage a motor dealership that integrates with Xero for a small retail & wholesale car yard.
Looking at an add-on for Xero for a hire business.
Was wondering if there is any EDI Messaging add-on readily available with Xero.
Anyone have any suggestions as to payroll services or add-ons to XERO.
Any Add-ons for managing Horses
Any suggestions of a suitable add-on that would work with Xero to do this.
I am completely overwhelmed with all the different add-ons and what they all do so can't make a decent evaluation and recommendation to the business owner.
I am trying to find a Add On for Xero, which is a VERY simple CRM.
Are there any other Add-ons that might work?
What is your favourite Xero Add-on?
There is an add on for this?
I nearly purchased an add on to assist but refused to do that as Xero should provide a one stop shop.
There is an add on for debt collection ?
Expense Categories in ioS app is not showing when option to add multiple receipts is used.
I was assured by Xero staff that the add-on only accesses relevant information, but I there is an issue of transparency here.
Can anyone please recommend a payroll add-on that is not too expensive?
If they’re no longer relevant, unvote and add them elsewhere.
I love Xero and can't wait to see what updates and features they will add next!
##### CLUSTER 12 #####
Hi all,A quick question I am hoping someone can please help with.
Hi there, would be grateful for any help!
Hi thereSomething has gone very wrong, so I hope someone could help me understand how this has happened and how I can sort this out.
Hi,I'd be really thankful for any help on this.
Hi, I am hopeful that someone can help me fix a problem of my own creation.
Hi all,I have a small issue I am sure someone can help me with.
Hi, Can anyone help me with this scenario:We are a study abroad business.
HI fellow Xeroniansi am having a bit of trouble and aim hoping someone out there can help me.
Hi,Could anyone help me?
Hi all,I am wondering if there is an accountant out there who is able to help me with the tax implications (as a Sole Trader)?
Hi everyone,Could someone help me see how come I cannot import the following file?
Hi AllI can not locate my query in the forum - if someone can help.
Hi there - can anyone help me?
Hi there,I am hoping someone can help me identify if I have set up my payroll incorrectly.
Hi,Can anyone help me with Annual Leave loading 17.
Hi,We have an employee ”Mandip”, his balance leaves are showing under the heading employees<time off at  the end of year 2016 – 4 hrs Now, On his January payslip, accrual leaves should be 204 but it shows 200, can you please help us to get the correct info on his payslip.
##### CLUSTER 13 #####
What is the best way to treat part of this sale being treated as funds introduced by owner A?
Is there a way?
If it is limited to 100, is there another way to track for example over 100 properties to be able to do a profit and loss?
Is there a way to still manage this in the system?
Is there a way of doing this?
Is there a way to fix the opening balance against the inventory?
What is the best way to do this?
Is there a way to set this as a recurring expense or is it matter of me expensing the costs manually every month?
Is there a simple way of doing this?
What is the best way to handle this?
Is there any way of doing this?
Also, is it possible to have leave balances to be linked to reports, in the same way say, "superannuation entitlements" is linked?
Is there any other way of sending reminders that a monthly amount is due from a package.
Is there no way to show the expenses that have not been approved yet?
Is there any way of separately showing net profit BEFORE tax (and having the Corporation Tax expense sitting between net profit BEFORE tax and net profit AFTER tax?
What is the best way for me to reconcile those charges?
Is there any way I can undo this?
Is there a way to remove them?
Is there a way round this?
There is no way I could send it to a customer.
And if so, what is the best way to settle the left over amount?
What am I doing wrong or what is the right way to do this?
I am wondering, If there is a way to remove this VAT recorded.
If so, what is the quickest way to do this?
Is there an easy way to fix this?
What would be the best way to reconcile this?
What is the correct way to set all of this up?
I am wondering what the best way to administer this is.
Is there a way to reverse this and have this transaction reconciled the way it was originally?
I understand the logic of total cash in and out so maybe there is way of seeing net sales and purchases on the dashboard?
Is this possible, and if so, what's the best way to achieve this?
So what is the correct way of doing this?
Is there any way to turn this on?
Is there a way to customize Reference (i usually use that to specify the service period that is being charged) ?
Any way to globally stop this being carried?
What is the best way to do this?
Is there any way to rectify this?
Is there a way I can undo this?
Is there any way to create an aged statement, with outstanding balances summarised by month?
Or is there any way we can track the income and expenses PER FLIGHT by putting in the flight number somewhere?
Is there any possible way to revalue the inventory without passing an inventory adjustment.
Can anyone make sense of this and recommend  the easiest way to notate the Q3 scenario above?
Anyone else have a good way to do this?
Is there any way to import a CSV file that can post a whole month of transfers in one transaction?
Is there an easier way to accomplish this?
This is a bit of an insidious problem because the only way to see that the balance is incorrect is to compare with the paper statement.
What is the best way to deal with this recall?
Would anyone be able to throw in some suggestions on what is the best way to deal with this?
Is there a way around this as the feed hasn't been refreshed now for 2 weeks so have a lot of catching up to do already.
Is there any way you can type in a sum to calculate GST (eg .
Is there a way to revise your depreciation rates on specific assets without rolling back depreciation?
Is there a better way to manage what I am doing?
or what is the best way to go about this?
So perhaps I have this wrong and there is actually a way to do these things.
As we are a small Company, red tape and long processes are really not an option but there must be a better way?
Is there a way to select checks to deposit, so I'm not calculating myself?
I was wondering if there is any way to track the remaining balance of the PO.
Is there any specific way people would recommend?
Or is there a better way to manage the two?
I can't see any other way of doing this.
/What's the best way to do this.
Has anyone had experience with a similar situation and what was the best way to go about it?
If so what would be the best way to handle it
My question is - now that I'm paying a mortgage instead of rent, how would this scenario change (if at all) & what would be the best way to reconcile this?
What is the best way to keep track of them and allocate them to the differed projects?
Is there any way I can do this?
Is this the right way to go with this or can you recommend another solution.
In which case what would be the more suitable way of coding these?
What is the best way to deal with this situation?
Is there a faster way?
Is there any better way of dealing with this?
What is the normal way to deal with services such as tolled roads and public transport, which require advance payments before the actual charging occurs?
What is the best way to input this transaction so I can decrease inventory and owner draw?
What's the best way of handling this please?
Is there a way to set up the recurring money transfer?
Is there a better way of handling this?
Is there are better process to use rather than Expense Claims or is there some way to still have a record of the items purchased appear in Purchases and still process a refund to myself?
Is there a better/more-standard way of doing this?
Is there another way?
Or is there a better way?
I have been entering it as a spend money overpayment transaction, but was wondering if there was a more elegant and streamline way to do this.
Is anyone aware of a way I can retrospectively change this or an i stuck with that figure?
It is highly likely that I have way overcomplicated this.
Is there a way to change this setting?
Is there another way to create a single deposit consisting of multiple checks?
Is there any way to get the statement final balance to actually say  "Credit Balance" $100 ?
Is there a way of doing this I am not aware of.
Is there a way to designate money for an upcoming expense so it is not spent?
I assumed there would be a simple way of cancelling everything so those figures don't get included in my VAT and Income reports.
There is no way to bulk approve, which seems ridiculous.
I cannot imagine larger companies with more staff do it this way, it would take forever.
Is there a way i can post an expense directly to a GL code?
What is the best way around this issue.
What is the proper way to record this?
Is there a much better way of doing this than my hatchet job?
Is there a way to solve this?
Please can someone tell me the easiest way to resolve this situation.
Any way around this?
What's the best way to go about reconciling these?
Should I be creating a Credit Note for the renewable energy generated (no GST is included) or is there another way?
)What's the recommended way to do this?
Is there any way that I can change this?
I have a unique contract type, where I am obligated to track 50% of the revenue I get, and spend it in a certain way.
Is there ANY way to unpublish so my GST is correct?
Any way to schedule payments subject to these two constraints?
What is the best way to go about this?
Other than clicking on each one and editing the transaction is there a way I can do this quickly?
If I disposed of these in the normal way, wouldn't this create a double entry?
Anybody have anybody advice the best way to do this or what category to put it under or even what best to call it?
Or is there an easier way?
According to everything I have read there is no way of quickly doing this?
Is there any way round this please?
And what's the best way to handle it?
Can anyone advise the correct way to process this from a bookkeeping perspective?
What is the best way to do this?
or is there perhaps an easier way?
Because of the multiple fees involved with Amazon, and the bulk transfer at the end of a period - I can't yet see an easy way to do this - any suggestions?
what would be the best way to deal with this please and the steps.
Is there another way I can handle this entry?
Any ideas what the best way of doing this is?
Is there any way we can use separate sequence for both ?
I’ve started this page so we can get a discussion going on the best way to treat dividends .
I’ve started this page so we can get a discussion going on the best way to treat dividends in the .
Is this by way of a credit?
What is the best way to track which company is earning / paying money?
I guess my question then is which of these approaches would be best or is there another way that I haven't thought of which would be even better?
Is there a way to square this all up without having to delete all the credit card merchant payments?
Is there some way to manually change the opening or closing balance?
HiJust wondering if there is a way to put comments in the budget?
Is there any way to unlock this?
Can anyone advise of the best way to make the adjustment?
Is there a quicker way to double check?
What is the proper way of doing this?
Is there any way to do this?
Is there a quick way, cash coding?
or is there a way of reversing.
Hello,Some of my clients set up direct debit and I am assuming that they will keep on paying that way.
Is there a way to change this?
Is there an easier way to refund someone's purchase that will reverse the funds on the date of the refund.
Is there any way I can "clean" it up.
Is there a better way?
Obviously capital income is not a sale so what's the best way to record it.
Is there any way to do this?
Is there a way of filtering these out?
Is there a way to roll back changes made?
Should I simply manually edit the Instalment Activity Statement or is there a way to correct this elsewhere?
What is the best way to deal with it?
Is there a way to avoid "double" entry?
Or is there any way which fits with accounting standards to somehow collect it?
What is the quickest way to apply this when reconciling, assuming the $25 difference has to go to an expense code?
Has anyone come across this issue or can suggest any way to deal with this?
Is there a quicker way?
Is there any way to edit it?
Any way to get these negative balances moved from Assets to Liabilities?
Is there a way I can convert the original entry.
From what I gather the answer is no, but I would appreciate some advice if there is a more efficient way in dealing with this type of transaction.
Is there any way to do this?
What is the best way to do this?
Has anyone come across a better way?
Is there a way of stopping auth or worldpay batching the payments?
I use the new system and everything is worse that before - especially since there's no way to adjust the settings.
Is there a way to use your own email server so that the "From" address doesn't look suspect?
Is there a better way of doing this that can reflect the VAT element naturally?
Is there a correct way to record this?
What is the best way to do this?
Is there a way to undo the import without going through each individual transaction?
What is the best way of allocating this?
Is there any way of doing this please?
Can anyone advise the best way to reconcile this?
Is there a way to do this when I enter the bill or put it in the recurring bill?
What is the proper way to record all of this?
Is there a different way to accomplish the root of the goal i outlined above?
Can you please advise the best way to  tackle this transaction?
What's the best way to do this?
What is the best way of doing this as we're not going to be paying the mileage expense as it's been covered by the fuel receipts?
Is this approach sound or is there a better way?
Is there a quick way of doing this?
I have spent a reasonable amount of time trying to work out how I can do this but haven't found any concrete way.
Is there a video for setting up VAT rates part way through the financial year?
Is there any way to do this?
1% my question is, what is the best way to record the credit card surcharge please?
Or is there a way I've not thought of?
Is there any way of working around this?
is there a way of getting rid of this as it looks very confusing on the reports which I was going to send to the accountant.
Is there a quick way of writing these off, or do I have to apply each credit which will take agesmany thanksMegan
Is there a more elegant way?
Is this the best way to go or is there another option?
What is the proper way to code these?
My questions are:Other users - has anyone found a way around this?
Other than going through the inventory list and adding it to the description is there a way round this?
What is the best way to handle entering product shipments that I have already bought and paid for?
What would be the best way to record an expense that's part personal, part business?
What is the best way to get the correct sales figures that SHOULD have been reported to ATO.
Can I do this or is there a way around this?
What is the Best way to reconcile this error?
Is there a way to make it work?
What is the correct way to setup this asset and corresponding loan?
Am I missing something or is there an easier way to figure this out?
Is there a better way of doing it?
If i enter all my expenses is there a way  that i can see how much each job is costing separately if there is more than one project running at any one time.
Can anyone suggest a neat way around this that won't leave our books looking messy?
Is there a way to set the default list view to NEWEST to OLDEST instead of OLDEST to NEWEST?
What's the easiest way to deal with this?
What is the best way to write this off?
Is there a quick way to record these payments?
What is the best way to remove the VAT on these two entries?
The trouble is that there doesn't seem to be a way to show upcoming payments off the credit card.
Any way to do that?
What is the best way to distinguish those customers?
Is there a way around this or should I do a refund to the centre and then they can write a new cheque to the correct centre.
What is the neatest way to solve this?
Is this a bad way to go about things?
Or any easier way?
That way I make my 'Money going out'  into the future on the Dashboard as accurate as I can.
I have tried searching and lots of other things but not been able to find a way to do this.
Is there a way of keeping the quotes out of the the numbering system?
I'm wondering what the best way is to record postage charged to the customer.
Obviously it can be done individually, but I have too many customers to do it that way.
What is the best way to reconcile and to confirm those figures are correct?
What is the best way to process the monthly instalments so that the finance company balance is reduced every month?
MYOB Premier is not meant to cope with these volumes, and there is no way to purge inventory – the list will only get bigger.
I must be missing something here because I'm sure there must be a way to do this!
Is there a quicker way I've not though of?
What is the best way to reconcile this and create a refund
Is there a quick way to see the address of a customer when entering an address?
Has anyone else experienced this issue and worked out a way to deal with it.
Is there a straightforward way of getting there?
Is there a way to reinstate this functionality?
There is the Partner, Senior Accountant (Manager) and a Junior Accountant (Accountant) and currently there is no visual way for our admin staff or Partners to see that a Junior accountant is working on a client.
At the moment there is no way of recording that the submission has been sent which could lead to duplication of reported information.
Is there a way to specify a tolerance range, i. e. +/- &#163;0.
Unfortunately there is currently no placeholder for this and therefore no way to automate getting this into the email.
Is there another way?
Is there a way the staff member can create a prepayment by check for our customers without having standard access?
This can result in being pennies off one way, or the other.
This is a most useful way to pick up contractor payments for payroll tax purposes.
Annoying that it is structured the way it is.
In fact any page that has that sorting option should automatically go that way.
Any chance of enabling a way to rename a link we are sending?
Is there any way this can be improved?
Can there be a way to view budgets on the app.
Could a Cash Basis checkbox be provided or is there some other way of reporting this?
Is there a way to enter amortisation payments for loans without using the "copy"  option?
That way, the user can decide which profiles to link to social media or to show in public searches.
Is there any way we could have reminders inserted against sub-contractors for renewal of their statutory insurances?
Is there any way we can filter out some category when running reports?
Is there a way to amend the page so you can reintroduce the ability to copy/paste from it?
Is there any way of having files/folders which can be used for storing previous year/years historical information?
Is there a way to retain them so it makes it faster to start next time.
It would be very useful if there was a way of splitting the pages in the inbox.
This way you can see instantly the approximate cash flow situation.
Whichever way I seem to do this, it results in incorrect figures on profit and loss or balance sheet.
Is there a way (or could there be) of adding info to a contact about contract renewal/cancellation dates, e. g. utility companies?
Any way to fix this?
Hopefully a way to do this already exists and my research is lacking, but if not is there a more suitable workaround?
Is there any way that the clients email address can be logged as the person accepting the quote or making the comment.
Is there a way to ensure they see details on all emails (without having to download the pdf)?
comis there any easy way to make these blue to stand out for a hyper link?
"Is there a way to implement this throughout the software?
Is there a way I can disable it or extend the time?
Unfortunately there is no way for the "reports" function to allow me to drill down this information.
That way we can bring the relevant entries onto the first page.
When it comes to preparing the statements for each division there is no easy way to filter this.
Is there any way to disable published reports from showing decimals?
Or maybe there’s already a way of doing that and I'm doing something wrong, is that the case?
Some simple performance graphs would be a great way to connect with the numbers.
Currently, there is apparently no way to change this.
Is there a way of having multiple receipts appear in one "receipt" when doing in on the app?
Has anyone else had this problem and found a way to resolve it.
Is there a way to set quotes to be Tax Inclusive?
Is there an easy way to transfer that info into the employee contacts area so that I can see all there contact info when out and about from my phone app?
I will do it manually if I have to but hoping there was an easy way I was missing.
Costs should work the other way around - if actual spend is less than budget then this is a positive variance.
Is there a way to change it or a workaround?
Is there a quick way to fix it for a specified period ie.
The answer was that there was a way but  haveing seen it it is not easy!
Is there any way around this without having to upgrade to a full business editions?
Can anyone suggest a way of doing this please?
This would give clients a very quick way of seeing how profitable their business is and the amounts of monies owed and owing.
Is there a simple way of doing this.
It would be good if such a log in had the ability to lock the data in such a way that the period under audit can't be changed.
When preparing 2014 budgets I was surprised to find (well not find actually) that there was no way for me to change and save the layout as I can in the income statement reports.
Currently there is only the option for:x days after bill datexth of the current monthxth of the following month So there is no way to set 60 days from end of month.
This way bills cannot accidentally be entered as sales and vice versa.
This might be more a feature request: is there a way to apply a different rule to the one picked up.
Unless there is currently another way?
Is there no way to get these back?
Is there any way we can set up the allowance without KiwiSaver being calculated.
Well, apparently there's one small detail getting in the way of actually making this work.
Is this a feature that is on the way?
Please tell me there is a way to enter all this information easily ?
Is there any way to change on the back end or through my financial adviser?
Is there a way we could automate this rather than having to change each asset in the pool.
Requesting the option to in some way brand each company page.
At the moment there is no way to track who has approved or rejected an employees leave request.
All I can see are options for weekly, 4 weekly, monthly etc and can't see any way to set up a calendar that matches our periods.
Is there some way that I can only have the base hourly amount ( - 1.
US Payroll - There is currently no way to track an employee advance.
Is there any way to customise employees daily hours if they do not work a standard 7.
This is a very serious privacy issue as there is no way to password protect the payslip PDF.
What is the best way to do this?
Is there a way to break down the bill between what has already been accrued and what has not?
What would be the best way of doing this?
That way the customers can see how far behind payments they are.
Or is there another way to accomplish what I want?
Is there a way to remove it using the API?
Is this by design or is there a way to allow this.
Can anyone advise if there's any way round this please?
Is there a way to define the preferred date format?
Is there a way I can enter these "Spend Money" items when I am entering it as a "New Receive Money" entry?
Is there a way of including the country information in the feed from PayPal, so I can see at a glance where the customer is from?
This cannot be unusual but is there a speedy way of handling it?
Is there a way to enter an Item in my inventory in the "what is it for" area?
The only way I have found is to reverse the disposal of an asset so that there is always something available to get it up to date.
Is there any way to get the VAT to be included in the cost of goods?
Is there a way to solve it?
Can anyone confirm which way it is?
Basically I am struggling to setup the right way to store all the info so i can reconcile correctly.
Maybe I do something wrong or there is some way to make a refund for my case, other than over CreditNote?
Is there a way to fix the start date somehow?
Is there a way for me to reconcile the transaction with the overpayment?
If not, what is the best way to handle this?
Is there any way we can do this?
Is there any way for me to track down this issue?
A friend of mine uses QuickBooks which appears to set things up in the same way.
Is there a way to change the start and end date of the VAT return to fit our needs?
Is there an easier way?
Is there a way to filter line items to remove the shipping charge?
Reason - This way i am hoping public holidays will be included in annual leave calculation.
What would be the best way to go about doing this?
What's the right way of dealing with this?
Is there any way of removing an individual receipt from a processed claim?
Is there a way to bulk remove all payments?
Has anyone found a way to select ONLY those contacts with no Contact Group?
Is there any way to achieve this?
Is there a way of copying these across simply?
At present there is no simple way of correcting this.
Is there a way to create a custom docx receipt?
Is there any way to correct this?
Is there any way to adjust the back end controlled journals in general?
Is there any way to get around this issue?
Or if there is another way I can substantiate the variance.
I'm confused about how the multi-currency functionality relates to the way my business works.
Is there a way to setup an option to automatically run the depreciation on fixed assets on a regular basis (i. e. , monthly)?
If this isn't an "appropriate way"  of doing this, I'd be interested in knowing the accounting reason why.
Is there a way to return it against the original spent transaction?
Or is there another way?
Anyone had the issue and is there a way to fix it ?
What would be the easiest way of doing this?
Is there an easier way to go about this?
Is there a way to reduce it to two?
Is there a way to make it more accessible?
Failing that is there another way of generating the desired result?
Is there no way to do this without copying the Contact Person's name to the attention field?
Is there a better way to accomplish this so the expense detail matches the printed receipt?
Is there a way of combining them for presentation purposes within Dashboard?
OrIs there some other easy way to edit the contact person name?
Could you advise if there is an easier way of doing this please?
Is there any way round this/ what is the quickest way of fixing this?
Could anyone advise me a better way to do this?
Is there any way to do this in the app as well?
Is there a way of editing this once the transaction has been reconciled - without undoing everything and having to re enter everything again?
Or is there an easier way to change them without inputting again?
Is there a way to show either the budget figures for the month or the Actual to date.
I entered them all the same way, so I can't figure out why I can't get the others to appear.
Is there any way I can have this person removed and take over asap?
So I am wondering if there is any easier, one off way to reconcile with the total amount outstanding in unpaid expense claims?
Maybe someone is aware of a way to do this already, but support say there is currently not and have emailed their Product Team.
Is there a way to delete them?
Can someone throw some idea's our way to explain what is happening?
Is there a way to remove the expected date before I save the note?
Is there a way of checking this without having to open up each individual transaction logged?
Also, is there a way to enter expense claims on an employee's behalf?
This way I can at least start to work with the past data.
Is there a way round this?
By the way, I'm in the UK and I've never heard of 'Yodlee'.
Is there any other way of going about it?
Is there a way that this can be populated from a value set in the API?
There is no way to change the contact or go back to "all" contacts.
Anyone found a way around this?
Is there a way to pick up both columns of data?
Is there any way to remove it?
Is there a way to get Contact ID on the export?
What is the best way of doing this?
What's the best way to do that?
If not, is there another way to preserve continuity?
very clever :-)Is there a way I can set up all future Paypal payments as a rule to avoid the who and what in reconcile at all?
If not, is there another way that would make the reconciliation process easier?
What is the fastest / easiest way to record cash payments?
I do not think there is a way but I may be wrong?
Is there any reason as to why I do not treat my NatWest credit card in the same way as other suppliers?
Is there a quick way of doing this?
Is there an easy way to get around this?
Is there a way of eliminating the late claims that have actually already been claimed?
I cannot really see a way of doing this unless I am missing something.
What is the easiest way to deal with variations of the same product.
Is there any way to quickly change them all to expense?
This looks messy and is difficult to find the right item from the drop downIt seems the way around this is to enter a simple code into `Item code` with nothing in the `Item name' section.
Is there a way to repeat this common transaction?
What would be the best way to record the escrow for payments?
What's the best way to do this?
What is the best way to handle this?
Is there another way I could send them an 'outstanding balance' each month?
Wondering if there is a better way.
What I want:An easy way to create the split transaction that doesn't involve me manually calculating payments/totals etc.
Only to have to wait and do it all again,  Is there a way to save it.
or could you make a way to save it.
Is there any way to get the data that I want without having to export it to a spreadsheet and manipulate it on my own?
Is there a way of doing this without having to refer the customer to the online quote?
So is there any way to switch that over?
And is there a way to override this duplicate flagging?
Is there a way to import bills for day to day work?
HelloIs there any way to customise a receipt that gets sent to customers when I do batch deposit.
Or an alternative way of processing deposits.
So I wrote a guide on how to complete this conversion the simple way.
Is there any way I can track the amount of work being done?
Has anyone else saved receipts for business purchases this way?
What's this used for and is there any way of preventing these occuring.
OK so my question is if there is a way for me to remove the Customer & Supplier groups that I'm not using?
Unfortunately there is no way to do this as the formats are not matching.
Is this possible in any way?
Can anybody tell me the best way to set this up?
I can't see an obvious way of adjusting the input GST rate.
Is there a way without manually doing it?
Is there a way to setup jobs/sub-customers under a parent customer?
But there is no way to split the transfer accordingly.
Is there any way to increase the resolution/dpi of receipts captured?
Is there a way to allocate expenses for a specific?
Is there a way to batch reconcile.
Is there a simpler way?
Is there another way to deal with this?
Is there any way this can be fixed?
Is there a way for that amount to be reflected on the payroll summary for 2016/17 financial year?
Is there any way I can edit these in one go, rather than having to edit these individually, which is SUPER SLOW and somewhat irritating.
Is there a way to align these two so manual intervention isn't required?
Is there a way I can allocate these amounts to the correct location?
Anyone agree, or got an easier way?
The only way I can get 1.
Is there a better way as i dont want to show it on the payslip?
Is the process I have outlined above the only way to proceed or is there an alternative that is more appropriate/efficient?
Is there a way to fix this?
What is the best way to process this through payrollThanks for your helpDebra
Is there another way?
Is there any easy way to do this, rather then set up each payrun seperately and issue payslips?
I can't see anything in the setup which would link these payments that way
Is there any way of changing this permanently so I don't have to manually change it every week?
Is there a setting to change this or another way to deal with it without converting the leave accrued at 8 hours back to 7.
Is there a way to approve the Christmas Break leave for all employees at once (For those Eligible), or do you have to enter it individually for each employee, which is very time consuming with large payrolls?
What would be the best way to get rid of the accrued sick leave hours from the last time?
As this date is not included in the selection dates and I cant revert is there some other way of doing this.
What is the best way to fix this error?
Any Australian users out there have any suggestions on how they calculate payroll tax monthly, and/or if there is a way to separate Leave Loading from Annual Leave (as not all our employees receive leave loading).
Is there some way to manually correct this?
Is this a way we can do it and  if so how can I set this up?
I was wondering if there is a way around, other than having to download the PDFs, edit and manually emailing them.
Is there a way to import all employees from one entity to another?
Is there another way?
Is there a way I can have this automatically adjusted if I select "Unpaid leave" in the future?
However their wages should be tracked to a job and I can't find a way to do it under Payroll Settings
How would we do that or is there a better way?
Is there any way to delete these or edit?
What is the best way to deal with this please.
Is there a way to get this done so I can stop using so many different leave types?
When 'Wages Payable' is not zero, indicating you have over/under paid an employee, what is the quickest way to find which employee has been paid incorrectly?
Is there a way I can see a breakdown of super paid, outstanding or upcoming?
Is there any way around other than journals?
Is there any way I can create payslips in February and then allocate the EFT payments to these?
Is there any way we can mannually put in the wages expenses to make them show in the P&L?
Is this currently an option, or is there a way to manage this better?
Is there a way I can print out all the payslips for an individual for a certain period?
Is there any easy way to fix this?
Hello,Is there any way to modify or revert back to the old payslip design/format.
Is there any way I can get to this?
Hello there,Is there a way, that I can disable the Timesheet tab from the employee portal?
Is there any way I can Create an Approved Bill rather than a draft bill from the Payroll section?
Surely there is a better way?
Any way to do that easily ?
For "B", I can see in the opening balances tab an option to set some leave opening balances, and I assume that if I change the date I can correct things that way.
Is there any way or removing this?
It is sitting there under "Leave" in the particular employees section but there seems to be no way of doing anything to it?
Is there a way for the employee with lots of leave, to transfer leave to the other one?
Also, Is there a way for the employee to insert the amount on the timesheet screen or do we have to do it when we run payroll?
Is there a way around this?
Although there is an After Tax Deduction category, there is no way to set up the maximums we are allowed to deduct (ie:  no more than 25% or 50% of net).
As far as I've been able to determine, there is no way to do City income tax.
Is there any way to do this?
Is there a way for me to set them up as such and avoid withdrawing taxes from the payments?
Is there a way of doing this?
is there any way this can be corrected?
If there is no other way .
Is there a way of doing this ?
Am I missing something or should I approach this in a different way to ensure his P60 will be correct at the end of the year?
They are going to work again this summer, but I can't find any way to reinstate their employment.
The only way I can get April to show it to select the bottom month (August) then to keep reselecting the bottom month until April appears again.
Is there any way to A) Change the hourly rate to a day rate on payslips?
Is there some way of editing the payroll journal that is automatically posted when the payroll run is processed?
Is there any way to revert to this setup rather than have the full blown payroll?
Is there a simpler way to explain this to the client to allow him to pass onto his staff members?
Is there any way to align YTD amount on payslip with what the employee has earned to date?
Trustworks is a better way to manage trusts, developed in New Zealand for New Zealanders.
Is there any way around from importing smartlist each time?
At the moment the only way I can see would involve a manual check of each bill coming in against the PO.
Can anyone share with me the best way to integrate with either or both.
Can I set this in Expensify in any way?
Or is there a totally better way to set this up?
Is there an easier way to fix these?
Is there a way to trigger this?
But is there a way to also import inventory items?
Is there any easy way to change this?
What is the best way of going about that?
This way you won't mess up your own accounting records trying to figure out how the integration works.
Any one in similar line of work and have a great way of managing things?
Is that the only way?
I would think there is a simpler way.
Is there any way I can push them through as spend money items rather than Draft Purchases?
What is the best way to accept deposits, track time, and then bill the time against those deposits?
I would welcome any advice about how to set up our system in a way which is the most cost effective but open for further improvement.
Is there not a way of synchronising them so this doesn't have to be done manually.
Or is there a way to automate the process?
Is there a way to do this and can it be added to the common formats?
So what is the best way to see where I stand regarding upcoming bills/expenses ?
Anyway is there a way to tell if I have sent a remittance for a supplier bill I have paid?
If we could please have a simple way to upload a check register.
Community Forum - Is there a way to see which threads you have looked at?
Some missing support emails and two weeks of waiting, the faceless voiceless support team is telling me there is no way to roll back after my short lived experiment.
Is there any way they can be marked sent 'en masse'?
There is no other way to describe this but stupid.
There is no other way to describe this but stupid.
Keys to the Kingdom and a way that a disgruntled soon to be quitting employee can right royally screw things up!
Since the latest Fixed asset upgrade there is no longer a link in fixed assets to the IRD depreciation rates and there is also no way to upload a document to the fixed asset purchased as we have in the past.
Is there a way I can customise this to my needs?
Is there a way to fix this?
For the love of God please fix this and put it back the way it was or at least explain what is going on.
##### CLUSTER 14 #####
Would I reconcile them as dividends (owner drawings in Xero) or would I be able reconcile them in another way?
Is there any way we can get this clients with email address from Xero.
Is there a way that I can do this in Xero?
Is there a way to track how much of a client's PO has been billed through Xero?
What is the best way to record this in Xero?
What is best way to do this in Xero so that the project shows the income from the club, and there is a corresponding expense showing for the Club?
How would be the best way of showing this in Xero to make sure the book-keeping is kept correctly?
What's the best way to achieve this with Xero?
-Is there any way that we can insert the opening balance in XERO in the middle of use.
Any way I can get this out of Xero?
But in this case there is no way to document the fees and other cost in xero that are associated with Amazon.
What is the best way to code this discount in Xero?
Is there a better way to accomplish our goals with Xero.
Is there any way to replicate this in XERO.
Hello,Has anyone else found a good way to use Xero for a business that receives its income as monthly Direct Debit payments?
What is the best way to process this in Xero to reflect this?
Is there a way to stop Xero updating the exchange rate?
What would be the best way to implement this in Xero?
What is the best way to do these reports (P&L and BS) in Xero.
What's the best way to record this in Xero?
What would be the best way to do this in Xero?
Can anyone advise what's the best way to enter this entry to Xero?
As we have the data on a spreadsheet, is there any way of importing it into Xero?
What's the best way of doing this with Xero if I want to set all these up to be recurring and automatic?
My Xero reconciliation is way out!
Please can you recommend the best way to handle ACC payments in Xero.
Is there any way I can configure Xero to the full current financial year (Jul-Jun) when producing the P&L.
In my attempt to go paperless, is there a way I could use Xero Touch for tracking receipts without them ending up as expenses?
What's the best way to record this in Xero, so that I can record the check number and the transfer of funds?
Is there any way I could collaborate into Xero adoption for Latvian market?
What is the best way to handle this in xero?
What is the proper way to record this on Xero?
Is there a way of exporting this data out of Xero?
In my mind that is reflected as:-Advertising DR           Inventory CRThe only way I can think of to deal with this in XERO is via a manual journal.
So, is there any way to do something similar in Xero?
In essence we are trying to understand the proper accounting workflow for such a transaction and then how that can be facilitated in Xero in the most automated way.
Is there a way to make Xero only reconcile 50% of a credit card transaction and ignore the other 50%.
What is it easiest way to post a VAT Fuel Scale charge into Xero?
Is there a way to convert a QuickBooks Online file directly to Xero?
CBA advised to contact Xero, wondering if there is a way around this to reduce the manual import process.
Either way I built a dynamic form that can accept variables form the page link and tried to use the XERO dynamic fields within the link.
Is there a way XERO will keep track of the items (descriptions) we enter in the BILL?
Consequently my balance in Xero is way WAY off.
What is the suggest way in recording these in Xero.
What is the simplest way to differentiate these things as being a different code when I enter them in Xero?
Any advice or thoughts on this would be welcome along with any comments from other companies who have to work in a similar way with their clients and how they overcome this issue when using Xero.
That way, we can keep tabs on how much hasn't been billed to us, and we can make adjustments for the GP figures in Xero.
Is there any way to change the accounting calendar in Xero?
Is there a way i can have  xero user related data added to the templates.
Anyone using Xero in this very minimal way?
What would be the best way to enter these customers into Xero?
Is there any way to solve this in Xero?
I was wondering if there was a better way of doing this in Xero, as it is a lot of manual data entry every week for every store!
When there is a comment in the discuss tab, there is no way of knowing if there is a possible match in Xero without clicking on each individual Match tab.
Although JBWere have advised they do not link with Xero, wondering if there is a way around this to reduce the manual import process.
There is no current way in Xero to customise the access so that an approver can only see their staff.
Is there any way to specify a range amount for the figure that Xero matches on when reconciling bills against statement lines?
Seems a really obvious omission to me: Xero is designed to facility devolved business structures but there is no easy way for the remote team members to collaborate at a fine detail level.
docx* templates these don't appear in the link included in the email to customers and it would be useful if Xero had a way of including some of this information.
In Xero, there is literally no way to see information this way.
I can't find any way to do this in Xero which is prohibitive to me.
This way, from the start Xero can calculate the correct amounts for write offs and end value very easily and automatically, with no workarounds by the users.
Is there any way to disable this functionality for their specific Xero organisation?
Previously we were able to search for a customer by any detail and miss this feature a lot, finding that we have to look back through old/other records as we frustratingly cannot search for them in any way other than by name on Xero.
There is no way between the two systems to adjust in WFM and then push the updated one through to Xero.
Is there any way to do this in Xero?
After discussing with customer service, there is no way to do an owner's draw via Xero Payroll.
Additionally, there is no way to do a direct deposit except through Xero Payroll.
Or is there a better way sending the data directly from my server to xero for example.
Is there any way I can replicate this, or get a similar result in Xero?
To date their appears no way I can clone/copy a Xero file in this manner.
Is tehre another way to contact xero support - how long would I wait before I would expect a responseThanksCC
There is no way to contact anyone other than support@xero.
I explained he can do this by going on the xero website and adding that way.
Is there a way for Xero to recognize these PAYG payments made on a monthly basis so that our 5A figure (or W2 figure) reflects payments made (outstandingW2) ?
Is there any way to file this as 1 complete return in xero.
Is there any way to do that sort of thing on Xero?
Is there other way to record in xero?
Is there a way to load this into Xero somehow so I dont have to type it all in by hand?
Is there a way in Xero to print a listing of who owed us money @ 30 June 2016?
Hello,My company is making a loan to another business and I was wondering what the best way to enter this into Xero is?
There's no way I can tell Xero that the 0.
Is there a way I can do this with the existing functionality in XERO?
Is there a way to adjust the way that Reports look in Xero?
From what I gather the only way to do this is to download reports from MYOB Essentials, convert them to csv and upload them to Xero.
Please Xero, could you provide the ability to view documents attached to supplier credit notes in the same way that those attached to bills can be viewed.
Can anyone think of another way in Xero?
what is the best way to set this up in xero?
Is there a way to properly reflect this in Xero?
Is there a way to alert clients from within their Xero a/c?
I can't find any way of doing that with Xero.
We can't relink through the API without 1st getting the contact number removed from Xero contact and so far we haven't found a way of doing this.
Is there an easy way of automatically converting this to the Xero import format / column layout?
What is the best way to include these in Xero?
Is there a way to solve this issue and get the data from Xero into Sage?
of days overdueIt seems there is no easy way to get the equivalent data out of Xero?
What is the best way the reconcile them both on Xero?
Is there a way you could only send them to the Xero Subscriber and Financial Advisors, rather than all Users?
Is there a way to export all of the data that you have entered into Xero?
What is the correct way to record this transaction in Xero?
Is there any way that Xero can do this?
Is there any way of automating this in Xero?
Is there a way to submit timesheets via Xero's mobile phone app?
Can Xero please explain if there is an easier way of doing this.
Is there any way that Xero can do this rather than showing the hours paid under the Ordinary Earnings Rate.
Is there any way in Xero to change the normal days of work so that this corrects itself?
Hey Xero,Is there a way to delete old timesheet templates ?
Is there a way within Xero to calculate the Payroll Tax, proportion it to each entity etc.
HiIs there any way in Xero to get a listing of who is yet to approve the leave requests?
Can anyone shed some light on the best way to accomplish this in Xero?
Xero have said there is no way to enter in 2 separate tax codes in the opening balances.
Problem is, in Xero, there is no way to send off RTI leaver notifications without any employees.
Is there any way that Xero could actually show the RTI (sbumission and HMRC Responce) files in human readable format?
Is there a way to easily find the Gross Earnings for that month within Xero?
Linking BarTab to Xero stops bookkeeping getting in the way of bartending.
Your business can once again focus on your sales by seamlessly integrating Xero with Constant Contact for two way data synchronization.
2) Is there any point in linking MS Access to Xero or is there a better way of reconciling between the two systems?
Is there any way of getting xero information into Power BI Desktop?
Can anyone tell me if there is a way to feed Stripe payments into Xero in the same way that Paypal feeds in?
I now understand that the integration is only one-way Clio --> Xero.
Is there a way to make these expense claims to publish to Xero as awaiting approval?
Further to this, is there any way to make use of additional fields in Expensify and have these appear in the Xero bill?
Is there some way to split up payroll from Zen using Xero's tracking?
This way we can accurately forecast our direct cost expenditure in Xero, and we use Float to monitor cash flow.
Is there any way to integrate Xero with an automated state sales tax system?
Unfortunately there is no way to match the Paypal Feed to the Xero import feed.
Is there a way to customise the colours of the screens in XERO?
##### CLUSTER 15 #####
I see that:the GST Reconciliation Report balances up to June 2015, but for each month after that there is a huge difference.
This year we can't fins any links to Annual report pack.
How do I get a report on COGS per customer?
I can't see that and I don't seem to be able to create a custom report.
68Total cost of Goods Sold (in the report on xero):£20.
As advised by Xero support, if the report is not run for  GST periods (as advised, from the beginning of the period prior to the conversion date, or the first period that contains GST in it, whichever comes first), this can result in an incorrect opening balance.
Apparently the product development team is intending to rewrite this report but there is no timeframe.
I am used to sage and wondered if there was a similar report that I could run which shows me this so I can agree the figures on the VAT return are correct.
havent been able to find this button/feature at all and every time I go back into the reconciliation report the numbers have reverted back to what our financial advisors set them to when we first started with xero.
If I go into the VAT reconciliation report, it shows how much has already been paid and then produces the amount owing minus the VAT paid.
Is there currently a report?
The VAT amount in the audit report to be 14% of the gross amount.
One thing that bugs me about running reports in Xero, is that the report date always defaults to the date the report is being run ie.
Now I can no longer find the bespoke reports I created and trying to reestablish then using the new report editor leaves me with the only option of saying "done" at the point I have completed my new template.
So in my Fixed Asset Reconciliation report there is a discrepancy between the Balance Sheet and Asset Register of the discount amount.
Xero - by limiting our access to this report is forcing charities to have to spend money on accountants!
How can we track/download the previous report that the accountant didn't upload?
I can also foresee a huge number of tracking categories which I suspect will be difficult to work with / report on.
How do I reconcile bulk deposits to her daily cash out/report of Services vs Sales?
I have set up things in tracking but I can't seem to get a report of income or expenses broken down to each event.
Let's say I am taking a balance sheet report until April 2015.
I can use the  tab to get the expenditure without the budget, or I can use the  tab to create a report for 1,2,3 or 12 months.
Dumping a report into excel to "create" a comparative trial balance is not a solution.
23 Sept 2014Hi thereAt the moment under Xero, we can only compare budget with actuals for one period or month at a time in the Budget Variance Report.
I notice that there is a tab on the budget variance page called 'show date range', but when I select this and then select the date range that I want, the resulting report is still running for the calendar month of May.
How easy is it to get a report for each donee?
Can I get some advice on how to deal with this unpaid 5% so it doesn't show as unpaid / overdue for 3 months in our receivables report.
I noticed that there is not a specific report pack for superfunds in the partner edition.
There is no option to filter the report for this.
How can I get the Budget Variance report to report a period within 2 financial years in one report?
There is however a tab that says Sales Tax Report which is where they told me to go when I asked the question.
It would be great when editing reports (in V2) if you can use the PDF preview to show the current report you are working on rather than having to generate all the reports in the pack which can take some time.
My employee purchased an item, filled in an expense report which was approved and he was paid.
Essentially what I'm after is to have a different report which will show progress in paying off a loan (eg.
If the report parameters are set to commence the day before the conversion balance then there is no out of balance issue.
finally is there a function in Xero to get a report for my monthly EC sales list?
Or run any report on contact groups for that matter?
Question I have is, on my P & L report there is nothing there for computer purchases we made during the year.
HiDoes anyone have any experience in costing a variety of repeat jobs performed by any number of hourly paid staff so that I can report cost of jobs over selected periods, and also accumulate costs os staff members to generate amounts to process for payroll.
How do I report expenses for two separate businesses?
It would be very useful if you could create a report in respect of the trade debtors and creditors where they were netted off in this manner
Please provide a summary activity report for the payroll period.
Can Xero make more customizations to Journal report ?
However, Journal report in Xero is lacking some good features to support:1.
If amendments do not make impact in GL, we should exclude from journal report as well.
Please could you develop a Tier 2 PBE Report Template for reporting the financial statements of a medium-sized charity?
It would be great to either be able to filter by dates (e. g. put in 1st of the month to end of month) and show all the super that would show up if you ran those same dates in the payroll employee report.
So can you please either rearrange the report or provide a "drop-down" arrow to allow this for the users that want it.
It appears that there is an option to delete the VAT audit report when filing a client's VAT return.
Please, please, put a TOTAL function on the Payroll "Transaction Listing Detail Report".
Each time we print a Receivables or Payables Report it doesn't show a total per customer or supplier.
Great New Report (and will stifle the temptation to say 'about time' but there is no facility to print or export.
When in Report Code Mapping in an Organisation it would be good to have a "Confirm as is" column which you put a tick in all the codes that are already correctly Mapped, instead of having to edit Map all of the codes.
Could this report please be included in the package.
This report should include check numbers.
Why haven't Xero created a simple report to show an estimate of distributable reserves for the purposes of declaring dividends (in the UK).
Currently there is a superannuation report that shows payroll payments for supaerannuation as they are accrued, but there is not a report that shows when the superannuation payments for each employee are actually paid to ClickSuper.
Is it possible to have the new reporting features extended to be able to provide a sales by customer report that is able to be filtered by tracking category?
- can you also have the report default displayed in date order, for the same reasons as aboveIt would be great if this can be done, it would assist sooo much!
For U. S. users, please offer layout options so that we can present this report in the following order:AssetsLiabilitiesNet AssetsRevenueExpense
Can you please create the ability to run a sales report based on the country, province, state (i. e. location)?
Can we have a function to move/transfer the customised older style report layout to the new version of the P&L and Balance Sheet?
Instead of re-customise the same layout in new version of report which created in older style report layout.
Can the detailed transaction report please show the code and the transaction amount
Is there a similar report in Xero?
If more detail is requires on who is overdue then this can be seen in the aged receivables report etc.
Could you please create a Find & Recode History report in Xero.
All our other reporting is on a cash basis, but there is no Cash Basis checkbox on the Inventory Items Summary report.
Even if for some reason you think your reports are better, you should have a whole menu of 'QB report formats' or have that as a preference.
I can run the new aged receivables report to include the Contact Group name.
Would you please to consider to enable the Sales Tax Report can generate multiple currency column, instead of one only.
Can Xero please show the Journal ID in General Ledger Report?
Can this please be fixed at the report template level?
In particular the pages for Approval of Financial Report and the Statement of Financial Position.
I am sure that everyone will vote for this feature if there is a separate column for Name in each detail transaction report and General Ledger.
Fore example:If you see the detail transaction report you will observe that Payee/Vendor Names are merged with "Transaction" Column as follows:"Miscro Center - Debit For Checkcard Xxxxxx8678 04/05/13 Micro Center 972-664-8500 Tx"Here we request a feature to kindly separate the Name Column from Transaction so Accountants can analyze and able to see the Payee/Vendor wise Transaction with Accounting Category and Class.
Don't get me wrong, I LOVE Xero and think it is fantastic but do not understand that a simple Sales by Customer (Not Contact) report is not included.
CRITICAL FEATURE CRITICAL FEATURE CRITICAL REPORT, how is this not in the upcoming or planned reports?
The Profit & Loss report is GREAT in Xero, but the only thing missing in reporting is how many new customers we've gained or how many customers we've lost and what the impact is monthly.
Would it be possible please to provide a report that lists all the assets loaded in Xero.
For example, an exempt or non-profit organization should have a report called Statement of Financial Position, not Balance Sheet.
I can provide a sample report but I am sure you have access to them already.
(A step further than turning notes on/off would be to have certain notes triggered by the use of the relevant report code - maybe a dream for the future)
HOWEVER, there is still NO option to apply our Practice logo to the Front Cover of the Report despite the advice that is already available.
On entry into the Report Templates for a client organisation there is a message advising how many Report Fields have not been completed.
Can you please amend the report so that it carries output of the source document #.
The headache I have dealing with a multi column P & L report that outputs in the wrong chronological order is a nightmare.
I want a report option to print all unbilled purchase orders showing the details of who/when/what and how much.
All my clients want to see how they did this period V's the  period last year and it cant be done on the New P&L report.
Maybe there is another report or document I can easily view this info I am not yet aware.
Hello Xero TeamThere is a "Report Settings" Option in  your New Reports where you can choose report fields, such as Columns, Filters,etc.
Please review this report, and allow the ability to select the report based on the specific inventory items.
The current report codes provided are not enough for some of our clients.
Or is this something suitable for a developer to write a customised report for us?
The worst part of this is that there is no indication when you navigate to Income Statement in the Reports menu that you are viewing an Accrual Basis report when your settings indicate otherwise.
You can override the entire expense claim with user entered receipt date (e. g. 2014 date) in the report date box.
Is this something that could be added to the Trial Balance report?
For the on-chargeable expenses, I was getting a copy of the “Expense Claim Summary Report” in a .
I generally find the default schedules in the Notes section of the Report Packs unsatisfactory.
When editing a report pack in My Xero, there is  option to control the font size of the heading for the text that defines a note item.
In the final report, the name of a schedule will be a sub-heading below the heading of a note item.
This would make for a simpler display of multi-line items in the audit report – where appropriate.
Your contacts section identifies contacts by Customer  and Supplier, so why not a report by Customer?
This is a key report from an accountants point of view, so important to get it right.
I would be interested to hear if people have any other suggestions for this report.
Please, please, please devote some attention to the GST Reconciliation Report.
In the current format I found the AT report needed to be either exported to excel or referenced by hand for readability.
If it was possible to start this at a nominated number, this report could then be inserted as part of a report pack.
Even better if we can pick which fields to show on the report.
My client is wanting to run a report showing income only from clients.
If I do a report on quarters I can get nearly 3 years in a single report.
What I do now is export the report to Excel, convert it to pdf and then resend to my clients.
As seen in Xero, there is no multilevel filter grouping available in any detail report.
When I run a report my practice logo will appear but I cannot find out how to put the client logo on (or if this indeed possible).
Currently whenever you go in and out of the report the Trial Balance defaults back to today’s date.
Can we please be able to export this report to an excel spreadsheet?
What's the point of being able to include the email address on the report if you can't click it to open a new email?
Can a button please be added to allow us to quickly view Balance Sheet & Profit and Loss reports in current and previous financial year so we do not have to change the dates manually each time we wish to view the report.
However, when we want to run a report listing all members, we can't do this with their membership category.
There is currently no general ledger report that you can export in a suitable format to create such reports.
Is there anyway we can get a report of these?
I am putting together my report packs.
In fact, Xero has a financial report name cash summary.
The Title page of a report is normally the entity name not what has been setup as the report name.
These notes should be read in conjunction with the attached compilation report of (Accounting Company Name). '
A profit and  loss report that compares how the business is performing year to date in comparison to the whole years budget.
* App for 'Other' company staff so their receipts can be sent direct to their report for approval.
Is there any report available about this?
Please integrate a setting to allow for a default date range to be set when a report is pulled up.
In fact from PayPal's website: Starting in 2011, PayPal is required by the IRS to report the sales of goods and services for customers who, in a single year receive more than $20,000, AND 200 or more payments.
Please can you give us the ability to choose any date for the AR report.
Can you please include the ability to filter the aged receivables with tracking categories to allow them to report receivables per location?
I can get the report I want AFTER I've posted the payroll and run the Payroll Activity summary.
The report should subtotal by Centre so we can see the total liability for each Centre.
Further, there is no report that you can pick to show which appover approved an employees leave.
Can you then implement a report to track this.
There doesnt appear to be any report in there.
I would suggest a holiday/sickness report showing who, when, how long and annual leave entitlement calculation.
This is useless information as we already have an Accruals report that tells us exactly the same thing.
Could we please request that a heading be added to this report to include the period of the report for example "1 July 2014 to 30 June 2015"This will make it easier when people that look at the report (that didn't print the report)will not get confused as to what period it is relation to.
Create a report as at a certain date showing how old each employee is, where a DOB has been input into the employee card file.
Maybe this can be built into the current employee contact details report?
Surely Xero could take this info and have a report to say a) super accrued B) Super paid and C) Super owing per employee for a particular period?
I find this report important together with Aged Payable and Receivables Report.
When is this Report going to be fixed ?
However the Xero VAT report interface only gives the option of Quarters, that I can see.
Could you please create a report that summarises the GST on receivables/payables.
2. how we can run the report every months to see the financial statements?
I can get Xero to report Income & Expenditure analysed by Tracking for the whole organisation.
Is there a report that shows the number of hours an employee has worked?
How do I exclude payments made with plastic from the 1099 report?
I have printed the return and the audit report (using up a couple of tress in the process due to not being able to remove details).
How do I get a report which shows me my sales for X-Y period and How do I get another report to show me purchases from X-Y periodSo when I am working out my VAT returns, I can see the Sales for X - Y Period in a Report and the Purchases for X-Y Period in a Report.
They mentioned that there should be a report available with EVERYTHING – similar to what you could get from MYOB and other accounting programs.
Please include a feature where you can click 'Previous Financial Year' on the profit and loss report to view the P&L from the previous year.
Any idea how I can do this in Xero as a single report or even as multiple reports?
Can anyone please suggest the correct report?
Is there an existing report for this or can a custom report be made?
I ran the Inventory Item Details report (new) for sales so far this month and I'm a bit confused by how it displays the total.
There are a variety of ways of producing activity reports in banks, for example using the General Ledger report.
)Unfortunately, I can't use the tracking categories to customize this report.
Can more lines be added to the Aged Payables Report.
How can I see a P&L report that compares the current FY monthly against the same month the previous year?
why ending inventory and beginning inventory doesn't appear at Balance Sheet Report ?
There's a particular report that I'll want to view every month to check how the business is doing (profit & loss - current financial year - custom layout - wide view).
For example, for clients that we are not using the depreciation function for as they use pooling, how can this report be removed from the annual reports (other than exporting to excel or google docs)?
Also, how can I run a report showing all payments posted in Xero.
What I really want xero to do is to give me a report showing a single line summary of all expenses and rents for each property.
Can there be a report to check with the ATO Super Stream system that all super USI in the payroll system are still valid.
What should I do now to backpay this so it comes up in the Superannuation Payments Report.
However when I checked the Leave Transaction Report it is not showing annual leave taken (it is showing opening balances and annual leave accrued).
I have noticed that the dates on the Payroll Activity Report are wrong for the From + to dates.
In such case how do I report payroll related expenses and liabilities in P&L and BS for a month?
How do I report 2 days of payroll expenses and liabilities in May P&L and BS?
How do I include 4 days in year end report?
I do not understand how there can still be an allowance or deduction showing when there is no amounts showing on the Payroll Activity Details Report.
I realise you can probably run a report to get this information however having it listed next to the leave applied for on the same screen was very useful.
We  are  looking  for  a consolidated   report  that   Payroll/HR  can  generate   to  monitor  this  Leave  unpaid   for  a  period  of  time
What report can I generate to give me a list of payroll deductions for a particular date range?
So if your super payable for a month was $1,000 you have a negative $1,000 appear in 'Superannuation Payable' on the Cash Summary report.
How do other users calculate and report Unused Annual Leave on Termination, and other termination payments?
I can also find out what is owing in super by using the report 'superannuation payments'.
Is there such a report in Xero.
there is no updating of payslip template as it advises, there are no pension contribution files to upload to People's Pension even though I can run the Pension Contribution report and manually extract the info.
Presumably there is a report somewhere, but I can't find it.
Obviously I can not submit to HMRC final report as the figures are not correct for the year end.
As neither client has any statutory payments to report I can only assume that the EPS was to claim for the 2k Employers NI allowance.
I have noticed an error in the draft payrun with holidays, how can I delete the draft payrun report and start again?
There is currently no 'x' at the side of the draft payrun report to delete it.
Or is there a report that will give the dollar amount?
You can see this in the PDF report that you can download to review; the totals on the summary page are different to the totals in the detailed section of the report.
I want them to be able to make notes, check off for completion and report any discrpancies.
The best I could see was where the client can be emailed a timesheet report and they could respond to the email with Approval which would then have to be manually entered into the system.
My initial plan was to do a monthly report in Expensify then export this to Xero.
In the event of a recall, new "Recall" report can be used and letters to notify goods recipients can be generated.
User can select what price to use when creating purchase order report.
A bulk of payments(lets say 100) will be in one report and the payments related to once report are received in 5 or 6 batch payments.
In the meantime while we work on this, you can manually filter by contact in the Aged Payables Detail report.
In Quickbooks you can do a search under a combination of numerous factors and then print that in report format with a total.
##### CLUSTER 16 #####
I don't know how to handle the unfiled amounts.
If I was able to correctly fix the unfiled amounts, how best to know if we've paid/received the right amount to/from ATO.
Is anyone else experiencing this / know anyway to fix this?
I am a bit late with filling my VAT return, I know.
I know you can do this in MYOB .
It would be great to hear from some people who know what this is all about.
Could you please let me know how to fixed it?
Anyone know how to get around this?
Anyone know reason for this?
(know that this could apply to any one of thousands of products that we are able to procure, and any hundreds of product decorators we could use.
baring in mind i wouldnt know how to alter these how can this be and how can i check what he's saying ?
Is there an issue I do not know about or is anyone else having to do this?
So I know I have some fundamental shortfall in understanding but how do I rectify these conversion balances whilst keeping them in line with my FYE figures .
The items I purchase are semi-random so I don't know what I'm getting until I go through all of it.
Anyone know of issues with PayPal feed not updating?
I know you can attach a receipt to a transaction.
Is anyone know how to solve this problem?
Has anybody had this issue or know how to fix?
Now i don't know how to do the reversing journal to correct the balance sheet.
"Would anyone know the meaning of the error and how to overcome this?
I want to know what is mean Tracking Transfers and the functions?
I suspect there is a journal I should be posting to remove this apparent expense, but I don't know what it is.
Anyone know why?
Payments to the ATO - Don't know what to do with these.
All I want to know is what is the figure of VAT I got in for Jan/Feb and what is the figure of VAT I paid out for Jan/Feb.
Anyone know what else I may be doing wrong ?
I know I’m probably doing this all wrong so hopefully someone can advise…and hopefully I’ve articulated myself well enough.
Do you know of a better card processing system that will do this for me?
Please share this with anyone you know who might be interested.
I know this question is a bit specific.
If you know of any trusted resources out there please email me at mike@proimageapparel.
Anyone know what will happen when I switch this on?
I know what I want to do but don't know how to explain it.
Please let me know if there is a magic restart button.
I know how to do the expense claim but after that I don't understand how to do the Owner's contribution part instead of cutting an actual check.
So we know how we are getting the totals etc.
Hello,I know this could be a question up to personal preference but would appreciate your view.
I know I can use tracking with the expenses when they come through, but how do I check if I am over or under budget with my printing?
can someone please let me know, i am not having much luck in working out how this software can apply to standard building contracts & data management.
This is how we know this Google Local is not going away.
Anyone know how to fix this?
I know it may be difficult to understand but it is a hard process to explainThanks in advanceBen
Please let us know what we should do.
Thus I would appreciate if anyone could let me know how to attribute expenses (make someone the payee when that space is blank) to a particular employee from a general reimbursement check that has already been reconciled?
i know this is asking a lot, but this is where I'm at right now:How do I explain to my bookkeeper that this is the direction I want to go?
> D/D…but again it relies on memory to know who is paid by what method as it is not always shown on the bill.
Do you know of a solution?
Please let me know if you now any tools that would better match our needs.
The funny thing is, do you actually know what it means?
There are so many options, it is difficult to know where to start.
I know rules can be created to capture many suppliers but there are frequently new suppliers used.
I know this is getting picky, but it will save time when you have 20+ bills to enter each day.
for example:Secured loansMortgage loan    xxxxxx"Mortgage loan repayable monthly at 10% interest rate"Member loan     xxxxxx"Member loan is unsecured and repayable on demand"Or if this feature already exists, please let me know how to use it?
We all know that once the expense is approved it is very time-consuming to "undo".
I don't know if any other users would be interested in this?
If these could be identified separately it would be useful to know this value.
We want to know what the income this year is rather than a rolling 12 months.
Let me know if you have any question.
The scheduled ones work quite well, but once the 3 have gone out, there is no option to send further reminders - i know it shouldn't be needed but thats business!
"How would Amanda ever know there is a note for her?
Can this be a feature added for the on the go business person who especially travels between stores and needs to know who owes what in each store?
In quotes would be nice to have field markup so I could instantly know how much money I make.
They have to 'open as a PDF' to be able to do that but of course they don't know that.
It is extremely helpful for sales to see this activity: if a 'cold' customer suddenly reclicks a quote link from a few months ago then we see that instantly and know there is the possibility of a sale there.
What it should happen (in my opinion):The system should be smart enough to first know that my accounting method is accrual because I?
If you know what to do and where to go it isn't a big deal.
So it means I never know what the file relates to.
For those who don't know 2FA is an additional layer of security on top of a username and password, whereby a one-time password is generated for the user to input with each session (or even per machine).
I know the current work around would be to save the PDF and then email separately, but this seems to defeat the purpose.
I know it seems lazy, but this would be helpful to know immediately, instead of having to look it up if the employee isn't at work that day, and they haven't called in sick yet.
How would a user know how many hours were taken and how would half day requests be handled unless the request was in hours?
Anyone know an answer?
I know there is 'tracking categories' but this is something you would have needed to implement from the start.
What I'm wanting to know is if it is possible to enter a starting balance for each category?
Is there a know issues being fixed or something else going on?
I know, I know, I can *easily* do some magic with Excel or Google Spreadsheets before importing.
<|If you have any questions, please let me know.
Anyone know of a fix?
Otherwise I have no choice but to voice my opinion on any and all social media forums letting them know of my experience.
Anyone know anything about this, and how to resolve it?
i don't know what I can do now.
I know that we can create our own categories, but you were adding them already would make things easier and more standardized.
Any one know how to fix this error?
I know in MYOB you can run the P & L to show Nil balances.
When I reconcile I know what the amount is for and why it was paid (in essence they are debit card payments and DDs for services and goods).
Anyone know how I can prevent this?
I do not know some of the users who has access to my financial information.
Possibly there is somewhere to look to see a service or tech message in relation to the service being down, but we do not know where this is.
Do you know why?
Has anyone else had this issue and know how to solve it?
so that please let us know that How we do ?
Any one know how?
I know I can go to Authorize.
I know its only a small amount in cents but its still creates more work for me to write that money off or can you fix it so i can send out correct statement.
I know how to declare the Duty but the VAT is driving me crazy.
Anyone know why?
Hey guys, i know this has been mentioned before in here but is there any update if this issue with the PayPal refunds is going to be fixed?
And for this reason, I think I want to know what ability I have to go back through and alter things in the past.
We have manually entered the tax, but don't know how to do the same for the super.
I don't know (and frankly, am not really interested in) how much the person owes .
seems to change things up i don't know if this is a great idea.
However, I don't know how to deal with the additional PAYG and Super incurred before.
I have turned Emploee Groups on so I think I can do it for future pays but I wanted to know if I can put it in place for past pays?
I don't know why someone can't pick up the phone, listen to our issues and walk us thru the fix.
Anyone know why this is.
I would also love to know how to print off a copy of the FPS details that I send to the hmrc.
Please let me know asap as we are considering using the payroll function instead of using Sage.
Has anyone come across this who could let me know how I change it?
I would prefer to know there is a known issue than for my client to tell me their is a problem.
Payroll should know what the breakdown is between PAYE, NIC (employee), NIC (employer) and my employers allowance.
If you have any further questions on this, please let us know.
How do we do this and how do we know the exact amount to be deducted.
It goes back a long time to type in the hours for alternative holiday and I want to know if there is anything I can do to do this.
I would be interested to know if there are any applications available that would support this?
Please can any kind person let me know the best app for this to make my life easier!
Do you know how long it takes for payments to show in Stripe?
I can filter by vendor and provide detailed reports for my suppliers to know how their products were selling.
If you run or know of any fitness business within Australia please post the email here and I will get in contact.
Can you guys let me know how to sort this out?
Has anyone done this before or know how to do this?
If you don't know, Winforecast is a very comprehensive program that produces P&L, Balance Sheet and Cash flow forecasts including variance reporting.
Do you know how many people have commented on this great little quoting system?
Do you know how many quotes have probably been accepted because of how great they look.
Also, I know there is something which integrates with Hicaps but can't remember the name.
We don't want a card system and we would ideally want the system to be live and integrate on the receipt with a printed update to the customer as to how many points they have earned so far so they know how much further they have to go before they are rewarded.
or do you know of other solutions?
Can you write a blog entry or let us know what the progress is for WorkFlow Max?
I also want to know why there is a pending transaction of .
com/au/training/Of course, I clicked on bookkeeping as this is what I want to know about and what I do for my own business.
Of course if we could, you know, talk to somebody.
At a minimum I expect to know what is going on with my support request.
##### CLUSTER 17 #####
What does anyone think?
What do they mean and what difference does it make for accounting and VAT?
2 - Service - what program service does the transaction belong to?
As the "Dispose" option removes the asset from the Register this does not seem to be the correct method in this instance.
Does anyone else have this situation?
Does anyone have a template or real-world example to share with me?
This, however, does not allow me to record the transaction to the Client's information so I can have a total of sales to each Client.
Does someone have the same problem and have you fixed it and how?
Does any exist?
Does anyone else do this and how have you found the experience?
Besides creating journal entries, does anyone have a solution to our problem?
Does anyone have any better ideas?
Does anybody have any advice on how they normally deal with this when it comes to tax time?
How does everyone else handle this and their projections for the next year?
Does anyone have a solution.
Does anyone have any advice?
Does anyone have any ideas?
Does anyone have any solutions for this?
It does not seem possible, however, to use the both the "Transfer" and "Create" section when reconciling.
Does anyone have this same problem?
There does not seem to be any option currently to change the 'Total Retained Earnings' heading generated on balance sheet reports to state 'Total Retained Earnings (Losses)', where applicable.
When I look at the HMRC guidance it says these sales are outside the scope of VAT but how does that relate to the options below?
Does anybody have any idea why this would be happening?
Does anyone have any other idea how to handle this type of transaction?
Does anyone else have this issue?
Does anyone have any better ideas on how to track transfers between tracking categories?
If so, then how does the tax credit asset get cleared out of the LTC when it's passed through to the shareholders?
Does anyone have any idea how to resolve this?
Does it do proper fund accounting?
Does anyone use tracking categories for this purpose?
Can anyone offer any advice and does anyone share my frustration with this ?
Does anyone else have this problem?
Does anyone have a solution?
This works fine, however it does not take the deduction into consideration when confirming the payments due to Hmrc.
), credit Revenue ($300 or $330) How does the GST treatment work?
How do I classify these withdrawls and deposits so it does not show up as revenue etc?
My question is how do you interpret analyse this ratio:•	What information does it give you?
Does anyone utilise factoring companies that could potentially get in contact with me to discuss procedures?
Does anyone have any ideas?
Does anyone have any suggestions?
How best does one offset an equal debtor and creditor balance that is due to/from the same entity?
Does anyone have any ideas?
Does anyone else have problems with these?
The single hangup is, if we use tracked inventory, he cannot sell what he does not have on-hand.
So, does anyone have experience of this?
Or does anyone have a suggestion as to how I could get this information to show?
Does anyone have experience with this type of client?
Does anyone else have it working?
Does anyone have any suggestions?
Does anyone have any experience of this that they are prepared to share with us?
Does anyone have any suggestions as to how we could do all of this?
Does anyone have any good ideas about how to deal with this?
I use paid Facebook advertising to market my business, is there anyone else who does the same?
If they are considered assets how does depreciation work for the ones on subscription, as they are essentially brand new pieces of software every 12 months?
Or does it take a while?
Does anyone have any experience of this?
They’re currently using MYOB Premier which process wise does what is required however it’s struggling to cope with the ever growing list of inventory, and this means it is running really slowly.
Does any one did this before?
Is this expected behaviour or is there a reason why is does not appear?
That is not how the client spells it & they do point it out, and it does not match what the ATO has on their records.
When there is an error indicating the there is a data file error "your file does not contain valid statement data. "
com/uk/Payroll-Setup-AEOThis does not seem to be a feature in the AU version.
All this does is give me worry that if i don't waste time double check with the client administrator I could be held liable if it is a rel breech of the file.
At the moment I am having to put these in as multiple lines in one expense claim which then does not allow me to attach each receipt to the respective line, I can only bunch them together in one big group.
There was no warning/indication there was any issue - which I must admit does concern me.
The notes section does not allow content to be pasted into it.
And no, the Find & Recode batch option does not solve my problem – that only allows you to change a bunch of the same at once.
I can't tell you how much confusion the postal and physical contact address causes in the United states and can't believe this feature request does not exist already.
- For example, the functionality does not efficiently allow sickness deductions that are not payable to a third party.
how can we do this now, does anyone have a crystal ball i can use.
How does a potential users of an app in the Addon store find me as certified or an expert with the app there considering?
Find & Recode currently does not find manual journals, so we can't do a bulk recode.
90% of the time due to the volume the batch does not balance to the total authorised.
Doing  so does not save the info and requires it to be reentered
Currently I'm having to write out the description in a text editor which does the character count for me, than paste it into the field.
Does anyone have any idea, or workarounds that I'm not thinking of?
I'm looking at using the Quotes section to send out to clients and including the link for the customer to accept/decline/comment online however, after experimenting with the quotes, the system does not show the person who has accepted the quote, made a comment.
Sometimes the contact name that you want to keep does not match the name you wish to keep in the payee section.
My file is tagged to (UTC+10:00) Brisbane however when I do something it does not seem to tag to that time.
Does anyone else experience this?
Once i select the customer the 'Telephone' field does not populate, it stays blank - please fix this to take the contact default telephone number.
It seems to me that using the Sale of an asset option does only half the job.
Does anyone else have this problem ?
The free text field does not to be linked to anything or even printable.
Does anyone have a workaround for this and could those who wish to have this implement please vote for this thread.
When I slide out the keyboard, the app doesn't switch to landscape mode and the keyboard doesn't function properly (I can't enter symbols) as it does with most apps (ms office, email, text messaging, etc.
Does anyone else think this would be handy?
The mobile app has been useless to us thus far as it does not display the items in a multi-line format.
Does anyone have another work-around for this?
Does anyone have a better workaround?
Does anyohe else think the timeout should be extended to at least one hour if not longer?
com/business/discussion/2331278#answerHow does a leave approver get Calendar visibility of when their team has requested and had approved leave?
On your list of counties in Payroll, you have North Humberside, which does not exist any more.
Does anyone else think this would be useful to them?
What else does this "feature" do that we should be aware of?
Does any one else experience this?
Does anyone have any suggestions on how best to proceed with this?
Even if I go into find and match it simply does not turn up.
The web interface does not allow you to use a negative number in the quantity field.
Does this exist / is this possible / how can I achieve what I want?
Or does anyone have any solutions?
Does anyone else do this?
Does anyone have any ideas?
Does anyone have any insight?
How can I lodge a TPAR directly if it does not reflect the actual amount paid to the supplier?
Am I missing something or does someone have any ideas or suggestions as to how to manage this.
Does anyone have any advice on how best to handle this?
Does anyone have any advice on how to handle this nicely?
We currently use QuickBooks Online, which does most things but not everything we want.
Does anyone have a solution for this?
Does anyone have any idea how I can fix this?
Question does the entry of Budgets when running reports to compare Actual to Budget.
Does anyone else have this issue, and is there a solution?
Does anyone have any contacts?
Does anyone have any ideas on how I can fix this?
My business does not sell any products.
Or does &#171;InvoiceTitle&#187; do something else that I'm not aware of?
Does anyone have a solution to this problem?
Does this happen on a regular basis, what size of files do you import/export and have this problem.
The same, however, does not apply to the statement, which prints correctly.
Does anyone else have a similar issue?
Does anybody have any suggestions as to how I could do this?
Any reason the Practice Manager level permission does not allow you to transfer subscription back to clients?
There does not appear to be any kind of indicator on the inventory item to segment these two types of items.
Does anyone else have insight into this?
Does anyone else find it annoying to re-enter your email address each time the session expires?
However the csv import does not appear to cater for this and treats all the unit amounts as GST exclusive.
Does anyone have any words of wisdom.
Does anybody have any ideas what could be causing this?
Does every staff member have to have a unique login or can I enter their expense claims for them?
I'm also generally curious about what does and doesn't quality as a "fixed asset"?
Does anyone have a suggestion on how best to do this?
CSV import does not and I can't work out how to solve this.
Does anyone have any ideas?
Does anyone have a similar situation and/or solution.
Does anyone have any suggestions?
Apparently SGC is supposed to be accruing on Annual Leave Loading (according to ICB & ATO) in most cases (only does not accrue if leave loading is related to not being able to work regular overtime whilst on leave.
5) or 2. put in a fixed amount (which would change for me each week as she does different hours).
How does this happen and how would you suggest I rectify bearing in mind the SGC super is calculated by the system and I cannot use a fixed rate to solve?
Does anyone have any idea how to include this previous obligation?
Does anyone have any bright ideas?
Does anyone else have any suggestions please?
Does anybody have any idea why employees tax file number details have suddenly disappeared?
My staff do fortnightly timesheet but they cannot enter their start and finish time, is this available, if so c how does it workThanksCath
Does anyone have any suggestion regarding this or can advise me how their own directors are set up?
Why does my employees I am ablate include in my payroll not equal my current employees?
This  information  does  not  appear  on  any  reports  except  payslips.
Does anyone have any thoughts on why this might be?
If we do, how does he get paid for his sick leave?
So, in many ways he is treated as an employee but he is working on a contract that does not entitle him to normal employee things such as annual leave.
Does anyone have an example of how they would do it?
How does the payroll limit work for Premium pricing?
Or does anyone have a suggested solution.
"Does anyone have any idea what to do?
How does one delete an accidental duplicate entry for Time Off if it has already entered into the Completed state?
Does anyone have any suggestions?
Does anyone have any ideas on how to fix this?
I will change the employee number but how do I rectify this so the tax code does not come into force.
Is this possible or does anyone have a work around?
does this mean that the tax tables and NI tables are also not up to date?
5 hours a week, but also does extra hours as and when needed.
How do I set up an employees salary so that it does not reference hours?
Does anyone have any idea on what I am doing wrong here and how I would go about amending it?
Does anyone have any suggestions?
Does anyone have a template that they are happy to share?
Suddenly there is a Payroll button on the top menu but it does nothing.
Does anyone have experience of this?
Does any such app exist?
Does anyone have any suggestions / feedback on these programs?
Does anyone have experience of Vend?
My understanding is that you can create teams in Gusto, and map at the team level, but how detailed does it get?
Is anyone aware of a package with similar features or at least does consolidated reporting that is a bit more cost efficient than the above named bolt ons.
He ideally wants a tracker that he can print off each month showing the amount of mileage him and his wife and one of his workers does so he can process this straight into the booksMany thanksFraser
Does anyone have any suggestions?
The company imports constructions materials from China to 3 states in Australia, does drop shipping as well as holding inventory, needs transit tracking, ability to handle cubed metreage, multiple sites, multi currency and has good support.
Does anyone have experience setting this up?
Does anybody have any suggestions?
Does anyone have one that they have found?
Does anyone currently have a good third party integration company that they have used to set this up?
Does anyone have a similar situation?
2) Does Unleashed allows my client to prepare a P&L for each of the job?
Does anyone else have these issues?
How well does the integration work.
Does anyone use these systems if so what is the Pro's and Con's that y'all have noticed?
Does unleashed do this? "
Does anyone have any experience with AffinityLive?
DOes anyone have any cloud based ideas of forecasting software?
Does anyone think this would be useful?
For example, the 'save' button does not work in order to save amendments to a contact; and the 'export' batch button doesn't export the batch.
Does anyone else have any issues as this?
The costings/mark-up does not print the quote that goes to the customer.
Does anyone have a solution?
Why does the request have to come from the email address i log in as?
The app features are useless and the screen does not even rotate to landcape format.
Does Anyone have a better option, otherwise I will start my 6 plus hour journey now.
Someone please jump in here and tell me how wrong I am, as the features I seek are so obvious that I completely missed the button or menu option that does it for me?
##### CLUSTER 18 #####
Hi there,Currently using Xero for accounting for a small community organisation but wondering how other people have set up their Xero to comply with NZ charities new reporting standards?
Hi, I have been an avid Xero user for a few years now however I usually start my clients up from scratch on Xero.
Hi,When a new user is sent an invitation to create a Xero login to access a file, this email can be forwarded to another party, who can then change the email address and create their own user profile, with full access to a Xero file without the original sender of the invitation being notified.
Hi All, I've been trying to create an asset in Xero for the past two days with the same response from Xero each time "Oops, something's gone wrong, please try again".
Hi Xero Team,   I m using manual journals api to post data to xero from our app, I m sending the data in application/json format , with Oauth parameters,Even through I m getting 401 exception ,Please provide some sample code to post manual journals.
Hi I have an issue for which I have put forward to Xero - Xero says they calculated correct, but I think this calculation could be costing business thousands of dollars.
##### CLUSTER 19 #####
I could go into each invoice and mark as paid although this would take quite a while.
Dear All,Where can I see for any particular voucher/bill/invoice's GL Impact?
We import data from another system and each billing line (rather than invoice) has a unique reference number.
The repair company have sent us an invoice for the £100 and £147 VAT, no mention of the original amount although I can work this out from the VAT amount.
After reconciliation, how would one go about removing or canceling out the A2X invoice sales lines so that sales are not reported twice.
In Thailand, there is a 3% WHT when customer pays an invoice.
How do I allocate the funds  ie   $500 to the invoice and the balance to the ledgers.
How do I set up a monthly invoice?
As I typically do when i sell investments, i have raised a sale invoice in Trust A lets say for $2 million.
I can't allocate the credit to the relevant invoice as the previous month has been closed off and it won't allow this to happen.
Hello,How do I code TNT invoice which is for GST from customs for imported goods in NZ?
How can i set this up on the invoice?
So how do I mark their tax invoice as being paid when the amount I received is already minus their fees?
Here are the individual figures of the particular invoice in question:• Line 1: $307.
How do I reconcile it against the invoice/them ?
How do I show the full amount of money we took at the event, and how/where do I reconcile the invoice for the new equip, paid for with some of the cash takings?
This is how I've been working round it:Purchase invoice issued to Company1.
How would i reconcile this against the £12 invoice as it will be slightly short due to the PayPal fee's.
How do I reconcile the payments and match the invoice?
How/when can we claim the input VAT back on this as technically the invoice has been paid?
I'm looking for a field on the bill where I can enter the invoice number where I charged for the subcontracted service.
There is a $10 saving applied to the entire invoice (not a particular line item) which brings the total down to $26.
I invoice clients for licences which are generally annual, but I cannot figure out how to allocate the income equally across the life of the licence
There is no invoice or bill to attribute this to.
Wondering if an invoice for the 10 widgets with a credit note is the answer?
We find the detail information is too much to put on the remittance stub when it would be simpler to have the "invoice number(s)" listed that the check is paying.
I am assuming I can code this as one with the consultant's fee as it is one invoice?
How do I set up the invoice?
Also, we are starting to supply a number of charities products - How do we process this on a quotation/sales invoice?
We have customers that we invoice monthly for a set amount per day, so this can be 28,29,30 or 31.
How do I invoice and post these?
For example, invoice could say:Service X                                              100 USDGST                                                        15 USD*Amount due USD                             115 USD*Footnote: This is equivalent to $23.
This means that the client can legitimately enter my invoice which they receive on the 23rd of the month as at the 1st of the next month.
Should i edit the invoice amount OR use some form of credit note?
These are not Billable Expenses that I can include on an invoice to the client.
50 from job 1234, but I cannot figure out how to associate the Purchase Orders from Sub-contractors 1 and 2, and the Stripe fee with the Invoice I sent to client for Job 1234, so unless I do the math on a piece of paper or in excel, I can't see how much money I've made from this job.
However, there are instances when one invoice shows deposits for multiple room hires or restaurant dinners.
Can you please provide some feedback about the tracking category field and whether I can incorporate same in to customising invoice?
Do I enter multiple bills for each invoice?
One of our clients recently started paying on our paypal link in the invoice.
Please could anyone clarify what should happen in the following instance:Purchase invoice (bill) received from someone who isn't registered for VAT.
Should this invoice be entered as:1) No VAT2) Zero rated3) Exempt?
The invoice we send out obviously has a different figure to the one receive, how can I reconcile this quickly and easily?
How do i create an invoice with this?
Or should I create an invoice for each one every month?
If I issue a credit note for the second half of the invoice, will this invoice still show in my sales income?
So if I'm using the voucher to communicate to the supplier what I am paying, it would be preferable to title it "Invoice #" as opposed to "Reference. "
Is it possible to enter cash sales without generating an invoice?
What is important to me is to be able to track the Fee vs the Invoice - i. e. I don't simply want to put it in a bucket.
How do I properly handle closing out this invoice as well as moving the additional 3% to the appropriate "credit card fee expense(? )"
So how would I record the agents invoice until the c79 comes through?
Often a purchase is not backed up by a VAT invoice or receipt, it's a cash purchase and/or online purchase.
So maybe there is an order confirmation with no VAT breakdown but sometimes there is no receipt and no invoice.
How can I remove the "Outstanding bills" that shows at the top when a user views their invoice online?
Hi,I am trying to create a DOCX sales invoice template whereby there are lines items in the body of the invoice where the amounts indicated are not included in the total amount of the invoice.
How can I allocate my prepayment without coding to an invoice?
I then invoice my client for my time and any other costs incurred.
My question is how do I determine the profit or loss of a invoice (order)?
How do I categorize this invoice line so that my reports show the difference as profit and the true cost of the equipment as an expense.
However, what I don't want to do is input multiple lines on an invoice for each team.
A UBL invoice can be sent from a supplier to a recipient electronically through an access point.
Would it be possible to nominate an email address to send notification when a repeating invoice is sent?
My question is what date do I use for the invoice?
Is it possible to enter free form text to an individual sales invoice?
My question - is it possible to send the pdf file attachments with a sales invoice?
How do I keep track of the Stripe transfers I actually get, opposed to what the invoice is so I can match up.
I can't seem to be able to void the invoice either.
When I purchase an asset and push the invoice into FA it is fine, however in this instance there is no invoice.
How do I create my Sales Invoice automatically from orders I received in separate system without manually entering the data?
In the FX rate at the top of the invoice I put .
Can I include GST on a personal invoice to my business?
This is different to a regular invoice where tax inclusive is default.
Hello All,I am working in a country that has a habit of rounding off the last two decimal places when manually writing a bill/invoice total.
Presently these FIFO employees should be set up as INVOICE ONLY – DRAFT ONLY.
Now I've got a very old unpaid invoice sitting, apart from screwing my days-to-get-paid stats, it worries me for other reasons - monthly figures are wrong.
I'm trying to figure out if we can tag a payable invoice to a sales invoice for future reporting purposes.
Or even per Invoice.
Without changing the invoice date, how can I make this invoice appear in August.
How do I apply these against the invoice, so I can mark the invoice as fully paid.
I've enabled cash payments to be made to the directors' loan nominal, and can then use it to settle the wages invoice.
I have a yearly invoice from an insurance supplier, which I am paying monthly by direct debit.
All I am finding at the moment, is that you can have a PayPal button at the bottom of the invoice, however that is not what I want, as the process is not as quick and easy as what MYOB are offering.
Can anyone tell me which VAT description to pick, from the invoice line drop down list, in the following circumstances.
-Do you find that there's often discrepancies between your PO and your invoice?
OWNA will:1) Upload your ordered products by taking a photo (any invoice or quote).
Is there a setting to not allow a customer to alter an invoice?
Secondly, how do I go about allocating the payments to the invoice?
Do I invoice each artist for these repayments?
Also how do i reconcile the invoice from payatrader as im not sending them any monies.
The due date of the invoice would be pretty far in the future, realizing that I can't accurately predict when all the value will have been delivered.
When doing an invoice we can update email address and postal address but not telephone numbers.
How can I expose these attachments to the client via the invoice without scanning them all in again and reattaching, which would negate the first scanning process.
When i went to checkout the notes on the invoice, I noticed it is not even there anymore.
How do I show I am missing the invoice and that I shouldn't claim VAT on it?
And what do I do with the invoice?
They then invoice us with our PO number and their Supplier invoice number.
I am worried that using HSBC for invoice financing will create a lot of additional work for us on a daily basis.
When I reconcile sales invoice to payments received there is a difference of $86.
I can not see an option to create a Pro forma invoice to customers?
I invoice them as I do with my cash customer.
When we issue a NZD invoice, the following information is always included on the invoice:How do I remove this information?
How do we invoice this without showing the commission on the invoice to the client?
I want to be able to associate a salesman with a customer, such that when an invoice is raised for that customer the salesman is associated with the invoice by default.
Please don't tell me we can't include it on the sales invoice.
Hello,Because there is no area to write a description of works completed, i use the reference part of the invoice.
First what do I do about this incorrect invoice?
When I purchase something from a supplier, what do I do with the tax listed on the invoice?
How do I set this up on the invoice?
Every four months I do some work in Kuala Lumpur and invoice in US dollars.
About once a year I do similar work in Australia and invoice in Australian dollars.
We want to move to a system where he can invoice the customer directly from the job.
As far as I can tell there are a couple of options to handle the dynamic content:- set the repeating invoice to 'Save as Draft' that I can manually change the Reference for each invoice and then manually approve and send.
But what is happening when there is no invoice and I have the option of creating a spend money item from the reconciliation screen?
This is critical for the customer to see what payments were applied to his invoice.
At some point, would it be possible to have the notes box pop up automatically (or have the option) when an invoice is voided, instead of the oh-so-time-consuming task of having to click "View Invoice" and then "Notes", please?
Is it possible to revert to a blank reference field when there is no reference in first invoice please?
My question is, how do I produce an invoice where it splits out the multiple rates under the one task.
Is it possible that when creating a bill or an invoice the extra lines required can be set, as it is currently when creating a quote.
When in an invoice you can copy that invoice - can we then use a drop down to turn it in to a credit note?
If the confirmation is incorrect either funds were not received or cheque was not cleared they it is still an outstanding invoice but reminders are not being sent.
Can I please have 1 of the following suggestions implemented:- any uploaded invoice attachment automatically defaults to 'include with invoice' = true.
They always get confused as there is nothing inside the invoice saying what job this is for?
As a consultant/contractor, I am required to invoice for my work on a monthly basis.
Its not feasible to do this for every invoice, often we are entering up to 50 or more a day.
It would be great to have the option to taylor invoice reminders for each individual customer, perhaps it could be added to the page as an option when creating new customers on the system?
Then go through it all again next invoice input.
Currently i do this in one of the description fields on an invoice.
This would help Bookkeepers who have many clients to remind them of things to do with the invoice without clicking into each invoice to see the notes.
Since there is an option to set an amount not to send if the amount is lower than "x", setting a starting point for an invoice # or a date should be able to be added with little trouble.
At the moment you cannot tell you have made prepayments until you raise an invoice, then you can allocate the credit.
Please allow the invoice lists to show reference _instead_ of customer name (make it an option please)2.
There is a field for Reference in a Sales Invoice.
A tax invoice is supposed to be held for each item on which GST is claimed.
To give the option to send a client an editable invoice in an open format as word of example.
each item line of an invoice appears in the CSV).
Can we have the system automatically send the client the a copy of the invoice once they approve the quote?
Could you have a reminder of some sort so that if an invoice is being raised, we are aware that a purchase order number needs to be quoted?
Can you please create an option when setting up a repeating invoice instead of selecting a date you can choose "Last Day of the Month"?
'Week', 'Month' 'Year' (+ or -) aren't really beneficial for calculating invoice date as we have different terms for different services and clients.
Would save me clicking on the attached PDF each time to work what the $ / invoice number relates to.
However, once the invoice is created and ready for emailing/posting, we are not sure what that customers preference is.
Currently we only enter email addresses for those who request email preference, but there is nothing on the invoice to tell us what their preference is, or that there is an email address entered in their customer file.
So, Im asking for a simple notification, placed next to the email option on draft emails, so I can see how I should be delivering their invoice.
So it would read "From Sales Invoice #92134:"Dead easy to do and very useful!
Please have the system challenge if you are sure that you wish to send a DRAFT invoice.
What I recommend is that the first version of an invoice take a "copy" of the Contact details.
What would be ideal is, if the date of invoice would update automatically to the date the invoice is approved.
The standard invoice template offers a logo upload in only a small size, which is fine when viewed on screen, but when printed, is illegible.
Please bring back the ability to attach an invoice to new fixed assets entered in the register
How do I skip the current invoice without approving?
Please make new notes clearly visible e. g. at the top of the invoice
It is very rare that today's date would correspond to the invoice date - so why it is a default I don't understand.
We usually put down our company name for the details however I receive a lot of phone calls asking me to verify the invoice we paid and to please put the invoice number instead.
Can it be set up that you select the items off the quote (maybe a tick box) to appear on the invoice without having to delete anything.
Can we have a feature similar to cash coding but without creating a new sales invoice?
I get shipped many Purchase Orders at once and get sent one invoice.
My suggestions are:1.  that the 'merged' invoice optionally can have a label that it is a 'merged' invoice2.
As under UK GAAP (and IFRS) the income must be split annually evenly over 12 months, can the sales invoice be released evenly to the P&L over 12 months?
Many people invoice quarterly or annually for services or licences, so I would have thought this was a very common problem.
s in the one invoice and also asinine inventory or item to a particular currency.
I have suppliers that have items on back orders that I can not send to my customers so to have to part invoice delete and create another draft invoice which is a waist of time, and if i don't do it then and there it can be forgotten.
please can we have the option of having the last used suppliers name loading into the next invoice/bill?
I believe a Approve and copy feature would be another time saving shortcut when posting large invoice batches.
Please could you create a separate proforma invoice function, which allows you to make part payments against the proforma invoice, before being able to convert it to a sales invoice upon the customer settling the full balance.
I hate having to type in my login details each time I come to do an invoice .
with the app i can only send the invoice to the first contact.
So I have to type in these details with every invoice we do at end of month.
Sometime items are deleted and/or added to our repeating bills - can change the sequence or order of what is represented on the bill/invoice received from a supplier.
We use the bill process once the supplier invoice arrives, which can be many days after the stock arrives.
I separate out non-on-chargeable expenses that I’m claiming from the company, with on-chargeable expenses that can go on the invoice to the client.
Including with invoice is a very easy step to miss.
Which can be used to create a invoice .
Can we have an extension to the quote facility to quote for a new recurring invoice?
Unsure why we cannot already do this but one of my employees voided an invoice in error.
it is not possible for me to make a new invoice.
- Be able to link any repeating journal entry to an invoice/payable entry.
On other systems there is a check box or something that allows you to drop the total, then all we do when we come to invoice is modify.
This has been partially covered in although with the new quote functionality it would be really nice if we could do the following: - Set a required deposit percentage on the quote (perhaps displayed on the generated quote)- Generate an invoice for the selected percentage as a deposit invoice with the click of a button- Generate an invoice for the remaining amount (total minus the deposit) with the click of a button - At a glance of the quote see if a deposit and / or total invoice has been paidApologies if this has already been suggested, but this would really help my invoicing workflow as I often have to keep a separate record of deposits sent / paid and manually calculate the remaining amount to invoice on completion of a project.
Even better, this would then automatically create a draft invoice within zero and await approval.
However, if an ending date is set that is the same as the invoice date, an invoice will be sent out anyway.
Could we please have a field when creating and printing a Sales Invoice, to enter the Customer's Purchase Order #?
For example, when creating a sales invoice, a unique code would be added (e. g SIN001) or for a purchase invoice (e. g PIN001).
an invoice or a range of invoice numbersExamples:1.
Can you please alter the draft invoice only user access to give them the ability to create draft credit notes for approval?
The basic invoice template ?
It would helpful if the customer can make partial payments themselves on the integration vs call me and I manually make changes in stripe or separate out one invoice into several.
We have set up separate branding templates where the client can select a "Quotation" which has a different layout compared to an invoice.
This would prompt people to accept a quote immediately without them asking you to approve the invoice first.
I have used the reference to indicate how an invoice is paid and the amount if not the same as the invoice.
This means that every single invoice must be manually viewed and marked as Paid which will take FOREVER.
Acknowledgements can also head off customers chasing delivery, potential invoice queries further down the line and present a more professional image to the customer.
At present I am prefixing my supplier invoice ref.
Can we have a simple feature that allows a one click option to create a delivery note from an invoice that has already been reconciled.
Currently a new sales invoice is created with only 5 lines in which to write.
Currently I must go in and Print as PDF each invoice and email to them so they can send to clients.
This isn't great as I want all the numbers to be visible to the customer when I print the invoice, so they can check I've got them all right.
However a large number of online purchases do not give me a PDF invoice, they provide only an email with invoice details.
Now I want the amount to turn up in the month of travel, not in the month I issued the invoice (same for costs).
This would remove a lot of the time spent on manually inputting the dates etc for what is essentially the same invoice every week.
If you sort it in ascending order, the latest invoice (example invoice 1058) will appears somewhere in the middle of the page 1 or page 2.
But this only calculates from the current date, it would be great if it could work it out from the invoice date!
Looking for these is traumatic, particularly when our supplier invoice numbers are similar to ours.
I'm surprised there is no field to date individual line items on a receivables invoice.
At the moment I can import & export financial data via an Open Standards CSV format (& well-documented API's), which is great for interoperability with other systems :)Unfortunately this is not carried through universally, such as Custom Invoice Branding, which is reliant on ms docx formats.
Or do some convoluted narration on the invoice itself to explain the balances.
At the moment I am having to go back to clients and request them to assign each invoice line to a tracking option - prefer not to have to do this!
I also purchase some goods online and then receive an email with the invoice details.
Are there any keyboard shortcuts when entering a new payable invoice?
And when the actual supplier invoice comes in it can be checked against the PO and the invoice approved and converted to a purchase invoice Here's where it falls apart though, there is NO WAY currently to customise the payable invoice as you can with receivable invoices, so the printed version to send to supplier says 'invoice' and gives our registered address (which cannot be changed) and not our physical address.
Lately dragging a line item on an invoice to another row is sooooo painful.
Do custom invoice templates allow extra fields?
There is a difference in the Invoice Preview layout and the Print PDF layout.
There is no drop down contact list when I go to create a new invoice?
How can I put in the description to the client the "month" so that it rolls over on each invoice.
Of course there is an issue where a supplier has more than one invoice for the month and you only want consolidated payments.
Is there a setting where we can check to automatically attach PDF invoice to all outgoing emails?
In Chrome I am unable to adjust the order of the rows when creating an invoice.
Do I create a separate contact each time and invoice that?
So is there a option where I can enable/disable this feature as and when required, depending on the invoice.
How do I book the item in so that I can raise an invoice for it's sale ?
Hi there,In order to edit a sale invoice I have removed & unreconciled all of the payments that were attached to that invoice.
Also how can i issue 1100 dollars invoice to our client.
Sent an invoice and got this back, Any one have any idea what this means?
This is critical for me since logically, I put some details in there to give myself and my customers an idea of what the invoice is for.
I can't work out how do I create invoice that reflect 1 month rent for equipment?
My husband and I run our own roofing business and I am fixing our invoice and quote templates up and they arent flowing properly.
We dont sell quantities or unit items - we offer/invoice our service of labour to fix repairs etc.
For example: There is a invoice#A which the value is $10.
We do not make any adjustments on this invoice.
We run daily and monthly reports to track payments by invoice.
As our first system is not suitable for invoicing, it is not possible to create an invoice number.
How can I be sure which ones should be matched without an invoice number after they arepaid off?
We do one invoice per week for a major customer and sometimes things get missed.
Hi All,I have this issue on when I am in an invoice, and click to another part of the invoice (example: clicking inside the Description box, it then jumps to the bottom of the invoice, and I have to scroll back up to the top of the invoice, and click in the Description field again in order to type.
Is it possible to have an invoice line calculated as a percentage of another invoice line?
Please can you tell me how to configure "Invoice Only" users so they cannot access all historical financial data?
for now I am manually adding this to the expense description so I can input the tracking code again on the invoice to keep my tracking reports accurate.
then I can't customise my invoice to how I want it.
How do i enter a overpayment in a batch, when client pays invoice twiceThanks Karen
The second is a line item of type INV called Square - Net Credit Card Sales that is the invoice that square uploaded on each day.
I have tried to create a credit note against the invoice, have tried to create a separate invoice for ($363) which is not possible given is below zero.
The only option I have found is to create a brand new invoice, which is not what I want to do.
If the Expense Claim module can do this, how do I generate an invoice out of it?
How can I create a package of items on an invoice, some taxable some not, without showing each of the individual line item prices.
How do I remove the original invoice, because it's been partially paid I can't see a delete option or anything.
Under features I can see four things: 1. invoice settings 2. currencies 3. payroll settings and 4. email settings.
I'm wondering if it’s possible to assign multiple purchase orders to a sales invoice (the same as you can with bills)?
26My question is how do I reconcile these payments against the invoice?
I haven't had time to investigate what is happening, but I'll use one invoice as an example.
Also, it would be nice if you could automatically attach copies of relevant invoice to an outgoing statement.
I am customising an invoice template.
A typical sales invoice needs some kind of supporting document in most cases i. e. a time-sheet, or a purchase order or even a confirmation email.
Shipping from USPS is applied to invoice along with other info (such as tracking number?
b)  Can anyone tell me what happens if an invoice is voided in a reporting quarter after the invoice was issued.
So if I have a customer who rents a forklift for 12 month and they started renting on 5/10/14, they would automatically get a new invoice each month stating the actual hire period they are being charged for.
And If I create Supplier Bill for "Lease Rent" and Customer Invoice for the deductions, how shall I combine them both to have a LANDLORD STATEMENT, which I can forward to the Landlord.
Also how can I adjust the invoice so I have less dead space at the top of the page.
My question is how can I change the title/lebel of the 'reference' on a sales invoice?
I can create alternate templates, but I'm at a loss for how they can be applied on an invoice by invoice, customer by customer, or country by country basis.
I have refunded the monies owing via credit note but how do I now cancel the invoice that has payments made?
How do I remove the item code from my invoice templates.
Basically, I am trying to ensure I can track the booking invoice from creation through deposits to final invoice.
At what stage will the actual invoice instance be created?
I am concerned at seeing a 500 invoice limit somewhere?
I want to post a purchase invoice, but there is no space for my own reference of the invoice.
i also have 6 guys that they are doing this job for those contacts, they work on self employer and they invoice me at the end the month.
i also have 6 guys that they are doing this job for those contacts, they work on self employer and they invoice me at the end the month.
After reconciliation, how would one go about removing or canceling out the A2X invoice sales lines so that sales are not reported twice.
Can anyone recommend an app where we can input the daily deliveries and auto generate the invoice when needed based on this?
We want to tag every invoice with a unique job identifier and then the expenses for those jobs get the same identifier so we can see individual job/project results/margin.
This is quite frustrating as the whole purpose is that there will  be a digital copy of every invoice.
This is necessary for my clients to understand how they we're invoice.
Meaning change contents of invoice or PO.
Why is it so hard to continue emailing a PDF invoice?
As you can imagine they are getting 'Happy New Year' message though and from ourselves they get an invoice!
In the process of creating new invoice, see something I want to change, go to Invoice Settings, error 500.
As this is a large invoice to us (45k EUR) this is acutally a major problem.
I have been trying to finalise payments on an invoice for the past 30 minutes, and keep on getting the Error500 message.
When I select the product code to invoice there is now a delay - it used to find it instantly.
- Do I mean that I have an AR invoice?
- When I am looking at a customer, are you talking about an AR invoice?
- When I am looking at a vendor, are you talking about an AP invoice?
##### CLUSTER 20 #####
You can monitor the budget and export invoices from TimeCamp to Xero.
Now I am stuck as to how I really get rid of these as the real payments are now allocated to the invoices.
Is it possible to put through a bad debt differently, such a journal entry, on an accrual scheme so that we can claim the VAT back but still leave the invoices open in case we do eventually get payments in?
We don't want to enter invoices again so what is the process to put an adjustment through Xero VAT return?
How do you reconcile the invoices you made in Xero for a customer when the customer pays by Squareup.
What am I supposed to do with the invoices I created for the customer?
I would be grateful if you could please advise what the best procedure is to write off and write down open invoices within XERO.
when this is set up will Xero show us which invoices/clients have paid - and where can I see this?
I can seem to get all my clients moved over, but when I go to import my bills and invoices I run into problems.
So I have for instance 500 000 outstanding invoices, but my balance is 600 000 as there is 100 000 from the previous year.
Or must all invoices be paid individually?
Xero states any outstanding invoices etc.
As these businesses are based outside of Australia their invoices do not include GST.
We use the 'match' feature to allocate the correct sale invoices to the single transaction, once all the invoices are allocated and the figures match, we can reconcile.
My company started using Xero on 1st July 2016 so we have only posted sales and purchase invoices from 1st July.
For a lot of online services, I can get the invoices from their website.
Should the feature not be available to include in customising invoices, then how soon before this can be available?
I'm reaching out to anyone that uses repeating invoices annually.
What would be helpful is if Xero could use the timesheets to then make invoices to customers.
How do I enlarge the logo on my invoices?
Hello,How do i make custom repeating numbers for invoices?
I am now also adding invoices I received from suppliers as bills in Xero.
I'm trying to figure out how I can set up recurring invoices in WorkflowMax.
It is still not required for businesses to send other businesse invoices over a UBL access point.
Our company have multi-currencies supplier invoices, for example HKD, USD, EUR or GBP.
Some of the suppliers are providing a refund - some are being offset against future invoices.
Should I be creating Invoices or Bills?
My thinking was that the first job would be to raise a credit note against each of the invoices (I'm fairly confident I can manage that part), then create a whole bunch of new invoices for exactly the same amounts.
We have two invoices in Xero against which partial payments seem have been recorded.
Some of the invoices are emailed to me; some are not.
How do I mark 'repeating invoices' as paid in advance for clients that have set up direct debit?
I'm provided with a month's worth of sales and supplier invoices at a time from a client.
How do you match the reality (physical invoices in folders etc. )
Doing that, I can match it with existing Invoices then to reconcile.
So my first problem, is that I then have to go into Xero to amend all invoices received by iZettle, to put the different sales codes on.
Create dummy invoices and do not send them?
When I go to find and match I can only see the invoices not the credit notes.
Is there anyway I can see both the invoices and credit notes in the find and match window.
I import the invoices via csv, how do I import payments in the same manner?
It doesn't matter what period I choose it still shows all the invoices, not only the Payable ones.
My guessing is I do, but how do I match the payments collected through the subscription to individual invoices?
Invoices made in xero are dating correctly.
If not where do I then send the invoices created, perhaps there is a screen that shows Invoices waiting to be sent?
Where can I see GL impact of any vouchers/invoices?
What is the treatment for VAT for Xero invoices to an Irish business which is about to register for VAT?
His suppliers invoices include GST so do I record that as GST on expenses when I enter them?
How can I make sure that on future invoices, the insurance company will not double charge me?
We are based in Hertford - HertfordshireCandidate needs to be self-employed and be able to work from home, but also have means to come into the office from time to time to pick up and drop off invoices.
Question #1: now that it's tax time,  should I (or can I) enter all these expenses and invoices from prior to my start date into Xero?
I'm not quite sure what the "Paid to" Section is, I would have assumed all invoices would have been automatically set to paid to "Cash" as a current assetThank you!
Anyone else missing invoices?
Has anybody any experience of posting more invoices and what happens!
It would be great if we could have a free format text field for invoices to allow recording off any special instructions.
Obviously some months will be blank, but I do have forward dated supplier and sales invoices which would/should show up.
Can delivery notes be matched to xero customer invoices?
HiDoes anyone use dynamic content on repeating invoices?
);  so how do you actually change the period of the monthly invoices you email to your clients?
How do I make sure that we have all the documentation/tax invoices required for ATO compliance?
How can I match payments to invoices then?
Is this possible, I dont want to create 4 invoices with the total split 4 ways.
Also, it would be good to have a cash flow forecast tile that could use due dates on bills, orders, and invoices to forecast cash flow.
Xero not displaying original foreign value of invoices is a separate issue, but edit layout on more reports would be great please!
Brief explanation:A tab or webpage where you can view all files you've uploaded such as invoices or receipts.
Could we get an option to sort or search invoices and quotes by user?
I am autoimporting invoices from woocommerce with the Payee name and all other details.
Also, it should be an option to further customise how invoices look form the clients point of view.
What's actually the case is that I have $383 across 11 unpaid invoices, with 14 overpayments ("dues credits" for my org's purposes) totalling $1333.
Is it possible to set this up to receive online payments to invoices?
This is particularly helpful when reconciling payments for foreign currency invoices which cannot be paid as "batches" in xero.
Staff working on Suppliers is not able to view Age Analysis or previous invoices captured.
Please change the integration so invoices for clients with "Zero rated GST" selected default to "GST Free Exports".
Can the link from PO to creating a Purchase Order please retain the PO number field and also can it retain the same date as it currently updates the date to TODAY but I rarely post purchase invoices on the same day that they were raised by the supplier.
Invoices could have a 'tag' field which allowed any free text phrase to be used .
I have over 600 repeating invoices, this could be done within 1 hr  if I could export them out, but takes days to edit them otherwise
When adding new invoices, there is a green "APPROVE" button at the bottom.
Please change the new reports so you can exclude invoices due after the month/period you are interested in.
I approve all drafted invoices and think Xero can match all sent invoices to received money.
Can you execute a check on exiting the program that warns the user if there are unsent invoices?
Currently there is no level of access in the user roles that would allow staff members to be able to draw up quotes, purchase orders and create and send invoices without being able to view all of the data for the whole company in Xero.
The information has to be input as invoices as there is no other option.
Under "invoices owed to you", can we have a button "New Quote"?
Then, we can change the contact details in the future (inevitable) without changing the older invoices which correctly and historically went to the old contact details.
There is already an option for overdue invoices should I wish to view them.
Can Quotes be added to this as well Maybe next to Invoices with a click to Quote History.
CAN WE PLEASE HAVE COPIES OF BILLS ATTACHED TO NEW INVOICES IF WE ATTACH.
I was only able to transfer the full amount of the invoices not what was outstanding.
very handy CAN THEY BE THE SAME invoices and quotations?
This will prevent problems when invoices are imported from csv file as it is easy to duplicate contacts.
I feel that the one main thing that is missing is the option to inline edit the invoices on Xero without having to open up a separate tab.
The system now will allow you to put in invoices from last year without any warning or even put in invoices an time in the future.
Please update the default PayPal logo that appears on invoices - see the PayPal Logo Centre for current logo's.
Xero could apply this logic to sales invoices too, allowing more info for businesses who allow instalment payments against their invoices.
But we have hundreds of outstanding invoices at any point in time resulting in many pages.
Once processed the program should drop you back to the list of invoices outstanding so you can start on the next transaction.
In invoices you can do calculations in some fields (i. e. instead of using a calculator).
I would hope this will be included in the App very soon so you can quote on the run and turn quotes into invoices?
You do this for invoices so it's be great if this could be replicated for quotes.
When I reconcile against invoices they get split and aren't shown clearly.
The payments disappear into payments for invoices which can be different amounts.
If I change a contact name in my database (for example correct the spelling of their name) it creates a new contact in Xero instead of adding the invoices to an existing contact.
Often quotes/invoices/packing slips have multiple lines (10+) for products that are not immediately recognizable or easily described.
I have found some of my customers get confused by the due date being displayed on paid invoices.
Why is there no direct link to Client Invoices once they login into Xero.
so for those of us without a nifty integration set up, it would be wonderful if we could set invoices to generate with a greater number of lines by default.
However the issue is that how can I see or sort invoices or drafts by user ?
Please implement the same solution as what you have in place for managing this in Xero invoices.
Any Sales invoices that have not been paid/reconciled.
Please Xero, implement this feature to avoid the complicated work around adjusting or editing invoices to show correct VAT amounts when VAT is only charged on the Margin between Purchase price and Selling Price.
There is not the option to show all legitimate invoices otherwise.
VOIDED invoices are a real pain in Xero - as they keep getting added into totals - can't we archive them?
Please, please can you FIX the function email multiple invoices.
Is it possible to Highlight Text (ie as if using a highlighter pen) in say Draft Invoices/Invoices or Purchases?
However, since the invoices can run 30-100 pages in length for some customers, we prefer to print the invoices double sided.
I am sick of having to go in and create these job numbers - which should be pushed over from WFM anyway (an absolute disgrace this still hasn't been addressed) - so staff can allocate against their client invoices.
We can do repeating invoices for a single contact every month.
The scenario is that we use MyAccountingToolbox to synchronise invoices from Autotask to Xero.
The invoices our business generates are often pages long, and adding the lines one by one can be time consuming and aggravating.
Please see also my suggestion that the "next new line" be added automatically on invoices as occurs in many other accounting programmes.
The invoices our business generates are often pages long, and adding the lines one by one can be time consuming and aggravating.
When entering the contact details in invoices, the system should ask if you want to create a 'new contact' if it can't recognise the details you are entering.
At present you can search for all of a clients outstanding or paid invoices and download one PDF with multiple invoices.
I mean whats the point of approving invoices if you can send out the draft's anyway?
There are staff in different departments here entering invoices and some require inclusive and some exclusive set up, so there are often mistakes when the wrong set up is used.
Flipping through each page when you want to close off paid invoices can be agonising.
It is a bit of a chore looking for invoices that have been automatically created but not sent.
This applies to other invoices if you have multiple items too (which I can now get around if needed).
Can we please be able to edit or delete notes on invoices?
If I click on the amount outstanding for a customer and export a pdf of the invoices based on the selected date range, in the pdf output the amounts are rounded but in the excel they are accurateCan we please have the amounts exactly represented as this confuses customers?
Any one else dealing with adding interest to invoices that are paid late?
This is very easy to skip over when entering a lot of invoices at once & if you are tabing across quickly the message is easy to be missed.
(Possibly in the same place as the bulk upload of invoices).
Can we please have the ability to load more than one email address to who invoices get sent to?
Will we also be able to attached files to employees as we can attach invoices to suppliers
If there was a feature available that can allow to auto allocate credit to multiple invoices.
How can you get a balance outstanding amount on the bottom of your invoices?
I am getting a time and date stamp on every line item on my invoices.
Is it possible to assign different email templates to outgoing emails when sending invoices out?
Is there the ability, within Xero, to send invoices to one email address and have a separate email for statements.
When emailing invoices purchase orders etc from within Xero there is a reply address for the sender.
I generally copy invoices for clients on semi regular basis as I only have to change the quantity of items and perhaps had additional descriptions.
(I do not mind manually creating invoices of what I have sold in a day due to my limited inventory item choices. )
Is it possible to give one email address access to see unpaid invoices of multiple customers?
I now have many POs, quotes, and invoices and I seem to have lost any links between them.
How would I check if these invoices were somehow missed in the sequence?
While our Product Team urgently work to resolve this issue, please create individual invoices for each of the intended contacts.
We do not create invoices for this, we simply do a receive money transaction.
I have been told that this is because the invoices on the system are not coded as inventory items (ie the Item Code field is left blank).
However, I cannot figure out how to reconcile as the invoices/bills are not in the awaiting payments and if I use 'create' it will create a duplicate.
Hello,I have been asked by clients whether the links in e-mailed quotes and invoices are free of viruses.
however NOT have power to authorize any invoices or expense claims?
The problem is that these invoices are already paid in different date.
Has anyone experienced similar issue with their sales/purchase invoices?
I'm concerned about how many invoices have been sent out where the total has been short.
At the moment the only work around I have is to promote everyone to administrators so they can print invoices.
Sometimes this will happen several times before the import works and imports all of the sales invoices in the file.
I can see from the Demo Videos that recurring invoices are easy.
HiI am wanting to set up an email inbox in xero so that I can email all my invoices to it directly.
So how do I match the balance on the cc statement with the invoices and this credit in the purchases?
I paid the old supplier against number of invoices, some of which were for the old company and some for the new.
Is it possible to store (electronically) purchase invoices in Xero?
How do I get a summary of billable hours from my Sales Invoices (under the quantity item)?
Company X invoices start 2xxxxxx company Y invoices start 5xxxxxx so they can be differentiated in Xero.
As we always deduct the amount for batch of invoices from prepayment, how should I record it?
All my invoices (created in another program) do this.
I am trying to bring in a bunch of invoices from the past 18 months into Xero.
Is it possible to have a file permanently attached to all invoices?
It is possible to attach documents to supplier credit notes, however, unlike sales invoices it is not possible to view the attached document without selecting - Credit Note Options - Edit.
These payments maybe invoices I have sent out or as a result on received money which is entered into Xero.
The trouble I'm having is that when I upload a high quality 400x120px PNG (~15KB), Xero is compressing the image further so it ultimately come out looking pixelly/fuzzy on my PDF invoices.
I have read the guides on how to contra / offset single invoices.
My ecommerce website automatically creates invoices for each sale in Xero.
I want to be able to do repeating invoices each month set by anniversary date.
Then how do I reconcile the bulk fee received each month against inndividual invoices (paid or not).
Most of these invoices are renewals and almost all of them can be grouped under around two dozen categories.
How can i get my email address, phone number and website details to appear on my invoices?
This is for all selected invoices.
All of the contacts in question have the first name field filled in and if I click 'Send anyway', the invoices are sent and the contact's first name appears at the top of the email anyway so there isn't actally any error.
as all the invoices are different and some have gst/non gst items?
I can void Invoices but not credit notes am I missing something?
My art gallery client includes a picture of the purchased artwork in their word invoices, is this going to be possible with a .
We are using Xero for invoices, we dont want to start using something else to do more invoicing !
I am wondering if I can set the email address that invoices go out from?
3) If I change an inventory item code down the line, will it alter past invoices/how will it affect reports?
What we want to do is tie all of the invoices that we generate straight into Xero using (of course) the API.
Saying this, a client is a mechanic and do a large amount of invoices perday and very detailed ones.
We can Import Debtors Invoices but it would be nice to be able to Import Bills payable.
Shoeboxed transforms your piles of paper receipts into payables invoices in Xero by using reply paid envelopes or your mobile phone.
Automatically sync invoices, taxes, customers, payments, refunds, products, and stock level.
Invoices and payments are exchanged automatically without any data entry.
Intelligently capture data from scanned Invoices and Receipts and post them straight into Xero.
Create invoices in Xero from orders in Magento.
Convert time entries into Xero invoices in 4 clicks.
We use DEAR with Amazon integration which creates invoices in xero and payments against them.
Has anyone else found a service provider who offers that function for CHF invoices?
Can't seem to post to the app review page of Entryless - I started out being pretty happy with the free service however it now continually loses invoices that have been sent to the app.
We can then batch send out the invoices from Xero.
My invoices in xero are showing BAS EXCLUDED not GST income or GST free income.
I also have a similar issue with the woocommerce sales invoices but the volume is a lot lower.
what is the best addon so that the invoices/payments created by duoplane can be reconciled to the payments from paypal/stripe/zipmoney.
Link to an hourly rate for each training program or service contained in the Client Record for the production of invoices.
On receipt of the goods in the client then invoices the customer for the balance.
"Also, I’m not sure what the relationship is in Xero between invoices and sales.
GBP invoices do not have this problem.
If anyone currently pays foreign currency supplier invoices there is a new addonAvailable in the addon store.
We use Harvest for Employee Time & Expense entry which work great for creating invoices and integrating them into Xero.
Also if edit invoices or PO in WFM, do they automatically update in Xero?
I have a requirement to provide a crm system that can automatically take contacts and invoices from xero.
I have opened two different company logins and I cannot open customers or suppliers or find any uploaded invoices even though there are over twenty uploaded.
I can see this causes a lot of issues where invoices become 10% less than what they should be.
As a sole contractor in a small island nation in which its hard not to do business internationally, I'm facing 900$ a year to support 12 measly invoices.
As this email address is not unique to your company, our software cannot direct your invoices correctly.
When I create invoices, the city field of my clients' addresses appears in all caps, even though they're formatted correctly in the contact info.
##### CLUSTER 21 #####
Quite often you will get about two days coming through or when you have just imported a statement and it is reasonably common and I will show you how to fix it.
Is it assumed GST is included in the paid amount or is this just wishful thinking?
I've been paying myself mileage for a few of months now, but have only just had time to do an expense claim.
Do we just zero it out at the end of the year and not worry, if so how do we do that without affecting income?
In my current system it is treated as a "goodwill" asset, i just want to be sure that this is correct before adding in the balance.
Can i just stop receiving the personal feeds?
I've been through all the guides and it says just click the button/box but there is no box.
Or instead just use a manual journal?
Confusing - why not just create it in the liability area of Balance Sheet along with any loans?
Anyone with a solution to this in laymans terms I would be grateful as I am two clicks away from just remaining with cashflow.
I am a sole trader and just become VAT registered (UK).
The resold service is fine, I have a 200 series sales nominal for that but I just wanted a quick sanity check on the purchase side.
Or is it enough if I just create a New Bill line without any attachments?
Just imagine if your life was suddenly switched with theirs"To donate please CLICK on the LINK or CUT and PASTE to your browser and follow the prompts….
I am just wondering if:1.
Can I just record the initial deposit as a 'purchase'.
I'm just not sure what the journal should be.
Do I just put it in under 'Expense' and select "No GST"?
Is this down to my version of Excel or is this something that just doesn't work?
I'm just confused about what effect this has on the ledger, i. e. where is the other side of the double-entry being accounted for?
I've just heard that a client I've invoiced a few months ago has gone into liquidation and won't be paying me.
I have tried just to copy a jpg file and a word file but can't seem to get them in there.
I am unsure how to reconcile this as I can't reconcile both payments as I would with just one against the same person.
I can do it for any other expense or income but just not wages anyone got any ideas
It is a little messy just leaving them there.
Is anyone else having this problem or is it just ME?
I just wanted to put it out there in case anyone else finds it helpful.
Do I just wait it out?
I hold stock for 10 out of 185 SKU's and mostly purchase stock just in time (as the order comes in).
We have a client who we have just set up the feeds to bring in two credit cards that he is utilising.
When recording Insurance premiums expenses - do they just attract the regular 10% gst on the premium or is there an adjustment that needs to be done?
The question being, how do I create a credit note for just VAT?
Would be great if Standard could include up to 3 employees, I think this would be a much better option than just 1 employee only for small businesses with payroll.
I am just on set up rate at this stage.
This must be a common problem so I am sure there will be a post on this somewhere already but I just cannot find it.
I can see there is a placeholder for Week, but this is just the week number of the year.
Just curious if there are any 'Medium Business' size users on here.
There is no qty as its not an inventory item, its just an insurance expense.
how do i just enter a lump sum amount with no qty?
There is no interest on the amount, just the total outstanding and reducing balance via monthly payments.
I have just set up a small gallery and I am selling works GST inclusive ie $300 total sale includes $27.
Hello Everyone,My question is to whether to record VAT on expense claims if my business is not VAT registered or just simply record the Gross Unit Price?
Am i just overcomplicating this?
I just can't reconcile any of this to the Lloyds printouts.
Can I filter the Aged Payables somehow to show me just the unallocated Prepayments?
I just wanted to ask for some real customer feedback on what is "the must have" for this integration?
:(In Quickbooks we just create a 'sales receipt' and enter in their details into one field.
PO Cancellations - why would I just delete the order, can't I send a cancellation email?
I am a BAS Agent with just a few clients - I work onsite at most of these, but I have a couple of sole traders who I work for from home.
I believe the columns are mapped incorrectly so I just wondered if anyone could give me a list of how they have mapped there columns for this please?
should I just create a new name ie (last financial year) under revenue -> sales?
Just wondering if anyone has any genius ways of storing receipts rather than keeping fading hard copies!
For items under $300 I can just claim the 10% GST at the time of purchase2.
The worst part comes when you try to input a new contact - it doesnt differentiate between current contacts and business names on the directory - staff are now duplicating entries, have hundreds of business names to filter through (businesses that we do not and never will deal with ) *** So please can we have the option to turn this feature off *** And the ability to filter it - to have thousands of business details come up - that are not customers or suppliers just isn't helpful or necessary.
Lots of what we do already is on a trust-basis with our employees, but only typing in a number is just a deal-breaker for us.
I can get it to include the time sheet information but the natratoce of the bill just lists everything in one section and totals it all - there is no breakdown so the client cannot tell who did what and at what cost.
In Sage Line 50  can just press F3 to allocate the whole amount.
If the two features could swap places that would be great, we understand there is already a warning that pops up when delete is clicked but people assume it is just a confirmation of the above.
Besides that information is created for accounting  benefit, but is lost just as quickly.
Ability to see all debits and credits on a contact in one place and not just a description of the activity.
Whilst this serves a purpose, I am surprised that one cannot just suspend all access.
I understand that marking a printed one as sent is necessary, but not when you have just emailed it out.
Of course as everyone asks - the cost price/ mark-up would be invaluableThis is a bunch of ideas - but basically it is just a request for greater functionality.
Why can't i just make that the default
Having just watched the May product update I am pleased to see that you can now access the demo company from the IOS app without logging in.
Please just a 'Disable further notifications' box at the bottom of the popup or something would be great or a setting for advisors to disable notifications even.
Can it open on the ALL Tab please, Opening on the All tab would make finding a clients "Draft return" while using the search feature just as quick as if it were in the draft tab.
Would be awesome if client can just click on the link in PDF and start paying.
Maybe the blue frame around the Discuss tab could turn green, just something to show there is a possible match.
What if the deduction is just a decrease in cost for the business?
At that stage I do not want to login, I just want to check my emails.
just to have it sitting there to pick up when ever it is needed, as a time saving exercise.
What has just taken me an hour to do 3 pages could be done in a matter of minutes.
It sits there ever so proud in a nice green box and just asks you to click it ~ DON'T DO IT!
When I'm deciding what stock to spend the limited cash available on, looking at just specific items is very handy.
It would just see what the current year was and make it 1 year earlier.
Please show the icon for files attached to ALL bills paid, not just mobile attachments.
(I use multiple monitors in portrait)This is just simple html coding that would take a competent programer very little time to "fix".
The data is there - we just want to filter by it!
Just saw the new Inventory feature - this is really a classic situation where a USER with a purely data entry role   into INVENTORY is needed.
I would love to have a Note option just pop up when VOID is hit, to ensure that there is a record of not just who did it, but why.
Or am I just doing it wrong?
Is it possible to rename our PDFs or just have 'statement'?
I can't recall if this problem was in Spend Money, Receive Money (which both appear to behave now), More Details in Reconcile, or somewhere else that I can't find and replicate just at the minute.
I think this is preferable to a warning, as often people/clients ignore warnings and this will just create rework.
Or maybe it just isn't possible right now?
please please please can we have just a one liner that gives TOTAL sales to date for the current month ON THE DASHBOARD!
(Just 3, 6, 9, 12) it was extra work for me to do end of year forecast when I had 11 months actual data.
This should be the default so I can just tab through the field without getting the error, "Quantity cannot be empty. "
That we readers can easily assess how they are tracking for the full year, rather than just how the budget has been "phased" through the Budget Manager.
Otherwise they accomplish the same task (ie an air filter, they're all the same, just different shapes and I can't list every application for all of them!
The system should search by the first letter of all the words in the name, not just the first one.
Why can't it just remember i want to view 200?
At $50 per month, this should not be a paid extra feature ($30 via Debtor Daddy), thats just crazy.
Can we please have the ability to log if an employee has provided a Doctor's Note for any sick leave taken - Preferably just a check box.
Just a couple of small things that would make setting up employees easier in the payroll section.
Very strange, could the cloud that my information was saved in just evaporated in the last gust of wind?
I have edited the login details and it just sits there saying that it is connecting, but never gets anywhere.
pngHow can I remove the spent money and just reconcile that transaction as the bill?
Do I just enter it as a Bill, and then as a Credit Note?
Find and Match just says it can't find any bills to match.
Is this just me or are other users experiencing this issue?
I am just wondering how I go about either reconciling these items individually in sales, or receiving payments in sales for each item?
Is anyone else having this problem or is it just me?
Currently there is just one reference field for information.
Is this a problem given it's day 1 of the new FY, or should I just let it go and see what happens?
But that is just this supplier, which is a complicated one.
or am i just missing features?
If I just choose to reconcile it and label is as "vendor refund" is it categorized as an asset or as revenue?
Is this just me or have other people seen this behavior?
I am doing this by contact, and just wondered how many I can enter for each search without problems.
Whenever I go into contacts it just says:"Uh Oh.
It just keeps saying that there is a problem with the feed and to try again later.
BUT, I've just gone to do this and it's not working/giving me any option to do that.
Just wondering if it's necessary to use two different tax rates for sales and purchases.
Can I just go into set-up and change the date to 8/31/15?
Is this just not showing on my link or am I not suppose to see what the client sees?
My online version of the quote doesn't show any of the quote detail, just some text which says "Please see the attached PDF for complete details" and a button which reads View PDF.
this just can't be correct functionality so what am i doing wrong?
just that some of our international customers have asked "what is the CVC field? "
Or is that $500 just lost in the system now?
Just so I can do a quick mental check on where I am if I haven't had chance to reconcile everything.
This is just the most simple example I can use to explain, but there are others.
This is a gross oversight on user permissions and there needs to be more flexibility of what staff can access and what they can't - not just a blanket 'all for one'.
Just wondering if anyone else has had the same experience and if there is a work around.
Why can't you just do what many of your customers are asking for.
Have just started using Auto-super, which hopefully is going to save me heaps of time!
Or am I just missing something here?
Now this is just an exchange rate thing so it's not something I am going to 'park' and refund later so I don't think recording it as an overpayment is appropriate.
Obviously if there is not fix i will just have to have long references!
Just to clarify, a standard scenario is as below:Customer is on a 10 hour per month agreement.
Or can I just collect all expenses in Excel and then process a summary reimbursement to the employee?
Is it just me or is this totally backwards?
Hey everyone,I'm just looking into the product for our firm and I can't seem to find an aswer for the following questions.
Is there a phone number we can just call to save time.
Having set up a new employee in January, I have just realised that the leave is not accruing for him, in fact he is still at zero hours for Annual, LSL and Carer's/Sick Leave.
HelloI am just wondering if someone can tell me I have an employee who has 56.
I was just wondering how I can fix this drop down "period" box  in the timesheet tab to show the period of 16/01/2017.
Just started this payroll, is there a glitch?
I just realized that the rate of the levy decreased in July to 2.
Do I just set this up as another deduction?
Is there a reason for this or could it just be a hiccup in my system.
I have just realised that our employee who went from casual to full-time back in March this year didn't have any sick leave accruing (personal/carers) so I've managed to fix that up but I notice that in his details there is Compassionate leave of 19.
I have checked the user guide and there is no mention of this so was just wondering whether it was possible.
How do I stop this so that I can just allocate the superannuation payable when the actual payments are made?
I'm hoping I can just untick the employees I don't want to process yet and then all their details will still be available after the others have been posted.
1) I can't just enter that amount, I have to relate it to hours and a hourly rate.
Do I enter their salary as 45 k for 45 hours and then just put time sheets in for two days.
5 hours in 1 day but want to just book off half a day, could they request 4.
Will they just not get any more holiday?
Just wondering if this is a bug or if it is meant to happen.
Get pre-approved instantly and funded in just hours with Bizfi's simple online application.
Or can I just be an payroll admin and be able to sync the apps.
Anyone had similar poor experiences or is it just me?
Eventually they may consider using an inventory management system, but until the shop is operational and it is known how well it is going, they will just manual manage inventory.
There is a 30 day free trial for the new artificial intelligence app Recount which I have just signed up for.
We are Cabinetmakers, just wondering if any cabinetmakers out there using it are happy with Tradify?
I just return stock i ordered from a supplier and don't see how to do this in Vend.
Just trying to gauge any other interests, and whether there's enough demand to offer a partner app to handle this.
And please do not just list useless workarounds!
just me or what?
I'm trying to update our employee's photos and every time I just get the error "Please choose a photo to upload before saving. "
I've tried work arounds suggested and they are all just too time consuming.
Has anyone else noticed this or just me?
then to ask the issue to be passed to a manager in the hope that it would get some faster replies, doesn't happen, and then i get an unplanned phone call, with a light hearted attitude of 'ill just email him' all because i was trying to do some work, and was unavailable at the time.
It just isn't practical to wait for a fix any longer.
If I wanted to do my accounting by hand I would just use a spreadsheet and not be paying $30 a month.
The 'Description' is then a copy of what should just be in the 'Reference' field.
In my opinion, if you could provide just half the reports that Quickbooks has, you will sort out 80% of the problems.
##### CLUSTER 22 #####
I'm astonished to find out today that all my employees can see the balance and feeds of corporate bank account.
Our US Dollar bank account in Xero is reconcilled but is showing a credit amount of $26.
The bond is set up as a bank account and I can create a bank receipt into the account, but what balance sheet code do I post the transaction to?
Being no Yen bank account setup in Xero.
For example, we have a bank account with USD 5000 balance, can the bank summary show the balance in USD instead of convert to base currency?
How can I switch an expense (in draft or another status) to be able to reconcile to my bank account?
The issue is how do I reconcile the bank transaction, which is obviously lower than the rent, which I want to account in full.
how to i pick the bank account in a journal entry?
The issue I have is how to change the balance in the old bank account to be 0 but without affecting the balance of the current bank account.
Should we use 'bank account’?
(The PAYE liability account shows the correct amount, but I'm not sure how best to reconcile this against the bank transaction)
I have recently taken on a new client - a start up who operated via his personal bank account for the first few months.
How the heck do I tell Xero whats going on and make sure that the Stripe deposits to my bank account reconcile against the invoiced amounts?
2- Bank Account Name : What is this for.
I am Reconciling a bank account and have come across a Cash Drawn from ATM transaction that includes a ATM fee of £1.
I then ran the P&L statement and calculated what cash the new Business Bank Account should have - ensure it was correct.
I can readily reconcile the bank account in Xero, using live transaction feeds from our bank.
I've got company bank account with $0 dollars on it, got it linked with xero feed.
What is the best procedure for keeping the two reconciled purchases and organizing the reimbursement amount from the employee to the company bank account?
Two days later, our bank did a "PROOF ADJUSTMENT" and debited $10 from our account.
So, my bank account not registered in xero.
As this is my private bank account, I can't upload a bank statement into Xero.
We can only select the bank account in HKD or EUR and the system not allow us to select USD of the bank account.
How do I input this into xero when the total bill has to be reconciled with the bank account?
Could I set up every buyer as a bank account (even if there is no bank feed)?
So I have:1 debit on a credit card to reconcile1 credit on our business bank account to reconcileIm wondering what the best practice is to fix this up.
How do I account for this on Xero as the transaction appear on the  bank feeds.
Has anyone tried or considered using a 'credit card' type bank account for Directors loans or other loans?
How do I balance a bank account against a statement?
How do i record the debit from my bank account that refunds the deposit back to VRBO's guest.
At the moment, we've paid out of the bank account so have three unreconciled lines in the bank statement (there is no corresponding ledger entry for them).
In Xero it is a bank account.
So my bank loan bank account in Xero is a negative balance.
Also, by using the credits to our bank account as our sales figures, Xero is assuming that all sales have GST, which is not the case.
I understand that it is separate to my ABN and will be presented at tax time as a group certificate but how do I deal with the payments into my bank account.
Xero seems to think that business run exclusively through a bank account and that every penny of cash turnover goes in the bank.
Their bank account is not set up in Xero.
Should every business transaction be recorded as paid via Owner Drawings and received via Owner Funds Introduced; instead of via a Bank account?
The bank has since credited this back to the credit card, but how do I account for this?
As I did this before i registered the company or had the bank account there is no link between the company and the loan.
How do I prevent the "Paypal transfers" into my bank account from counting as double?
I have done an EFT transfer into their bank account but now have no idea how to reconcile the refund.
All payments (minus fees in the case of Paypal and Amazon) get transferred to my business bank account.
Plus I can't distinguish between those paid for with the Owner's personal funds and those that can be reconciled with the business bank account.
Should I perhaps set up a bank account with a slightly different name?
Is there a feature within Xero where we can create a reporting rule so that our non-bank feeds can be captured in the reports when the non-bank feed hits the bank account, rather than when the individual transactions within the non-bank feed hit the non-bank feed account?
We currently restricted to having to use paper forms for any new bank account our clients with this access.
It will decrease the number of the bank rules in their account.
This saves time as you can see where you coded that bank account the time before
Where there is a bank account in Xero - if the same one is put in again can there be an alert come up?
If a bank account goes into the negative, is there an alert that can be emailed or texted?
Alternatively, allow the user to pick what (additional) columns to show on the bank account transaction page.
I found it quite astounding that there is no ability to see a transaction listing which includes both the bank account AND COA on the same line.
A cash basis not-for-profit client has 7 or 8 activities or programmes each with its own bank account.
I have to unpick the transaction each time, and re-do it balancing the difference into bank fees nominal, so please either take into account the fee, or allow me to choose if I want the system to reconcile or me to do it manually.
Very simple one this - can you show when the last successful bank feed was done against each account on the dashboard please?
The ability for Xero to code a bank rule such that the description for the account transaction can be copied from the Statement transaction.
How can I attach a receipt to an expense - not an expense claim but something paid for out of the business bank account?
Xero is not accepting the bank account number as stating that it is in the incorrect format.
I have not changed the format of the bank account in Xero and the creditor has not changed their bank account number.
In the meantime, the $100,000 cash has come into my bank account and is currently sitting there as an unreconciled credit.
HiHas anyone successfully managed to link up a bank account in Xero using a Lloydslink login?
Also, in the standard template provided by Xero, how come there is no account for bank balance?
So the problem I have is that our bank balance for 31st December 2016 doesn't match the bank account.
so I have printed of my account transaction for the month so I can manually tick off against my bank statement and see what is missing.
Then, there is monthly prepayment (interest + principle), it is auto deducted from existing (same) bank account.
How do I reconcile the bank money that has been transferred to the company account with the bill that has already been paid ?
Is it possible to change a liability (or asset) account to a Bank type?
You have the account type "bank" and even "prepayments" so would you please avail us of "debtors" also.
Could someone point me in the direction of how i record the 'Z' reading of each days sales, I assume this will then correlate with my synced bank account?
How can I tag a transaction in my bank account to a nominal account e. g. 'Bank Fees'?
The Bank account can only be shown when I print the balance sheet consolidation.
If I put it under bank account, I can not do a manual journal to book against this.
The reference for the feed is "Principal Credit" but the credit card is not linked to their normal business account and they can't seem to find that same transaction with the same amount on their bank statement for that transaction date.
They have opened another account with the same bank but it is linked to a different login.
how can one go about setting a new system bank account, and removing/archiving the old one.
as i have a bank account in xero which has been used for a while, but it is locked.
In some statements, there are multiple payments to the bank account.
Is there any risk to payroll/bank account details having been compromised?
What is best practice to account ( & reconcile ) for commission & fees, that do not show within the bank feed ?
How should I record a business expense which is paid for directly via the business bank account?
How do we set up multiple Business DEBIT Cards for the same bank account?
Currently we can do this only in the Bank Account screen once the Bank Account has indicated that it has received a lump sum.
For example, say I have $10,000 in the bank account, but $3,000 is designated for a specific project.
I am using multi currency support, and have a paypal bank account set up for AUD and USD with automatic feeds.
For me, it is taken out of my bank account in AUD, then converted to USD.
However I am doing some general compatibility analysis and I see that you are not supporting Arizona's largest Credit Union, Desert Schools Federal Credit Union, for bank account downloads.
Can I assign the same bank account to two separate business?
Finally, if I could link to my bank account so payments of dues could go directly their that would be amazing.
I cannot work out how to link the allowance to the second (new) bank account, though I have looked all through these forums, played around with the setups and watched the mini tutorials in Xero.
Bank Account A is where we process payroll (distribute checks to employees).
Are there any apps that connect Xero to a bank account that allow Xero to generate bank payments to suppliers?
Paypal/stripe/zipmoney would all have their own separate bank account in Xero.
Also, Shopify periodically deposits money into our bank account, so how would I reconcile these deposits with any sales the app imports?
I've been working with ZenPayroll the past week and while I haven't started using the service yet (bank account verification in process) I can't say enough nice things about their customer service.
Look at my bank account details and they are all in order, so am a little worried about this .
##### CLUSTER 23 #####
This would allow for Recoding of transactions with a contact that has now been deleted or archived.
I could, of course, go through and delete all transactions but that's kind of time-consuming?
How can I combine both transactions to show that the refund should be $200 less the $80 credit.
All of the other forum questions I have found are either from the perspective of the company hiring or are not quite right for this situation - please can someone shed some light on what I should do to resolve these transactions.
I now have two problems:1) I have to fix 9 months worth of these transactions.
Nevertheless: How should I reconcile these transactions?
Is it possible to have Tracking Categories always be completed when anyone on all transactions?
How can I have One Statement to show both Transactions so that I can see the REAL Balance he ownes me.
Im unsure what to do with the first and third transactions.
What could be the reason and how can I find out what the transactions causing the difference?
This can possibly cause some systems to crash if a large volume of transactions are being processed regularly.
In both cases the dollar amounts of the transactions are correct.
And then a debit from each daily settlement of 10% of that daily paypal transactions.
What is the difference between office and general expenses in relation to categorizing transactions?
So any answers on my workaround without having to enter multiple transactions for each item.
When reconciling transactions on the statement can I simply delete the personal expense lines or do you have to do something fancy with them?
and if so how do you reconcile the transactions?
Some transactions are showing up 4 times on the same date.
do you delete any closed detail transactions up to .
How do I VOID ‘Spend Money’ transactions?
3) If the answer to 2 is yes, then how do I reconcile the paypal transactions to it?
When I reconcile those transactions, what should the category be for this?
Surely I can't be the only small business that requires more than one sales code and then requires the days takings to be broken down into the separate transactions?
how should I code these transactions and seperate these stock from the inventory qty on hand?
I'm not sure how to categorize the various aspects of these transactions to be as accurate as possible (the small amounts of money coming in for repayment = reimbursed xyz?
Our software fetches all your VAT transactions and groups them by tax code so you can complete each relevant VAT return.
Sometimes there are cash sales when my client sells at Baby Shows and these transactions are entered into shopify too.
Currently, I can only filter by division, which gives me all transactions allocated to that division, but doesn't tell me if I have missed any, or coded any incorrectly.
hello,is it possible to bulk reconcile or cash code paypal transactions?
I've got 2 transactions I can't reconcile though, can anyone advise how it should be done?
However when I go back into my transactions pending to reconcile it is not there?
Finding out what the transactions are is incredibly difficult.
Can we please be able to remove the tracking categories in bulk from transactions using Find and Recode?
What I want to be able to do is quickly identify any transactions where there are missing receiptsThanksDsheppo
Payroll transactions may not be under that definition of 'Exempt' and not reportable.
This should not affect any previous documents / files attached to previously reconciled transactions.
I can then click on other transactions on the page and it copies the details from the selected one to all the others.
It would be useful to be able to do this for all transactions at once.
This is something my smaller clients struggle with as they think the transactions have been auto coded from the transaction rules.
Unless I am not processing these transactions correctly I am finding this process extremely cumbersome and time consuming.
However, the auditors can not see supporting docs (images) on the spend money transactions.
if i missed reconing a few transactions last month, can i please have them available to use now rather than expire with a new month?
It would be great if there was a 'Select All' for the list of transactions on the one screen and then you only have to press 'OK' once to approve multiple transactions at a time.
Any normal accountant puts an accrual for such transactions at month-end.
At the moment, I can't tell which transactions have files and the process to upload receipts involves too many steps.
or deal with any accrual transactions.
Why should we have to remove and re-reconcile MANY transactions when we do this?
> What about all the transactions?
Any suggestions on how to search for these transactions?
I am currently cash coding 1825 transactions for a new client & this auto populating makes this task very frustrating.
Several days later Amazon (as they do) invoiced it separately as 2 transactions ($400 & $600).
When I look at my transactions online within ANZ I get a clear page with the name of every vendor or payee clearly displayed.
Or do previous repeating transactions done have effect on this.
Point is: I can't assign a pre-set tax rate to all of my transactions.
Is it possible to create recurring transactions that do not require a regular schedule?
How can I get the Spent transactions into the spent column?
All good, except that I can't modify the transaction from the reconcile window, as the buttons display behind other transactions etc.
I had to use yoddle which seems fine, however it wont import any transactions before July.
However, why can one not reconcile a number of transactions at the same time.
Should I create purchase orders in USD so I can reconcile transactions?
How will I reconcile the transactions then?
How do I view all the general journal transactions associated with, for instance a payroll entry.
I'm not sure I understand how starting leave balances will be entered if there is existing Payroll transactions.
How best should I be managing these payments/transactions?
I'm having issues reconciling a Mastercard with two transactions that are sitting in last financial year not showing up in new year even when I amend dates.
is that one of the transactions seems to be be for a completely different Payee (Google) from what came over in the feed (Uber).
I saw transactions called "Expense Receipt Created" but could not click into it to see what is it or how it got there.
Can I associate/reconcile the two separate transactions?
I am consistently getting extra transactions imported from my Citibank Visa feed.
Also, if some expenses end up as Bills and yet others end up as 'Spend Money' transactions, how can a get a comprehensive list of all outgoing transactions (including bills and 'Spend Money' transactions)?
Please see the example below:This is how the transactions appear in my statements:ANZ M-BANKING FUNDS TFER                TRANSFER XXXXXX  TO  XXXXXXXXXXXXXXXAnd I setup a rule with the following:1.
I have deleted a bill that got entered accidentally while I was trying to work out how to do repeating transactions.
Can someone tell me how exactly your credit card transactions are supposed to show up on the reconciliation screen?
Can anyone suggest anything we can do to avoid having to re-reconcile 16 months of transactions?
All paid for using the business credit card in seperate transactions or petty cash.
How do I see the last few transactions that were entered?
However there is one issue that has been bugging me no ends: namely there is no Searching for all transactions related to a contact.
Spend Money/Receive Money transactions do not show.
I would have imagined that a "Search transactions by contact" would be a very basic feature of any accounting package.
When I then reach a statement where there are reconciled transactions the tick box is not offered.
My question is what is going to happen to the transactions between the 1st and the 7th.
Given our scale and volume of transactions, we have to have something we can rely on and it would Zapier (quite understandably) is not that.
Is there anyway to view all the transactions filter by department or location?
Starting Saturday I can only enter transactions with the tax code 'BAS Excluded', I am unable to change this even though the suppliers have been set up as GST on Expenses?
So how do I enter these transactions?
Either please stop dropping and duplicating Paypal transactions or bring back the ability to delete your errors.
Sometimes when you are trying to test treatment of transactions this can be very useful.
Is it wrong to import transactions before Jan 1?
If I change the conversion date to 12/31/11 what happens to the prior transactions?
How do I get these transactions reconciled?
When i go to payrun history the correction is there, but it doesn't change in transactions.
I don't see any reports or transactions for payroll tax withholding.
We are now reconciling the remaining data from last year and I am trying to find out how to enter the relevant transactions.
Now you can easily feed all your transactions and fees from one program to another.
These are small transactions - many for $12 or $13.
I am after some advice on a tool that offers consolidation, allows some customisation of reports and can handle foreign currency transactions.
Also provide any information as necessary to enable a smooth running of transactions of my clients.
I verified it, and even had to open up the OFX file in notepad to take a screenshot of the transactions there which did not import.
On the 30th of Last month the transactions pulled through no longer match the banks transactions and it seems descriptions and amounts are staggered meaning that I have a heap of transactions to reconcile that I can't.
##### CLUSTER 24 #####
How do I add FX rate on USD deposit into USD account?
How do I add an account for Cash only.
It would be great if I could add multiple account Numbers to one contact.
Currently you can only add the account number, name and details.
Please fix the deduction to allow a Current Asset account or add employee advance tracking.
Do I add a new account?
Would it really be that difficult to add an "account column" in the activity view of the contact overview?
To add to my confusion, the "other half" of the transaction sometimes shows as reconciled in our checking account transaction screen!
So I add a new rule, or manually create a Name, Account & Description for a transaction when reconciling.
##### CLUSTER 25 #####
How would I account for this in Xero?
How do I account for fuel bought abroad?
As I can't do the transfer between the account and back again because nothing was showing in the Bankwest account anyway, only in the Amex acc.
Now im not sure what to do with the payments into the account as there will be some from the business (which shows on a business cheque account) and some from personal.
It seems to me that from today when I have to use "receive money" I can't post the entry any more, as I completely miss the line where I should put qty, unit price, account and amount.
also, what is the correct account to use for this records?
00 from the normal everyday Business Account, how do I reconcile the transaction back against the credit cards?
Has anyone had this issue and created a new account?
So when I look at the total balance in the Sales Tax account, it's really hard to determine what is owing for each type of sales tax.
What is the purpose of setting up this account in balance sheet?
what is the difference between GST clearing account and ehis account?
Do I account for these sales as No VAT or exempt income and what is the difference?
What account do I assign the purchase of stocks on behalf of the business to?
I'm baffled can anyone tell me how to account for this in Xero?
Any sales that are not eftpos ones are cash and therefore is on hand so are reconciled to a 'float' account.
He will be advising me of all future orders and the relevant dates but how do I account for them going forward.
How do I reconcile the payments from my credit card account with there being no account to transfer from?
Which account should I reconcile this under?
So my question is, what is the purpose of account codes if they are not used for reporting purposes or, as far as I can see, for filtering of any sort?
How exactly do I account for this, ideally as simply as possible as I am new to Xero and to accounting in general.
This is the first time using the Credit Card account in Xero to do reconciliations, so nothing is in there prior to this transfer.
Shall it be Other receivable (Non current asset), as amount is going to be credited in account after1 or 2 year.
Or should it be put in the advertising account?
What do I record the transfer into my holding account as?
How do I then account for the use tax liability?
How do I reconcile Interest received on a savings account.
How can I record all that income and expenses earlier in the financial year into xero from my personal account?
I am now creating bills for those purchases in xero, but what account do I use to mark these as paid?
Personal credit card account is not linked in xero.
The bonus amount remains in the liability account, so how (and to what account) do I associate those funds with so everything reconciles?
How can i account for the payroll in Xero.
How do I assign that as a cost, presumably to my cost of goods sold account?
We don't manufacture or buy stock to sell on so inventory is a bit trickier to account for.
This will avoid having to move the money out of the business account and back in.
Please note, this was done over a week, yet the proper account was allocated for each individual inventory item at the same time and saved.
I am unsure of which account I should assign to "Debit" the account to make the journal entry complete so I can reconcile our checking account.
As soon as I created the bill in Xero, my Balance Sheet shows that the inventory account has increased by the full value of the 1000 units, as if all of the inventory is in my possession and fully paid for.
I am confused how to classify the interest that is charged to the account.
Now I can't work out how to account for this in Xero.
How do I account for software purchases in the following scenarios;1.
On my Profit and Loss statement i expect to have the following partOpening StockPurchasesTOTAL Cost of SalesClosing StockSo the question is: what is the Account Type of Closing Stock?
If so, what are the specific settings this account needs to be?
Do I create an expense account e. g "Trading Losses"?
I have a client account code that I categorise any client claims to.
Should I set up a new cash advance account?
Im assuming the DR in account two gets matched to a bill or expense.
Can you please advise what account I post this to please, the wages clearing account?
I can't work out how to enter a cash purchase from my Till Account.
Using this account is unnecessary, no?
Although not sure what I should assign for the "Accumulated Depreciation Account" and the "Depreciation Expense Account".
I understand how to set up the loan account for it, but not how to code the actual outgoing figure - i. e. when the purchase is being made in order to buy the business, aren't you therefore purchasing Equity?
If I do that, how would I account for it within Xero?
However, the company account (real account) still then requires this transaction to be reconciled and I am unsure how to do this and ensure the DLA remains £5000 overdrawn.
I can create the cash account.
How we can register this fee under the Xero account?
What account do I code the purchase of these subscriptions against?
I've been treating this as a purchase, but is there a better account to use?
My question is which account should I put to?
At the moment I create an account in the chart of account under expense.
I was wondering how to reflect that in my Xero account?
We can switch between the companies in our Xero account.
I have approved and paid the claim to the Owners Drawing Account -  dated 30/06/15 - and can see it has reduced this account.
I don't have credit note issued from supplier, but I am sure they are not receivable from supplier account.
What should this be coded to, to reconcile the account?
So how do I move/convert the USD amount to the AUD PayPal account so they both sit at $0?
Xero has a 'Prepayments' account in Assets.
In this case, how should I record the $ 2000 in our book without messing the loan account ?
In Xero I have a fixed asset for this piece of equipment and a non-current liability account for the loan.
Now my loan is completely paid off, but the liability account is showing a balance of $800.
The closest account that I see available is the COGS account.
My question is how can I treat this means charge to which account.
How do I account for this under Australian taxation rules please?
and how do I reconcile these entries from my paypal account.
If I should set up a new account what sort/type should I set up?
What is the relation between Tax Rates under general settings AND Tax under Edit Account details?
Problem is, the credit goes in as a positive to the liability account and increases what it shows we own.
Right now I am paying my city Business License fees and am wondering what account that expense should go in.
They use this account for office expenses, receivables etc anything that is to do their business.
The only idea I can come up with is this: create a "Prepaid POs" asset account.
Let's say you have expenses of 2000 in the year 2014 and 3000 for the year to date at 31st Aug, you would therefore have a debit balance of 5000 on the account on the trial balance to 31st of August, however when you enter this, you get a journal for 2000 at 31st Dec 14, making 2014 correct, but then you get a journal of 5000 at 31st August, as shown on the P&L for the respective years.
Should it be recorded in the awards account not sales account or somewhere else.
How do I represent this account in xero?
I have a situation with an account that can be both a current asset and a current liability depending on the balance.
Assuming that is correct and that they prove this status - how do we account for this in Xero?
Can I set up an asset account and reconcile it to that?
Because VAT is calculated and assigned on each transaction (sale or expense) which is assigned to a member (tracking account 2,3,4 etc.
If the composite material consists of a container and x ml of cream, we can easily order and record the two items into inventory account.
My question is:How do I initially set up the new company's account in Xero so that it accurately reflects the &#163;8,000 liability to me and then how do I show it getting paid off?
How do i separate this so that $x amount goes into the Sales account for the herbs and $y goes into the Acupuncture account?
Any payments he make from cash are paid from this account.
DR  Income Account, Amount Inclusive with GST on Expenses code (Xero won't let me do this line)CR  Income Account, Amount  inclusive with GST on Income codeThe mistake makes me claim money on a sale which obviously is incorrect .
What I am doing currently is manually allocate part of the repayment every month into interest expense account and loan account separately, based on the repayment schedule.
I was wondering if someone has experience with integrating a currency exchange account in Xero?
95How do I account for this in Xero?
What I want to do is transfer £100 to the petty cash account and allocate the £1.
How do I account for this in Xero?
When I spoke to my account manager he was not aware of any problems with yodlee.
We then got our business account opened and got revenue flowing into their instead.
How should I account for this in Xero.
The closest account that I see available is the COGS account.
How do I categorize it that the 50% received goes into the prepaid account until the remaining balance has been paid.
How can I change the starting balance as I only seem to be able to access the current account?
I have a dummy 'Cash in hand' account in Xero.
Is it easy to cope with a manual feed on a 50 plus transaction per day account?
My question is what account should i charge the portion that belongs to the stylist?
And the cost of the product in inventory only takes in account the purchase order from my USA supplier.
How come I can't select receive money into the USD account and have the receive money type as "Prepayment" rather than direct or overpayment?
How do I account for these tax payments in Xero?
Question: How do I account for the printing part?
#2: How do I account for the shipping and handling and fees paid for the blank shirts?
How do I really get rid of this account and its balance?
How do I account for this?
What is the correct account that I should be using for this?
It's not new revenue, so which account do I assign?
I, as the sole director, use another personal account to dump/withdraw money in/out of the business account.
Or both account as a whole for registration fee which all GSF free?
We are having an issue with our AMEX account in Xero.
com posting payments into a current liability clearing account in Xero.
Conversely how do I treat it on the CC account side of things?
How do we store this liability against a specific account without raising any credit note?
How do I show this with the Cash Clearing Account?
My second question is more theoretical - I have posted Capital I have put into the business using the Funds Introduced account.
If so what income account do I use.
How do I account for this in Xero?
How can I account for this now closed account in Xero?
When I get receipts emailed to me, can I forward them to my Xero account, so they can populate?
This is because he isn't reporting the total income, only the income that is deposited into his account.
Do i account for these in 429 general expenses, or 325 direct costs, or somewhere else, please advise.
Reconciling an account, there is a £200.
So do I have to turn EVERY DEBIT going OUT of my account, into a Negative number?
When I reconcile the business account, how is best to do the entry of "Rent Income" for property 1?
We hold an Amazon account and any payments received are after fees are deducted.
I only get this option if I setup a new Fixed Asset account, which I'd prefer NOT to do.
So I assumed my "Stock on Hand" account was were I should code any stock purchases.
So how do I adjust my SOH account?
How do I account for this?
How do I account for that?
When a supplier is overseas, do you simply put in all account details as with an AUD supplier?
This is an excerpt from my SOH account http://nimb.
Now when I enter it it is a spend money from the business account but do I put it against "Sales"  if not there any suggestions?
How do I assign the bill to the correct account please?
The problem now, is how should I account for those transfers?
and when I finally do my BAS, and transfer the money from Account 2,not sure how that will affect reports in Account 1 etc.
If I do that, how to I account for the assets?
And if I have a bunch of expense data, how do I move it into being receipt data for reconciliation in the main (current) account?
How do I account for this on Xero please?
How can I account for this in Xero?
There is a debit adjustment for the Creditors control account.
How do I account for this vehicle in Xero?
It is not a "Sale" in the true sense of what we do, or is this how I must account for it?
How do I get this in balance, or in other words, how do I credit the payables account if it's not done automatically?
Can anyone please advise me of the correct account type to create?
Our Xero account has all of this info in it.
My account is set up to use accrual basis (Financial Settings).
Any charges he makes are listed on this account.
With every transaction (sales & purchases) I have made sure to account for the amount of VAT and its percentage on every line item.
How do I record $200 on an account without any line item details - can it be done or no - Y/N2.
What I want to do now is allocate the value of each of these account codes into four different Tracking Headings.
What account categories would the following go into?
Which type of an account should I setup for this in xero to properly record the contribution?
With this approach prepayments are not reflected in the customers account thus not showing true picture of the customers account.
I do not have a foreign exchange account, it is a standard personal UK mortgage and savings account.
Please correct the account number format setting.
00   The account code I used was 830 in the (current) liabilities section of the account codes.
How do we account for this in Xero?
I have since found out there is another cheque account used as well.
However this has completely skewed my account receivable reports by showing me as the biggest debtor for the companyAny advice on how to handle this situation is much appreciated.
The account code can be alpha numeric and up to 10 characters long.
Or, do I create a separate account for each supplier?
What would be a classification for moving to the holding account and then a classification to move it back again?
I've read about Contra Payments on here and Suspense account but I can't quite work out how to do it.
What am I missing with the account type "Credit Card"?
Do I reconcile both against a clearing account?
When I try to get feeds the information requested is not the kind of information that is held on a business account, ie 'What was your first school?
How do I reconcile the bill when there will be no cash transaction into my account.
Wondering how do i account for and categorize this charitable donation we made in our Xero account?
Now check Balance Sheet  Liabilities - Income Received In Advance Account again,  is that should be only Customer B's $1000 balance?
Normally you look at BALANCE SHEET , income tax payable Account balance amount should be $5000.
Is it possible to prepare individual tax returns using a free trial account?
How do I record this in xero - I have been reading that I should have a drawings account and enter it there?
And in any case, what account code should this be under?
Also i have got my xero subscription coming out of a overhead account titled subscriptions is this correct.
What account do these go under?
I understand that I can create an additional account in Xero with all the costs detailed however, all payments are made from the current account.
How do I reconcile the monthly payments reducing the total on the credit card account with payments from the current account.
My only option now is to set up a new account and import account data etc but i cannot see where this option is possible.
Any ideas on how to change which account Xero is putting my Big Commerce Sales?
How do I set up an account for Discounts received from suppliers and what type please.
Has anyone had their account files disappear?
What other account will be involved in the transaction is what I am after.
Needless to say I can't reconcile the account!
So I bought a brand new vehicle on hire purchase, how do I account for the repayments in xero?
Or if i assign current account to employee name is it ok?
How can I delete the account and feed that is going into the wrong business?
My question is: how do I account for this on Xero?
what account should I use?
Can you please recommend what account code I should allocate this income to?
I'm struggling to work out how to factor in a discount I received from a supplier on to the reconciliation statement to match the money removed from my account.
or can they be ignored/paid from another account without scrambling the books?
Which chart of account codes do I use for this and any repayments?
(is the fact that I have accounted it the the bond liability account all that is needed to ensure that the $300 doesn't get recorded as income)3.
I have all this money allocated to an account called Import Duty which is set as type "overhead".
Could you please advise which account I should be applying this bond to, should it be Assets/prepayment?
How to I put a sum total of all the Expense account totals on the dashboard?
My cash turnover for those three days is &#163;1575 (which needs to show in my "Sales" account), but my cash deposits for those three days is only &#163;1425 (where do i record this so that xero doesn't think it is additional revenue)I have other questions but will leave it there for now.
Assuming the above is ok, my question is what account type should these COEs be?
Anyone else use xero to account for workshops, or training courses?
And do consumables belong in another account?
I am new to do business and accounting, I recently withdrawal $1000 for purchasing shelving, and spend $330(as I only can carry 2 sets to my car), and deposit the rest $670 into the same account.
Now that I am loved in I can not see any ways to change it unless you reopen a new account.
Am I booking the travel expenses I charge to my client to the wrong account, or how else can I make sure my travel expenses are added up accurately as a business expense?
Likewise, an expense account in one is open in the other unless they both have the same expense.
How do I account for this as income for tax purposes.
These payments already have a nominal account, so do I simply debit and then credit that nominal account?
If so, under which "Account Type" should these be categorised?
What I'm meaning here is I upgraded my mobile phone handset recently (business account) and the upgrade did not cost me anything.
The benefit of one account for COGS is that once I've reclaimed all items the balance is zero.
How will this effect the direct debit amount that shows up in the actual account?
How can I account for this transaction in Xero please?
Second when the funds arrive in my account how do I reconcile this?
I understand I can user the MANAGE/RECEIVE MONEY screen -  however In the acccount field, which account should I use ( 881 or 970 ) .
Can they all be integrated together under one account in Xero or do I have to buy three subscriptions?
I paid it from my company checking account as an owner draw (as I wasn't aware any was deductible).
How do I categorize these in my business account?
Under what account do I categorize Estimated Tax Payments that have been posted to my checking account.
Please look into making the check account and routing numbers populate the check style automatically.
We issue purchase orders on a regular basis, our PO's regularly have 20+ line items, it would save so much time if there was an auto-fill check box or option for the account and tax rate columns.
Account 826 Superannuation Payable shows totals of ALL superannuation contributions and is not helpful especially when superannuation contributions are being made ad hoc.
Lloyds were very unclear about using a Yodelee feed - saying that if cash disappeared from my account they would not take responsibility if there was a feed in place.
Please can the layout of entering go nominal (account) code first, then the description, then the amount?
Can Xero create the functionality to sort the new Balance Sheet and Profit and Loss Reports by Account Codes?
Please provide an 'End of Month' option for setting the Financial Year End that takes into account leap years.
We do a lot of analysis, forecasting and budgeting in excel and everything is based on he account code.
Also, when a transaction is to be accepted into the xero, the chart of account information has to be entered, so that that transaction is accounted for into the accounting system.
For instance one account is running in millions while other is running in thousands, both should be on same scale to show comparison, and to be able to see the big picture.
So if there is an amount transfer from one account to another, it is not really a dip, when looking at the overall picture.
I can sometimes post up several to the same account.
Can I save the xero account on the app?
I have tried clicking on the 'my account' button but all that I am able to change is my signature.
I could transfer all unreconciled to being paid via a clearing account.
Can the Account Watchlist be set to Cash Basis pretty please?
Could the column 'Quantity' be added as an optional column to these Account Movement reports please?
It would be really handy if certain current asset codes and current liability codes could 'float' between assets and liabilities - depending on whether the account in question is in credit or debit.
For instance if you have a limited company with a director's loan account - it may be in credit or debit at any time.
Is there anywhere that I can see how long before I get an automatic feed for the CashPlus business account?
There is already a 'Sort By' dropdown, but it only lists account name or account ID.
Is it possible to set a "default" checking account in Xero?
com account, I expect to find a link telling me who is our current sales representative.
In the new reports Display fields, it would be useful to have the Contact Account codes as either a column field or in the drop down for the "Group By" setting.
At present there is no option to include the Accumulated depreciation account and this has to be manually added to each asset.
Please consider adding Accum Dep GL account and a tick box set to "register" or "pending" to the import template
There is currently no functionality for this in Xero, so I'm having to constantly re-enter the same descriptions and account codes for regulars suppliers.
You could set up rules which would allocate each to a certain account if needed.
For example, if I have one expense account (let's say Meals and Entertainment) that has both Program Expenses and Support expenses which I can classify using a tracking category, I can't separate out the functional expenses on the Statement of Activities.
Maybe "Applied" too as well as any credit that might be owed an account.
A total overview of your fixed assets account and what the total cost for all items.
The first is a clearing account, which is in USD (while my company is NZ based).
The bill can be automatically paid on the lodgement date by a liability account (e. g. ATO Integrated Client Account).
The workaround, becuase that is what it is, is to create a 4 line journal, two of which lines offset in the contra account.
He also mentioned that if the account nickname has 'brokerage' or 'investment' in it, Xero will ignore the account.
How do I revert, and fix the account?
Click 'Print'There are 2 additional steps if I try and print from Account - Sales - Awaiting Approval screen.
I prefer seeing the A/P account--2000--in my bill page, or the ability to change it to another A/P account.
It would be useful for Xero to have the ability to account for depreciation on both business and private portions of an asset.
Many Clients are getting confused with entering BSB and Account number in one box with no spaces etc.
You can produce a P&L account at any date but not a Balance Sheet, Aged debtors/creditors etc and you cannot enter conversion balances at any date other than a month end.
You have my current account, and any other transfers or spends all pending.
Can we have Tracking Watchlist in Dashboard similar to Account Watchlist?
When you go into the Detailed View of an account, can we please have a running total column?
Payroll is run out of one account, and our Federal/State payroll taxes are paid out of a different one.
Currently it is quite manual and time consuming to reconcile the Payroll Clearing account if there is an out of balance.
Realistically, the only account that should be off limits is Retained Earnings.
For accountability of staff and to get a more in-depth account of our staffs movements it would be more beneficial if you could rearrange the time sheets format, so they could login at the start off the day write in their start time (morning tea is accounted for but could have an area to put times in as they may break at different times due to job requirements) a start and finish of lunch break and a finish time for the day.
At present you cannot delete or archive an account that has been used in the past by payroll.
As the business manager of a Church, I wish to be able setup in payroll a 10% deduction that goes directly to the revenue account for tithes & offerings & have discovered that I can only direct to a liability account?
How do I reconcile customer/Land loards account?
co. nz, my account for xero is ---------@anothername.
I can not secure my Xero account currently, as your only 2FA option I see during setup has been relegated to a non-project for Google, so cannot see any future updates or support for it.
what is the 220 account supposed to be used for?
One is the primary account holder credit card (USER1) and the other is what I believe to be a subaccount credit card (USER2).
but this account says BAS excluded, and I want these expenses factored into BAS.
Could you advise how I reconcile there account and allocate the cheque refund that I have issued?
At some point in time, (not sure how or when) this money goes into my checking account and gets reflected in Xero as income and the fee goes somewhere else and gets deducted.
I am setting up a new banking account in Xero for our new Allegacy Federal Credit Union account.
What is the equivalent code in Xero to Sage code 3200 P&L account?
- The Directors Loan account now has an additional credit of 3,000How can the conversion balance be corrected?
Because it was paid with Funds Introduced there is no account transaction to delete.
A company has one credit card account with 3 cardholdersThe issue is:Charges for one cardholder is NOT showing up through the feed at all.
But now I can't login into our company account in xero.
How do I correct so that the Current Asset / Float Account shows the full credit of funds received from the customers pleasE?
How should I treat this to get the resulting credit/POA balance as the first item on their account in xero?
is doesnt default to 434 - Fuel account, client still has to code.
What is the point in having a defult is it doent recognise the account defaulted to ?
again were is that account, how do i view it?
again were is that account within xero, how do i view it?
We can't answer questions on how to account for things though - this is where our wonderful Partners come in.
I synced Xero with my Chase business account, which is my only business account.
At present it is only possible to set one email address as the default (i. e. your own logged in account email address or another one set up in the email settings. )
Can I also show a TOTAL for the highlighted account codes?
For example, in my OFFICE EXPENSES account, there is a transaction for amazon.
In the process I deleted all of the genuine account transaction and receipt records As a result: 5.
I do this for our foreign currency account.
Also, how to code if I receive refund from another party for the expenses I made for that party via my business account?
Any idea how can i download the return with its detail account Transaction.
How do I account for these?
However, you can't do a manual journal entry from the tracked inventory account!
Please can you tell me how to search on their account number?
What I'm struggling with however is recognising that this has been paid - it's still sitting in the current account in Xero!
I am currently using two different patterns of account codes for separating two entities into one book.
Having moved to the Netherlands from the UK 6 months ago, I still have a uk account which has Visa debit which I can use.
But this is a pain as I will have to transfer monies to my UK account each time.
Our previous employee used the main account email address so I can't change the email address as we are trading with thousand clients.
Thus when a client uses an account for items they are uncertain of how to code I can easily recode them in batchs.
How do I reconcile these items in our PayPal account?
I am trying to create a rule so Xero can recognize credit card payments and credit the proper account.
Also what Charter of Account code should I put the Xero bills against?
I accidentally paid one of the claims in to the '980 - Owner A Drawings' account.
HiHow can I reduce the number of options appearing on the account list on the app?
50 transferred into my account, at which point I can reconcile  How do I account for the &#163;7.
Every night we batch credit card payments and receive them into our account a few days later.
The only account I have that will allow international wires is my personal brokerage account.
How on earth do i import items with no purchase account nor COSG account?
both are set up in our Xero account.
Jan 1, 2015 I wanted to move DBA K in to the Xero Account for DBA H. I was managing them seperately last year and this year I wanted to put them together to manage cash easier.
How do I move this to the other Xero account with out showing it as profit, because I earned it the previous year.
Assuming the vendors have been set up with all their info, there is a default expense account set up in the Contact account.
How should I account for this in Xero?
It was transferred over in Xero as an opening balance in a sundry account against SALES.
How do I find out what is the underlying system account so I can change them back to what Xero had them defaulted as?
Unfortunately this posted an entry to P/L and loan account.
How do I edit the name of an Expense Account?
How do I transfer a client's account balance into Xero.
Or, sorting by account number would be fine, too, since that would result in the same thing.
If this is different to he 31/1 reval another entry is made to the fx gain/loss account.
When it comes to reconciling this single transaction, I can’t split it into two sums for each credit card account on Xero.
This would be useful when you are reviewing the GST treatment of items in an account.
Is there a merge field that I can use to determine the account of the line item.
so here are my questions:- How do I classify my credit card payments from my checking account in Xero?
Ask Account:This separate program imports any or all Excel Rules.
They don't use multi-currency for anything, yet in the P&L there is $60 sitting in the account as of April.
So, how do I account for this in Xero?
From what I have read this occurs when someone is not the administrator or person who set the account up, yet I do have that role.
Unfortunately, the first run I couldn't process as the account holder (who the SMS goes to), was out of phone range in Sierra Leonne.
Enter any Price, Description, Account then press "Done".
We have two credit cards, each with their own account in Xero.
How do I reconcile the $$ in the cash clearing account coming from my POS and the cash that I kept as Owner Drawings?
"default account invalid BSB and Account Number" I cannot find where this is or how to fix it as it wont let me download the file
My question is how would you then close the superannuation payable account at the end of period to the “pre-paid superannuation” account?
Can anyone tell me how I can allocate the pays processed from cash to the Petty Cash account?
I'm not sure what is meant by the second step - set up another account?
How do you account for public holidays in Xero.
I have entered the GST component of $5604 against the GST code of 820 (using this account for both GST on Sales and GST on Purchases).
In the general ledger, there is a superannuation account (code 478) and a superannuation payable account (code 826).
However what account do I allocate in the account column?
To get around this for the time being I have created a replica account "804 Wages Payable New" but is there something I have missed?
If so how do I set that up to show she has 18 weeks accrued and how do I offset it against the liabilty account?
What method do you use to account for these payments, and reconcile against your payrun?
Problem is that the account is locked since it is payroll related.
I am the only advisor and owner of the account, with full permissions, but if I go to cancel the payments, there is a padlock symbol that won't let me alter it.
Our Xero account is linked with our NEST account.
under "organisation"  Wages Exp and ER NI Exp can only be posted to P& L account which I understand why?
I was hoping I can post the ER costs to a balancesheet account e. g. suspense (so I can make sure that the account is NIL each month) as really don't want to post entire cost to a single department and having to split each month by journal.
320 Direct Wages477 Salaries811 Wages PayableWe also have a lot of wage advances how do I reconcile these I have created a Wage Advance Account 621 - Current Asset - but how do I reconcile these amounts against the wages posted.
My issue is with choosing which liability account this needs to be taken out from.
For example, if salary for Jan is paid on 1 Feb. All the salary expenses are shown in Feb account, which is not so.
This was done but how do I account for it?
Use any merchant account.
Data from Xero is automatically transferred to your Dropbox account.
I can see on sales slips that the reference is 'afterpay', but I'm unsure as to how I should be setting this up in Xero considering that the amount paid to me is different to what is paid by the customer as Afterpay take a percentage of the sale - I also have to account for coding and reconciling those fees as an expense also.
How do I set up Square to be the credit card processor on my Xero account?
Should I set up some kind of clearing account?
I see that I can (and have) set up a Paypal account to automatically feed into Xero.
Jobs can be invoiced at any time based on quote or taking into account timesheet times.
Sync your store products as Items in your Xero account.
Use any merchant account.
I can’t reconcile the the refund twice so how do I account for the difference &#163;9.
So, the big question over here is, how do you handle refunds and import them to your Xero account?
How can I correct this without having to manually enter each account type per line item?
I have no idea where I should map this account in Xero?
in/460292There is no Payments account in Xero.
•Now any account marked to receive payments in Xero can be used for payments in Dear (account can now be other than Asset type account)•Assembly cost estimation approach is now persisted on Product level.
I am seeking a weekly profit and loss account reporting solution.
How do I adjust the SOH account to reflect the correct value of my stock?
I assume, if they then for whatever reason closed down or indeed you closed your account, your data would be lost.
HiEvery time there is an update for the Xero iOS app it forgets my account, so I have to put in my user name and password again.
I have tried to use the 'Account Billing' section in Xero which on the face of it appears to work.
Instead of taking this into account you continue to make everything worse in the looks/usability department.
Why is there no option to notify the primary contact via email when someone/anyone logs into the account.
If we were to ever identify any malicious activity in relation to your account we would notify you immediately.
If you notice something suspicious in your account, please contact us at phishing@xero.
1-6 Lauren informs me that only the subscriber can transfer the account.
I understand the approach that "we will give what online community wants" but please take in to the account barely anybody (unless desperate, annoyed, or have to much spare time) would have time to elaborate online.
Not sure what the authority level is in adding an account is?
It appears that each account can only have one feed, and so disable them elsewhere before proceeding in connecting to Xero (I had to disable my feeds to FA first).
I have tried:logging off and back inopening other Client's Payroll sections, non of which would openopening the Xero account on a Mac and on a PCopeing in Chrome.
##### CLUSTER 26 #####
On a few occasions we've had to transfer a part of that payment back so she could repay it out of a different account.
There's a "loan" account which I can assign the inward payment to.
I'm trying to verify what account to assign to the payment.
So my question is: how do I register/account for any payment made to them for their work?
Is it somehow possible to log this whereby the payment method is into my directors loan account?
That is, after payment, interest payoff and transfer into escrow account, what is left reflects a decrease in the loan.
We make a fixed monthly payment on account to a fuel supplier.
Hello there,We have internet merchant account is in Singapore Dollars (SGD), which is accepting payment from our Indonesian customers via our website (online payment).
I understand that I can record the payment from the 'Expense Claims' pane of the dashboard with payment from the petty cash account I created on the dashboard.
When I reconcile the payment what account do I put it on.
Which account should I choose when reconciling that payment?
How do I take the funds out of the liabilities account and apply it as a payment?
What I am asking here is other accounting packages I am using show a lot more detail that what is currently been shownFor example when a cheque is written or an amount transferred it shows the account it the payment/transfer went into.
Can we expand the batch payment facility with Tyro Smart account to Payroll processing?
This leaves my account out of balance by ($100) How do I reconcile this, or split out the total payroll payment to match up to the expense lines?
However, after I manually made the payment to the employee from my account, I am not able to reconcile the transaction because there is no match on the system.
I'm having problems with a 'check payee account details' error when I try to do a payment export from payroll.
##### CLUSTER 27 #####
00am", how do I remove the time so I just have the date the invoice is due?
Or just an invoice?
I just sold my supplier some equipment and now I'm trying to raise an invoice, but I can't, because I can't create a job on a supplier.
Do I just setup my business as a customer and invoice items at cost or is there an easier process?
It can't just be my Client and Mr Catty that have non-finance systems with data to export to create an invoice?
Currently, the invoice just states that it is a billable expense, but it is not a clickable link to the actual bill for that expense.
Receipts should reflect true total paid and not just what is applicable for the invoice.
Hello,I have just had a client ring up to say that they hadn't paid an overdue invoice as it is not them who is supposed to be paying it but instead a customer of theirs.
this should be basic stuff, and the options for these two fields are just not on the "create invoice" page at all.
If that's the purpose of this invoice format, I'll probably just leave the customer address off, as I normally send them via email.
##### CLUSTER 28 #####
I then create an invoice in xero.
How do I match & reconcile payments my customer made by my squareup machine to my Xero invoice.
There is an option in Xero to create a 'Repeating' invoice, but i have a few questions:1.
Hello,How do i record the VAT in Xero for an invoice that has VAT on it but we cannot claim back.
How do I record this in Xero without voiding the whole invoice?
An invoice that only contains a WEG figure does not contain all of the necessary information for it to be a tax invoice.
What happened is that Xero created a duplicate transaction with same date and time stamp and matched both to the same outstanding sales invoice.
Xero will show receipts, however, it is only possible to see these when an invoice is opened, which is not sufficient for our requirements.
How should I record these Sales invoice in Xero.
However it appears in Xero I have to do each single invoice allocation individually.
When I’m posting a new purchase invoice in xero, it gives me a warning if I enter an invoice number which already exists.
Invoice from DHL: Bill in Xero: I am unsure how to correctly create a bill in Xero for the invoice.
How do I input this invoice in Xero so that the correct input VAT amount will be accounted for?
How do I amend the invoice VAT total in Xero?
The only issue I'm having with Xero is if you have a receivable invoice for say &#163;1,000.
90 how do i show this in Xero as ive created a invoice for £100 for the work but im actually only getting £98.
It would be great if you could send a photo or file that you've attached to an invoice in Xero Touch, with the invoice.
I am currently using 2 systems, one is xero the other is iCount (recently switched to Green Invoice) which are legally certified by israeli tax authorities.
If I follow Xero instructions those details place themselves in the body of the invoice.
Is there any Xero addon that could store this  information linked to product sale invoice and customer.
Xero does not accept invoice imports without an invoice number; whilst it makes sense that the system needs a unique identifier to group lines onto an invoice it isn't helpful that it requires this to be the final invoice number.
PLEASE GIVE US THE OPTION TO TURN OFF THE BUSINESS DIRECTORY FEATURE Has anyone notice the new Business Directory Feature in Xero when you input an invoice or create a new contact.
In UK law the Registered Office has to show at the bottom of the invoice so the invoicing in Xero picks up the Postal Address to do this.
The import should look at 'Invoice Number' first and 'Contact Names' second as qualifies for the generation of the bills in Xero.
- Upon clicking "Save" Xero would *detect* that there is a "Repeating Invoice" setup for the *same* client.
Exporting invoice or sales data in Xero results in the CSV containing multiple lines per invoice (ie.
Xero, please update this so we can export all sales/invoice data, but with each invoice on only a single row.
Currently, when choosing "right", a square logo ends up in the center of a Xero invoice.
So every month I get my invoice from Xero that has a pdf attachment and the body text that says "Please find attached your Xero invoice.
The feature to email a document to a library is cool, but what would be better is to be able to email a document to an invoice in Xero.
Can be frustrating if client is working on Xero mobile app raising an invoice, then takes a phone call.
At present the new release allows you to email a PDF of a Xero invoice, and this now also emails separate attachments if you include them with the invoice.
Xero I love the flag/ notification you get when you receive in an open invoice, notifying you of a duplicate.
For example, when I send an invoice through Xero, instead of the link reading http://in.
However when you email the customer the quote, Xero Touch defaults to the invoicing email template i. e. "Please find your attached invoice for .
This would avoid the where a supplier sends an invoice (electronically or in hard copy), and not via the Xero Purchase Order process (that helps to create the underlying Bill that can be sent to the supplier).
Current workflow to attach a scan to Xero invoice is:1.
Perhaps this work could be undertaken when Xero address this "Auto Text on recurring invoice"https://community.
This is a very manual process of matching up invoice numbers from what is on the supplier statement to what is in Xero.
At first I thought you could do this in Xero, but Spend and Receive Money don't create invoice records.
I think Xero needs to focus on adding some real ground breaking invoice features to keep ahead of the game and or simply replicating some of the brilliant feature sets from competitor SAAS applications.
It would be really useful to have a signature setting for emails within Xero - the ability to set a number of signatures so you can choose at the point of emailing an invoice.
It would be great if XERO could enable their CSV invoice import file template to accommodate multiple currencies.
I have been asked by a client to send their monthly recurring invoice to can this be done in Xero ?
It would be better if Xero made it easy to select a date range for expense reimbursement that could be automatically transferred to an invoice when it is being drafted.
My accountant has sent me an invoice for accountancy fees - which i have paid for now - where do i upload this to in Xero?
Invoice data is imported into Xero as manual journals which include if the sale is GST on Income or not.
Despite the fact that there are no payments attached to that invoice now, Xero does not allow me to edit the invoice (edit that will change the total amount of the invoice).
How do i post this transaction and create invoice in XERO.
How do I make Xero do that kind of invoice please?
Anyone have a clue as to why Xero outputs a invoice PDF at 8.
I can't figure out how to create a VAT only invoice in Xero though.
My question is how to use Xero to invoice my clients for my expenses.
so in Xero I have neither a quote or invoice created for this project yet.
So I go into the dummy company, create a dummy invoice, and export it to CSV - the idea being I can see what Xero expects in the CSV.
Can anyone recommend me a Xero invoice designer?
Is there an option for me to choose the email address that Xero sends their invoice to?
But this doesn't match my invoice in Xero, so I have "amount due" owing.
On the previous system I used, there was a reference number for every invoice on the system - I am not sure how I can do that with Xero.
Even better option would be for Xero to incorporate a job number system so that hours can be assigned to a job and invoice the customer from the timesheet entries.
Collect your invoice payments by Direct Debit and reconcile them automatically in Xero using Eazy Collect's simple invoice collection solution.
Simple to use, when attendees confirm they can receive their invoice via Xero.
Simple to use, when attendees confirm they can receive their invoice via Xero.
Seeking a conference/event ticketing integration whereby the purchase of the desired tickets creates a matching invoice in Xero.
We wasted a lot of time evaluating TSheets (listed in your time tracking category) only to discover that we are unable to assign a billing rate to each employee that can show up in an invoice we can import into Xero.
Is there any solution for getting Xero to send the reference number when notifying the invoice is paid?
Can anyone advise on  how I get my daily shopify orders into xero in one invoice instead of a separate inv for each order.
How do I record this invoice paid by cash in Xero?
At present we must manually create each individual member invoice in Xero even though they have already been automatically created in our membership management software.
How do I get the invoice imported to Xero to match the correct invoice in FB?
We are looking to convert our handwritten customer reports to digital forms that can be emailed with the Xero invoice.
docx invoice template on Xero allows.
I believe this is because no invoice has being raised in xero.
When stock is received in Vend, you can create a Payable Invoice in Xero.
##### CLUSTER 29 #####
First i understand there is a choice to either delete the unwanted transactions (including payments into the account) or to leave them there but code them as drawings.
and in turn messed up some other reconciled transactions for the current account.
I am entering card transactions as I make payments on the card and them paying them on the card account as and when I do this.
And if so, how can I transfer all the history of statements and transactions over to it from the old account?
So now I have all the transactions showing up in one defunct account that was created by accident and can't work out how to get them across to the active account where all my other transactions are!
When in banking view, under account transactions, I realize you can do a “bulk unreconcile” on transactions.
However, the problem is that in banking view you cannot see which account the transactions have been coded to.
I used to be able to check what entries had a file attached - in Account Transactions but it is not there anymore.
There are a number of different factors that can determine how best to account for these transactions so please share your wisdom, and/or ask away!
There are a number of different factors that can determine how best to account for these transactions so please share your wisdom, and/or ask away!
There are a number of different factors that can determine how best to account for these transactions so please share your wisdom, and/or ask away!
There are a number of different factors that can determine how best to account for these transactions so please share your wisdom, and/or ask away!
There are a number of different factors that can determine how best to account for these transactions so please share your wisdom, and/or ask away!
My gut instinct is that "Current Liability" is the wrong account type for these kind of transactions.
How can I get the individual transactions from my credit card into my Business current account so I can individually categorise them and apply VAT to each?
How do I reconcile the credit card account without entering these transactions twice?
The new reports "Account Transactions" can't manage to deal with even relatively modest volumes.
Also, I'm not able to export any chart of account transactions as excel file.
Hey Everyone,I was wondering if there's a quick overview of what repeating transactions are being assigned to a specific account ?
Is it possible to delete inventory account transactions?
How do I review the transactions in this account?
The problem I have is that there are several transactions (money flowing in+out to my personal account) that I can't re-conciliate.
I can't seem to un-reconcile the cancelled card's transactions and somehow attribute them to the actual credit card account.
Then comes up on account transactions as a duplicate and says unreconciled - what do I do with this one?
##### CLUSTER 30 #####
Is there a way to mark the invoice as paid before the Stripe deposit that doesn't break this process?
Is there a way to change the item code in an invoice after it has been paid?
If a customer has been given a credit for part of an invoice from a previous month what is the best way to deal with this?
I'm sure that there is a quick way to do this other than going into each and every invoice, editing and changing it.
Is there a quick way to link a lot of small credit card charges to one expenses invoice?
Is there a way of setting it up so when we chose the branded theme of ABC we have a freight line appear already on the invoice grid ready configured for that brand?
Is there a way of issuing some documentation (ie invoice) of what they owe us and allocating it as a prepayment before they deposit the cash.
Is there a way to unmark a Paid Invoice?
Wondering the best way to reconcile customer payments when there is a settlement discount applied to the invoice.
There is no way that I can find to include the receipts for the expenses with the invoice automatically.
Is there a way of sadding statement fields in the invoice template?
I have though of maybe an invoice but not sure if this is the best way to achieve what I want.
We can't find any way to download the invoice detailsXero advised this isn't possible, also that they will delete the records of the old file when we stop paying.
I can't find any way to edit multiple invoice templates at once.
Is there a way that this can be done without removing any part payments and/or redoing the whole invoice again?
However, there is no way to display this information on the invoice when printed.
Is there an existing way to save invoice descriptions as templates?
Is there any way that when the draft is change the repeating invoice is automatically updated.
We are allowed to choose different formats, however, is there any way that we could hide the due date of invoice and reference from the printed receipt?
In XPM (Workflowmax) it would be nice if you could prepare quotes on say 10 jobs and consolidate them to 1 to send to the client, in the same way that you can with an invoice.
Is there a way I can grab the direct URL to view the quote/invoice in browser without actually having to send them out?
Is there any way to get the Standard Invoice layout to make more room.
I can't see a way of creating a quote or invoice which has for example '10 chairs for 2 days @ £5 each per day' .
The only way i can work out how to continue is to close the invoice which is a real pain.
Is there a way to filter line items in the docx templates for the invoice/packing slip theme?
TLDR is that sometimes i have to enter the credit note way after the invoice is paid.
Is there any way to attached more than one PO to a customer invoice?
Is there a way to use Contact default settings when generating an invoice or credit note?
Is there a different way to mark them by invoice rather than line item?
Is there any way to automatically send a file attachment along with an invoice?
Is there any way to get the reference on a customised invoice to be on multiple lines?
Is there any way to edit the fields in an invoice?
Has anyone found a way of embedding a photo in an invoice?
##### CLUSTER 31 #####
Hi Experts,I am doing GST for the first time so i need some advice.
Hi there,I need a difference of opinion in our office sorted so I can instruct staff how to treat things!
Hi,I need some assistance recording the details of a loan / line of credit.
Hi,I need to reconcile 2 expenses paid back to me, without having spent any money.
HI,Having reviewed a number of historic threads on similar subjects I can't quite see an answer to our particular need.
##### CLUSTER 32 #####
I have coded all the transactions accurately still there is difference in total sales & income (Box 5) with actual sales of the business but when I check the same in GST Audit Report the sales figure are accurate.
How do I save the final GST report, hence locking the transactions that have been recorded for that period?
At the moment we have more than 50 cost centres listed under tracking category, be really good to be able to run a detailed report of transactions where we can group the cost centres.
For example, If I run a payables or receivables report for January 14, there should be a button that will include transactions after that date.
Here in British Columbia, Canada, the Ministry of Finance needs a report that shows all transactions outside our province.
It doesn't report any errors but transactions aren't coming through.
##### CLUSTER 33 #####
This results in a much lower overall website hosting expense than to pay everything monthly.
They are able to pay weekly, fortnightly, monthly or in full.
I would mind to pay a fee to get it doneor if we could be directed to someone who could do this for us.
I will be receiving the goods in January upon which I will pay the 70% balance of the bill.
Will be used to pay Loan #1 with better terms.
I am from New Zealand and I pay provisional tax three times per year.
Divide the cash equivalent of the benefit by the number of pay days to find out how much to payroll (£720 ÷ 52 = £13.
I use a business credit card to pay all of my monthly expenses.
I want to do this so I'm consistent in my accounting as I will now create bills and pay with checks that way.
We have archived the PayPal Acct, but still the option to pay via PayPal is available.
Often the balance is paid in cash by the customer on the day of their event and from this I have cash expenses of my own, in particular I pay the land owner in cash for use of the venue on the same day.
Then when you have to pay, you can only pay each individual expense.
some pay us when the tenant enters the property (AirBnB).
At the moment, when I pay one of my suppliers in China, I book it in as a purchase of stock and set it to 'No VAT'.
I have classed the 3 pay items above as paid to a contact I created called HMRC - is this correct?
I didn't keep any taxes out of their pay or anything.
I bought new item and pay new 77 AUD by business credit card.
Customers using the e-commerce site can choose to pay by cash or debit/credit card.
But I do have to pay Federal Self Employment Tax estimates quarterly.
We can have up to 5 jobs going at once and have up to $80,000 a month in wages to pay out.
I am currently using the pay run and am not sure how to set up the issue of unpaid sick leave.
I. e. users pay a monthly fee to use our software.
why there is  a balance of a large amount of fund The scenario is:  Customer is asked to pay some fund upfront for a Auto Repair Job.
I am told the difficulty comes from the various methods customers can use to pay bills; ie: online, in store, EFT.
How much should I pay?
I was hoping I could then push a button and generate a completed self-assessment form stating how much tax I have to pay.
Also we are a small business and often pay suppliers bills by personal credit card.
However, when the expenses are reconciled when they are charged, there is no place that then shows you when I have to pay.
At the moment I send out Orders to customers so that they can pay a deposit.
There is no Pay By Check option in my bills, and there are no Check Settings in the General Settings menu.
However, they would be happy to use my affiliate number if I had one and they could pay their own subscription and I could benefit in a small way.
And I'm not prepared to pay our bookkeepers to provide me the information which I can access myself in real timeP
This should also apply to employment termination in the middle of a pay period.
A lot of our customers pay by direct debit which are effectively prepayments and to say there balance is zero when they have paid us money is madness.
For us advisors that don't pay for clients' 1099s on their behalf, this creates a stop in the flow of them being able to use the 3rd party options - as it's only accessible to us.
In this scenario, one can deduct a sickness using a pay item, but then this is payable to a third party.
STANDARD user / ADVISOR can they be given permission to approve/approve and pay ETC.
Is it possible to a enable a 'pay online' link in draft mode please?
Employees time and again get advances and that function is not there in the pay run function.
However, some do not pay when due no matter how much follow up there is and no matter how many times the "transfer subscription" has been sent through.
For example on the Pay Calendar screen, when clicking on the lock symbol providing information that Calendars can not be deleted whilst one or more employees have that pay calendar as their default.
How do I re run an incorrectly posted pay run?
I am looking to pay my employees whilst away on holiday and would ideally want to do this via an ipad.
I was unsuccessful in  removing the Planned Pay Date of the 'batch' once it has been entered.
We sell lots of small value services online and people pay online.
For example:GoCardless & PaypalThe client could choose to pay via Gocardless or pay via PayPal.
Alternatively, could you make it possible to pay holiday pay other than only at termination?
This would be useful in dealing with any pay corrections or leavers or any other situations which may arise mid-month.
I pay motel cleaners that do different hours each day, not regular hours.
Then when you enter someones DOB and then their pay rate per hour, if you under pay them a warning would show.
Would love a reminder email and / or in-app notification for upcoming or overdue pay runs.
Please can we request the ability to manually override the KiwiSaver - KSE, KSR and ESCT calculations in a pay template?
44 is coded to Holiday Pay (same Holiday Pay code as above).
Perhaps there needs to be more 'Pay Items' created that can link through to each employee so that the holiday pay in these cases can go to the correct departments for reporting purposes.
It would be great  when checking the Pay run before it is posted, to be able to see the hours at a glance instead of opening every entry to re check.
Often it is difficult to convert dollars into hours especially when there is pay rises.
If you have leave, you can revert the pay to draft (or it would feed through from the leave approval request if being used correctly).
Currently there is no ability to pay Court fines or statutory deductions direct to the court/IRD/other govt agency within the payrun.
5) per week, not per payperiodEmployeeEmployee week 1 works 55 hoursEmployee Week 2 Works 30 HoursCurrent System:Employee time sheet shows 85 hoursMust manually make 15 of those overtimeDesign system:The system would recognize Week 1 has 40 hours of regular pay and 15 at overtime (x1.
Staff are then held accountable & responsible for entering their own times and failure to do so may result in a reduced pay.
Even if an employee is on leave, employers are still required to issue them with a pay slip.
It would be great if this could be changed so that GST codes can be allocated on reimbursement items in payroll, as currently we are having to amend pay runs so that the expense being reimbursed can be allocated along with the GST that was paid.
Would be good if we can have the previous month available in the pay period drop down.
What this means is that for a monthly pay calendar, the number of working days each month can change and the hours automatically included in the leave applications may not be what you expect.
Is there a way to allow user to specify how much to pay via Stripe?
This works great because I collect the cashback rewards and I get to pay things in the native currency of the expense.
This is to pay regular 'contractors' who get a different amount of money each fortnight.
invoiceStatus=INVOICESTATUS%2fAUTHORISEDSo that I can search, select and quickly calculate a total for bills that I am about to pay.
Or unscheduled pay run in prior period to get closing leave balance correct and zero out the rest?
How do I mark it as unpaid so that I remember to pay it when it's due?
How do I now reconcile those payments with no pay run info) and work out what the tax/super should be that I now owe to the govt?
All the amounts that I charged (or paid out) are showing up in the Received column and all the credits and payments to pay off the card are showing in the Spent column.
It is not intuitive at all how to pay these.
We're willing to pay for assistance with this if it can be done properly.
I have no way of knowing ahead of time if they will take the withholding tax out or not; some places pay the full amount, some don't.
My accountant told me I can declare the dividends now to include them in the tax year and then pay them later when the funds are in.
I can only see a way to pay the entire bill instead of paying say $1,000 against the total.
Open to suggestions ways to do this will getting a similar result (how much are we actually expecting to pay out at the end of the month).
How do I delete his pay off the payrun and use it as an advance?
I have to pay/reconcile them but I can't.
If I use the km rate to pay drivers, what's the easiest way to calculate and pay annual leave?
So, how do I include the amount of paid hours they have accrued & their unpaid leave in a pay run, the employee is full-time salary?
When I process a weekly pay run, this should be approx 1.
Is there a way of deleting these as I do not want to  pay twice for the period between 7/16 to 9/16 anything after this date has to be paid.
I want to pay employees different rates on the same day or in the same week.
Any ideas how I can generate those deleted pay runs?
My question is how can we clean up this list that appears in the drop-down box 'Select a Pay Period'?
how do I now go back to that payrun and only pay that employee.
We pay most employees monthly in advance, but we do have 1 or 2 timesheet employees.
Is there a reason my pay runs are not showing?
How can I reduce this amount so I can pay the correct Annual Leave entitlement.
Is there a option to change these tracking options for processed pay runs?
HiI'm running my business as a sole trader and am trying to set up a monthly salary I pay myself through payroll.
I go to process a pay run but the employee is not showing up to select for the pay run, what am I missing.
I was previously able to process their pay run, but since the end of financial year there is no employee to select from.
How do i Pay this?
Is there any way to accrue leave with these pay items?
How do we load the ABA file and pay our employees?
In the Payroll Settings > Calendars, it shows a "default" pay calendar of monthly with the next pay period being 1 Jul 2015 > 31 Jul 2015 - I can't seem to change this.
I understand there is another way to Pay myself where there is no Tax required until a certain threshold is reached but using Payroll I'm only paying my self $1,000 per fortnight now and the automatic pay roll calculations not show I have to pay Tax on this income with the  PAYG Tax - With tax-free threshold, no leave loading.
Even if I delete the opening balance, it is still leaving what has accrued in the first 2 pay runs under that type.
So how do I pay a different random amount each month, based on the monthly takings less tax and super?
How do I go back and change ordinary hours already processed in a pay run to annual leave taken instead?
Can I delete the last 12 months of pay runs and then re do?
5. in the pay run, I added a deduction line and entered the amount of the invoice6.
HiPlease can someone advise what the difference between:830 - Income Tax Payableand825 - PAYG Withholdings PayableI am the sole director and sole employee and I'm trying to pay myself a wage.
I can normally see (and edit) the pay items in the pay run.
How do I enter this so that it is correct for next months pay?
Both pays can been seen in the Pay Runs within Payroll for these two months.
But I cannot see what the total pay, tax and superannuation is.
My client likes to pay the super monthly so is there anyway that this can be done?
PAYG deductions MUST be cacluclated on YTD earnings and not on the assumption that that the pay is for the Week/Fortnight/Half Month/ Month or Quarter as there is no facility for an annual payroll calendar.
How do I change withholding variation for allowance only, not the entire pay.
I can't see how I can do this but it would save so much time and stop pay run delays.
Firstly, when an employee is terminated, is there a way to assign a tracking category for their termination pay items?
Has anyone experienced issues with Tax on unscheduled pay runs?
How do I do an adjustment and pay the difference?
As you can imagine this is ok for a one off every now and then, but to do it over multiple pay runs for over 10 individuals can get quite tiresome and frustrating.
How do we get the payslip to display the leave used in a particular pay run?
Some of my staff are choosing the wrong pay rates.
Feeling a little Silly asking this question :-( How do i pay the public holiday for last tue being melb cup day?
How can I reset these dates so they are all brought up to the current date and I can get the normal Pay Run feature to present me with the correct dates?
What is the best way to pay  fringe benefits (non-profit, religious)?
You can decide which option is best for you in line with other considerations, such as how many pay runs have been posted, whether PAYGW has been reported or superannuation has been paid etc.
An adjustment could be processed for one pay period or it could include totals of multiple pay periods.
Don't want to have to try to remember to do it manually every pay.
Could we please have the ability to put into a pay template a Manual Tax Adjustment for those employees that want extra tax or have an adjustment made via the ATO instead of having to remember to do it weekly.
Xero support has indicated that the following 5 reasons could be responsible for this :1) Not all Payroll bills have been approved2) Not all Payroll bills have been created for each pay run3) Duplicate Payroll bills have been created4) A pay run has been edited after the bill was created5) A manual journal has been posted within one of the wage expense accountsHas anyone else experienced a discrepancy between pay run and associated pay run bill and what was the cause and how was this resolved please?
Can you please tell me the best way to correct the other pay runs so that my group certificate will be correct?
Has anyone experienced that monthly salary pay run (payroll) produced different net pay every month?
Or is there something else I might have missed that would be causing it to not recognise that the pay run has already been completed?
I have gone into each of their pay templates now and added the appropriate leave type, however I can figure out how to set an opening balance because I missed it on the previous pay runs.
My question:How do I go about reconciling this refund and how do I then pay the employee without creating another pay run?
I have a client who pays his employees a salary, regardless of whether or not they work 20 hours or 50 hours in a given pay period.
Is there a way of using the time sheets to record time in lieu not pay extra/less?
Is it possible to print Payslips for an employee from multiple pay runs at once?
The result is that the Leave Balance is showing as the total from only this weeks pay - which amounts to 2.
(In a second step I then want to pay all of September and any following months, see 3) below.
Is there a way to place custom unit pay on the Employee time sheet?
To fix this issue, please revert the pay run to draft and re-approve the pay run.
To fix this issue, please revert the pay run to draft and re-approve the pay run.
Therefore the pay amount is a commission that is not the same amount every month.
When I go to the Payroll tab, there is a calendar that shows pay run dates, but it doesn't say how much will be paid.
But what happens to that check number when the pay run is paid with direct deposit?
How do I make a pay run for April 30, 2016?
What can I do to get the 3/20 and 3/27 and 4/3 pay periods to show up for this worker?
I am looking for a fast and easy way to pay a 1099 contractor on a monthly basis.
I have assigned the Holiday Group to the employee, processed a pay run that included the timeframe for the holiday, however, nothing shows up on the payroll run for holiday pay.
HiI have an employee who is not eligible for RAS as they are a non taxer payer due to not earning enough to pay tax.
When we go and create a pay run, there are no entries for pension contributions in the pension slips, so we're unsure how to solve this problem.
As a result of this I am absolutely blocked from posting any pay runs and therefore submitting RTI data.
Any suggestions on how I might go about correcting this employees pay?
)I seem to have got around most of these issues, the timesheets one is a pain, they have to be completely filled in before going to the payrun page and I always have two on the go as I pay a week in hand so the one i want is always hidden - could get very confusing if you are not careful!
Another issue that I am having is that I have always sent a copy of my payslips to the employee at the beginning of the week so that they can check that it is correct before I pay it.
In setting up our Workplace Pension scheme we have most employees whose employer pension contribution will be based on a percentage of their gross pay and some for whom the employer contribution will be a fixed amount per month.
Can we pay SSP on an interim basis say when we normally pay the payroll, or do we have to wait till the emolpyee returns.
Any ideas how to get the reimbursements to pull through the YTD even if the 'this pay' figure is nil?
HiWe deduct &#163;5 per month from participants pay for our company lottery syndicateThe only options I can see under deductions are pension or student loan options.
What is the point in the pay template if I have to enter this item each time?
We were told to do a null pay run, but that still hasn't worked either.
I am having a problem setting up the payroll for myself in that the system wont accept that the payroll calendar should start from the day I started trading (a couple of weeks ago) whereas the date that I became a director was back in Sept 2014 - it says that the date of directorship cannot precede the start of the pay calendar.
I am a complete novice to pay roll software - but usually can work it out!
(as pay is meant to be run today or tomorrow).
I have entered brought forward figures for the employee, gross pay &#163;3000 and student loan deductions &#163;8 - which relate to April/May salary (processed on my previous software).
In order for the changes our Product Team have made to take effect, could you please revert and re-process any Posted Pay Runs that include an employee that has been affected by this issue.
Pay is due tomorrow, do I pay manually or not?
Can someone please explain why there is a balance showing at all since she is not entitled to any holiday pay on termination?
Also his holiday pay is showing 144 hours, is this the amount the hours we owe him now, or is this what he is owed in general if he stays employed until his next annivarsary date (01/18).
I am paying my next 2 weeks pay periods in advance.
What is the easiest way to pay employees who have not been with us long enough to get paid for the full closedown period?
While there is still Holiday Pay owing we cannot remove them from our payroll.
entered an employee to accrue holiday pay but they want it paid out in their weekly wage, please advise how to amend the first pay and adjust his details to automatically do it in the futureThanks
How can I pay people two rates in the one pay run?
How do I delete a draft pay run?
And once I do, can I process the same pay run again?
But for the contractors I can't figure out how to pay them through Payroll without accumulating a holiday pay balance.
Their are 2 employees who I can not change to new Pay Calendar as it brings up this message in red box.
I can see from previous discussions that the holiday pay will convert to annual leave on anniversary date.
Everytime i try to click on the 'create' button it comes up with a warning that "The timesheet already exists for this employee and pay period" have checked payrun etc and cannot see one.
How do I pay our employees their holiday pay accumulated so far over that period?
What do I input on her Holiday pay leave column as an opening balance?
How do I process his first and last pay?
I am trying to do a final pay for a staff member that left 24 April.
When I create the pay run the holiday pay amount is different to that owing which is $2512.
What is the theory behind this accrued holiday pay figure?
Is there a way of showing average daily pay?
Even if it had the feature to input how many weeks to split it over, but during the pay run.
it seems to be it's locked, I can't change it at all, even if I go to Pay Template.
There is no visibility on IRD PAYE payments after each pay run either.
How do I process their final pay.
Calculate wages, pay your employees and stay compliant with payroll taxes & regulations.
Bill & Pay () is looking for beta testers to use our service entirely free for one month.
Even if I do net pay with aje's with non integrated service.
The issue is related to super payments failing so it is very important that we resolve this problem so that we can pay our employee's super.
Is it possible to pay via PayPal or any other means?
Silence is not a service what I want to pay for.
##### CLUSTER 34 #####
Is there any way I can pull a report on everything that has been entered that included the same reference #?
Please can you advise on the correct way to report this?
Is there any way where I can produce a ledger report for each of my customers with debits and credits ?
Unfortunately there is no way to filter the Sales Tax Report by Tracking Category to show totals for each branch location.
That way the report will only provide what is required and will be a lot quicker to load.
It would be excellent if there was a way to publish more than on report at once, as going backwards and forwards through the reports menu is time consuming.
Is there a setting I can change, or another report, or a way of generating this without exporting to excel and adding gst columns?
A couple of suggestionsIs there a way to edit what is included in the front page of the Report Packs to include, for example, the ABN?
Is there a way of doing this easily or could the standard report be modified please to conform better with GAAP.
Is there a way to report by group (top level) only?
I did search but couldn't find a setting that enables the report to include credit notes - is there a way to do this?
There doesn't appear to be any way to print a report on outstanding quotes by tracking category.
Is there any way of generating a report (income etc) by using the branding.
Is there a way to be able to print a "receipt" or batch report
Is there a way to exclude these types of items from the Cash Summary report?
##### CLUSTER 35 #####
Is there a way to do this without having to make a ton of manual adjustments to all accounting accounts in XERO?
Could I work in the same way in XERO or it looks as a messy books if the  credit card accounts are not reconciled (in the Loan case)?
Is there a way, I can import the sales and purchase orders into Xero that will match with the conversion balance of the opening accounts receivables.
Is there any way that I can migrate my past accounts into Xero?
I love Xero in every other way, but I think this is a serious deficiency for creating management accounts for anything beyond a SME.
##### CLUSTER 36 #####
hello there, how can I add a conversion balance for the customers without entering any kind of invoice date or number as required?
See the screen shot: I am not sure what the problem is - should add that I imported this invoice.
Can you advise if you could add the ability to do a spell check before approving an invoice?
On my custom sales invoice, how do I add the customer's phone number?
It is possible to add files to a customer invoice - also a great idea.
Please add an option either on the bill/invoice or a company setting, on how sales tax will be calculated.
In many of the email templates there are placeholders for the invoice number but in the remittance advice template there is not an option to add a supplier invoice number in the remittance - I currently use the reference field to record this information - please add this to the template options.
Please add a checkbox on the invoice customisation page so that due date can be hidden.
Can you add a feature where we can assign an entire Supplier Invoice to one customer?
This can be rather lengthy when you only want to adjust the invoice e. g. adjust the amount, add a new line or adjust the description.
"Please add your unique reference code (you'll see this on the invoice in the format ABCXXX). "
What i mean is how you have the "Add New Inventory Item" function when you are entering products on an invoice.
Please can you add the ability to barcode an invoice.
Add the filer in the existing "Payable Invoice Detail" or 3.
##### CLUSTER 37 #####
How do I allocate this in our chart of accounts as an investment to show in our reporting?
Consequentially now there is a Accounts Receivables balance showing for $2M.
How do i take the accounts receivable balance from $2M to zero?
How can I make an adjustment to my accounts to show that my sales tax owing has reduced by $100?
I inadvertently inout $0 conversion balances which them went though any added historical adjustments to all of my accounts.
Opening balances are easy to enter with a journal; though if I have accounts payable and receivable; how do i go about it?
I am looking for a suggested chart of accounts for a eCommerce retail operation.
I currently have my personal accounts in Quicken but it is so much more difficult to maintain.
There is no co-mingling between accounts.
HelloI'm in the process of setting up my first organisation in Xero and have a query regarding the opening balance for Accounts Receivable.
How do I zero the balance of the loan I have in Xero given the money never passed through the business accounts?
16,  That is a huge job when I don't want to do anything with these accounts except show balances for reporting purposes.
I don't have this problem when paying bills from any of my other accounts.
How would I record my "opening balance" or initial deposit to open the checking and savings accounts from within Xero?
Are there any customizations one can download so that setting up mortgages with escrow accounts are not so impossible to deal with?
There is no option to change it nor delete the entry once it has been saved and now my accounts wont reconcile.
I can't figure out how to correct them to being credit card accounts.
If so, how do I process this through the Xero accounts?
Is there something I can do to remove the errant transaction that is causing my accounts payable to be £1,100?
Two accounts set up in xero 1.
In Xero, I have a long list of accounts in my chart of accounts.
How do we get round this as client is desperate for his management accounts?
I am really insure as what to do in the accounts!
What do people use to create the year end statutory accounts for charities please?
I tried increasing accounts payable conversion balance by $100, and entering a credit note, but that doesn't work?
5I want to calculate discount on the gross amount i. e. 100 *10% = 10Do i have to adjust the accounts manually or some settings can be changed to suffice the purpose?
I also reconcile all accounts and run payable and receivable reports and do payroll.
should I do a journal at 30/4/15 to bring everything into line with year end statutory accounts?
Then various options for tax are available and I can opt for any tax then why do we assign any tax rate under edit accounts details?
What's the difference between 4000 sales and 4300 service accounts in the xero stock chart of accounts?
01 cent balance in every line item and I can then group all as requiredBUTCan I then round reports to accounts with .
Is it possible to ignore the VAT on tracking accounts, or would there be a work around to remove this liability from the accounts?
I am the bookkeeper for a local weekly paper, currently in the process of setting up accounts, etc.
Has anyone out in the Xero Community done a large scale change to their chart of accounts?
This means that any sharp eyed accounts assistant is now going to start posting stuff to my accountants!
- i can see them in the nominal legder accounts as SC conversion Balances?
Not really sure how I managed this, But I tried to 'find & match' entries while reconciling my accounts the other day.
My business partner believes the ICA should reflect what has been lodged and is still due to be paid with all unlodged BAS for the financial year reflected in the GST, PAYGW and PAYGI accounts.
So, for the past year we have been spending our own personal money on equipment, supplies, advertising, marketing, etc from our own personal accounts.
how is the money collected correctly handled in our accounts?
Or are layouts simply a grouping of accounts?
What are the correct accounts and rates to be using for this?
I'm reviewing unrealised gains/losses calculated by Xero in preparation of year end accounts.
Typically we transfer funds among our different accounts electronically, which is easy enough to record in Xero.
My question is how do I enter this into the accounts?
I’m setting up my expenses in the Chart of Accounts and I don’t see where I would associate an expense with a “tax line mapping” (in Quickbooks terminology).
In the chart of accounts that Xero generates there is one called "Owner a Share capital".
Has anyone dealt with Bartercard Contra in their accounts?
If I go into "Settings" => "Chart of Accounts", I can "Enable Payments" to the "Prepayments" accounts.
How do I correctly handle these 3 accounts in xero?
Any chance of a simple write down in first year tag for the asset, or acknowledgement of the AIA allowance within Xero Accounts?
So, what is best practice here in terms of the Chart of Accounts and reporting for this?
The issueWe have a number of UK companies that maintain their accounting records and prepare accounts in Euros rather than £’s.
I'm confused as to how to have things look correct in the Xero reports and also on the set of accounts that I will send to IRD.
What accounts should these payments be going against?
How best do I offset these to keep my Xero accounts clean?
What is the difference between the sales and revenue accounts in the Xero context?
I don't see anything in the Chart of Accounts for charitable donations.
Hello Xero Community,Can you please advise on the following transaction:In Company A $50,000 XYZ accounts payable are outstanding.
Also, could someone please advise what tax rates the contractors super expense and liability accounts should be and whether they should both be liabilities.
I'm looking for a bit of advice on how to structure a chart of accounts for a typical basic online retail store, perhaps someone in a similar business could give me an example of theirs?
Or should I do a dummy credit from the accountant and create a nominal in the chart of accounts for the amount outstanding?
Which chart of accounts for this also and for any repayments made?
do I set up every customer as a contact and treat them as an accounts receivable?
The trx has been recorded in Xero as 'Rent' in the chart of accounts and a GST on expenses has been applied.
I can then assign the branding template to the sale person accounts/contacts.
How do I get Jane, who is using the accounts@businessname.
In accounts I've set the purchase of the van up as a Fixed Asset however underneath where it says "Depreciation", Xero states that only an adviser can enter Depreciation and Register assets.
Can anyone advise what tax code I use when setting up my chart of accounts for a Rental Bond?
There were other Compass accounts added since our initial setup and I think one of those accounts is causing the problem.
Trying to setup basic COGS accounts in the chart of accounts - ie.
I am very frustrated as Xero support staff have told me that this is because the australian date format is not supported, yet I believe it is as the previous accounts that I've manually imported statements for have had the correct date format.
In a nutshell we have a physical location, we have wholesale accounts in our region, do markets, and are also very digital.
I know that I can restrict the list of sub-Accounts in Expense in the Chart of Accounts under do not “show in expense claim” option so that our sales people can only see a restricted set of sub-Accounts in Expense under the RECEIPT menu when they view through their smart phone and they can only select from this restricted set of sub-Accounts when are keying in their expenses.
The dashboard view can be quite deceiving for people who aren't bookkeepers or "accounts savvy".
A total of all accounts should be visible on the dashboard along with a line chart of balance, in and out.
Could we please see an additional ability to do a multiple items deposit to paypal accounts.
This benefits individuals who use advancement accounts and those who include them under normal expense accounts.
It would be great if  notes with nothing active accounts could be disabled or market to not print, rather than being deleted.
What I'm saying is we should be able to save certain reports within the Annual accounts as Favourites so we can use them all the time.
Could we please have an area in supplier contacts to enter accounts department details.
In Xero, I can only get the accounts to show what I want, however the accounts are in Alphabetical order.
How can this be done if you can't even show the depreciation as it actually is in the clients accounts?
To be able to show some different information on the dashboard for accounts on watchlist.
Basically, anyone doing business in Africa works with Mobile money accounts.
Can I suggest that you enable the general ledger accounts to be allocated to a tax return item number when setting up the chart of accounts.
I would use this facility a lot in the course of creating new names/accounts.
Also,Could we please have expired quotes in their own tab when viewing the "/Accounts/Receivable/Quotes" table?
if you download your accounts can you tell what file was attached to them ?
I am not comfortable having to unlock my finalized accounts so that credits from within the locked period can be applied within the Sales and Purchases areas.
Would it be a good idea for Xero to warn me, pace Microsoft for email accounts, that my card is due to expire at month end?
All of these drafting packages require the acount code and name in two separate columns to assist with linking the accounts.
It would be really useful to show overdraft limits, balance limits and whether accounts charge interest so that expenditure can be spread across the accounts and the impact visible.
It would be handy to be able to change the order of accounts in reports.
That is fine, but it is too expensive to be useful for an investment portfolio with a couple of FX accounts.
Discussion Tab: something similar to the Skype Instant Messenger - where Accountant and Client can have discussions about the accounts and retain the audit trail.
A company budget must include both operating and capital accounts.
What you can do at the moment is change the date on a Create Spend so it goes in the period you want for management accounts.
It doesn't seem too much to expect that I could at least download a local backup of my accounts data.
This is a basic feature most other accounts software have built in (even Sage 50 years ago) yet Xero still haven't implemented it.
Your Chart of Accounts should not be restricted by Payroll items.
ie How do I prevent the staff seeing the practice accounts?
I'm looking for a setup expert to fix accounts so they balance, etc.
What would be very helpful would be the option to merge G/L accounts.
com/petition/using-gemb-accounts-with-mintquicken-intuitSo what's the hold up?
These are not 'real' accounts, but really virtual ledgers that show up under accounts and can be held in foreign currencies.
When I get to Accounts > there is no option to choose Cheques.
All our purchases of stock and assets so far, I have shown the VAT split in the accounts.
00 CR - accounts receivable (the missing portion of 1000/1590)How do I reconcile this transaction to correctly reflect and make provision for the missing 1,000.
How do we go in and change the routing number as well as the link to access our accounts.
au or accounts@businessdivision2.
I have settled these bills from other accounts and therefore can't get them to reconcile.
Please please please can you put Fixed Assets at the top of the balance sheet and accounts reports so that the reports match the statutory UK formats!
However, how do I get these accounts to appear in my Overall Budget which was set up last year?
When I quote they are then addressed to accounts payable, which I do not want.
As it stands, there is absolutely no control and I'm ending up with too many supplier accounts for the same supplier.
I am asking this because I see the accounts payable is not going down and the telephone expenses are higher than what they should be.
Can this number be included in the tab when I look up their Accounts Payable details.
Using the Xero template I can only import the first line:*Description	*Quantity	*UnitAmount	Discount	*AccountCode	*TaxTypeI have up to 8 lines in my existing accounts system.
Will it request that the items with those unallocated be allocated to another item in the chart of accounts?
I use Gmail normally, but have not had success with any MS email accounts either.
Or will the accounts begin to feed in automatically after a few days?
Hello,I'm a health professional who is currently moving to Xero for managing my accounts.
Or would I be better setting up an entry in chart of accounts code for the loss.
I am currently in the process of revising a chart of accounts.
When entering an expense claim there is not link to the any of the accounts - none - so no expense claims can be completed.
Or CC the accounts person's email address in?
How do I consolidate the accounts of all the companies?
My wife uses Xero but I have access to check accounts which I might do monthly.
Can you tell me if it's possible to print a detailed general ledger selecting a number of accounts?
I've got dividends setup in the chart of accounts as equity which works fine for me.
I can only direct a single sum to one of the credit card accounts.
Any suggestions besides creating a new tax rate and changing 20+ accounts?
Hiya,We currently run our company accounts on Xero & we are launching business No 2 currently.
I have managed so far with the exceptions of how accounts are ordered within groups.
How do I reconcile this in our accounts?
I have attempting to log in with my "My Payroll" details but it doesn't show any details and if I login with my normal accounts/admin login I don't see any payroll information.
We don't want them to have any other access to accounts information.
What Gusto sends is recorded in Xero as bill with this underlying journal entry: dt #668 Wages and Salariesdt #628 General Expenses (for reimbursements)dt #672 Payroll tax expensect #200 Accounts PayableThe problem I see is it being recorded as bill into Accounts Payable with no option of using this as basis for extending it to a proper monthly payroll journal entry.
How can I change the posting date to Xero accounts?
Seamlessly map payroll data from PaySpace to the chart of accounts in Xero.
if going on to accrual will make much difference to me in practical/tax/cost perspective (I am the business end not the accounts end of the business, so short words please).
Is anyone interested in a basic product that links to brokerage accounts and imports holding information in to Xero?
We do run monthly accounts for customers as well.
This would allow me to check the costs of the project how it is made up into various parts of our accounts.
How is VAT closed off at the end of a quarter and transferred to the accounts payable
as I have tried it now on a couple of different accounts in the last half hour and still the same message.
This is my first month with you and I have wasted more time and effort asking you to fix it with zero results than working on my accounts.
All that is needed is a bulk adjustment option, could be similar to the opening stock process, excel sheet , count and enter adjustment accounts , upload , boom!
I understand you have got merging accounts on your to do list, please make it sooner than later as when we allow new users to add accounts to the chart of accounts willy nilly without recognising the gravity of their actions i believe is poor programming.
##### CLUSTER 38 #####
It's very common in the industry that someone comes in and looks at a car and wants floor mats, windshield wipers replaced, or maybe the car needs something repaired before they pick it up, like an o2 sensor, brake pads, etc.
Hello,I'm wondering how best to record an expense and I'd like some assistance.
How do we  capture deductions like every day expenses in the business.
We would like to convert an existing payable into a shareholder loan.
I'm not even sure if they should be doing something like this.
Given that I would like to have the accommodation transaction (in hypothetical example, £90) as billable expense, what would be best option here?
I would like to avoid this duplication of effort and understand better what he is telling me to do.
How do I handle purchase of services like Dropbox which I resell?
My accountant says it's possible, but I would like to try do it myself.
I've read a few different solutions on the Xero Community, most of which center around the idea in this like.
so should i do something different like include them in cost of goods sold?
I will transfer it all onto this service in the near future though as I like to keep control of the books.
I'd like to be able to track the tax liability to ensure that I'm setting aside enough tax, and also see what my bottom line profit is.
or is it okay to leave it like this?
For subscriptions like dropbox, adobe creative cloud, grammarly, evernote and pagemodo, do these go under Dues and Subscriptions or is there another category better suited for this?
Sales 2400COS  2000Profit   400How can I see the P&L Like This?
But I would like to simply see the total 'revenue' received; how much has been spent, and how much is remaining.
Seems like the logical is that my equity base is that example $15,000, is it not?
Seems like this should be possible.
What do you do with tracking assignment if a purchase or cost is split between 2 stores, like a advertising cost for example?
Can someone advise me how (in Xero) I can set up a consolidated GST tax code like I can easily in MYOB.
Is it possible to get year to date balance on the payslip like what appears in MYOB.
Can someone please please please explain it to me like I'm a child.
I would like to do this without making adjustments that actually show on my income or expense statements.
Is something like this possible?
I would like to set up a directors loan in Xero for £10k.
Also, if we try to do a purchase order for our suppliers, it is going to look like we want 6 bulk packs.
I would like to be able to see whether a contract is profitable over time.
Don't worry, this will be more than enough for any small or medium business, and will save you $360 if you like using us.
6) How do I record initial purchases like beds, towels, dishes etc.
It doesn't feel like Xero is designed for a small charity like mine at all.
I would like receipts to be created for these on a recurring schedule that I can then reimburse these as part of a monthly expense claim.
I like to keep up to date and see what is going on, but I feel my approach is a bit ad-hoc (which is ok too as there is life outside of xero!
This is like a billboard on the first page of Google highlighting the local results, giving them their own special section and allowing people to quickly see reviews, the Google+ page, the address, and call them!
Anything like that happened to any of you?
I'd like to get anyone's take, experience, etc, on what I am proposing to do.
On occasion, we will purchase a small amount of food on behalf of the club for things like, filling split orders that our members don't quite have enough orders to fill.
Like a restore or something?
Have a cafe who like most, receives mostly cash payments from customers (some eftpos & credit card) Some small expenses are paid out of the till.
So to clarify, who here is using expense claims for things like fuel, phone, internet?
It seems that where the current value of the stock on hand has significant values in decimals 3 or 4 (like 2.
Would the Xero team please print some of your own reports and see what they look like to you?
However, it is not like there are a lot of reports.
I would like a field (or fields) in the inventory database that links a given item to a supplier (or suppliers).
I would like to be able to do a general search on how much we paid a contact.
I can't be the only one who would like to create multiple identical credits.
I would like for Xero to have the ability to email a recommended subscription to a client, where we can pre-select the version/level required.
I would like to see an option where changes can be made to contacts in bulk.
com/business/discussion/11761724#answer36113173Quickbooks is linked with Taxfiler is there any scope for something like this within Xero?
As the registered Xero Admin user, I would like to be able to login as one of the other registered users for the purpose of trouble shooting their issues and to have the ability to see what they are seeing on screen.
I would like to request the development of the API feature to allow Quotes in Xero to automate with other programmes.
Would like the ability to scroll to the next, or previous, GST return in sequence.
I currently have an Excel file that I enter all my journals in and this looks like the FORMS we would fill out in the "OLD DAYS OF PAPER"  I then run a macro over this to import it into MYOB, HANDY TAX or WhateverThe Manual Template to be imported could easily be formatted to look like a Journal
When accessing Xero, I'd like to see all 7 entities that I have files for on the drop-down list.
This is not possible at the moment, but I would like to see this, customisable to what you want to see.
Can the format be changed so amounts look like 1,500.
This feature will also give Xero a competitive edge over their main competitors like Freshbooks, Quickbooks etc.
When we receive Notification of Assessments from the ATO and load the figures into WFM I'd like to create a cover letter or template that will merge into a pdf so we can forward it out to the client.
For the Summary and Terms fields on the , it would be great to have the capability of having simple rich text formatting (like bold, italic, ordered and unordered lists).
I only get export to a CSV file which is like an excel file.
It seems like Xero is so close to having this feature in place already.
I would like to see the a graph that shows Product Sales and Service Sales by day over the last 30 days so I can see my trends at a glance.
There are many occasions where we simply cannot wait for the automated feed - so we have stuck with the Yodlee feed as we can update whenever we like.
Can this is changed ASAP as I would very much like to use it.
Is Xero planning on bringing in this feature like sage one
This is because we are a serviced based business, like many other Xero users I imagine.
Please fix so it's standardized to the customers keyboard meaning only first letter of first word in a sentence, not EVERY Word Being Like This.
)I am saying let's drop development of unnecessary features like multiple contacts - gosh .
Why not have a notification flag like you do for failed uploads, but for successful ones too?
comThere's no reason anyone should have to use 3rd party software to interface with Xero for something like this.
com/toolsAs teams and businesses move into the cloud tools like Toggl are becoming increasingly important, please consider providing an integration for Toggl
Then, say you want to look at all your client notes, you can see it like a 'story' in one uncluttered feed?
34 it would go like this:Key Press   Data Shown1          12        123     12.
All jobs for clients not currently assigned to a client group could simply be listed together under something like "unassigned".
Hey AllWouldn't it be great if there was a register (much like there is for assets) to keep FBT information.
Please give this a lot of thought as it seem like I am NOT the only person requesting this type of thing.
There are however, a few fields that can’t be edited, and we’d like to get an indication of the demand for those.
I am thinking of things like rent and lease payments.
I would like to be flagged when a supplier has not responded to a purchase order within a timeframe, say 2-3 hrs, can this be done
I would like to see some more options for the conditions, in particular having an "Edited By" condition.
The ability to classify Items into Groups or Types already exists in other Inventory management systems like SAP, Unleashed etc.
One other thing that I would like improved in the Xero Files area is that the name of the folder is not totally visible - it only shows a limited number of characters which is not enough to display the full name.
I'd like to be able to view what checks were printed on any given day.
I am guessing it is something many people would like to use
Entering 30+ payments each time like this is extremely time consuming and laborious so if there is any improvement on this process would be most welcome!
Currently anyone with Standard access or above can manipulate the chart as they like.
Sometimes it doesn't recognise that an employee has worked on a Saturday or Sunday and applies the mon-fri award rate - (under paying the employee) for this reason I do not like to tick all timesheets and approve in one go so I have to click on each employee, check the rate is correct and then approve and then close and click on the next one.
I would like to see some business performance graphs that can be added to the dashboard.
I would like to be able to put the reference as a placeholder in the subject field of an email within xero.
If what you’d like isn’t on the list, you can .
I would like to see a simple To Do list in Xero, where I can list queries that I want the client to respond to or actions that I want the client to complete.
Xero prices are now LIKE A like a STOPPED CLOCK, which is ONLY RIGHT TWICE A DAY.
From the GST audit screen, I would like the transaction link to take me to a transaction I can edit the GST codes on without affecting the net transaction value.
Can we please set what notifications/messages we would like to receive.
I would like to be able to mark them as paid in the csv import (why develop the import if you can't import them with an accurate status?
The alternate code would be used by businesses whose inventory item codes are different to what their suppliers use like ours.
>>> best would be a field where users can enter any information they like such as e. g. FOB Harbor 1, FOB Harbor 2, etc.
>> best would be a field where users can enter any information they like)
It should be a core function in a service like Xero.
Maybe though if it was executed as a batch process on demand asyn in the background so I'd have to wait for notification to pull down the result - like how feed registration works - this would be perfectly fine.
It would be great if you could customize the column headings in the Contacts page so that you can view and sort your contacts by different data like the Street Address or any other data that has been filled in for the customer.
This is especially handy for those that also accept credit card payments with their phone, like Square or PayPal Here.
(like drop-down menus or something?
Would anyone else like to see this too?
The one on the right is what I would like to see.
I'd like to make a rule that when it sees it's fro Square to do a transfer from our 'Cash Exchange - Square'.
In case of users like me, who are project managers but not payroll admins, this feature will save a lot of time keeping track of approval histories and monitoring resource utilization.
Other platforms, like ZenPayroll and ADPrun, already do this.
I'd like a 'note' facility so that the timesheet approver can provide information to the payroll administrator.
From memory this was going to be planned but I can't find anything in feature requests about this - if it is planned can you please advise an approximate time frame (e. g. under a year or 1+) - we have a few clients who would like this feature in Xero.
I REALLY do not like how UNcustomisable Xero reports are.
Sorry if this doesn't make a whole lot of sense, like I said i'm new to this system and formal training is pending.
Sometimes there are things you would like to note about something to do with that contact however there is no where to put it, unless there is & I have missed it!
We have that system well established exactly how we like it and it's not going to change any time soon.
So then I contacted  (they do lots of integrations, like IFTTT) and they do NOT do Xero Quotes!
I feel like this should be easy but I can't seem to work it out.
However (and I think this is correct), I have labelled that purchase like this: http://i.
I get 2 automatic statements each day in Xero and i would like to delete them all from the beginning of this year.
We would very much like to use it also for statutory accounting as it is such a great tool.
I would like to be able to merge contacts in practice manager like we can in Xero.
I would like to do some data processing in Excel on our Profit & Loss statements for each quarter.
I'd like to see which projects are performing at any one time.
Like 19`/,90 € or something?
What I would realy like to be able to do is fully ignore or automatically void and forget about the second company.
Can you please have the option to enter a persons name, include their title, email address direct dial and mobile number and perhaps an "other" option to record info about that client (e. g. their birthday, what product the like, call history etc,…).
)However, when I go in to see what Xero is suggesting, it looks like this:Coffee -- .
Like we do with Capsule CRM?
This isn't ideal, as I like to see exactly how much there is for each individual supplier.
Is something like this possible, or is someone able to point me in a direction to get similar results?
I'd like to create a grouped Profit and Loss in one of the companies and export the layout to the other companies.
), how do I prevent these from looking like double payments and throwing out my statement balance?
"Given that I don't have any conversion balances, it sounds like it wouldn't really have any impact at all - right?
Anyone doing anything like this?
• Because I can't select any text in the overlay window showing the attached file, I can't copy and paste things like the transaction reference into the transaction.
I have a customer that is also a supplier, lets call this customer / supplier TEST, and would like to offset what I owe the supplier TEST against what the customer TEST  owes me i. e. credit the customer TEST and debit the supplier TEST.
It is likely this has been raised before, but is Xero planning to sort this out alongside things like multiple email addresses per contact?
Our Norwegian parent company is keen to also adopt Xero like our UK subsidiary.
We have some companies in Italy that would like to migrate to Xero, do you have any plan of deploying an italian localisation anytime soon?
I'm assuming that it must be a purchase that has at least a certain amount of value to it – something like a computer – or could i include small purchases such as filing cabinets or furniture?
I am switching over from Quickbooks Pro 2009, needing a web-based program and did not like Quickbooks Online.
What I would like to do is get rid of the traditional prepayments spreadsheet.
---If you'd like to request and vote on cheques to be made available in your region please start a new request in the 'feature requests' topic.
YippyBut not in Wages and Salaries, it looks like both sides of the transaction is in this section as a Debit, could you please advise on how I go about fixing this
Has anyone got employees set up like this that could give me some pointers?
Everything came over like a dream and has worked perfectly ever since.
alternatively, if you can see a flaw in my approach i would like to hear your suggestions,kind regards,
If this can't be done I would like to be able to print the time sheets so that they can be manually approved by the managers before they are authorised in the system
But it seems like i cannot do it.
I. e. they should accrue less leave in a 28 day month like Feb than in a 31 day month like Mar.
And why do items like 'Depreciation' appear on there anyway?
I would like to do it manually since we have some people who are split across nominal by various percentages.
To get you started with US Payroll:If you'd like to suggest any enhancements or new features for Payroll, please use the  and start a thread for each specific request.
Essentially like a clock in and clock out function.
This is what the P&L looks like :-Income			Sales	&#163;5,000.
It doesn't look like this is possible to setup in Xero Payroll?
Like Xero you can be up and running in minutes and use it on any device.
Do you have something like this?
Is there something like this?
Is Tradify beneficial to people like us?
What did you like or not like?
Aswell as this they would like to keep track of client leads, be able to do bulk emails and basic CRM tasks.
Ideally we would like to be able to see a city by city break down for each tour per city so that we can determine which cities are profitable.
I've been searching some of the softwares like Zapier, Pipemonk, zapstich, one saas, carry the one and can't find the info, have sent e-mail for 3 of them, waiting for an answerThanks
If you have any questions or you would like to book in a demo please contact me brett@jobsdun.
Also I would like to be able to search through faults to see what I done to repair the machine before.
Do you think Xero and Chrometa would be sufficient or it's necessary to have a full PM system like Clio as well.
I'm not looking for something like kaseya or labtech.
We'd like to use another online app that links to Xero on which we can have a budget for each project.
Do we have anything like this on offer for Australia?
Is this an app you’d like to see integrate with Xero?
Feedback can be fragmented as:- General suitability for your business (or your clients) - Any additional purchase/sale/inventory functions you would like - Any additional reports you would like
Manufacturing products in AUD, USD or RMB and selling in local currency AUD like a lot of business it seems strange Workflow doesn't integrate the multi-currency properly.
I haven't found anything like this in Xero.
Interesting to see UK boss using Twitter to have a go at BT when his support is so like theirs!
What is the process or workflow in Xero that you'd most like to learn about?
My husband, who is  a very experienced programmer, has suggested that this looks like a 'floating point' calculation is being used in the background, rather than a 'decimal' calculation.
How do make it "look like $2000" so you can reconcile your checks against your deposit.
What I'd really like to see is the Roadmap!
##### CLUSTER 39 #####
TIA's for any tips or clues.
Any tips or ideas on how to fix this?
Any comments, hints, tips etc would be most welcome.
Any tips?
What tips do you have for non-profits?
Any tips on fixing this please?
Any tips?
Any tips how to get the right currency show up in the options?
Any tips - as this is obviously quite urgent?
Can anyone give me some tips on what I should do about this?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
etc)Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips/tricks/short cuts/ideas?
Any tips on what I'm looking at and how to break through or in?
Any tips, ideas?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Looking forward to any tips you might have?
Any tips or tricks (using payroll deductions maybe? )
Any tips or suggestions?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
Any tips?
However, I would be grateful for any tips as to how to achieve this by perhaps cobbling together some complementary platforms.
Any tips?
What tips and tricks or features do you love and why?
##### CLUSTER 40 #####
When viewing the invoice, I can see no mention of a payment near the total, this is what it says:Subtotal 240.
So one customer receives a weekly invoice from us and we receive a weekly payment from them.
The IRD is clear with the GST guidelines that the time of supply is the earlier of:  1. 	 the time an invoice is issued by the supplier or the recipient in respect of that supply; or   2. 	 the time any payment is received by the supplier in respect of that supply.
So my question is - How do I reconcile the $1400 payment against the $2000 invoice?
Can I record the payment on the invoice and assign it to 980 - drawings?
If so how do I record the invoice from my supplier for the first quarter payment and then for future months after?
How do I mark an invoice that has been payed in a multiple payment of 6 cheques and then subsequently bounces as unpaid ?
later when I try to reconcile this invoice as a cash payment, I can't seem to do it.
Once client make the payment how can i update the invoice status as "paid" through coding.
Also, I have a customer that paid their invoice twice, so I refunded them the second payment - how do I reconcile that deposit and debit?
I want to be able to show suppliers that I have used a credit note and to which invoice I have applied that too when I do a batch payment.
How do I enter payment received from customer  the amount  of which is reduced by his fee, hence less than invoice amount
Once their workshop is complete the Order is converted to an Invoice which I send out for final payment.
Please set up the "receive payment" on the invoice screen to accept additional rows.
in the building industry in order for our invoice to meet the legal requirements to be able to ensure payment we need the heading to be 'Invoice and Payment Claim' or 'Invoice / Payment Claim'.
InvoiceID=", at the bottom there is a dialogue for receiving a payment against the invoice.
When your clients click on the link with the invoice(s) you send, they can quickly see what they owe you, and their payment history with your business.
There is no payment on the Invoice, only one Credit Note.
How can I (a) reconcile the payment of $3993 against the $3600 invoice  (b) How can I capture the $363 direct payment I have made to their account to reimburse them, then reconcile that against the invoice so that it clearly shows they have cleared the debt of $3600 via the $3393 payment and my $363 credit?
How do you reconcile multiple statement lines to an invoice when you have already put in the payment date?
However when I go to the invoice and click on the payment it is clearly there with the correct reference?
I can't find any setting on the invoice or payment service to change this.
90 spent on my statement line - the original payment to TW▪	in find & match an invoice of &#163;298.
##### CLUSTER 41 #####
Do I do a credit note and allocate both in and out transactions that way?
What is the best way to record this, ideally to represent it as a series of transactions relating to one event.
Can anyone think of a way to work out which transactions will have been included and which have been posted since?
Is there a way I can search for all transactions relating to en employees name for the last 12 months?
What is the best way to apportion costs  on both past transactions & moving forward.
There is one way I can think of doing this - manually create the CSV file to upload the transactions in/out.
Is there a way to re-import the transactions dated April 19?
Is there a way to edit the incorrect transactions to change them from credits to debits?
Is there a way to delete the incorrect transactions and manually import the transactions using a CSV file import?
What is the correct way to record these transactions that have occurred?
Is there any way of finding out which transactions make up this unfiled amount?
What is the best way to enter transactions that were paid with personal money?
Can anyone advise of any easy way to records these transactions.
Can anyone suggest a more efficient way to process these transactions?
My question is -  what's the easiest way to search for these transactions by contact name?
Is there a way I can allow him to post his visa transactions?
Can anyone suggest a more efficient way to process these transactions?
That way I can effectively provide the client a list of transactions he still needs to find and upload the receipt/bill for.
Is there a way to undo the previous reconcile, leaving the transactions there, so that I can reconcile the whole lot again afterwards?
Is there a way I can list all transactions during that period and then change them from GST Inc. To GST Ex.
What is the best way to reconcile transactions for purchases made for the second company?
Is there a way I can associate/reconcile the two seperate transactions?
Is there any way I can import the transactions from the old banking software?
I have 2 1/2 months of transactions to enter and reconcile so can anyone advise what is the best way to do this?
Is there a way to categorize multiple transactions at the same time?
For example, is there a way for me to click on "Owner's Draw" or "Travel Expenses" and see all the transactions, activities, etc.
You have told us the only way to close this off is for you to delete the transactions.
##### CLUSTER 42 #####
Can I simply take the invoices from the payment service provider and create an expense claim with them?
I can retrieve all the invoices that belong to that payment though.
So my question is in my payrun the tax elements are creating invoices awaiting payment, how can i clear these down every month ?
Also for construction industry this works well as we often have progress payments so I can easily see the invoices for each stage being passed on to the client for a progress payment.
As this has been a repeated request in our company, it would be great to have a a similar future so that we can email invoices as receipt or more clear proof of payment.
E. g. One payment of &#163;1000 paying 50 invoices shows as 50 lines not one amount paid?
I am after some advice on reconciliation of multiple invoices with one being a part payment.
The customer than made payment in full for both invoices to one of the company.
I am having an issue with our payment terms for our customers Invoices.
We have over 600 customer and a good percentage of them are invoiced 2 or 3 times a month, and make payments for these invoices in one payment.
Where has this payment gone, and how can I reinstate it so I can allocate it against the correct invoices?
##### CLUSTER 43 #####
I'll try to break down what I am saying below in the best way I know how.
Is there any way to extend the number of tracking options (not tracking codes as i know there are only two) to more than 100?
I've been having difficulty determining the best way to tackle this type of income and being able to distribute it correctly (The section what to know how much they ahve spent and what they have left).
I want to know if there is a way to create basic, summarised quotes.
I want to know what's the best way to record it.
I know what is required, however,  I want to be sure I handle it in the best possible way.
I know how to do a normal asset purchase, record and depreciate the asset but not sure the best way to do this.
If  you don't know where it is, you assume that there is no way to customise the reports.
I know that its going to be owner contribution either way but I'm not sure what the difference is?
Please let me know if there is another way I can do this.
Is there any way to mark these goods off of the PO so i know exactly how many I have remaining on the order?
If there is an easy way to check if feeds are available, please let me know.
I dont know if this is a feature request or a question but is there any way to amend, other than the two drop downs, what access the users have?
Please let me know the best, cleanest, most lightweight way to do this.
##### CLUSTER 44 #####
I just figured before I spend a good chunk of money on a Xero certified accountant, I'd try to do as much research and leg work as possible.
should I just leave Xero altogether, who is with me?
How should I deal with a supplier who has just been bought by another company in Xero?
How can I set this up in Xero so that just at a click we can see all the debtors in each batch?
I'm sure this is a very basic query, but I just can't figure out how to update Xero correctly for the following transaction.
My business is new to Xero, just started using 4 months ago.
I'm just confused how I reconcile those amounts when they come through in Xero?
Just started using Xero about 3 months ago and wanted to offer feedback on a few accounting features that our users here in our small office feel could use some enhancements.
Oh and just in case it makes any difference, we didn't start using Xero til 2014.
Just started with Xero, hopefully this question is an easy one?
Normally you can just run a cash P&L, but Xero doesn't seem to have one.
I have entered the receipts into xero under expenses and just figured out that there is also Purchases.
Just a quick scan, I saw Xero offers different pricing plans in different countries (AU, US, Global, NZ, etc. )
My hubby has just started his own business and I am in the process of setting up Xero.
I just wonder if it is feasible to connect the database (LibreOffice Base with MySQL) with Xero via ODBC or JDBC.
Hey it would be wicked if Xero could push out a notification to a contact's owner that they have just surpassed a lifetime revenue milestone (say $10K).
I have to dig deep in reports and exporting to excel get meaningful sales data out of Xero that should just be charted out on the dashboard for us.
Just saw there is a Xero apple watch app available.
Anyone figured out how to do this without just downloading from multiple sources within Xero?
If you just delete the statement line it is still there so Xero pulls through the date from the transaction that has been deleted!
Just the ability for a FA to post a note that any other FA in that Xero org can see.
I had already done it in Excel so this was just an exercise in seeing how Xero went.
Please note, I'm not saying Xero doesn't show the necessary info on the purchase order, just that better design would drastically reduce these human errors from occurring.
Newbie question - we are an accounting firm just starting out on Xero.
Really frustrating that you cannot speak to anyone at xero to just see if there are any known problems.
Just started a series of articles looking at favorites reports in Xero.
Just wondering where I can view a list of all upcoming webinars Xero is hosting so I can book them in?
Just thought i would share this quirk in Xero reporting as it caught me off guard.
Just wondering how do i set up an apprentice correctly in payroll for wages, that will show the correct award which i have retrieved from fair-work instead of the ones showing in XERO.
I have just set up a new payroll system in Xero.
They currently use attache and want to change to Xero if I can just figure out how to do this!
I have just setup for running my first payroll in Xero.
THerefore instead of just November for 2 employees there is also a debt from the employee I brought into Xero going back to April.
Just setting some one man bands up on Xero Payroll - typical owner managed businesses where monthly salary is either GBP671 or GBP883 etc etc.
We have just started in Xero payroll.
Just wondering how Xero calculates the annual salary.
I'm just wondering what the best structure for my Xero files would be to reconcile and code payments made via Afterpay?
However trial is just in NZ initially and I am struggling to link to Xero, anyone any clues?
Normally in Xero I would either just reconcile as a transfer or for cash back, record it as Other Income.
Xero is just so inflexible.
I just started using ZenPayroll for a client I have on Xero.
So just some thoughts for the developers out there in Xero land, please don't forget the hard working little guys.
Just a very annoying feature of Xero but something I would of thought was obvious from an accounting point of view.
I just wanted to say how awesome the quoting is in xero!
##### CLUSTER 45 #####
I want WIP in XPM to have an automatic link to ledger, much in the same way as Accounts Receivable is always "live" in Ledger.
I can't get me head round the best way to resolve this his accounts are in a rather big mess.
I was wondering if there's a way to categorize Expense accounts so that I can separate them into Deductible and Non-deductible categories.
Is there any way of seeing if my advisor has checked my accounts?
That way a user can immediately find out how much inventory is on hand for any and all the items for which they created an inventory accounts.
Is there a way to merge two accounts into one?
Please put this back to the way it was and use "accounts receivable" and "accounts payable"!
Is there any way to export all unarchived accounts, so that the format is consistent every time I export?
(As there is not cost center/job center function at this moment, so i make them in this way,  #10000HK & #10000US for HK expenses & US expenses respectively) I was thinking i could customize the profit and loss & balance sheet into two sets of layouts by deletion of unrelated accounts in each layout.
Is there an easy way to update the previous 6 months worth to go to the correct new income accounts?
Is there a simple way to put this right, so all accounts, including Paypal can be reconciled.
Is there a way to do it in the charter of accounts?
Is there a way to separate wages to different expense accounts?
I'm surprised there is no way of having different payroll cost allocations in the chart of accounts.
##### CLUSTER 46 #####
hi everyoneI am a bit of confused with provision for GST account.
Hi, can anyone advise on how to account for gifts under the new Trivial Benefits legislation in the UK Here:https://www.
Hi, I'm unable to figure out how to account for Government Fees- dont see any expense ledger for that.
Hi all,How can we account for payments made to us from Amazon?
Hi there, can someone give me the neatest set up for this: I have some very minor cash income to record - the majority comes direct to my account by transfer.
Hi,Am a newbie so please be patient with me :)A few things-When adding inventory into the system - which account should I be putting this to?
Hi Everyone, How to proceed for the below: - Expense in USD paid from owner personal account in EUR knowing that the company based currency is USD?
Hi How can i view/see all attached files in any of account/transaction in a single window.
Hi all, I am currently preparing EOFY reports and note that in my Contractor payments account, there are a few descriptions that do are not "uniform".
Hi all,I've recently taken on the finance role for a company and have discovered that the wages payable account has had a steadily increasing balance for the last 12 months.
Hi,Can you advise if it's possible for an employee who had decided she wants to contribute more into her Super account for salaries that had already been paid to her?
Hi allAny update on being able to do costing by account rather than by tracking?
##### CLUSTER 47 #####
I am with xero since 2011.  what they are asking is pulling out all bank statement from 2011 to find the fault my self.
My bank statements continue to come in  and I cannot do anything with them, Xero is becoming fast redundant.
Our bank feeds have recently been connected in Xero.
Since a few days ago my BofA bank feed keeps failing in Xero.
How do I reconcile money paid to bank in order to clear bank overdraft in xero
How do the services that integrate with Xero compare to setting up Merchant Services through my bank?
I also have PayPal as a bank feed in Xero.
Can we set up in Xero Using the CRT Co-Op bank feeds form
How do I reconcile 2 bank lines that match one transaction in Xero (money received entry).
When reconciling one bank line, say £40 of coins receipts, it will not match the receipt in Xero as the two or more receipts in Xero match the total bank receipts (plus notes and maybe cheques, recorded on separate lines in the bank statement).
Xero support advised that: "You can't reconcile a bank statement line to a manual journal.
I keep track of cash transaction in a spreadsheet and import it into Xero as one would do from an electronic bank statement.
Is anyone having success with a business debit card that works with Xero bank feeds?
Can anyone recommend a US bank that integrates well with Xero?
In the most of the cases at the end of the bank description are the important details and more specific one that can be used for creatin rules to automatize more in Xero.
When is Xero doing bank feeds for AMEX NZ credit cards
1) Xero should AUTOMATICALLY suggest inter bank transfer in cash codding.
I can't use the 'get bank feeds' because I can't then force Xero to import the Country as the Reference - would be awesome if we could manually select how the paypal statements are imported.
Dear Xero Team,Please enable bank feeds for G & C Mutual Bank in Australia, formerly known as SGE Credit Union.
Ae there any plans within Xero development to restrict access to bank details that can be entered on contact records?
com/au/#BankAccounts_Details_Reconciliation$BK_AutoSuggest  It seems that they have a few instances where what Xero is prompting them is incorrect and they are clicking "OK" because it appears (to them) similar to a Bank Rule.
Could you please consider creating a Bank Feeds console for Xero Partners to track and monitor the progress of bank feeds across the client base?
Can anyone explain please why I have suddenly received a pop-up message (mid-month) telling me I have successfully reconciled the bank with Xero (which actually I haven't anyway).
Can someone tell me how to with to my new bank in Xero?
Also, the bank balance is ALWAYS completely wrong - I wonder if this is because we didn't/can't enter a starting balance from when we switch to Xero.
00 CR - transaction recorded on bank statement line, as imported into Xero for recon (incorrect)ACTUAL TRANSACTION RECON:590.
How do I reconcile this as the bank statement obviously only has 1 entry but it needs to go against 2 separate Xero entries
How should bank loan instalments be handled in Xero?
Handle each bank loan instalment as a manual transfer in Xero.
I can see that Receipt bank has a  'paid' flag but it doesn't seem to have any effect in Xero.
Basically it's this (as an example not real numbers):In Bank have $5,000In Xero shows Bank as having $12.
I'd be interested how many Xero users get any value from the bank a/c charts in the format they are.
How do we enter this into Xero and reconcile it with the bank transaction?
How do I put it into xero, as obviously the transaction isn't going to appear in the bank statement feed so it can be reconciled?
HiWe are running our first payrun on Xero that covers a bank holiday.
From what I can see bank payments for employee net wages are now posted to the net wages control, and when I have tried to drill into the payroll entries, Xero has crashed.
The payments are showing on my bank statement lines but there is nothing to reconcile these against in Xero, no suggestions are coming up.
Look if my bank or whatever has data fields that do not directly correspond to the fields available in XERO.
And are there any plans within Xero development to restrict access to bank details that can be entered on contact records?
##### CLUSTER 48 #####
It's generally accepted that most accounts payable transactions would be categorized as operating activities in the Statement of Cash Flows.
How do I record these transactions to my business accounts and still be able to track the income in the Client Contact information, etc?
When I look at the Accounts Payable transactions, I find that there is a credit of £1,100 for a bill that was voided.
How do we show these transactions in our accounts?
I can go to the chart of accounts and see the values there, write them down, then do new "Spend Money" transactions where I re-type the values from the monthly liabilities manually.
##### CLUSTER 49 #####
However, we want to track the debt in our account receivable or somewhere we can track it the same way.
What is the best way to account for what is essentially an 18 month interest free $9000 loan from the credit card?
Is there a quick way of selecting several receipts (purchases) at once and changing the account they have been posted to?
Is there a way of attributing the payments directly to the account?
Is there a way of changing the account to credit card?
Is there a certain way I should record a Withdrawl into my personal account so that at the end of the year it is still classed as profit and not an expnse?
The only way I have found is to click each transaction to be able to view the account used.
I have all of my inventory in the inventory account and I'm not keen on messing things up in the G/L without understanding the correct way of doing this.
Is there a way to get the account back?
Is there a way to transfer the transaction from one account to another?
Is there a way to change the account type?
If I receive a bill that is payable, and create a bill in Money Going Out, what is the best way to account for it using the software?
What would be the best way to account for it - appreciate your thoughts here.
Is there a way to use the API to copy the ACCOUNT field (from COA) to the description field in a transaction line?
Is there a way to simply credit the sales tax account to zero it out?
Is there an easy way to transfer to the stock account once all expenses are received?
Is there a way to change that in bulk to the correct expense account?
Is there any way to see what expense account the matched Spend Money was coded against?
What is the most efficient way to account for this?
Is there any way we can sort by account number PLEASE!
Is there a way to produce an Income Statement that is not in alphabetical order but in account number instead?
I see no way to receive or spend money from this account; it is a Current Asset.
Is there a way for the account transaction page to register the bill that has been reconciled with that transaction has an attachment?
Is  there a way of using the Payee names to recall the last account code used.
If I were to sell this business to my partner is there a way I could break off that subscription into its new own account somewhere down the road?
Is there no way to select them all and assign them to the same account code?
##### CLUSTER 50 #####
How do I treat the bank charges and GST transactions?
Payments are mainly received through credit and debit card transactions as well as bank deposits.
fyi, compare this to bank credit cards - they are required to send you a nil transaction statement with nil balance for the month if you have had no transactions on your credit card.
I love Bank Rec Discuss - useful for raising queries to do with unreconciled transactions, but limited to unreconciled bank transactions.
Paypal is set up as a bank feed and imports 30-60 transactions a day ( >100/day by summer).
A $100 debit (cash withdrawal) and a $100 credit (the bank's reversal of that transaction at the same time)How do I match these transactions?
I've setup our feed from bank of ireland, however it isnt downloading any transactions, is anyone else having this problem?
##### CLUSTER 51 #####
Hi hopefully somebody will have an answer, i am struggling reconciling my bank statement lines that are "cash paid into atm".
Hi I attempted to reconcile some cash payments with a large amount I deposited into the bank.
Hi,is anyone else having problems with AU bank and Visa Card feeds?
Hi,Has anyone setup a Coles MasterCard to receive automatic bank feeds?
Hi - is anyone doing bank reconciliation of their iZettle card payments?
Hi there,Has anyone used any alternatives to receipt bank?
Hi there,Have anyone encountered this before that American Express's bank feeds are being imported more than once.
##### CLUSTER 52 #####
The calculation made on the VAT Return does not appear to include the interim payment.
Please note that I calculate the amount paid by debit/credit card based on the email order notifications my system creates, not based on the PayPal download which does not identify which small business the debit/credit card payment originates from.
For example I might want to note that that customer does not get credit terms or I might want to note a specific suppliers payment terms where they differ from ours - rather than trawling through the small pale notes section at the bottom, being able to pin a highlighted note would be really helpful.
Payroll produces payable journals, but does not produce individual "bills" for payment of each person's salary, or other payments.
You are correct in saying that the IRD amount would not be due to the IRD in the August period (as this is based on payment date) but this does not affect that there is a liability.
##### CLUSTER 53 #####
I just started a new business and have already contributed quite a bit of my own money for new product design and legal fees using either a personal credit card that I paid off using my personal money or my personal checking account.
I am just wondering how I account for these transaction, and the monthly payments including interest to the finance company going forward?
Do I just invent a new account?
Will you charge me for each company or you just charge one online account?
Why can i not just allocate to an account with out every transaction being a customer !
It would be great to have the assign expense just as another field next to the Account field or something so I can just tab through and then approve.
The ability to change, on the fly (without clicking into each transaction, or requiring a page load) to edit the category (account) and notes, individually where a field appears or a drop down, and you can search for that transaction (just as you enter in a receipt – type in a search to change category).
This prompted our customer in thinking that their amount was overdue which was not the case, just a summary of her account.
can't just use Everyone without having created a least one group) and can select the account code paid from and then specify the box the amount should go into on the 1099.
Instead of falsely stating that an error has occurred, which could prompt one to try and rectify, just the suggestion to please choose an account, would be sufficient.
Hello, I just managed to set my Coop Business account as auto feed, which is great.
Alternatively I can just create a new COA Account and assign to it, but want to check before committing.
##### CLUSTER 54 #####
I have picked up all these transactions and have created invoices for them but not sure what to do after this .
How do I reconcile the two outgoing transactions together so that the total of the payments matches the total of the invoices?
There is currently a subscription gapI am constantly coming across people who issue sales invoices, no payroll and a couple of hundred transactions a month.
When you are depositing cheques together can you select the related invoices and get a total amount showing, then archive the transactions.
When going into recent invoices or bills reports in contacts, the whole list of the contacts transactions come up and can take quite a while to load.
I have found a lot of information about splitting payments when attached to invoices, and have done this for other transactions, but in this scenario I can't work it out.
2) When orders are sync'ed do they appear as Receive Money transactions or are we forced to create invoices for them?
##### CLUSTER 55 #####
I started by creating an 'Employee Loan Account' in the Chart of Accounts, listed under Current Assets.
I was looking for one account, such as Shareholder Advances or something similar, but I found those two accounts 880 and 881.
We have included two account ranges in the chart of accounts so that the income and expenses can be recorded separately.
What account type should I make under the chart of accounts for this?
* Am I right to assume that the 2nd account for their clients will be a coded in chart of accounts as liability.
In the chart of accounts I setup an account called ABC Liability and made it a current liability.
There are figures in here which can be seen if you look at the Trial Balance or the Account on the Chart of Accounts.
Should I create a Liability account under "Chart of Accounts" ?
Do I create an account in chart of accounts called 'Stock'?
If I pass credit not to this accounts payable how I am going to reconcile the creditors control account with the accounts payables ledger accountsWhat can the options be?
Is there a difference between the "Owner Capital In/Out" account and the drawings/funds introduced accounts?
Why would some of my purchases go into the Accounts Payable system account and not others?
Or delete the petty cash account in the chart of accounts?
Is it possible to allocate an overpayment from one central account across multiple accounts?
I find myself exporting balance sheet accounts that have gone awry into excel so I can pinpoint where the account went off the tracks.
In the chart of accounts area - when you Edit Account Details.
The setting for this could be in the chart of accounts edit account.
You can map accounts to box 4, but you can only select an expense account even though withholdings are not an expense.
How can I account for this within the chart of accounts etc.
I can also allocate any difference to an account in the chart of accounts to accommodate reporting on the amount of money that "vanishes" due to credit card processing fees.
##### CLUSTER 56 #####
That way the company can just reimburse me as part of payroll.
By way of background, I own a property company (just a single asset) with no employees other than my wife and I who are both unpaid directors.
Is there some way I can set a rule to just ignore it or how is this handled?
I was just wondering what would be the best way to deal with these bills.
Would I just do this using the 'receive money' function or some other way?
00 on the same day, again I have reconciled one and the other is left un-reconciledIs there a way I can just delete these entries?
Do I just delete the extra ones, or is there a better way to import?
All results just show the total in GBP (or base currency) is there a way to change this?
I have an employee whose personal/carers leave is way out of balance and no matter what I change it seems to just stay the same number.
Is there a way to generate an ABA file with just the excluded employee for that payrun.
Just wondering what the best way to set this up is.
I can't create a manual payrun that far back, is there any way to just get it back?
Is there a way to just make it show as one line or to get details of the leave dates added?
Is there any way to fix this or should I just not be using payroll for W/T contractors?
##### CLUSTER 57 #####
Sometimes this was handled via a control account set up as a bank account and sometimes not.
I have seen than there are two main options for a loan account: setting up a 'bank' account, or setting up a liability account.
Is this a whole new bank account I have to create as a fake account?
Every week or so I withdraw the money that has built up in my Paypal account into my bank account.
00 each month by bank account The thing is why Balance Sheet Income Tax Account is still $7500 even I have processed 10 month @$250.
He has business bank account which is crossed over at times for personal expenses, I have created an expense account called 'Personal' where I put these but this doesn't seem right, is there anywhere I should post these personal expenses to?
Can anyone tell me how to fill in the bank account details to create the petty cash account.
I can enter them as a spend money through the bank reconciliation and code as an overpayment on the supplier's account, showing the account with a credit balance.
How do we account for interest we receive on our bank account?
Should 'Undeposited funds’ asset account from QB actually be closed and reopened as a bank account?
##### CLUSTER 58 #####
Is there a way to email current invoices with the statement without having to select all invoices manually and emailing separate?
Is there a way to create non item based invoices?
If not, what is the best way to create non-item based invoices.
Is there a way I can kill off these old invoices but retain the correct numbers?
Is there any way to extend the 'Reference' tab in the Repeating Invoices section to show the full reference?
This way we can track what our future receivables income is rather than using monthly recurring invoices and we can easily see when they are due to renew.
I've been wondering whether anyone knew of a way to save a template for complicated invoices?
What is the best way to clear unpaid invoices and track the losses/debts ?
Is there any way of converting these to invoices?
Anyways, there is no way to mark invoices which she has already printed out.
Is there any way to mark them in the same fashion as is done with outgoing invoices?
Is there a way to keep track that these invoices have been paid, without having them be included in the BAS?
Is there a way to sort out this mistake or do I have to delete everything and re enter hundreds of invoices in the correct category?
I am not even sure how many invoices and past due invoices are affected this way.
I am having a hard time figuring out how to make the invoices the way I want them with all the details I want on them.
Instead of typing up the 200+ invoices, is there a way I can do some form of journal transfer and reconcile all of the amounts to that?
Is there a way of setting our defaults so that users are forced to put VAT inclusive figures in on the Purchase orders and invoices.
There should be a way to submit / edit the amounts being invoiced & leave the rest of that quote in either 'draft' invoices or a work in progress option.
Is there any way this can be changed as they are not relevant at the moment, I can chase those invoices in next months run.
Is there a way to condense multiple separate draft invoices?
It doesn't seem right to create invoices for these, so I'm wondering if there is a different way of accounting for these?
Is there a way or should I create separate invoices in order to match the payments.
Is there a way for the "Due Date" to not show on the sales invoices?
Or else some way of sending the invoices and statements to Outlook?
##### CLUSTER 59 #####
What I have to do is to delete these transactions in Xero and input these transfers manually.
How do I ensure these transactions are not seen by Xero as income and included in the total reporting of income?
Now, I can't reconciliate these transactions, because they shouldn't be in Xero at all.
For example transactions that came in on 31st May in Paypal would show up in Xero dated 1st June, but imported from 31st may if that makes sense.
In the end I figured out how to manually import the day's transactions so everything is no in Xero.
Now I have 4 seperate transactions in Xero.
How can I record these transactions in Xero.
What do I put on the three boxes on the right (when matching transactions in Xero)?
Please can someone tell me how to reflect these transactions in Xero?
- There are no duplicated statement lines - There are no unexplained transactions - and please note the big one being: The balance in Xero MATCHES that of the "Statement Balance" line.
Can I automate transactions in postalmate to Xero?
Is there a mechanism for Xero to allow us to mark transactions are 'out of scope'?
How do we not these part payments in Xero without creating unnecessary transactions?
We Import the afterPay transactions into Xero for reconciliation however I'm not sure how to handle the fees that are charged with each transaction.
But how do I create the transactions in Xero that reflect the payments to me?
uk/government/collections/exchange-rates-for-customs-and-vatPlease can you support this asap as its a real pain to unravel the foreign transactions in Xero VAT and reapply them with the correct HMRC exchange rates.
Problem is, there's no data feed to get this figure (or related transactions) into Xero.
likewise, when transactions are coded into Xero, it is often a simple mistake that the transaction is not coded to an entity or defaults to something else.
I do realize Xero has a mechanism for employees to enter their receipts and tie them to credit card transactions, but that's not what I'm asking.
However - how do I record the transactions in Xero?
How do you search for duplicate transactions in a Xero file?
then match with your transactions in Xero") what am I actually doing here?
Where transactions are auto-imported via third party addons this may be the first time the transaction has been touched in Xero and this functionality would allow a quick visual check that the tax rate is correct on the original bill.
how do i show that i have had a fee on certain transactions in Xero?
Also when transactions are voided in workshop software, xero is not synced to void them also.
com/document/xero/I don't see any option to import past transactions.
I have a vested interest in getting this fixed as I use Amex and I do not want missing transactions in Xero now or in the future.
##### CLUSTER 60 #####
Is there a way to show my bank running balances on the dashboard?
Is there a way to reconcile with a bank statement as well?
I think the simplest way is to create a one penny transaction in my director's loan bank a/c and match it, and I can't imagine anyone will care, but is there a correcter (! )
In this case, what is the best way to do the bank reconciliation?
The way Bank of Ireland online works is that there is a general admin login (2 people required to login to this) then there are individual logins.
Is there a way to merge the two or apply that bank transaction to it?
And seems that I can't find a way to disconnect the bank feeds on my internet banking page as well.
That worked out great, but is there any way to transfer the Bank Feeds from the old stuffed subscription to the new one?
Is there any smart way to do bank reconciliation?
Or is there a proper way of zeroing out this transaction that was reversed by the bank so that it doesn't hit any Acct?
##### CLUSTER 61 #####
HiDoes anyone know how to show and then re-order the layout of the balance sheet by account code rather than alphabetically.
Here is the question: if I sell widget A out of my "Unallocated Inventory" account for $2 and I know my COGS is $1 then I'd love to easily record a $1 COGS charge when I sell that item even though it is untracked.
Good evening all,Would anyone know how to change the linked accumulated depreciation account on the fixed asset register?
I bought items on my account for my girlfriend, she has paid me for them but I don't know what to do now.
I've read on the forum that I can set up the drawings account and use that to keep track, however I don't know how to split the petrol bill from an accounting perspective.
Well, I actually know why they are not - it is becuase the PAYE payable account is setup by default as a current liability, rather than cost of sales or operating expenses.
##### CLUSTER 62 #####
orB: Transfer what I need to a personal account and set it off against the director's loan?
Once I have accounted for the Goodwill in the business purchase price there is little more accounting I need to do, other than account for it is it is impaired.
Do i need to set up a liability account "Deposits Received" (BAS Excluded)?
Some of the main issues floating in my mind are:1) Do I need to set up an account for each online cusomer?
The reason being is I need to do our BAS but there is a lot of money in our account which is essentially not ours.
Is this correct - I need to enter a totally new account or am I missing something?
Do i need to set up a liability account "Deposits Received" (BAS Excluded)?
On each transaction or account, we need to clearly see a counter with the transaction limit and the date when the limit resets so we can better plan.
Luckily we don't need to worry about tax, but we do still need to account for this properly internally.
To use your app as a selling tool you need account information so any outstanding $$ can be discussed.
And finally there is a need to be able to match off the debit with the credits within the prepayment account.
com but no response yet, to be fair it's only been 6 hours but if everything is cloud based and you can't access your account you need a phone number or a quick response, bit of a pain tbh.
##### CLUSTER 63 #####
Hi,Just wondering what other firms do with signed tax documents, ITR/Bas etc, once they are signed and saved to a secure electronic storage area.
Hi,I have a client who sells antiques and secondhand goods and has just registered for VAT on the margin scheme.
Hi,I've just come across something unexpected and wondered if anyone had any ideas.
Hi All,Just having trouble in terms for presentation of the income tax expense.
Hi,I am just wondering what the best practice to do in with my given scenario.
Hi there, I am a small business with just myself as an employee and another casual.
Hi just wondering if anybody has tested the above and would love some feedback.
Hi,I'm just looking at the Tradify App and what i've seen so far i'm impressed.
Hi, am having issues as cant log in this morning, just keeps looping ?
##### CLUSTER 64 #####
Hi Guys Can you please add a button  for clients closed date in the contact details?
Hi All,How can i add up the cost of the duties and the shipping paid to the cost of product.
Hi, Is it possible to add a box for "Federal Tax Classification" for each vendor?
Hi,Please could you add functionality on the mobile app a couple of things: 1.
Hi,Can you add Digita to the list of CSV exports available under Advisor/Export ?
Hi,It currently appears there is no option for employees to add notes to a timesheet.
Hi,How do we add a superannuation fund?
Hi, How can we add the Reimbursement field into the My Payroll where the Employee can access this.
Hi Everyone, Has anyone seen / heard of any Add ons that would be suitable for an electrician?
Hi Is there any add ons that send automatic email reminders to clients?
Hi All,I am looking for an add-on for one of my clients.
Hi, I'm looking for an add on that would be suitable for a small Catering business, has anyone worked with any?
##### CLUSTER 65 #####
We can't prepare batch payment from Spend Money for loading an aba file to the bank.
How do i record advance payment for future expenses and still able to reconcile my bank statement?
How would I post and reconcile the repayments, considering these will be within the total wages payment on my bank feed?
So, what I THOUGHT i did was when a test transaction (refunded from client) comes in to the bank feed, I make a 'receive payment' and reconcile it.
Petty cash - can be messy, not sure how bank recon deals with presenting a receipt and payment to match to a receipt.
##### CLUSTER 66 #####
What can I do to pay the outstanding billing and get it back online, as the subscriber also mentioned he cannot transfer the account over to us until the outstanding bills are paid.
What I want to do is "pay" the bill using the "Owner Contribution" equity account.
Obviously, I pay the whole bill to Spark, but how do I account for the half-half split?
I have to account for VAT on what is unearned revenue when they pay in full for the course at the point of registering and then if it doesn't happen I will reclaim the VAT paid over at the point of refund.
Do I have to pay GST on all funds in our account or only what is considered our actual cash-flow?
At this stage I'm putting them through as receipts in Expense Claims and was going to approve and then pay them with the account #970 (Equity) or #881 (Liability).
Or would it be better to pay all of these with a business account, then work out at the end of the financial year what percentage were business related and what weren't?
Then as soon as there is some 'spare' money in the account, I (part) pay some of the expense claim.
I will then use the business cash account to pay for some business expenses.
if I use business transaction account revenue to pay business credit card, how should I code the transfers?
##### CLUSTER 67 #####
I'm not even sure if it makes any difference in the end as I am new to Xero and don't know exactly how it works and how VAT owed is calculated.
And how do I let Xero know it's neither?
What I don't know however is which journal entries to post in Xero so that this shows up on the return.
Please Xero can you let me know when this is going to happen?
As far as I know  it is not possible to enter it in Xero.
I know you have been getting lots of requests for Job Costing in Xero.
I don't know about anyone else but in my opinion there are HEAPS of things that Xero can do to improve.
I now know that is the term used by Xero.
I know in Sage, there is the option to set where your documents start numbering from - I havent managed to find this in Xero.
That's how you lose trust in a company :/Please Xero, allow Authy, Lastpass and other 2FA options, as you are currently offering the worst solution out there, and we know you can do better.
I do not know whether Xero is ready for Ireland Payroll or not.
If anyone knows of any other programs that work with Xero to do please let me know.
It seems to be saying it is an 'internal systems error' but I don't know whether that is an HMRC issue or Xero!
I have been advised by Xero payroll to contact HMRC and send them the XML files as proof of what we owe, which as most of you know is a near-futile exercise.
I want to know if I can change the setting to make xero calculate the alternative holiday so I don't have to type in hours every-time when staff worked on public holiday. "
They currently use Jira to manage projects - do you know of any addons to transfer timesheets from Jira to Xero.
In my book 11 > 6 but hey, Xero always know best.
This is ridiculous, surely you Xero would know how to direct customers how to use YOUR PRODUCT.
##### CLUSTER 68 #####
Dear Xero we know quite a few businesses uses in Xero in Africa.
They haven't done any GST on Xero they did it Manually for they didn't know Xero could do it for them.
The general consensus from my clients is that it reflects poorly on Xero, I know that it is a Barclaycard/Yodlee issue - but they genuinely see it as a Xero issue (that is the reality from their perspective).
I know you'll say it's because of deliverability, but with a small amount of work on your side, we could set our own domain name up in Xero and configure our SPF records to allow Xero's servers to send mail from our domain.
But now that we are on this platform, how do we know which other organizations are Xero users (capable of a Xero to Xero connection)?
So now a Treasurer at the community group can do a great job without needing to know Xero in depth, or allow the auditing process to still take place in Xero even if they are working in that space.
I understand Xero will only alter this if there are enough votes so please can others with the same problem let Xero know.
##### CLUSTER 69 #####
Hi, can you advise what code should I reconcile the following payment.
Hi,Any body knows how to record a payment via credit card against any bill.
Hi ThereJust wondering if there's a functionality to access an employees prior year Payment summary?
Hi all,I am in the process of completing our PAYG payment summary for 12/13.
Hi There,I have employees that fully salary sacrifice their wages, in the payment summary the amount is showing in RESC.
Hi thereI am producing payment summaries (there is only 1 employee) and the TFN is showing up as originally entered rather than how I updated and changed it.
##### CLUSTER 70 #####
How does this work in Xero?
How does this get recorded in Xero?
Therefore the VAT Return on Xero does not agree with the VAT Return Submitted to HMRC?
Does anyone have any ideas on how to easily track and input ETO data into Xero?
Does anyone have any advice on how i would tackle this is XERO?
Does anyone have experience with these countries + Xero?
Does anyone have advice for handling this situation in Xero?
Does anyone have a trade finance facility and using xero.
I'm creating my first BAS & I see that Xero does not put a value in T1 (total income) whether on cash or accruals (even after putting in an installment x rate at T2.
Does anyone out there use Foodstorm Software and Xero?
Does this strike anyone else as really poor customer service from Xero, even arrogant?
Does anyone else in Portugal use Xero?
Does anyone out there in Australia use Xero in their charity?
Does Xero have any case studies that helped small businesses increase their profitability?
Does anyone have an idea on how to integrate Xero for this,.
When done through Xero now, it does not offer this convenient feature.
How does Xero intend to deal with this overlap on the system to reflect the two rates in one return period?
It is so easy to do in error especially when Xero does it by default.
This does not happen in Xero and is frustrating.
Xero does not allow us to apply credits against any of the branches - it will only allow the credit to be applied to the branch it was issued to.
This can be done in MYOB, it is not an issue, it has nothing to do with auditing issues which is a Xero comment on a lot of things, and does not cause any sort of state of confusion!
This is especially important as Xero does not round numbers correctly in these reports.
How does Xero treat the profit splits for a partnership?
Why does Xero still use Flash on desktop browsers?
As far as I can see, Xero does not automatically accrue the 13 wks on the 10 year anniversary and you cannot set up to accrue a further 1.
Does Xero also have this feature?
I also intend to use the onesaas ebay integration as xero's paypal feed does not seem to pull in any of the transaction information from paypal.
If Yodlee is such a terrible feed why does Xero keep using it?
How does Xero determine the order?
what does the "Statement Balance" in Xero meant to convey?
However, whenever Xero does a journal, its automatically considered a journal on an accrual basis.
In Sage you can use F6 for this, does Xero have this functionally?
Does anyone in hamilton provide practical training for xero software?
However when I do it for credit notes, the DueDate column that I have in the csv does not seem to go into Xero.
Does anyone have any experience using MYOB RetailManager and Xero?
Does Xero ignore them?
Does anyone else upload a file direct from Xero to a clearing house?
Does Xero do anything similar?
How does one accomplish this transaction in Xero's Payroll.
Does anyone use Zen Payroll and Xero?
I have followed the information provided on how to set up the pension - we are using People's Pension and Xero does seem to connect but it's so inconsistent.
Alternatively does anyone have a phone number for Xero support?
Xero does not except any date of directorship start prior to the first day of the current tax year.
Does anyone have any insight into how Xero is calculating this number?
065Unless there are very specific reasons you always round UP from a final decimal place ending in 5So why does Xero Payroll round down!
I don't want to use Payroll in Xero so why is this option there if it does nothing ?
Does Xero plan on adding any benefit providers for FSA and HSA to apps?
Does Xero have any intention to do this also?
In addition to that, Xero does not roll over "Absorption Costs" at the end of each Financial Year.
Does any out there have practical experience of alternatives to this Sage combination that would work with Xero.
Does anyone currently use a software packages which is compatible with Xero?
Does anyone have any experience of other xero-compatible software?
Does anyone have their self storage business running on xero already.
)Vend said that the Xero does not allow for negative figures to be posted over.
Does anybody found any alternative to print Canadian  cheques from Xero?
Does anyone have any other recommendations for childcare software that preferably integrates with Xero?
Our website currently sells on AMAZON and EBAY and we use another 3rd party to list to these channels Does anyone pull sales into XERO  at the moment and any pitfalls you can see or errors.
Why does Xero not post the customer info to Stripe?
Does anyone have a childcare center on Xero?
Does anyone have any aged care clients using Xero?
Also this means Xero is unable to keep track of which tradesman does what.
Does anyone have experience using Xero with RentPro and PocketRent?
Does anyone else have clients that use these with Xero?
Does anyone have any experience of using Carry the One with Xero and how well the inventory functionality works?
Too be honest I am sick of the time wastage and Xero Support does not seem to do anything about it at all.
Xero does not appear to have the functionality to deal properly with a VAT Qualifying Asset Purchase with monthly HP or Loan payments.
Since xero does not have true keyboard shortcuts this feature is a big time saver.
Xero is a great product but unfortunately it does not display correctly in IE10 on either my desktop or laptop (both running Windows 8).
##### CLUSTER 71 #####
What are the relevant accounts I need to set up?
Would I need to create two accounts, one for loan and one for loan interest?
In addition, I appreciate I can only reclaim half the VAT back so would need some advice on how to manage the monthly payments so that it accounts for this when feeding into the VAT return.
I need to clear down all of the test and demo data that we have in the system at the moment so that we can make a clean start with the accounts for the new year.
if you have any past due accounts you need to give us a try.
##### CLUSTER 72 #####
The invoices are already paid - as in, the total invoice for Client A was £100, and £3 of it was for Facebook Ads.
Now I am going to invoice those customers - how do I match the invoices to the income in advance.
How do I create an invoice that itemises all the payments to be made but invoices only the first installment?
Currently the placeholder can only be set for the current month (same month as the invoice) and therefore this feature doesn't work for rental invoices.
Where an invoice is set to be recurring, and the customer has previously set up a pre-auth with GoCardless, it would be great if the payments for future invoices could be collected automatically (kind of what Direct Debit is designed for really.
Instead, detail for 2 invoices print on the voucher and I have to print a Remittance Advice for the invoice(s) not on the voucher.
It's a bit of a pain to have to manually calculate the how much we will invoice in the next month of recurring invoices.
3. that the user is automatically presented with the option to void the single invoices from which the merged invoice is created.
Often, I input many invoices from suppliers via Invoice Smash and  Bills from a CSV file import.
Repeating invoices makes this possible but there are still a lot of steps to take and there is no link between the invoice and the journal entries.
Please have the option to see both the invoice number and the reference for sales invoices.
In our case, this supplier will invoice over a period of time with a number of invoices, not all at once.
Provide a field that I can complete on the invoice or contact, that will be visible on the list of Sales Invoices to tell me which ones to Email and which ones to print.
Can a feature be created to allow the 15th August invoices to be generated earlier, say on 1st August, without having to change the setup of the repeating invoice?
Is it possible to combine multiple sales invoices into a single invoice?
I have to open every screen (POs, invoices, quotes, bills) to understand when an item comes in from a PO to figure out what it is associated with, or when I look at an invoice how to tell what items haven't yet come in, or is it complete?
At the moment, the recurring transaction is there in the repeating invoices screen but there is no instance of the draft invoice created yet (I wouldn't expect it to be).
For example, I'm entering some invoices directly off my credit card statement and don't have the invoice in front of me.
In our case, this supplier will invoice over a period of time with a number of invoices, not all at once.
##### CLUSTER 73 #####
Can anyone point me in the direct of a report that shows the Customer invoices that have been paid in the qtr.
When looking at past invoices under Suppliers, why can't the most recent ones appear on the top/ or first on this report?
This can then be confused with the Invoices report.
It would be great to have the facility to run an Aged Payable/Receivable report on a day-to-day basis, so that the figures provided can be used to cross-reference and ensure that all invoices/bills entered within a day, can be accounted for.
At the moment we can't differentiate between paid and unpaid invoices for those items when we run the Inventory Items Summary report.
Can the report be adjusted to show actual invoices please?
any idea how to build up a clever report that shows VAT included in supplier invoices?
Is there any ability to print a report of draft invoices ?
##### CLUSTER 74 #####
Hi,I have an invoice that is out with a client but has not been paid yet.
Hi all,I have one invoice to book which is to be paid in 15 August'16.
Hi,How can I customise the 'Description' for payments received or paid when it is linked to more than 1 invoice or bill?
Hi ThereI've been struggling to figure out how I can work this in XeroI made a prepayment for a service of $275, but received no invoice.
Hi,I cannot seem to change the size of the PayPal Logo in a custom invoice template.
Hi, As an exporter I can't find anywhere to state the INCOTERMS on my invoice.
Hi, I was wondering if it would be possible to nominate a different email address for the Invoice Reminders to be sent to instead of them being sent to whichever email we have on file for that customer.
Hi,I am trying to set up custom DOCX invoice template which is working great.
Hi all,   Only in the few days to a week has the invoice changed to view as tax exclusive despite me having everything I can think of set to tax INclusive.
Hi,Can someone please tell me how to send an invoice to a customer who have already paid?
Hi,Is it possible to import a repeating invoice template?
Hi, Is there an option to have pro rata items on the invoice that would for example bill for services for part of a month?
##### CLUSTER 75 #####
i have to account about a 100 expenses in xero, is there a way to import the same.
What would be the appropriate way to account for this in Xero?
What is the best way to account for this in Xero?
66 VAT)What's the best way to account for the above in Xero?
Is there a way to sign up for certification when you are an 'Advisor' on the Xero account?
Is there any way in Xero to have "virtual balances" under one account so I have a view of how much is related to which concept?
Is there a way to somehow tell Xero to not include the Car Rental account in this return for example?
We would love to have a way for these suppliers to input their bills into our Xero account so we could then review and approve these bills.
I have a number of clients who suffer deductions from customer receipts but there is no way of entering this into Xero on the customer account.
Is there any way to assign two VAT numbers onto the one Xero account and simply reconcile both companies using 'tracking' functions?
##### CLUSTER 76 #####
I need to remove these payments so that I can reconcile with the actual bank statement.
The ryule would need to copy the description line from the bank statement - can that be done?
Is this a bank error, or something I need to adjust settings for?
I need to do an import that goes from November '15 so you can imagine thats a lot of work to get done and I can't even get over the first hurdle of the bank feed!
ofx bank statement from Barclays but I need to import 4 months of statements prior to that which I was going to do by creating .
##### CLUSTER 77 #####
Can you help me figure out a way around this that can maintain transparency and accurate foreign currency exchange rates?
Or is there another way, Please help.
Can you help suggest an alternative way to handle the declines?
Hoping someone can help figure out the best way to do this transaction.
Please help as I can't for the life of me see a way to get the GST from the expense claims onto my BAS.
Is there any way these messages and alerts can be done on a by user basis (so if I dismiss a help message or an alert) it is gone from all organisations I access?
Can someone help me out in finding a way to delete them?
I've searched in the settings and help to see if there is any way of changing this but no joy so far.
I now have 1 day left with no way of knowing what I am doing wrong and with no help.
##### CLUSTER 78 #####
Hi, Is there a way to see a live vat graph on the dashboard?
Hi there,Is there a way to do an expense claim, but charge it to COGS rather than expenses?
Hi All, is there a way to send dispatch notes to my warehouse team.
Hi,Is there any way we can send a reminder for employees to enter their time sheet?
Hi, is there a way to bulk void expense claims without having to do them individually?
Hi All, What would be the correct way to deal with unpaid leave?
##### CLUSTER 79 #####
Is it possible to custom design a customer invoice report adding tracking categories?
My income statement has Sales under the Revenue section at a much lower amount than what is showing in my customer invoice report.
Please offer an option to include the Customer's address, zip code and phone number to the Customer Invoice Report.
This report is mainly used to scrutinise qty levels at set times (ie stocktake or invoice/purchase errors) so I feel it is vital!
It would save a lot of time to be able to do a Customer invoice report that excludes GSTThanks
Can you create a shortcut in the Reports section that brings up the Invoice Report please?
If you included the "Reference Text" as a column in the report users will be able to see more identifying information so they can better determine what each invoice is for.
There is a new great report "Payable Invoice Detail".
I have run supplier invoice report to see if the amounts there and in the TPAR match up and they don't because of the credit notes not showing in the TPAR.
##### CLUSTER 80 #####
What is the best way to reconcile these transactions in Xero as I don't actually receive payments from the companies for my commissions?
Could anyone give advise please on the best way to handle the following transactions in Xero.
I am not an accountant in any way and doing mainly basic transactions in Xero so treat me lightly.
Is there any way to get back the transactions Xero missed while the synch was down?
What is the best way of getting the April transactions into Xero, without them impacting on the VAT return?
##### CLUSTER 81 #####
What is the best way to show the outflow from business account to owner's personal account?
I understand account 210 is a system account, but what is the best way to reverse the above transaction?
-	DR$650 GST free-	Depreciation is based on 8 years for new carsLiability account: Chattel Mortgage Principal-	CR$22,325 GST free-	DR $7,000 Trade-in/ CR Directors loan GST free (is this the right way to account for trade in value since it was personally owned?
Is there any way for the default account to show up automatically without me having to click the box under “Account” every time.
Is there a better way to categorize my owners draw, or is there a journal entry I should make to reset the "owners draw account", and adjust the retained earnings account since the money has been taken out of the business?
When I deleted them in the system several others with different numbers showed up and I can not find a way to delete those because they don't show up in the conversion balance account, you can only see them when you look in different account reports.
##### CLUSTER 82 #####
Does anyone know a way to do a bulk update to increase quantity on hand for multiple items at once?
When inputting bills does anyone know if there is a way to bypass the unit price and quantity fields?
Does anyone know a way around thisGraham
Does anyone know of a way around this?
Does anyone know of a way to do this without it looking awful and taking too many pages?
Does anyone know what the best way to tackle this problem would be?
Does anyone know a better way to do this as it is time consuming?
Does anyone know a way to 'reset' this leave?
Does anyone know the right way to avoid this?
##### CLUSTER 83 #####
Has anyone else experienced this issue and does anyone have any details or solutions to add?
Any other ideas, is there a debtor add-on that does this.
The concept of a custom 'working pattern' does exist because if you add statutory sick leave to an employee, it asks for their working pattern and allows you to select a custom pattern and choose the days that employee normally works.
Does any one use any add ons that store job time to a customers contact that can then be invoiced?
Does anyone have an Add-on solution?
Does anyone have any ideas for an appropriate add on?
Does anyone have any suggestions on what they think is a good inventory add-on and why?
Is there an "add-on" which already does this?
##### CLUSTER 84 #####
I think I know to handle this as an overpayment so I can apply the two payments to the three invoices.
I know I could do it manually but we process large amounts of invoices and this would be very laborious.
I know that this has likely been asked elsewhere, but I am curious to know whether or not sales invoices and purchase invoices can be partly auto-filled based on previous entries?
We set these up in contacts so that the name field is filled in as either Statements or Invoices etc so we are able to label them so we know which is address is for what purpose.
As it is right now it's impossible to know what the invoices being listed are for.
Anyone know where I can find the voided invoices and/or whether I can remove the attachment?
So each month I want to know what the total dollar value is for item 1 on invoices with a category a.
##### CLUSTER 85 #####
So I paid myself the total of first month's salary + PAYE amount and now I am trying to find the best way to account for the PAYE part so that I can reconcile the bank transaction.
Is there any way to create a new account with some balance such as Bank or Current assets.
But is there a way that I can designate a certain amount of funds, let's say in my Bank Account, to a separate "savings box. "
There is only the rule that it must be paid before 2023, so I don't want to arbitrarily post it as a "spend money" against our earnings bank account with some random future date (or the extreme Dec 31, 2023) -- or is that really the best way?
'Is there a way to make the bank account number come up underneath the name of the business I am paying when I enter the bills?
Is there any way I can change the Bank Account to a credit card?
Is there a way to designate/allocate/reserve funds within a bank account for a specific purpose?
##### CLUSTER 86 #####
Expenses paid for by cash or from private bank accounts (not listed in Xero).
When I bank reconcile the prepayment in Xero I'm given a choice of accounts.
I'm newish to Xero and am frustrated that some of my accounts can't be delivered as a bank feed.
How do you experienced users reconcile your bank accounts in Xero?
I mistakenly made them bank accounts as suggested by Xero on conversion.
We've been using bank feeds from Kiwibank into several of our accounts in Xero for quite a few years.
On Xero we have three bank accounts set up on our dashboard.
It turns out that two of the Bank Accounts of my client is not supposed to be linked in Xero as it is not for that company's intended activities.
Now I have found out that Xero cannot even deal with US$ accounts at all, from any bank!
In waveaccounting, I can enter all my bank accounts, and code and categorise both at the same time - the far better conceptThere are many great things about xero and I would prefer it.
Secondly - our casual staff are paid from different bank accounts - is this possible on xero payroll?
I currently have my bank accounts feeding straight into Xero, where I reconcile them.
Our Xero bank feeds for 3 of our accounts haven't worked in almost 3 months.
##### CLUSTER 87 #####
How do I go about removing 'pay your bill online' from the email link which is sent automatically when sending out invoices.
We have customers who are issued vouchers from our State Government (NTG) which they can use to pay their fees invoices.
For us in Costa Rica, would be great if we can upload our "pay run slip template" similar to invoices.
Currently we have to do this manually as the 'Deposit' option throws up the message 'You can only bulk pay invoices in your default currency.
The issue comes with how we select the invoices to batch and pay.
##### CLUSTER 88 #####
Then when the tax is due we wanted to withdraw what we need from these investments and reintroduce the funds to pay the tax.
Basically I need to make sure that I set aside 25% of my profit so I when I pay my quarterly estimates, the money is there.
Do I need to file a form, pay business state and federal income tax on a quarterly/monthly basis for what my corporation has been generating income every month?
Do they still need to pay an IT Services Company to monitor their systems?
If so, do I need to still approve the timesheet before a pay run can be made?
We need to make sure that 5 hours and 50 minutes is what comes up on his pay slip but I can't figure it out.
I need to pay Directors' fees on a monthly basis.
Also we are with NEST yet on the drop down only "Other" appears when you try to select a scheme, this means I have to manually login into Nest to tell them how much I need to pay.
I need to resolved this before pay day, has anyone else had this issue?
##### CLUSTER 89 #####
Is there a way i can track the raw material i use in the manufacturing process or i still have to get an add on.
There is no apparent way to add in 1 cent somehow to make the total exact.
Is there a way to add a $10 tax there?
Or is there another way to do this either in Zero or  with add ons?
Is there any way or any are are there any add-ons for cheque printing in Australia?
There is NO WAY TO ASSOCIATE HUMAN SKILLS WITH ADD-ON TECHNOLOGIES.
Is there any way to add more than  one suppliers to one product listing?
Please please please can you add an Irish VAT return the same way you did it for the UK VAT return.
Is there a way to add custom expense categories?
Can you please add a way to uplift provisional tax payments to be a voluntary tax type (currently you have S,R,E).
It can't be anything meaningful because it's empty and there's no way to add information here.
Please could you work out a way of changing the dates of the timesheets to allow them to match when we run the payroll, or so we only add those hours that are outstanding at the time of the payrun?
Is there an add-on that the client could use that would automate this process in any way?
As a suggestion - is there a way you can add a functionality linked to your subscription details that is a link to cancelled subscriptions (not transferred subscriptions where there may be privacy issues involved).
##### CLUSTER 90 #####
Would that work or is that only intended for use with 'Spend Money' outgoing transactions from the bank account?
The CSV file has uploaded correctly and lists the 4 transactions for reconciling on the left-hand section of the bank reconciliation screen, however Xero is not bringing up the transactions I have entered in the credit card account to enable me to reconcile the account.
So I used my personal bank account - not an ideal situation as I had personal transactions mixed with business.
Why can't we have the same total for the transactions selected on the Account Transactions tab when in a bank account.
We then have to go back through our bank account reconciliation and remove and redo any transactions that are affected.
Ability in the Find and Match function ( in the bank recon screen) to search for transactions based on the contact's account number and not only on the contact name, reference or the amount of the transaction
How do I match up the two transactions (the refund transaction with the overpayment) so that I can reconcile my bank account?
To overcome this, I have to "Remove and Redo" all the transactions from the bank account then reconcile them in Paypal.
After researching bank reversals I have learnt that the best solution is to reconcile both transactions into a "reversal account" so they cancel each other out.
##### CLUSTER 91 #####
How do I account for the remaining €1200 on the invoice that is outstanding?
My question is when im doing the invoice for the deposit how do i account for the $5000.
How it looks in the inventory account is perfect, why is it all smooshed together on the invoice?
How would we create the invoice without it hitting our account?
I have a suspense account I can apply the purchase invoice and sales invoice to, but how do I account for the $1,000 profit difference between what was received and what is owed?
I can (and have) selected Create and manually keyed in the client, selected the account and entered the invoice on the description line in order to reconcile the transaction.
My question is when im doing the invoice for the deposit how do i account for the $5000.
Currently, invoice reminders all come from the main account and the reply to address can not be changed.
If someone else goes in to their account it can be forgotten to undo and apply it to the new invoice.
How do I produce a commission "invoice", when in fact, we will be paying the owner the rental money which has been in the trust account, minus the commission?
##### CLUSTER 92 #####
As it stands, I need to add them in on 1 July, which is technically incorrect.
This is a HUGE improvement - logical date selection, ability to add formulas etc, but there are a couple of flaws I think need attending to:1.
Could someone please explain why I need to add the Contractor's Super Liability as a negative?
I would have thought that this feature can be easily activated as I would assume that many of the add-ons would need to allocate payments to match the POS settlements an customer may be getting.
There is a strong need to be able to add specific fields to standard reports or exports.
I need to add additional grouping to my income statement but cant find how to do that.
Can anyone advise where I'm going wrong - I need to add times worked from 1/7/16 to date.
Do we need an add-in?
I am in need of a inventory add on that could cope with three warehouses.
I am in need of a inventory add on that could cope with two factories (so ability to create items from fabric, haberdashery purchases), 3 warehouses, wholesale sales physical, retail sales via website.
We need a fix or a suggestion for an add-on ASAP.
##### CLUSTER 93 #####
This has caused me to not be able to fully reconcile Square Deposits as the invoice does not yet exist (saved as a draft).
The invoice issued to the customer is to show only 15 meters ordered yet how does the inventory quantity align with 17 meters used but only 15 meters sold?
Does this send the invoice to the customer automatically / immediately?
Is the PO partially filled (because I issued a Bill (and unchecked fully billed)) but how does that relate to the Invoice to the customer?
When I click on "Find & Match" the reference number does not show the invoice numbers to match to?
Likewise the Purchase order does not show the Supplier Invoice number as it used to.
##### CLUSTER 94 #####
How do I add a non-current liability for owner contributions used to pay for this inventory?
You can then add the benefit to Vinnie’s Pay Template (Payroll > Employees > Vinnie).
All our staff would have to do would log on add hours worked & approve so I could pay staff
Is it possible to be able to add a notes option to pay runs?
Can I somehow add more weeks to the first pay period?
##### CLUSTER 95 #####
Do you know if we can add in Job No.
Can you please let me know how I can add a logo at the bottom?
I know that it can be attacked by 3rd party add-ons but from our experience these are expensive to use.
I also know we can get add-ons to solve the problem.
or Do you know of any add-ons that I could try?
Anyone know how to add "803 - Wages Payable" to these drop down lists?
If anyone recalls or is using this program can you please reply and let me know the name of it or alternatively if someone has a good recommendation for an add-on that provides good monthly customer sales reports that would be great.
Do you know of any add on that gives you this flexibility?
##### CLUSTER 96 #####
We have done this, but how do I reconcile/contra the individual transactions which appear in Xero as a bank deposit, and a merchant system refund?
We do not import anything manually so all transactions are sent to Xero through bank feed.
How would you reconcile the bank transactions in Xero?
Example: transaction in Xero of &#163;100 against transactions in the bank of &#163;110 debit and &#163;10 credit.
For some reason Xero is downloading “Pending” transactions from my credit care (Virgin America credit card provided by Comenity bank).
##### CLUSTER 97 #####
So, I have been using the transfers tab to manager funds going in and out of the business bank accounts.
I suppose I could set up "bank accounts", but then this designated donated rents, goods and services as assets, which they clearly are not.
I am not sure how to most efficiently reconcile MEMNET, the bank and eWay accounts.
I'm adding some bills but the first one is for a Bank Service Charge (which is on my Chart of Accounts).
If you can walk me successfully through setting up online connections  for 14 bank accounts and credit cards (mostly BBVA Compass and CitiCards) I will immediately send you $1,000  by PayPal or whatever means you request.
This has the added advantage of clearly reporting that there are additional bank accounts in the organisation.
It would be great if bank feeds could be supported for NAB nabtrade accounts, rather than having to download a CSV file.
We request that our customers use their unique ID when making payments and this would make reconciling with bank accounts so much easier.
For example, in a retail situation managers of one location can login and see their location but not other locations or bank accounts of other locations.
I manage clients who constantly transfer odd amounts between their multiple bank accounts and credit cards.
Would be fantastic if you can do the same thing with Payrun i. e. once payrun is processed, I can hit one button to transfer the funds into employee bank accounts automatically as opposed to having to do this manually.
I have a number of bank accounts and therefore do not have a standard Lloyds Business banking login.
I am trying to do a money transfer between two of our bank accounts.
HelloIs anybody aware as to how i can obtain a list of bank payments for the year summarised by the nominal accounts they have been debited to.
I have a question:1. what is the diff if we post a transaction into manual journal and bank accounts?
Can I reconcile one bank transaction to 2 different accounts?
So can someone please explain how to delete bank/credit card accounts.
THE BIG ISSUE:  When reconciling the deposits listed in our bank feed, we cannot figure out how to credit the client's accounts.
##### CLUSTER 98 #####
Hi all,Im new to Xero so hopefully someone can help me please.
Hi, love Xero easy to understand, may help that I first learnt book keeping back in the early days of my career.
HI all,Im new to Xero so hopefully someone can help me please.
Hi allI am new to Xero and can't find any help on this issue.
Hi Xero - while I love love the files option - could you please extend the name section on the left hand side to be more than 11 characters wide - would help to see more (preferable the whole) of the file name.
Hi guys -I used the online help recently to learn how to reimburse an employee though the payroll feature of Xero.
Hi there, New to Xero so hopefully someone can help.
Hi there, Im wondering if anyone can help, I have the Xero Shopify app and I initially enabled the EU Digital Goods VAT Tax rates.
Hi,I'm looking for some help with getting an accurate WIP figure in Xero fed through from EMAC.
##### CLUSTER 99 #####
I need to the total of tax exempt sales in the sales tax report.
I need to set up departments which I can report on (e. g. marketing, management, finance, events, etc).
In the absence of any tier 2 report templates, we do need to be able to fully tailor the existing reports so that we can comply with GAAP.
Please can there be a VAT return report, that shows us what we need to see in the audit trail, without so much background trivia.
The alternative is the long-winded inventory report, which returns results for ALL stock, meaning I need to sift through pages of data to find what I want.
You need to be able to enter absolute historical contact transaction details for the financial year, to feed into the TPAR report (in a similar manner that you can do with employees).
I need to report on two different styles of profit and loss monthly.
Presently whenever I need to show a customer what they have and haven't paid and on what dates, I am exporting the whole report to excel and then deleting all the lines that don't relate to that contact.
Can you please see if you can change the date function to remember the last date you entered for that report, so to stop the need for constantly re entering it.
You have all the data, all you need is a couple of Report writers to churn out reports.
##### CLUSTER 100 #####
In P&L report, it is negative under this account, but it doesn't make sense to me.
because although X is an income account (and it could be a product too) there doeesn't seem to be a report that shows this.
At the moment, there is no report that makes use of the Contact Account Number.
Could we please get page numbers on the account transaction report?
You can filter the GST audit report by Account (rather than the date default setting).
Similar to the new feature in profit & loss report where we can group the account codes.
Have the the general ledger account number in the GST Audit Report in a field of its own.
When viewing the GST audit report I can click on the account to take me to the transaction.
When running a statement or report on a supplier or customer account.
##### CLUSTER 101 #####
Hi there,I am a camera operator and I am frequently buying equipment for my business like batteries, lenses, luggage, etc What is the best expense code to use for this?
Hi I am in the process of finalising the above-mentioned and If anyone would like my work, I am  willing to give the *.
Hi there, seems like a postcodes finder has stopped working :-( Any idea what is going on withThanks Marian
Hi, I am having issues and it feels like I am missing something.
Hi AllHas anyone experience with Spanner planner they would like to share?
##### CLUSTER 102 #####
So: does anyone know whether Xero is going to gain more support for UK PBIK?
Does anyone know of a similar option in Xero?
Does anyone know how to get Xero to import these correctly?
does anyone know how we code cash purchases and expenses in xero?
Industry How does Xero know which Cloud Integrator or Accounting Partner has the skills to match to so that the best qualified and experienced advisor is matched to the technology and industry4.
Does anyone know of any Accountants or accounting firms in Norway that support Xero?
However, I did not received any responds at all(no phone, no email) so please does anyone know  the minimum requirement for becoming a Xero partner ?
Does anyone know if there is a feature in Xero to allow you to record and process time in Lieu in the payroll?
Does anyone know how we could treat this situation in Xero?
Does anyone know of a Xero compatible check signing software?
Does anyone know of a job/task management software package where you can assign staff to the jobs in a calendar which also had the sync facility with Xero?
Does anyone know if Xero has been involved in this, or has made any comment on http://safeguardmy.
##### CLUSTER 103 #####
-Do it through a debtor add-on that also invoices.
I am glad we can go back to voided invoices review them and even add notes after they are voided.
It would save so much time and avoid mistakes if you could add a date range to filter on invoices.
Can the ability to add more than one line at a time be added to invoices?
When posting invoices there is a Approveand add another shortcut.
Can you please add one more box to allow selection (Due Invoices only) in the dash board where you have select (unsent only) & (include Deleted & Voided)
Please add a tooltip to the green tick images on the Invoices screen 'Sent' column.
Please can you add the category Payable Immediately and Due Immediately to the terms for customer and supplier invoices.
We have always been able to add a message (eg 'special offer') and print off a run of invoices the night before the day of transaction so we can hand them to clients or leave them in letterboxes.
Could we add a feature to download invoices as CSV files?
If we can't add the option of a cc'd email address, is it possible to utilise a function that is available for invoices when completed - status is shown as sent and then viewed?
Is it possible to add a 2nd or 3rd Logo to your invoices?
When entering a load of purchase invoices it is usual to do 'Approve and add another'.
It would be nice to be able to have the drop-down list of inventory items when entering quotes as you can when entering invoices, so you can add new inventory items without having to open the settings screen.
Is there any add on which automatically applies payments for invoices.
##### CLUSTER 104 #####
net to download full transactions, like you can with Quickbooks Integration.
Can I search for any random transactions like this to ensure it hasn't been done and not picked up?
It sounds like a minor problem but I have a number of these each month to do so it takes me longer now to reconcile my transactions.
I would like to be able to mark certain transactions/ customers/ suppliers as confidential so that only I can see them.
It works well, and we reconcile and treat these transactions like any other.
How do I handle transactions like this?
It seems like the "Split" function should solve this problem, however, I can not get the "Split" link to appear in the "Find & Select Matching Transactions" screen.
##### CLUSTER 105 #####
Anyone know what I should do to ensure the invoice date is recorded correctly?
There is no receipt and I can't get hold of the VAT invoice but I know Esso is VAT registered.
Please enable the ability to override within an email template so depending on the client, or product service offering, when I send an invoice to a client I can choose an email template where I know the email will send from for example company2.
I know I can do it is I manually enter an invoice .
The issue I have I with this newly created piece of functionality is that I invoice one month in advance for some items - and when done for quarterly/monthly periods this function falls down as it cannot know to move the year on the correct amount.
(I know that the client is not gst registered, however I have always been under the impression that all information on receipt/invoice is the be noted)Is this not right?
##### CLUSTER 106 #####
The problem I have is that the report does not balance to the TB.
I am trying to find out if I can produce a VAT report or equivalent for expenses for the Estonian company, as it does not show up in the options even in the Financial Settings (probably due to the location).
The Sales Tax Report does not seem to pull from Expense Claims.
Multiple Customised Reports would be such a time saver - it's all about efficiency gainsThe Practice Report Templates - does not offer all the reports that we may wish to create to speed up processing
There does not seem to be a function to archive the report for any of the New Reports?
The balance sheet report does not currently include a net current assets total, which needs to be included.
When I tailor the Profit and Loss (new) report to show budget v actual and I filter it by the tracking category (particular location) it does not show the budget that I entered relating to that tracking category.
However, whilst sense checking to my dismay I realised that the "cash and cash equivalent at the end of the period" does not equal to the cash and cash euivalent balance from the balance sheet or the cash summary report.
HiSalary Sacrifice Superannuation of an employee does not include in Superannuation Accruals (report), this hapennig couple of weeks onwards only
##### CLUSTER 107 #####
Has anyone had this problem before and/or know what I need to do to correct this please?
Sorry I know another newbie question but I don't need to do this one often lolThanx for any advice as always
This means that we know that there is an answer but also that the person doesn't need any more assistance.
I know there is probably something intrinsically flawed about my setup but I do need to maintain this single magento database and inventory structure.
What I need to know is what is the difference between the Salaries code 477 and wages code 814?
Here's a quick 1 minute video showing the sync:  ​Please let me know if you need more details.
We also ideally need to be alerted when a customer is getting low on hours, so can proactively sell them more, or know when they've run out so can advise it's charged at normal hours.
We need cash machine in the shop, that is reason why we were thinking about the POS software, but we do not know that it is enough for us.
##### CLUSTER 108 #####
What is the best way to go about recording the payment when I do make it as it will be entirely for GST.
Is there a way to not allocate a credit note and have it deducted from the payment to the supplier?
What would be the best way to evenly distribute these tax payment monthly?
Is there a way to break down the components of the payments or even display the method of payment?
Is there any way I can view an old batch payment to see what was different?
There is no way of doing this now without adding up the individual payment amounts.
Please update new reports to allow for the old display way of All, Draft, Awaiting Payment, Paid.
When we allocate a payment as a prepayment there is no way to send the customer a receipt.
Is there a way I can put an employees payment "on hold"?
Is there a way of naming a Batch Payment?
We could do this in Quickbooks by setting an expected payment in this way.
What would be the best way to accept a credit card payment over the phone?
Or is there a better way achieve a pre-payment of an employee’s annual super?
00 and I have allocated this to Manual Adjustment  but I cant get that amount to include in the PAYG on the payment summaries, can you please tell me how to fix it and what would be the correct way to fix this Regards Jodie
Is there an easy way to reconcile and update the accurate payment?
Hey,Had anyone come across a way to test a credit/debit card payment with Stripe?
Has anyone come across a way to test a payment with Stripe using a test card number?
##### CLUSTER 109 #####
I've not been able to find an elegant solution yet - I don't think any of the reports can help here, because I can't identify these particular payments to this particular invoice amongst all the other payments received.
Is there anyone out there who can help me with creating a Customised Invoice?
e. g. type in invoice number from last month to look up details and it's telling me:No results for '516483' foundTry narrowing your search or search for '516483' in the Help CenterWas working perfectly.
This is the image from the help center that shows exactly what I don't want on the invoice.
How can I manage my customer as a single entity that I have a relationship with and provide the multiple entities on the invoice to help my customer with their business practices?
##### CLUSTER 110 #####
I've been on this for three days solid and although I now have improved greatly my understanding of Word am no closer to achieving the invoice template I would like.
Also the client would like to amend the invoice using word if possible so extra columns can be added.
This is what I'd like to be able to do:Send reminder (5) days before invoice is due.
At some point mine changed from the dashboard (what I'd like to see) to my invoice screen.
We would like the ability to copy the pdf invoice so that we can attach a copy to both bills we have entered.
I can create a bill and link this to the invoice no problem however I would like an ongoing summary of what is left on the order.
##### CLUSTER 111 #####
The payment transaction has come through my bank feed, but there is no "Expense Claims Owed" account to debit.
IE, you can see the payment come back into the bank account as a deposit.
My credit card is linked to my primary bank account, so the 15th of each month there is an automatic payment transaction.
When I click on the transaction in the Bank Account section, the option is not there and therefore cannot notify the party of proof of payment
Essentially one can queue up a check/bill and send the payment directly to the recipients bank account if it was entered into there vendor record.
My client was previously using a spreadsheet for expenses and calculated these incorrectly resulting in an over payment from the bank account of £43.
I can get the bank to balance fine with the over payment credited to the account.
##### CLUSTER 112 #####
Does it affect anything if i choose to reconcile the GST in a different way?
Does anyone else manage this process in a simple way with minimal effort for your customers?
Unfortunately this does not seem to be the case and all of the claims are now voided and there doesn't appear to be an obvious way to undo the void.
Or does anyone have any ideas for a better way?
Does anyone have a better way?
Nothing changes here and if it does, you do not really have a clear and consistent way of communicating that change.
##### CLUSTER 113 #####
I am trying to edit the following Bank Rule (Receive):- Payee contains John- Amount greater than or equals 100(After entering 100 I click on another field to make sure that 100 stays 100 and it does.
Has anyone else set it up Kiwibank bank feeds online, and how does one do it?
My bank balance suddenly does not agree with my statement balance (it did do! )
How does one go about correcting the bank feed delay in this particular case?
Many of our bank deposits are done from Etsy, and what Etsy does is, they will periodically deposit funds that represent a certain number of sales.
Does anyone else have problems refreshing bank feeds to Mondays?
Does it match to the bank?
Does anyone have any work arounds or ways to get he bank feed sorted out please?
##### CLUSTER 114 #####
I know at the end of the day the balance sheet still balances - I just want a consistent treatment in the office ;)Thoughts please?
Now I know you can do this simply when there's just one team involved.
I'm sorry if I've asked for too much in one go, I can understand this can be frustrating to read to people who actually know what theyre doing, but I just want to do right by my parents.
Is this possible and I just can't find the know-how?
Is this something that we can do that we just don't know about?
Just want to know if work is being done on improving this.
I want to be able to let a client know how much is overdue today not just outstanding or activity.
If it is entered just as A do HMRC know that he was previously M?
##### CLUSTER 115 #####
I guess I need to find out what the best way to handle these security deposits is.
Is there some other way I should be doing this, as I assume I need to recoup the net difference of $150 from future wage payments?
I use a job name as the tracker, I need a simple way to see how the reimbursables on a job are going.
That way the note is still there to print if you need it next time.
Is there a quick way to do this properly, or we need to edit each transaction and delete the tracking?
My prices can vary frequently so need a simple short way to adjust prices in inventry -maybe an editable list?
Is there a way that when an asset is entered as a purchase and edited that there could be a pop-up to remind people the pending asset value will also need to be amended?
Is there a way to grant that level of permission to my clients, who should be really the only one having it (though I ideally need the refresh rights)
Is there any way to get this to populate automatically or will I need to manually enter the computer assets?
We need to have a way we can merge these clients together and bring all the information into the one client left in the system.
I sell motor vehicles and need to keep track of the Vin number for each unit sold, is there any way to do this?
I understand that one can use some of the standard settings, however they do not all lend themselves to the way that I need things done.
Is there a way to do this automatically or would I need to create a new inventory item that is for 10 days or some other option.
##### CLUSTER 116 #####
Hello,I need some help, I already set up the Inventory that I'm selling and Purchase from my suppliers.
As you can see I'm very new to this and need as much help as I can get!
But I do need help TODAY.
I need help on how to enter the following:Insurance: For example,Premium - $8370GST - $847Stamp Duty - $920 (GST free)Admin Fee- $100Total is $10237However, instead of paying the full amount of the premiums up front, we have taken out a loan for the insurance premium funding.
HELP, I may  have screwed things up and need help in figuring out (1) how to fix it and (2) how to do what I need to do.
This is now urgent as I need ot run Payroll today, I cannot find any help on this anywhere.
I need some help how to do it.
Companies who do lots of jobs and need help organising them in a program that's not overly complicated.
I have 3 scenarios which I need help with AND COULD BE WIDELY Helpful TO OTHERs.
##### CLUSTER 117 #####
From what I've read, distributions beyond my shares in the company are taxed just like earnings.
I'm used to Excel and such, where you can just search all fields for everything, whenever you like.
I would like to monitor how often and how long the various users spend logged in not just the time they do
Just similar or like features enjoyed by banks or other financial institutions.
I just want to get this as near automated or least amount of time as I can, like I'm sure many of you do too.
##### CLUSTER 118 #####
What the bank did was pay off my loan and reapply the loan in a larger amount.
How do I split the expense in the case where my wife buys petrol on her personal bank card or I pay cash?
For example when money is received from a client and a pay statement has been sent or an image of a bank paying in slip.
How do I then get them into the payables ledger so that I can pay them out of the bank?
as they pay on Mondays so did the work in advance of the bank holiday.
##### CLUSTER 119 #####
How can I add money to my bank?
Can you please tell me if Payroll can automatically add the Ministry of Justice fines to the payroll bank file.
Please add support for PayPal IPN, so the "bank" statement can be updated immediately instead of having to do it only once a day.
It would be great if employees could add their own information (address / contact, bank, tax, etc) to a newly created Payroll record, rather than have someone collect paper and key it in.
How can you extract Bank Revaluations and Unrealized Gains from the QWD add-on?
This now means that you can not link it to a bank transaction or add the CC processing fee to the transaction.
##### CLUSTER 120 #####
When adding repeating invoices in Xero, is there any way to provide a specification?
Is there a chance that the software development team can look at an easier, less cumbersome way of posting vat only invoices to Xero.
But when they comeback later there is no way for them to access those invoices from the Xero Portal.
What would be the best way of customising invoices for export purposes within Xero?
com offer ACH payments, but only on invoices originating in their systems (no 2-way sync with Xero).
##### CLUSTER 121 #####
Hi,It would be VERY useful if I could run an Outstanding Billable Expenses report for a Customer that is grouped by Item and there is a sub-total for every Item.
Hi, I'm trying to create a Report which will show me what is due to be paid.
Hi allJust wondering how I would generate a report for sales that lists the marketing link we have put in?
Hi XeroCould you please make the report codes mapping section a drap and drop screen?
Hi,Maybe I am missing something but I am astounded that i cannot view this report!
Hi there, Could you please make the leave liability report available for download into excel (currently pdf only).
Hi there,I can only get the total of units sold for Australia, with the Sales by Item report.
##### CLUSTER 122 #####
should I pay this collaborator as a independent contractor or is there a better way to code it in Xero?
Is this functionality not available yet in Xero as I could only find a way to pay employees via direct deposit?
The xero app only has a few functions is there any way of adding 'pay runs' to the app settings?
I'd love to offer my clients the ability to pay via Dwolla but currently, there is no easy way to synchronize Xero and Dwolla.
Is there a way I can access them all through my Xero or do I have to pay more for a bookkeepers upgrade etc.
##### CLUSTER 123 #####
Do I need to raise a sales invoice for each transfer despite it not being a sale?
What I need to do is take Item A out of inventory w/o showing the item on the invoice to the customer.
Reasons for this include:- Greater flexibility on how to deal with clients, for better relationships you don't always need to highlight the due date for the invoice.
The invoice references need to be made more visible, there is a lot of wasted space which could show more information.
This column could also be used if you need to go back to this invoice at any time.
I think when you choose to void a sales or purchase invoice there should be a reason why which can be seen in the history field as often I need to refer back to why the item was voided in the first place.
I have an employee who posts invoice on the system for me to appove, however he doesnt need approval for purchase orders.
In my invoice footer; there's a whooping great big bit of white space that can be filled with a note should there need to be one.
##### CLUSTER 124 #####
how do i create a 'self billing invoice' in xero or any of xero's partners.
I'm new to Xero (and invoicing in general), and wonder if Xero can apply an automatic invoice numbering system.
Can Xero give invoice only users access to the Xero network key?
My question is: what is a work around I can use to manage inventory in Xero without creating double profit from a Square deposit and a Xero paid invoice?
I am new to Xero and have set it up so that when we win a new project, it is is given a project ref that is then used to post all sales/purchase invoice against in the tracking part of Xero.
i have installed a Xero plugin into my Woocommerce, so when a customer books a service online a new invoice is automatically generated by Xero.
i have installed a Xero plugin into my Woocommerce, so when a customer books a service online a new invoice is automatically generated by Xero.
##### CLUSTER 125 #####
If so, how do I pay out of it and write off an invoice?
It would be nice for them to be able to pay the invoice once the quote is approved right there and then.
On the rare occasion I want to part-pay an invoice, it's annoying that I have to do ctrl+a to select what you've put in the amount field before I can start typing my own.
I am currently using the stripe integration and currently there doesn't appear to be away for the customer to pay an invoice partially- can we change this?
In the case where I receive an invoice for 3 months of electricity, Jan, Feb, Mar totaling $300, I pay this all in one month (Mar).
If I email them the link to view invoice through Xero this shows up as a Pay Now button, or if I send them the PDF invoice there is a link at the bottom with option to Pay Online.
Hello,I am preparing an invoice to a customer for a 6-month service which they will pay in 6 equal monthly instalments.
I want to reissue the customer an invoice and pay the balance against inventory so I have a record of the sale of each product in Xero.
3) Varying service quantity and changing invoice amounts - all our monthly products are pay as you go services.
Is this something I can do automatically, such that if someone is using the "Pay Now" button from the invoice, than Xero adds 2.
Pay a deposit and then final invoice from supplier has changes or amendments made for example.
What determines whether the Pay button shows up on an invoice?
##### CLUSTER 126 #####
What I need to do is be able to enter their invoices that are $32/hr plus $3/hr Superannuation.
Is anyone else out there running a Solar business and need to discount their invoices for STC's?
Dear all, when filing my monthly VAT returns I need to provide a list of all supplier invoices with net amounts and VAT.
We need integration with Avalara or any other tax software for automated calculation of taxes on sales order and invoices.
Would need to quote and send invoices from ipads, and also see a schedule for the boss, and the two tradesman and easily see whos free so they can book people in etc.
##### CLUSTER 127 #####
Basic problem - how do you assign a bank feed line item to a sales invoice and a bill?
But now that the bank statement has updated with the credit, how do I make this a 'credit note' or similar to correspond with the original invoice?
Also  from what I understand – purchases will pop up (after the money is deducted from either my PayPal or Business Bank Acct) and then I will reconcile by adding in purchases in the money going out via a payable invoice.
how do I create an invoice and watch for my bank feeds coming in that will reconcile one by one for the payments coming in?
This could apply to journals, bank imports or even invoice/bill creation.
The problem is how PayPal handles the transfer from my bank to them when the PayPal balance isn't enough to cover the full invoice amount.
BUT, this would mean that the bank transaction would be sitting in the feed until the invoice is created, is that correct?
When I try to use bank reconciliation, there are almost 80% statements can't match with my bill or sales invoice automatically.
I do notice, however, when checking the coding of the invoice in Receipt Bank that there is a field called 'description' .
##### CLUSTER 128 #####
Client can able to pay through my own payment gateway.
It is possible to record either a manual pay with no payment through the payroll system.
If I click on each payment I can then see each employee, the pay period and the amount paid.
How do I ensure I dont pay tax on this payment received?
Can I adjust one of those pay runs to remove that payment?
Could somebody please advise if I am able to create a payrun, which I will get as accurate as possible, post the pay run, this will then provide the ability to create a batch upload for my click super contribution, then make the super payment and afterwards delete the payrun?
Can someone suggest how we can post "Pay Run" in the same month rather than on payment date?
'(2) 'There is a problem with this pay run that prevents the payment.
There is a problem with this pay run that prevents the payment.
Here is my current process with an example(leaving taxes out for now):-Record and approve for payment an expense claim for travel expenses in the amount of $100-Include the payment amount in a pay run as a reimbursement for $100 in the travel expense category of the pay run form, as well as my normal salary of $3000.
I can't pay it:"There is a problem with this payrun that prevents the payment.
##### CLUSTER 129 #####
Just wondering about how to account for the income in Xero.
The account would be held in this piece of software/app and just pass the amount in £££ to Xero.
I just opened an account in Xero by converting from quickbooks.
When importing this previous data It was too hard to remember what withdrawals went into what account over the course of the last 12 months so i just deleted these off the statement in Xero so it didn't effect my income and expenses.
I have been using the xero software on a trial account for a couple of weeks now and I am just about ready to commit to going live.
##### CLUSTER 130 #####
Or perhaps and most probably being not accountants we just do not understand how the management report suppose to work?
Un-hide transaction details before finalising reportThis method is inefficient and could be much improved if there was just a NET GST Summary Report including Decimals (incl Decimals could be optional - for those out there who firmly believe that there is no cents (sense) in tax!
I just want to be able to rung the report showing only what I have in stock not everything else as well.
It would be great in the new report templates if you can pick up a group of report codes eg just income or income and expenditure etc - at the moment you can just pick up all.
I would presume the data is already there, it's just a question of including it on a report?
Would be great if it was just saved as a favourite report they could have a quick link to.
Please could we have a Report, or even just an additional column on the Contacts screen that shows the last Note added and the date.
The data is there so it just needs a report to be written.
That is, run a payroll activity report and instead of there just being one figure for annual leave, there is a figure for the base annual leave and a separate figure for the leave loading.
Hoping that I'm just not seeing/using a report that can do this for me.
Is this report a work in progress or is this just how it is going to be?
I just registered for  demo user , I made a purchases and sales when you run Balance Sheet report , there is no effect for the inventory ?
I still can't believe just how ridiculously difficult it is to get what should be the most important report on the system - a 12 month P&L.
##### CLUSTER 131 #####
Can the money I pay to Xero be discounted from my taxes ?
I can't afford to pay an accountant so i'm hoping to keep on top of all this myself using Xero.
At present can 'exclude all' employees, but only per Xero page in pay run.
In Australian Xero Payroll we have a large number of pay items.
HelloTwo of my team do not have the "how did you pay' option when entering receipts on the Xero app.
Has anyone used Xero to pay staff under EBA's?
Could anyone please advise how do we do this in Xero, as the employee is not in the pay run from 1 July 2016?
Is it when employee leave is approved in Xero, or once a pay run is drafted/posted or at some other point?
Not on a fixed rate of a normal weeks pay how can I set this up in Xero ?
If Xero can automatically update tax tables and superannuation statutory rates, why not have the ability to import the pay rates based on the employees award classification?
Are there any other Xero/Westpac users that have successfully imported an ABA file for their pay run?
In learning how xero handles pay runs, I noticed that it automatically populates the check number field with the next check number.
What should I enter on Xero as the pay period start date?
I don't see how I can use Xero to track holiday entitlement with our pay structure.
My second choice is to postpone her pension assessment until 1 November, but the postpone box is greyed out and only appears (I think) when Xero assesses an employee should be enrolled to a pension scheme when running a pay run.
Xero automatically sets these employees up on a standard tax code of 1100L however i have noticed that no tax has been deducted from their pay.
Is there something I can change in Xero payroll so that Student Loans are not calculated based on the full gross pay in these cases?
##### CLUSTER 132 #####
We have previously used Xpirem and would like to know if Xero offers a similar product that can be used instead.
The reason is we have a couple of primary schools looking to move to xero and we want to know what the experince is like and how well it functions in a school.
I know that when you "Ask My Adviser" there is a box asking if you'd like this query to be sent to your email address, but is there such a feature when contacting Xero Support?
Thus, I would like to know if currently Xero servers have issues, or what can I do to solve my problem.
HiI would like to know if there is an option in which Xero can automatically export data to excel on a daily basis.
I would like to know if Xero can process payroll for employees residing outside of UK.
I would like to know what would be the double entry created by Xero for the decution.
##### CLUSTER 133 #####
We're seeking users that can help us in the the very early stages of testing a new Xero Add-on.
This could even be on the one payslipIs there any add on in Xero that can help with thisThanksMark Harding
I had to contact Xero Support to find this out so thought I would add the answer I received to the forum in case it can help others, especially over the Christmas period.
Therefore, I was wondering if you could help me in understanding what add-ons can be attached to Xero to make it more flexible to suit the company’s needs now and in the future.
Can anyone recommend an Add-on or App integrated with Xero that will help him for this?
HelloWe are a wholesale garment/embroidery screen-printing apparel Business who use Xero, please could you advise the best add-in to help us with tracking purchase orders, sales, scheduling internal work flow & tracking our orders (once they have been shipped via freight companies & Australia Post).
##### CLUSTER 134 #####
Can the batch payment report please list the payments in the order they are in the batch?
Is there a report available that shows the Batch Payment made ands the individual items that make up that total.
There is no report where this information can be obtained easily, and it is necessary to go into Auto super payment batches to work this out.
Then I would print a report showing what was sitting approved & prepared for payment so Managment can make the final call on how much and who is to be paid.
where is a receipt of lodgement for the whole payment summaries, where is the audit trail report, where is some evidence that you can print or save that its been done.
##### CLUSTER 135 #####
My question is when entering creditors invoices at conversion which account to I choose?
However, when I create invoices for my clients, I charge them travel expenses at 50p / mile and I have started booking this income to the same ‘Travel - National’ account.
Please consider adding a field column for the customer account number to the screen where all invoices are listed.
Or see all payments or invoices together rather than mixed up with other account activity?
If this linked to the supplier account and then simply listed the outstanding invoices, you can easily select which ones you are paying and allocate accordingly.
However when importing sales invoices there is still no account number field on the CSV template.
This could also provide more flexibility for companies / organisations who have multiple departments, brands, or account managers, and they want to provide a more tailored email conversation with their clients when it comes to quotes & invoices.
It is an account for an event which we have sent invoices to request a float from various customers.
Can I some how reconcile these known 5xxxx invoices to an account type that will be ignored generally?
And why can't it be easier to receive payments for multiple invoices or payments on account?
##### CLUSTER 136 #####
I'd like to fix both these problems but worry about what harm removing/voiding those invoices could do.
For long reports like the aged payables/ receivables showing invoices are getting REALLY long when printed Can you have a look at 'tightening' up the PDF reports please.
I'd like to have a total on the All tab (Invoices & Bills) for the items listed after doing a search (like the total on the other tabs) as well as a Total column so you can see the Total, Paid and Due amount for invoices.
I would like the app to have the same dashboard access so I can see how much I owe and what I am owed and be able to reconcile invoices when they are paid.
I'm in dispute with someone who owes us money and would like a copy of the covering notes I put on the emails that accompany his emailed invoices.
We are a service provider so our invoices would say something like "Supply and installation of.
##### CLUSTER 137 #####
Id really appreciate hearing back from anyone who can tell me a fast way to invoice in xero.
Is there a way for me to print/email those per invoice in Xero?
Unfortunately Xero only enables us to have one contact per business- is there any way we can invoice individual contacts?
Is there a way to stop exports or simply take this feature out of xero for the invoice only profile?
Is there a way I can do this within Xero without saving the invoice as a pdf and sending manually.
Is there a way to set up an invoice number and then have Xero automatically use the next number.
##### CLUSTER 138 #####
Does anyone know if one of the add-ons can do this?
Does anyone have any suggestions for how better to automate this process - do you know of any add ons that may do it?
Does anyone know what I would add for an asset I intend to depreciate over 15 yrs/ 180 months?
Does anyone know what add-ons I can use to do this?
Does anyone know of an inventory management add-on that would be suitable for a small book publisher?
Does anyone know of an add-on that can track Marketing costs by property?
Does anyone know of such an add-on that we could look at?
##### CLUSTER 139 #####
I'd like to be able to see what these are but I can't seem to find a way to do this.
What is the best way to deal with a transaction like this?
I can appreciate that this is difficult to manage; as the banks would have their own systems and implementation of the data feed service - but is there any way that obvious things like this could be corrected?
Personally I'd like to hear everything my clients say about my business, that way I can always improve on my service.
I would like some advice as to the best way to do this, which reports etc.
What we'd like to see, is a way to use a USB barcode scanner to manually input the Item Code.
I would like to change the day I do pays from a sunday, to the next tuesday (and then every tuesday fortnight after that)What is the best way to do this?
Wish there was a way to do RTI notifications adhoc like our existing payroll solution!
We are looking at Zapier as an integration tool - would like suggestions of any others or best way to approach this
##### CLUSTER 140 #####
Hi Everyone,This may have been answered before, but I have am looking for software that automatically invoices companies on a monthly basis.
Hi, I am in Sydney, Australia and I am working as an employee for a company and I also work as a consultant for other companies and I have ABN and send invoices.
hi, is there an option to check sales invoices that show the gst amount in the price?
Hi GuysSimilar to what is available for Customer Invoices, it would be fantastic if you could include an attachment with an emailed Purchase Order.
Hi everyone,I am wondering why I can't set up my invoices and quote on Inclusive.
Hi,I'm the treasurer for a small Australian charity that uses some overseas services, one of which charges us in advance in USD whenever our balance gets low, and then issues invoices based on our hourly usage at the end of each month.
Hi all,I will process some invoices, and sometimes go a few days or a week before printing or emailing them.
HI all, I have a client who is wanting to widen the first description column on their invoices.
Hi All,How on Earth do I reconcile international invoices in local dollars?
Hi,I sent a number of invoices out on 1/4/2016 & unfortunately I incorrectly typed the email address which should have resulted in an immediate bounce back.
##### CLUSTER 141 #####
I already have a gazillion calendars and spreadsheets and ganntcharts I just want the ability to print this  without buying more add-ons Pretty Please Xero?
Xero already has:- contact- quotation ("soon")- accounting- file storage- purchase orderSo why not just add new feature "CRM" using all those above?
Dear Xero, At present I can only email a remittance, please add the option to print it also as its very annoying having to email it to myself just so I can print it.
I was just wondering how many contacts/ 'customers' I can add in Xero?
Our company is just changing over from MYOB to Xero with Simpro add on.
Please make this an add on or just switch it on for everybody so international contractors can use Xero at a fair price.
##### CLUSTER 142 #####
It does not need to be subtracted again on the balance sheet.
Why does the expense capture need to be behind an app-level PIN?
does this info flow to shopify or do i need to duplicate data?
The system does need to go back to the "here's your 40 question test" method rather than this nightmare 30-section "curriculum".
If the employee does not work 5 days then the processor need to remember what hours that part time employee works each day in order to adjust the leave back to the correct amount of hours.
##### CLUSTER 143 #####
Could we please have the option to add a budget column to our cash flow report?
Please add the Tax ID information to the Sales Tax Audit Report.
Please can you add this field to this report and other reports?
Please add a column to the VAT detail report to show the contact (customer/ supplier).
Is it possible to add more report mapping codes?
OR Add an option that gets a Tracking Report against Any/All GL Codes.
In the report fields that you can add to notes etc, there is one for current year.
We can run a profit and loss by tracking category in the new reports, it would be great if you can do this in the report templates - ie add multiple P&L reports, each for a different tracking category.
Please add "Tracking Category" to the Inventory Item Details report.
Please add Tracking Category as Display options: Column and Group By, to the new Inventory Item Details report.
Please add the functionality of Report Packs to global organisations.
At the moment I can only see a report where if there are 3 payslips within 1 month, I have to add 3 amounts per employee to get that employee's super payable for the month.
Can you please add for NZ Payroll in the Payroll Activity Details Report.
Is there a report or an Add On to Complete Certified Payroll Reporting for Davis Bacon Projects?
Client needs an add-on that helps them to capture a report and photo's for each property that they do an inspection on.
##### CLUSTER 144 #####
I would like to have a links on the dashboard that enables me run my report that is specific to what I want to view.
I am running this report on a specific item and date range and I'd like to see what the starting balance is before all the movements occur.
I would like to run a report to make sure I haven't missed assigning any of them to a customer.
Like putting the Notes in the same page with trial balance/profit loss, or better yet hide the notes in the report?
My client would like to be able to see a weekly report that details the sales for each day so that they can track the daily trend across each week.
Specifically what we would like to see is:1) Give a checkbox option a the top to include "QTY" field in report.
I would like to see a Trust Distribution report showing how the profit for the year has been distributed to beneficiaries - for a trust.
In payroll reports I would like to see a report similar to one that can be created in IMS payroll.
I would like to be able to print a payroll employee report that I can use to check the input of the new employee by other staff.
I would like to be able to look at overall hours and or/cost of labour for one job, in one place, and preferably with the rest of the costs associated with that job in a profit loss report.
What I find is the Income by Contact report includes other things like Capital input and Drawings and also has no comparison.
##### CLUSTER 145 #####
I can add a footer to all the other pages, just not the cover page and contents.
Add a feature which required users to set up a contact details in full (by making them use the contact details screen) rather than just adding them on the fly - this will encourage proper details to be added , including default nominal code for better accuracy.
There's an easy fix -- in CSS, just add  to the  object, and this problem is .
kind of seems a bit silly seeing as I end up on the same screen 'add purchase' and have just navigated from the image in my online folder.
Alternatively you can just add the details yourself when entering a discuss.
I have a client who is a milk man just wondering if anyone can advise on a good add on to handle customer orders and manage stock levels ?
I was just wondering if anyone has had any experience with any Xeo Add-ons that have allowed them to use these functions, and if so which ones would you recommend?
##### CLUSTER 146 #####
I would suggest if there was a button providing an option to export when you click in to each individual invoice (like the button to download the PDF version) as is the case in other areas of Xero it would be very popular with businesses that have large customers who want that level of automation.
We would like to settle our monthly Xero Invoice with an American Express Card.
Perform lots of time saving actions like creating an invoice in Xero from a Zendesk ticket, check out .
I run a small school and would like something where clients can enrol online on my website and then I can invoice them etc using Xero.
When I create an invoice in Clio, it shows up in Xero like clockwork (albeit with a short time-lag).
##### CLUSTER 147 #####
Hi There, Can xero please add automatic leave reminder send to their employer?
Hi Xero peeps,Anybody using any calendar/billing add-ons suitable for Chiropractors in Australia - ?
Hi,is there anyone in this group who is familiar of any Add-On for "FINANCIAL CONSOLIDATION" that works well with Xero?
Hi I have a small business (2 employees) that require a CRM add on for XERO as we both work from home.
Hi,We are looking for an Xero-add on that keeps track of consumable inventory.
Hi there,I have a small Plumbing Business looking to move to Xero if there is an add- on that will import and keep updated the Plumbing Supplies Price List for their invoicing needs, can anyone recommend ?
Hi EveryoneI am looking for an add on to Xero that can cater for a couple of Stock level tracking.
Hi,I was wondering if anyone knows of a good add on program for Xero for a freight logistics company that I have.
##### CLUSTER 148 #####
I would like to know if possible and if not can it be added.
I dont believe we can achieve the above outcome with the current user profile settings etc, but please let me know if I am mistaken (I would like to be corrected!
We would like to know how to do this in the above scenario?
I'd like to know how to do the following1.
(I know it's unlikely, but I want bases covered before I do something rash and irreversible - like destroy a source document!
Support have identified the problem for some users and I would like to know when it will be fixed.
##### CLUSTER 149 #####
of us would like to bring the Remittance advice into line with the other custom branding theme items we've created - Remittance advice is the missing upload option in the custom branding themes stable - please add it!
Example: I'd like to sell these items at 10% markup and when adding the item instead of having to do math for each and every one, I can simply enter the desired percentage to add.
So I would like the option to add a new currency for the peso so I can enter the exchange rates manually.
This one hasn't arrived yet, so I would like to add it to the (long) list of revisions needed please.
So please do continue to add your votes and comments on what you’d like to see next.
I would like some recommendations as to an add-on(s) to use for the same purpose.
We do a lot of project work, I would like a add-on that has a great estimation/quote feature.
What do you like / dislike most about WFM or your favourite add-on?
##### CLUSTER 150 #####
Hi Does Xero have any reports planned in this area?
Hi, When using Xero from my Android tablet, clicking "Export Batch File" does not appear to do anything.
Hi, Does anyone have experience in managing holiday lets in Xero.
Hi, How does xero calculate the following: Hair and Beauty Industry Award 2010.
Hi HMRC have advised that it is ok to change last years payrol so long as the system we use is capable of: -‘Earlier Year Update’ Does Xero have this ability?
Hi Does anyone have experience of using Xero with Ebay trading.
##### CLUSTER 151 #####
Any questions please let me know this would help me very much.
Yes I know there are guides on the "help" site, but unfortunately, I am unable to comprehend them and they don't really demonstrate how the system functions.
However, I don't know what its intended purpose is and can't find an explanation in the HELP anywhere.
I have spoken to Tradify about this and they know it's an issue but can't help.
Please let me know what you can do to help me with this issue.
##### CLUSTER 152 #####
It would be useful if we could run a report which shows average days to pay by customer.
Currently I run the Payroll Activity Details report before I post the payroll so I can check what has gone through in that pay run.
When we do a Pay Run report, there is no column for the hours worked, only the totals of earnings, tax, super, etc.
I have to manually edit the report by adding in the credit notes and deducting their value to show how much the client needs to now pay that supplier.
Can anyone tell me what report I can run that will show me both the hours paid, and the leave accruals for each pay period?
##### CLUSTER 153 #####
Hi there,Please can you tell me where the information for the 'references' (on the invoices and the merge field code 'reference) comes from on Xero?
Hi thereI have a customer who is not receiving their invoices automatically from Xero.
Hi,Recently Xero has been very very slow at switching between companies, printing invoices, moving between tabs, clicking on buttons etc.
Hi everyone,our German company wants to start using xero, but it is highly problematic that you can't send reminders for overdue sales invoices.
Hi There,We don't send invoices to clients from XERO so they do not appear as 'SENT'.
##### CLUSTER 154 #####
Because a screenshot can help you see a problem faster, why not make it possible to add one when submitting a support request?
Are there any add-on soltutions that anyone has come across that can be used to help.
Are there any add-ons or tutorials that help with this?
Are there any add-ons that can help?
Can anyone help with a good add on for UK payroll?
Is there any add on that could help in keeping track of timesheeting & invoicing?
If there is an add on or Developer out there with any help I would appreciate it Carlo Explore Engage Enjoy
##### CLUSTER 155 #####
Hi there,The tax year (UK) is almost finished and I've made enough profit to pay myself (sole director and shareholder) some more dividends.
Hi there,I am claiming the tax-free threshold for an employee, but it is still showing tax to deduct in the pay-run.
Hi,I pay wages monthly and am unable to finalise our June payrun until 29th or 30th June.
Hi, we have a casual employee receiving 8% holiday pay each week but has now terminated employment and is asking why she is not receiving the 30hours annual leave showing in balances on her payslip.
Hi , an employee wants to cash out his balance of holiday pay, how can I do it?
Hi there,Can you please tell me how to pay a bonus?
##### CLUSTER 156 #####
I would like to know if there some french users to discuss the way they use the tool.
Does this account need to be closed at the end of the year?
Dear Xero team, Please add more condition options to the Find and Recode tool, such as, but not limited to- Contact Group- Invoice Created Date
Do I need to select "Payables" account while creating vendor account in Xero?
We need to accept and hold balances of BTC / XBT in our business but I don't know if I can somehow make it work with Xero.
HelloI've watched the Xero videos and read quote a bit of the help files, and I can't resolve my questions regarding customisation of the P&L reports:- Can I reorder some of the accounts in the P&L to something other than alpha?
We are getting a US based accountant set up to help but its taking a little while and I just wondered if anyone could give me some advise now?
Please can someone help me with the easiest way to unreconcile large number of bank transactions ?
I have an invoice for fuel which appears on my bank statements but not on my Xero bank statements, so I can reconcile it.
So if you have an expense in there that you don’t know where it should be and it has been in your bank account, this is not the way to do it.
We can go back to your bank statements and bank accounts and reconcile just three items.
Sometimes it is required to pay through a faster payment service rather through a normal three day acl/baccs payment could this be selectable please.
So should the payments into the account remain when importing the credit card transactions or there is another way to handle this ?
I currently receive 2 different income streams:- advisory- finance commissionsHow do I set it up so that I can "tag" Square invoices in each of these categories so that when they are received through Xero they are recognised as two different items so that I can reconcile them to two different revenue accounts?
Hi I have made payments to a supplier from the directors personal account, but am unsure how to reconcile the invoices off?
I need to update my accounts urgently but don t know how to go aheadI went to the guide but what I have on my screen is different than what I should have per the guidePlease help me asapthanks a lot
2ndly i have already AUD account and i used to reconcile statement lines, but now we have start importing and we pay in USD, my question is Can i add my USD bank statement into same account and if yes than what i can do with Realised gain and loss while converting AUD to USD.
Do I just issue a second/duplicate payment like normal?
Hi, How do I record the WHT held by customer when they pay our invoice?
Hi,I am a new user to Xero and still in trial, so keen to see if I can get it to do everything I need it to.
I saw an app called MileIQ which seems to do the recording of the data, so I need something like this, which I can integrate with Xero or Receipt Bank and then figure out how to get this recognised in the right way.
My confusion (and please bear with me because I'm still in school for accounting) is that this still leaves an "unpaid" balance in the Promotional Expense - Groupon account that will eventually have to be zeroed out, but I can't figure out how to do that without affecting income, which it shouldn't because Groupon took the money as a fee instead of my client having to pay it on an invoice.
Although we are aware we can set up the bank feeds for these accounts, we want to know whether we can import the transactions for the last 2 years from MYOB bearing in mind the way MYOB creates the transactions relating to foreign currency accounts?
If I search in my account in xero for those invoice numbers nothing shows up.
Is there a way to print off the Trial Balance with out having the transactions pre-April 30, 2017 affecting the account balances?
Can I export all my accounts put a track on them and then import them back into Xero or should I just wait till 01/07/17 and start from there.
However, if I buy a single book to read and check whether it could be a potential item to be sold, does that still go into the COGS account or would it be a direct expense?
Thank you in advance for any help or tips you can offer.
As there was no cash payment from Trust B to Trust A, there is no cash to collect to offset the accounts receivable balance.
What accounts should I setup for handling the tips before reconciling?
Hi there,Is there any way to to create an account receivable not linked to a sale.
When I click on the name of the bank in the dropdown menu, nothing happens - i. e. Xero does not pick up the bank name and open up the connection so I can enter my account details.
How can I make sure that the VAT Return submitted to HMRC accounts for the advance and so does not trigger a request for payment of the full amount?
How do I let Xero know this is not a new company without bringing over all the paid invoices from Wave?
Can you please help me with the journal entries for advertising expense payment made by the head office on behalf of the branch .
I can then reconcile these transactions but I am left with hundreds of unreconciled bank transactions, unrelated to my business.
Hi Just need to find out is there anyone out there using Xero for law firm accounting ?
00 and how do I just pay vat on a purchase so the vat returns will show I paid 2691 vatThanks a million in advanceJohn
Is there a way of migrating these subscriptions, or do we need to manually amend - add into xero then stop the paypal subscription for that customer?
The Retained Earnings account is a system account as far as I know, so how do I go about changing it with a journal?
Is there any way to specify which G/L accounts appear in the report, or which transaction types (ie, NOT 'Manual Journals')?
Hello,I have a receive money on my bank reconcilation screen that is a refund from a supplier that I would like to allocate off other invoices from this supplier, the find and match option is not working.
He pays for the goods before they arrive in Australia,How can we record the invoice in Xero so we can have an up to date bank reconciliation ANDrecord the items but not in the inventory account because the goods are on the shelf yet, AND then when the goods are in the store transfer into the inventory account.
I was thinking it would be great to add my personal bank accounts and CCs to Xero so they can be easily tracked and maintained.
Hi there, Just wondering if anyone has any pointers on converting a MYOB FirstEdge V4 on Mac file to Xero.
Would I reconcile by attaching bank statement amounts as split payments to  any invoice or is there another way.
I would like to ask why a customers over payment can not be left as a credit on their account.
After weeks of trying to get to the bottom of this and talking to people at Yodlee, FIS, Xero and Seacoast I have come to the conclusion that until Xero gets in a position where it can get banks to direct connect which will never happen until they get the third parties like FIS to direct connect first, that its not a platform that you can be comfortable assuming that you are going to have a feed.
This is what I don't understand, creating additional sales invoices does not sit right in my mind unless there is something that Xero does behind the scenes to correct this?
I have two accounts set up in Xero as 'bank accounts'1.
This does not happen consistently, just sporadically, and can be replicated across different browsers, and on an ipad as opposed to a PC, using Chrome.
I have banked the money and am making payments to the artists via bank transfer, but I don't really know how to properly log all of this in Xero as it isn't how we usually operate.
Hi,What is the best way in Xero to change the sales account on bulk invoices and credits notes.
Do I go back and change every sales invoice so that it goes to the sales ledger control account and if I do what happens when the invoice is paid does xero automatically change the account to sales on the invoice.
However they often do not match exactly to a certain number of invoices, can you part allocate a payment to an invoice, leaving a remaining balance to clear off with the next invoice.
I have since discovered by my own research that there is a section in the supplier contact file that now (for some unknown reason) includes our company name on some of my suppliers (I didn't enter this info as our company name is spelled incorrectly as must have been a behind-the-scenes change to xero), and this is what is preventing the invoice number displaying on the audit report.
Is there any way to enter Accounts Receivable/Payable balances without entering all the invoices?
I do have a question tho:We are an insurance agency and receive all payments (commissions) directly to our bank account without submitting an invoice.
Does anyone have any experience here that would help us?
I have just registered one to see if it works and the first problem I see is that it does not give me the option to change the net book value to reflect what has been already depreciated, so when I try to run the depreciation it does not give me the correct figure.
Do you know if there is a way to change my Inventory Account Type from Inventory to Asset?
Essentially we are a UK charity that has been awarded a grant - i need it to show as going into our account as a grant from the funder and then going out again not he same day to pay for their services however the money never physically changes hands so there is nothing to import - is there a way to create a statement line?
The trouble is that when they make payment, obviously the super is not included so it does not match my invoice.
What do I need to do in Xero to account for this VAT only element so the it is accurately recorded in the VAT return?
Hi,I have run the VAT reconciliation report for year end and realised there is a difference on the VAT account.
hi there,is there a way of exporting a quote/invoice from one xero account to another?
Please add button in contact , and also allow me to export a report , so i could run a report each month .
Hi, somehow I've edited the FBT in my chart of accounts and want to put it back as it should be, can someone please tell me should the FBT be under Liabilities, current liability in chart of accounts?
Can anyone please help with where I set this account up in my chart of accounts.
So when i link that bank account with XERO, and say for example there are only 4 transactions in a particular day, 3 of them are in one currency, 1 is in otheer currency, So how XERO will recognise that ?
Refreshing the feed does not seem to help either.
- Is there a way to add a note onto the invoice to reflect that the supply is subject to the reverse charge or should this be done manually each time?
Or Xero just add "Period" to the system, then you can really help Accountants.
As I have over a hundred inventory items to track, and as the cost of goods sold accounts does not show the exact inventory items which have been allocated to the account, but rather only the relevant invoice, I am unable to go back and fix this (I don't know which inventory items on the invoice got allocated and which got delayed.
htmlI know there is a method to use Xero for this kind of accounting - there is even a section in the help centre to address this - but I wanted to know if anyone has investigated the regulatory requirements are met by Xero?
We want to split out the cost of insurance from the rental cost - can we just leave this as exempt from VAT or do we need to account for IPT in a customer invoice?
How do I create this on the Xero invoice and invoice stationery to clearly show the different payment dates to customers?
Do I need to enable payment to that account?
I need them to all be under the one account called Telephone so that I can then delete the other account from my chart of accounts.
I cannot fathom how your bank system works, but it's creating chaos here, and because I can't talk to you it is deeply deeply stressful, I have a client here telling me I’m a ****, and I can't explain to him why the software is speaking bollox to me, I literally do not know what to do expect re-input a whole year using a proper accounts package that works.
Summarizing: transfer a single payment into two accounts and also allocate an extra bank fee (charged into main account).
Is it best to list all these purchases/expenses as separate invoices so they can be entered in the correct accounting area, eg advertising, cost of sales, equipment etc - or should I keep a separate list elsewhere (not in Xero) and just add one amount as "owner's loan" to get started?
Should I make a custom Chart of Accounts label for it, or does this have a specific code already?
Hi All,I have a bank statement line that is showing as not reconciled, but when I look in the account transactions tab it is reconciled.
We do not use Xero Payroll I am am trying to understand how best to account for the payments to providers and track the salary sacrifice "the hard way" :)I have found several resources online that talk about using agencies but none that show clearly how to account for it directly.
Xero is posting all transactions to Sales Tax control Account.
What document do I create here and how do I reconcile these transactions later since there is no actual payment to the bank account anymore.
My TB does not balance because of bank/AR foreign currency revaluation in Xero.
When we add their invoices to Xero, do we select "Tax Exclusive" or "No Tax"?
For e. g. suppose i need to adjust 2 extra piece of size S against 2 short pieces of Size L. Please note i do not want to opt for new adjustment under the inventory as Xero does not allow me to edit the stock adjustment once made.
Need help in how to deal with a direct debit payment received on a sale invoice that is later reversed by the customer.
I know I can just JE them out, but how do I get them to stop showing up on Xero's reconciliation report?
Does any of these modern "banks", like Entropay or Neteller, etc, have some direct feed to Xero?
Clearly it does not go under Liabilities but it is not Revenue or Assets either - how should I reconcile this in my Xero accounts?
What are the rules with regard to bank feeds, does it only update for the previous days transactions?
I am comfortable with the idea of reconciling a payment from Stripe in my bank account with an invoice.
Hello all,I am working for a Not For Profit and need our account reports ordered in a certain way for regulator reporting.
There must be a simple way to record 'Cash expenses" or expenses paid with "personal funds/accounts"  as a sole trader in Xero I had cashflow manager and it had a simple option you either placed the expense in the "Bank" Or "Cash" Column.
The problem I have run into is that my guests might have a meal which is run through the till one evening, but pay for it the next day, so the sales will appear on day one, but the payment will be on the 'invoice' for day to, so that invoice is a negative.
Others I find do not seems to have the quarantine processing charge and declaration processing charge explained (sorry if I have missed it) I attach my original Invoice and what I have entered so far, obviously blank in some places and my best effort in other lines (please let me know if you see mistakes)Essentially need to know how to treat the Quarantine Processing charge and Declaration Processing charge as seem to be exempt from GST on invoice.
To me it's common sense that it should be possible, but can Xero actually do transactions like this?
add a file/document in bank reconcilation to a payment like you can in invoicing
Can  you please confirm the most appropriate accounts code for the consultant's invoice?
I cannot do a journal to the accounts to transfer the amounts to retained earnings as the account does not appear it will not let you allocate anything to it.
note I don't really have any way to directly bank cash to my business bank account. )
Is there a way to record my payment of the bills that I can pick up and attach to an invoice to the tenant?
Is there a way that I could report transactions using the budget line items of the grant?
To run depreciation for the periods between Xero start date and current date does this post to the general ledger depreciation accounts?
Is there a way I can update the exchange rate that Xero uses for the day the payment was made?
I am just doing my first reconciliation and wanted to ask if I can use PayPal payment transaction details saved through PayPal website account (like in website browser you can select to print as PSF, whatever you can see on the screen) or do I actually have to use the original invoice from a company that I have purchased the goods from?
Just in the process of preparing our accounts from our first year of using Xero.
Hi,When I make a re-payment to the credit card I can see the transaction line in the bank feed.
What is the cost to have the current Xero account sit dormant with no new transactions only journal entries ( cease using payroll altogether except for EOFY reporting)?
How does the GST work on Xero: my returns are every 6 months and I paid all I owed to IRD from a personal/savings account (not on Xero).
Hi there,Currently we have a situation where one customer over the course of a month can make 100 transactions into the bank account with each transaction having a potential GST amount attached that differs to 15%.
Whilst xero does what we need it is very labour intensive .
So far, it looks like any donation I receive has to be deposited into a bank account.
When I run the sales tax report in Xero it is debiting all the spend money transactions that I coded as "No Tax" from the tax exempt gross total, which is throwing that amount way off.
Hi, sorry I'm new to this Xero and just learning as I go but could someone please advise if the amounts on the General Ledger are Inclusive or Exclusive of GST?
Could you help me with which account should I put to?
There does not seem to be a way to do this in Xero, other than manually entering mileage when invoices are issued.
However my Profit and Loss does not show any of these transactions as expensed.
I cannot work out how to do this in my account, could you please help me, it looks like some features are missing compared to the V. A. T FAQs I see in your website.
Hi AllAnyone know if there is any way to set minimum payment thresholds for outgoing invoices or in the details of suppliers?
For invoice, customers can pay in advance just like bank transfer, or pay by installment.
Since we don't know which 'middle' bank took the fees during the wire, how can I account for the missing amount paid.
(I could only find a prepayments expense account in COA, do I need to create a Prepayments Liability account?
This I understand Xero can handle, however we would like to be able to report on the profitability of each job (or sales invoice).
65When I have created this invoice in Xero, it just states everything in USD and doesn't do any conversion anywhere on the invoice of the GST amount to NZD.
Or can I just mark the invoice as paid and enter in the date paid and which account it was paid from?
I am the financial controller for 3 businesses who does everything from monthly accounts to the end of year accounts and I would love it if Xero made the workpapers available to businesses, not just accounting practices.
Does anyone know where I can find a template of chart of accounts for travel agency business or some key accounts for this type of business industry?
I have a couple of payments that I can't reconcile in xero due to the fact that there are differences between the value in the xero transaction, versus what actually left my bank.
Is there a way to enter a bill from a current liability account instead of the default accounts payable account?
Greetings,After reconciling a bank account, is there a way to view the reconciled transactions with the accounts posted to?
In QuickBooks, in Account Transactions or the General Ledger, it shows the accounts that were used in the transactions.
Do I now need to add in company receipts and invoices paid to bills, or am I just repeating the process that reconciling does?
If it does go into the Prepayment Assets account should 'enable payments to this account' be ticked ON?
How do I pay an invoice through a bank transfer?
I know how to reconcile the payment with the transfer from one bank account to the other.
I need help with making the invoice do what I need it to do.
Hi, How do you add shipping in an invoice?
Also I would like to ask in the chart of account the donation of products will go under.
Timely also has the functionality to generate invoices that flow through to Xero, and has a checkout function whereby you can enter the payments and payment method with a "reference".
If it does give me a transaction number, do I need to enter this in to the reference field on the invoice so that when PayPal syncs with Xero, it can establish with transactions are related to each other and reconcile that they are all 100% completed and paid?
I'd like to be able to issue a tax receipt that lists all activity on a customer's account for a given time period -- but with all items shown (rather than just invoices) as this needs to be clear for tax purposes (for instance, school fees can't be claimed, but tuition can-- so we HAVE to itemize statements).
How should I set up Xero so when I pay sales taxes on goods purchased for resale I can see those amounts on my sales tax report and properly deduct them from my sales tax liability?
I'm wary of just changing the date in the 'match transactions' bit, where the rule matches to the bank statement, I'm sure that can't be the right way to do it, and record this for the future.
So what I would like to know is what codes does everyone else use.
I know in advance the exact amount of USD that I received for that $1 when I sync the invoice to xero.
40 - (Received) - Payment RefundedCan someone please help me on how do I go with coding these transactions?
Should they be coded in the invoice or in separate transactions?
Is there a way I can set/link default asset type to account 720 for an asset I just bought?
I’d like to know what the correct account is for my rental equipment to be allocated to as it obviously affects my P&L.
Hi there,I am looking for help in what the best practice is for issuing invoices for pieces we give to other retailers on consignment.
I have received a payment into my bank account and, it is not relating to any of my open invoices.
Please Xero sort this out URGENTLY as clients who factor some of their invoices need an accurate sales day book to send to the factor companies.
We have to use the new reports as there is no option to sort by account group or account code on the invoices old report.
However according the local GAAP's in m&#233;xico (NIF) I need reclassify the balances negatives in AR as account "cash in advance" but I don't know how make it.
Hi there,I settle an invoice on behalf of the company and I am claiming the amount back, how should I go about recording the transactions in Xero?
So, for example, for a given pay period I might have received $10,000 in revenue and the payroll app indicated I do payroll like this (I'm totally making these numbers up, so don't think about them too much or they won't make sense I'm sure):$7500 in wages$1000 in employer taxes$1000 in income taxesfor a total payroll expense of $9500.
When the wages transaction cleared, Xero can figure out how to add that to the ledger, but how do I account for the tax liability?
When I make an actual payment, presumably Xero would take care of it, and the amounts would wind up in the tax expense accounts, right?
Hi All,I am wondering how others account for Cost of Sale associated to invoices that may be issued ahead of the being invoiced for the CoS?
Does anybody else work in this way, with Xero, or have any suggestions?
Hi Everyone,I am trying to put the supplier bank details in Batch Payment section, but did not how to put the information.
Due to existing system constraint or something, I can't do the below:1/ STEP 1 - 31JUL15 (Accrue for the upcoming invoice)Dr ExpensesCr Accrual2/ STEP 2 - 19AUG15 (Recog liability)Dr AccrualCr Accounts Payable3/ STEP 3 - 20SEP15 (Record Payment)Dr Accounts PayableCr BankIn order to ensure an accurate capture of Foreign exchange difference, I did this:Recog exp in SGD (PCF - CLEARING ACCT) - In Jul15.
I know there is lots of discussion on this topic but most of them seemed to involve downloadable ecommerce report but since this is a physical retail pos environment I'm not sure how to make this work.
Any harm in aggressively splitting up transactions into different accounts like that?
Hello,Just a general question surrounding coding of bank fees and other "Zero Rated" items.
We now have a new ABN and Bank Account, do I need to set up a new Xero file?
Do I just add it as a direct payment?
This causes me problems when I pay suppliers what I think is the total outstanding for a certain month but in reality there are more invoices which need to be paid to clear the account.
IS there a way of tricking Xero into letting me backdate approvals so that the invoices are appearing in the correct month on the AP report.
I am a Chartered Accountant, I love Xero (mostly) yet I cannot for the life of me work out how Xero has arrived at the forex difference because the AR of the invoices I have brought in manually, which has multiple currencies, shows one amount (in the Xero AR report which differs to the take on balance because of the closing currency adjustment) but when I bring in the TB, Xero works out something else and I cannot for the life of me work out why.
Hi,I have paid suppliers however those bank transactions are not appearing in Xero.
If so, how would I import just one transaction & not all transactions from the day?
However, I do not know how to record all the interest payable for the future 5 years in the accounts, though I have my repayment schedule on hand.
Hi all,Does anyone know how you can set the new financial statements so that they round amounts to remove the cents.
They wouldn't need access to any financial data it is just to seek reassurance that it works for that business.
Can you please let us know how to unarchive these accounts?
Is it just me being a Xero novice or is there a way to show a VAT summary table consisting of TaxCode, NetGoodsAmount and TaxTotal on a custom invoice using just the default currency.
I've added all of the transactions needed into the petty cash account - however how do I account for the opening balance?
When They pay I can reconcile the bank with this invoice, I can use the tracking feature to allocate to a particular section, however, I actually need to distribute across various accounts using the above percentages.
My issue is that the sections also need to pay for activities, do I setup an expense account for each of them as well, how does reporting work in this instance (how are the consolidated into an income/expense report?
Hi All,Anyone know why I can't run a Bank Rec Summary for prior months?
Does anyone know how I can get this info in one simple report?
So when a customer make a sale and pay with that credit, how then do we receive a payment for that invoice in xero?
If I have an invoice due from a customer for $20 and they pay me $25, how do I account for this as a tip?
Please add the option to show chart of accounts # on the check voucher.
I know what the agency (Home Away or Holiday Lettings) fee is for that payment.
Hi There,We run a group structure and have about 5-6 companies all with their own Xero accounts, I can easily switch between them as their all in my same Xero account.
Does anyone know how we can do this or an add-on which may help?
In that report is a bank account that is fully reconciled to 30 April 2015, but it has an unreconciled item from, say, May 2015.
I'd like to keep the value of the stock in the inventory account as opposed to expensing it at purchase date, so how can I make the inventory account available, or what would be the proper approach to doing this?
When it comes to doing bank rec I can't make a match as it only recognises NZD or USD billed invoices.
I am assuming I will need to finish of the expense payment process so that these can reconcile to my bank account?
Is there a way to also configure Xero to respect the 5,000 limit and notify me when we approach it so that I can pay up the oldest invoices?
Essentially I went to pay the balance for both invoices combined in one payment from my bank, but there is a 10k limit on each transfer.
Hi,On the account transactions the status column has the word "reconciled" which can be green or black.
I just add 499500 Shares to the business, could you let me know how to introduced these in the business with a manual journal entry please?
Hi all,I'm in the process of importing all of our inventory items into Xero to do away with an inventory add-on, seeing as the Xero inventory now does what we need it to, and after preparing the template file as per the instructions, when I try to upload it gives me an error message for every line saying "630 is not an inventory account" or words to that effect.
Or do I have to create a new account (in my previous accounts package it was 1002 near Stock so perhaps 600-700 in Xero)?
It does not work like accounting is made to work.
What is the best way to record these transactions in the limited company accounts?
Is this possible in Xero or an add on to xero.
My question is, do I start with these bills first and get the account into "negativ", or should i wait for the payment to reach my bank account and then reconcile in xero to be in "positive" numbers and then add the bills after that.
HelloI have just Converted a Client accounts from QB Online to Xero (he is from Australia).
Does anyone know how I can do something like that in Xero?
Hi there, I am recording transactions for a small business that make hundreds of transactions per month.
Can anyone tell me what the actual bank account format should be for Suppliers financial details in Xero ieBank      branch                     Account               Suffix02           0401                       0832103                014How many digits per section please.
Also, when I am in the Detailed Account transactions report, and I go into a transaction to edit it, I can't get back to the original report without navigating back through all the menu levels.
Hi guysI've just purchased a new Surface Pro 3 for the business but I've done so in a way that I'm not sure how to record the purchase in Xero.
The problem with this is that there is no way to link the bill to the invoice so there there is no quick way to see who has been refunded and who has not.
Do I need to set a tax rate on the actual account if I set tax rate for the item or can I just leave it at zero?
What is the best way to reconcile numerous client invoices to one single payment transfer from the DD bureau?
Xero could solve this problem by introducing an "Account" column when viewing Account transactions in banking view.
What is the easiest way to adjust the bank account and the liability account?
If this is the intended behavior, it is quite an oversight, as many Xero add-ons use clearing accounts to post invoice/bill payments.
I get the impression the Chart of Accounts for US Xero users is different than what NZ Xero users see.
Please help--I can't think that other people don't need to make journal entries effecting checking accounts!
Very occasionally, a customer does not need one of the components so I then add a second invoice line to make a deduction of -£1.
I have literally many thousands of individual transactions like this that I don't need to deal with and they are simply in the way.
Hi,Anyone can help me to export Fixed Asset invoice list?
When we put the figure into xero it is just a total, when payment is made it is bulk so 1500 customers pay $80,000 but a day later a hand full may decline.
Hi allAnd so my Xero mission continuesI have a Paypal bank acnt on my dashboard for my online sales.
Does anyone know if there are api links ( I think that's what you call it- when different software talks to each other) that would make it possible to extras the clarity invoice into Xero Regards Graeme Murrayglasgow
Also, what is the user flow from business checking account to end distribution (seems like multiple steps from what I gather)?
I'm currently using InvoiceSherpa so that my clients can make partial payments, but this really should be an option directly from their Xero invoices, without an add-on.
Is there any possibility of including the bank charges in a column when setting off the customer invoices with their payments?
This means that I have to record $2000 of invoices in Xero, and then manually mark them as paid because I need to print the invoice off to give to the customer.
I would like to see all the invoices in the embedded link as my clients invoices have pdf attachments to them each,can anyone help or advise me pleaseI am stumped :(
I have already reconciled all the transactions from our bank and added rules etc as well both balances bank and Xero are equal, Today I wanted to add the old invoices by creating them on Xero and uploading the physical invoice as well (documents) just to have everything on Xero (i. e. in one place), but when doing so I couldn't point the invoice to a reconciled transaction and say that was the payment for this invoice (connect them), or these 2 transactions are payment for this old invoice.
where do I go in xero to credit the liability account for the montly payment, and then how do i reconcile that against the bank account that is debited each month?
What i would like to do is link the base transactions for disbursements to the Invoice I create so i can run a report to show what costs have been recovered in which invoice and which are outstanding so i do not miss any nor over charge.
We have found an un-reconciled bank receipt which should be a bank payment - however I am unsure what the best approach is to correct this.
Would really appreciate any help / tips / advice.
Hi there,Does anyone know if we can group the tracking options?
Hi there:My bank account is connecting with bank on 20/08/2014.
I want to know how can I add money to petty cash without transfer from my real bank?
We can't do a bank transfer because the bank accounts belong to only the related organization.
Hi allI just discovered that I am doing something that may be incorrect and need advice.
Is there any possibility in Xero or via add-on to download a range or accounts at once?
We have just purchased a new vehicle and I would like some help with the journal entry pleasePurchase price of the vehicle is $17,000Fees total $702 (included in loan)Loan value total payable is $18,964 with the interest part being $1,262.
I need to match up a transaction in my bank account (for the money that actually came in at settlement) to what is being booked as the sale.
A pompous accountant gave me an advice, and I don't know what he means/ how to implement it in xero, please help:I presume the £2000 cost of goods sold last month is for stock of items, if so normally you would put this entry to the balance sheet under stock and transfer the items to the income line as they are sold.
Business Card 2 feed came in great, created rules and posted all expenses perfectlyBank of America however has an overall Corporate account that really just tracks business card 1 and business card 2 so you can't really "FEED" in this account.
I know there are a number of ways to enter a recurring payments but is there one efficient method for this example:Let's say we pay a cleaner $90 weekly but sometimes the interval might be 2 or 3 weeks so it is not strictly weekly.
A bit like a Memorised transaction that can be called upon every so often saving you the effort involved going through the ACCOUNTS-PURCHASES-NEW BILL or IMPORT a BILL CSV.
I need recurring invoices; any add-on is acceptable; what can I use?
The problem I am having in Xero is that the debit/credit card payments money that comes into my bank account from PayPal is grouped from hundreds of small businesses and there is no way to tell how much originates from which small business by using the PayPal download.
What is the best way to do this and what accounts and account type should I create?
I'm interested to know why my company's ABN does not display on the online version of invoice to my customer?
Does there exist a plugin for UBL invoices in Xero?
Hi,I was wondering if there is a way to transfer the whole bank account details and transactions from one organisation to another in XERO.
I wonder if there is any other add-on that can help me pay the bills or at least let me export a remittance file.
Hi Masters of XeroIn the report layout, I know you can move account from one group to another.
However, can / should I add this same account to my wifes' Xero profile?
New client does NOT have online banking; how do I add their bank info from a pdf?
I know I can see the account details per individual, but how do I create a report that would show me how the residential program is doing month to month?
when we paid for my client electricity bill or groceries , should we create new chart of account in expense or simply created other receivable account, i don't want this kind of transaction affect my profit & lost report, please help ?
I'm brand new to Xero, and have tried coding the WHT to the PAYE GL account, however when I look at the PAYE, the amount of WHT does not appear on the report.
My question is, how do I account for these additional invoices on Xero?
Is there a way to edit the invoice layout  which is sent to clients so they only see a summary of what is entered into Xero's New Invoice section, rather than each line item?
In a discussion about CC's being banks and listed as assets, one person responded that you can move the accounts around in the report section.
I found a payment in my bank statement which didn't match any invoices.
How do we transfer the current invoices in our xero accountsThanks for your help
bank charges or gas / electricity payments debited the bank on the 2nd April - these transactions are not in the opening balances as they have been accounted for in the year to 5th April 2013.
I see the over payment appears as receivables, so I am guessing the bank account balance is accurate and that I am ok to proceed like that is the case, but I would like to be sure.
Further, some accounts on the TB don't show up on the GL report detail.
Is there any way I can print a full ledger report for profit & loss accounts only?
Is there a way in Xero to allocate the amount back to that invoice while still showing the two banking transactions?
Sometimes clients pay me a net positive (e. g. just a subscription fee, dont sell any tickets).
Is there a way of getting this report in Xero or by way of an add-on software?
Can anyone help me know how can I value inventory at end of financial period in Xero.
Xero doesn't allow you to drill down on the calculations for bank revaluation like it does with revaluation of payables and receivables balances.
How is best to deal with marking invoices as paid, before we get the money in the bank ?
I now need to reconcile this payment as  customer's £100 - Amex fees What's the best practise way of doing this ?
I need to match up a transaction in my bank account (for the money that actually came in at settlement) to what is being booked as the sale.
Based on the Xero help documentation, it seems like the Sales Tax on Imports tax would do exactly what I want.
At the end of each calendar month the client will need to know the value of the outstanding purchase orders so that it can accrue for these in their management accounts.
So, before I try to get more information about the transactions that make up these balances, I just wanted to put it out there and see if there is something about the way that Xero is configured that means that the negative/positive is actually different to what I had expected?
Is there any way to add in statement different chart of accounts for one payment, if there are 2 invoices?
This seems like a bug to me - does anyone know how to avoid it?
How do I clear this payrun line item as it accumulates on our accounts payable account and will never be cleared by a payment.
Sales Channels coming into Xero:ShopifyAmazon MarketplaceeBayPayment gateways used:WorldPay PayPalThe payment gateways settle in my bank account within 3 days.
As an order came in I credited the sale of goods account and debited the payment gateway account.
Does anyone know if there is a quick way to do this so we can get the VAT returns correct in Xero?
Can anybody identify a way to report accounts receivable balances by tracking category.
How do i correctly track this payment from my personal bank in Xero?
Given that I have already coded them, ideally I like a way to fix it so that all 52 transactions gets reallocated automatically.
I know you can define two codes and  to each transactions - but that will take ages!
Does anyone know how to run a P&L report that shows multi-months across the page and breaks out sales by tracking category down the page?
Is there a way of saying this single payment must go against multiple invoices instead?
The invoice has been booked against my account reference is 327My share capital account reference is 950Therefore i need to reduce 327 by £500 and increase 950 by £500 - is this correct?
I am moving over to Xero and would like to transfer in our financial history so need help with what the correct accounting method is to record all this?
SAGE helpfully gives a breakdown of what is in each box, but XERO's VAT audit report is just a list of transactions with no real mapping of which box the numbers are feeding into.
Hello,am I missing something or does Xero not give Purchase Invoice's (Bills) a unique ID for me to file the invoices under?
If an organisation pays $10k for Bartercard dollars and they receive $45k in Bartercard dollars (the $45k does not hit the bank accounts), how do you deal with it in Xero?
There would be a difference of $35k that does not align up if I was to complete contra on both side of the accounts (i. e income & expenses).
If this is not the correct way to account for future travel, what is the proper way?
Can anyone help with a method to record the UK Annual Investment Allowance in Xero Accounts?
Account transactions report shows credits as debits and vice versa.
When I try to do pre-payment it asks me to add line items and descriptions- this does not make sense, a payment should be, who paid, how much and on which date, why do I need to give line item details in a payment?
Does Xero have a way to link the two invoices for cross reference, or would I just write it as a note or line item?
Now that I see the deposit in my bank account, when I go to reconcile it, the invoice the payment was for does not appear.
Is there a better way to handle matching bank deposits to existing invoice payments?
In Xero I have been entering my supplier's invoices as I get them and I usually pay them straight away.
I in turn did a partial funds transfer back into their account with the balance of the invoice remaining in my account.
I know Irish banks do not support this functionality of automatic bank feeds as of yet, but is there not any exception for GB that I'm unaware of?
Customers pay us in a lump sum of multiple items and in these lump sum there are are a couple of transactions that are not performed in the current year.
Hi folks,I'm a beginner Xero user and I have some questions relating to the reconciliation of certain items on my company bank statements.
Hello, I just noticed that my bank feed (which is also connected to freshbooks) hasn't refreshed/updated in 5 days.
Is there a way to reconcile the bank statement in a way where you don't have to create a "Spend Money" transaction or create a "Bill"?
I was hoping there was a way where you can reconcile the the credit transactions by the debit transactions from the bank statement alone without creating a transaction in the xero charts of accounts.
Hi there,Please have a look at the bank feed form for CBA  account.
I can't find a way to allocate all of the payment to only one invoice line item.
Is there a way to do this or do I have to void the original invoice and recreate it as many invoices?
HiJust wanted to find out if there is a way of reconciling the accounts without importing a bank statement or having bank feeds.
Hi Guys,I'm wondering if there is any way to run a 'Payment Due' Report.
The way i've been working with this so far is to set "Tax on purchases" to zero percent and just add a note to the label as to what the state sales tax is, so it reads in Xero something like "Tax on purchases 8.
Does anyone know if there is an add-on that will help (I don't quite understand add-ons yet) or does anyone have a tried and tested method.
If the latter, I guess my choices are finding a CPA, H&R block and the like, a Xero partneris there any advantage to using someone who can access my Xero stuff?
Hi everyone,I'm just having trouble finding a quick and easy report in MYOB which shows all the contact details which can then be transferred into the Xero template.
Like this:Invoice amount: 100Sales tax owed to the authorities: 25Deductible sales tax: 25Taxes to pay: 0But I need following amounts when I report to the authorities (in addition to nubmers for domestic sales and taxes):* purchase amount abroad (in this case 100) which is used to calculate a 25% tax* deductible sales tax from purchases abroad (in this case 25)Does anyone have any idea how I can accomplish this in Xero?
Should this be paid when the payment gateway or paypal money arrives in the bank and if so how is that reconciled in an automated way?
Given that the original invoice in Xero was reconciled, what do I code the reversal and the 2nd payment to?
Do I need to issue new invoices in Xero?
Is there any way to do this in Xero, it is taking me a lot longer to enter the invoices in Xero than anywhere else.
How does Xero handle old invoices i add into the system after i have submitted that quarters VAT return?
Do i need to manually take these into consideration as an adjustment to the next VAT quarter or does Xero do this for me?
When the pay run is approved, Xero expects to see a payment somewhere to for that payee, but in fact no payment, just a pure after tax withholding, is required.
How can Xero show separate accounts from the one bank statement and can Xero do 2 different GST returns for each?
I have just switched over from MYOB where i used to create invoices to the customer, and use the salesperson field to create a report on each contractor, then manually drag that into a spreadsheet for each guy, and work out there individual % monthly pay.
I am really hoping there is an easier way of doing this, i am thinking i could use tracking on each contractor and then export the report into excel, (similar to how ive been doing it), but is there another way?
I am looking for a book keeper that is familiar with Xero that would be able to help out getting my accounts into xero and managing monthly updates.
How can I remove these duplicate transactions and can you help fix the bank feed to that it imports the transactions to the correct account going forward?
Trying to setup our invoice template, how do we add credit card payment options to the bottom of the template?
Just adding this note because I don't see them listed on the bank feeds issue page.
I changed my email address on my account yesterday and now I don't have access to my data - it is critical to access for my business on a daily basis so could you help me please?
Does anyone know if feeds are available for The Co-operative Bank business banking, and if so, how do I set them up?
I could import via excel sheet, another option would be to create journal entries or place in all the historical accounts payable and receivable invoices and then 'pay' them and at the date and exchange rate set by paypal at a particular point in time.
I don't deal with purchase orders or any of that stuff, just go get what I need and either pay cash or pay from my business account.
My next major problem, is that I only receive one sales invoice per day from iZettle on my Xero account and each invoice only has one line on it with a bulk amount of all payments received that day!
It is straightforward in B Company accounts to show this payment as current asset while doing bank reconciliations.
If I am posting journal with credit to B Company as current liability and debit the accounts payable to reduce the amount then XERO does not allow to select and debit the specific accounts payable account, XYZ, it only allows accounts payable control account.
Hi,Ive connected a bank account in xero however it is not showing any transactions.
How do I get Xero to bring across all bank feeds so I can reconcile every payment we've ever made?
Today I came across a discrepancy in the account transaction report (please add running balance to this report), and found 3 classifications (I'll call them) which I believe are the causePayable payments - treated as a creditReceive money - treated as a debitReceivable payment - treated as a debitCustomer Payments have been allocated to one of these three classifications so I'm not sure how or what to change or why each of these three classifications exist.
Hi,I am new to Xero and in the middle of setting up bank feeds.
In the process I tried to set up an account which I discovered does not have a direct feed and as a result I would like to delete this from my accounts page.
I've reconciled our bank account by putting some payments in suspense, as recommended in the xero help guide.
Already using Xero, but would welcome a few tips and advice so not a complete novice.
Hi allMy Paypal account is showing a difference in balance to XEROThere is a variance of £1500Im sure the Paypal is fine but as it has a direct feed to Xero and no body touches it except to reconcile Im not sure whats going on.
How can I record this overpayment as being received on the date it hit the bank (to keep the account correctly reconciled) but also to the future invoice.
If I do a manual journal and debit a/c 820 GST, does anyone know which account do I code the credit to?
So, is there a smarter way of giving this money than just doing a bank transfer?
We already know there is an issue in that Xero does not enable the company to issue a buyer-created invoice and a work-around (manual! )
3) I have a few personal purchases on my business bank statement, do I just delete these transactions in Xero or is there a way to record them?
Do I need multiple Xero accounts or should I keep all 3 properties in 1 account?
I could only import 3 months of transactions during setup of my Xero account so I had to manually export a QFX file from my bank account and import into my Xero account.
Problems like this aren't good because these are first Xero actions when setting up and these need to run smoothly so the client/customer can see the functions working properly.
I am hoping there is a way to setup a bank direct feed from our CBA Commbiz bank account.
Hi guys,I know how to add bank fee adjustments when reconciling a payment, but how do you do it after the payment has already been reconciled and the bank fee now shows as amount owing?
Has anyone else from a small organisation moved from Sage to Xero and can offer me any tips?
In terms of tax purposes, is it better for me to save this money in my company’s account and pay myself a dividend cheque when I saved enough, or pay myself regularly, and save the money in my personal bank account?
Is there any problem with just creating transactions rather than manually matching the transaction to a bill?
Hi I am a small 1 man plumbing  business I work for some builders and under HMRC rules they stop 20% of all labour charged and pay it to HMRC, when i get paid by the contractor I get paid full amount less the 20% which leaves a balance on each invoice, how do I show that this balance has been paid to HMRC by another business, I presume I need to set up a CIS tax account but dont know how to do this can anyone help, please keep it simple Thanks 😀Ian
Does anyone know of any add-ons that could do this function, or how this could be done in Xero?
941 is there a way to add it like this as opposed to £1.
I need to print out all the invoices so is there a way I can reactivate an account so I can get all my information from it.
Just like any other money owing as this would help with bill payment planning.
What I need to do is categorise all of the individual credit card transactions for VAT purposes.
I don't need any responses - I just want Xero to know how really frustrating this makes people.
Now moving all in with Xero and my question is, if I turn on Invoice reminders in Xero is it going to immediately email everyone with overdue invoices imported from Freshbooks?
Hi, i work in health care and i'm having trouble creating a monthly invoice for billed patients i need to be paid for.
Does anyone know which banks and accounts offer this service?
Hi, does anyone know how I recored cash receipts on xero and how I can show them a being paid out of the owners drawings account?
Can you please let me know if there is a way to transfer these invoices across?
When I go to Sales > Invoices > Awaiting Payment, I can see a list of all outstanding invoices.
I'm assuming that it doesn't because I have received bank deposit payments on invoices that are only marked as sent, however every time I receive an online credit card payment the invoices are marked within Xero as 'Viewed'I supposed I answered my own question, just really looking for confirmation on this.
What is the best way to record it in Xero so the payment can be reconciled properly?
Hi, I am a beginner using Xero - I am an owner/driver - How do I keep track of diesel litres purchased which in turn I will need for my BAS
For billable expenses though it looks like I have to bill myself for the expense so I can add the expense to the invoice.
Is there a way to add a link to my website where the customer can go and look up his invoice number to pay it?
How and where do I differentiate the correct bank account before I save, approve and send the invoice regarding my foreign account?
but im wondering how i add in (paypal / ebay) and all my amazon accounts (uk,de,us,ca) would these all need to be separate bank accounts and does anyone have experience of getting amazon monthly data into Xero?
Hi all - I'm very new to Xero and a bit of an idiot when it comes to technical stuff like this, and this has probably been answered elsewhere but being a bit of an egg I can't figure out what I'm looking at.
Is it possible to arrange payment to a supplier, from a bank account or credit card,  from within Xero?
My understanding of their POS system is that multiple customers can pay their invoice (in part or in full) throughout the day, and at the end of the day, all payments received are added together and banked once into the bank account.
Hi allI have just started using Xero as a sole trader, I have my business bank accounts linked but I do not have a business credit card.
Do I need to enter conversion balances, other than opening bank balance for my bank feeds?
After i create those invoices i need to pay my drivers, so i go in new bill and i add all the details but when i am asked to input account i do not know what account should i select , can anyone help me please?
How would I find a invoice if the client doesn't know the invoice number or client name?
I am not sure of the best way to account for the bill smoothing payments and record the invoice from the energy company in Xero.
Hi there, I was just wondering what chart of accounts code to use when purchasing miscellaneous materials for a plumbing firm.
What's the best payment service to integrate with the Xero, easy to setup and just works?
Is there a way I can 'ignore' all the other transactions on this account apart from the money received for the invoices for reconciliation purposes?
When I try to add the deposit into Xero it obviously does not match my bank feed.
Is there a way of adding the Division field to the GL account transaction report so that I can see each line entry?
Hi Xero CommunityI need some advice on my VAT account.
Hi all, I'm setting up on the trial to see how I get on with this tool, does anyone know how I set this up to show I'm on the flat rate tax scheme at 13.
What I'm not sure of is how that would then impact our accounts payables/liabilities statements or what would happen when we actually pay the tax authority the amounts due.
We are a small business with say 50+ payments each month end, so batch payments would be a "nice to have" for efficiency but not worth paying large fees for (I believe HSBCnet can do this, but is aimed at large corporates) Can anyone recommend a small business bank account that works well with Xero batch payment files ?
Greetings,I want to view my transactions by the default account code - is there a way to do this?
Hello,Anyone has problem with chase bank feeds, amount on my checking account and amount in xero is always off, why is that, I did contact support but no help.
What would the initial bills account code be (e. g. from the council) and what code would I need to put the disbursement on the clients invoice?
is there a way I can have these options on my invoices as payment method?
Hi Allwe are currently looking at invoice financing as a way to borrow money instead of taking out a loan or overdraft.
Hi,I have been asked to print a management report but I cant see this in my reports or an advisor option (which I would think as owner of the business I would have access to) Can someone help me out please?
Hi, What Chart of Accounts is best to use for Contractor Labour Time.
What is the best way to enter these purchases - Should I bill myself then match that invoice with a personal payment I've contributed into my business Credit card account?
HI, I'm new to Xero & still learning my way around, so sorry if this is an obvious question.
Hi there, I have just started learning how to use XERO -so excuse me if this is a little basic.
Can anyone help me out in how to rectify this and get my account back?
Hi All, I'm not really sure what is the best way to reconcile the following scenario in Xero.
Is there a way for me to bulk change these transactions to transfers as there is 130 of them (between 8 different accounts)  so it's going to be time consuming going through them individually.
I have inadvertently voided an invoice, how can I reverse that action as I have already issued the invoice to the customer an dI need to keep that invoice number?
Paypal ones are fine for our reconciling in Xero as Paypal is an additional account in Xero.
Do I just need to create a new account for each of the above, and give each a unique Code, and Xero does the rest?
Do my clients need to have a Paypal account to pay my Xero invoices with Paypal?
Does anyone know how to set up sub-accounts like this in Xero?
Does anyone know of a way I can add a discount to an expense claim?
Just wondering if there is a way, or is there plans, to introduce the ability to add new customers to XERO via the iPhone App?
Could you please advise, as I put the invoice through as purchases but am unsure how to allocate a payment to the invoice?
Hi,I've set up an automatic bank feed for a credit card in Xero, and it is great, because i can see purchases as they happen and code and reconcile them immediately.
Does anyone know of a way that something like this can be done, maybe an add on?
I am on Xero multi currency plan, but this still does not help me because Paypal does not have an export tool that converts USD payments and receipts into AUD.
I looked at an add-on called Receipt Bank, but I have about 800 reconciles in my Xero, their plan maybe too expensive.
Just wondering what I can do (and how to do it) to get xero to match my bank account total (with the exception of transactions not yet imported by the feeds.
What I'd really like is a report showing only the invoice total, invoice number, account name for a date range.
If I was doing this in MYOB I would enter the receipt into a journal entry, attributing each of them to the particular account in the chart of accounts and then balance the transaction by debiting the Loan account for the director.
The Business Help Centre says I can go online into my Kiwibank account and connect to Xero from there.
Nor is there any way to account for materials used, which appear elsewhere on purchase invoices.
In Xero, it would probably be easiest for me to just edit the bank account number in my chart of accounts, and act as though nothing changed.
I'm just wondering how I should allocate those transactions when reconciling.
hi CommunityDoes anyone know of a subcontractor who can help with creating customized docx invoice templates?
Hello I am reconciling my monthly bank statement and am finding un-reconciled and double entries so need to know what I can do about these please.
Hi does anymore know how to have the line unit price on the invoices to be including the tax so it shows the figure the custom see as the original price?
Does anyone know the best place to go if you need new staff members, and it's crucial to your recruiting strategy that they have good Xero experience?
We have a few customers who pay their invoices with cash and cheques  I was just wondering how do I record it correctly in the paid to area at the bottom of the invoice in the make a payment?
Is there any way of inviting a client to a free trial - that way it is easier in the transition to a paying subscription on our Practice account?
I'm guessing because there already is a petty cash account (not a bank account) in the chart of accounts.
I know there’s other apps, but surely Xero could add this simple feature?
I would like to know if we can add an invoice to a spend money transaction.
How can I add these GST and PST payments into Xero for proper tax reporting as well as to reconcile my bank account?
Then you can cross reference purchase invoices to bank statement and into xero.
I am just starting with Xero, looks good if anything more than what I need but everything is there.
Ultimately I need to send an invoice for time (which is easy to do in Xero) and expenses to clients.
I find these highly unreliable in that the NAB feed can be up to 4-5 days behind and the Visa stops altogether until someone in Xero gets in and does something in response to me raising a help desk ticket.
Hey Guys,Just wondering if you had considered adding zipPay as a tender type for consumers to pay off on their invoices.
That's what I figured I would have to do and while it doesn't sound like much, it's just enough of a pain that now I'm wondering what else is going to be just enough of a pain such that perhaps Xero just isn't for me.
Is there an easier way of dealing with invoices from vendors like this?
Essentially is there anyway of added up statement lines much the same way you can add up transactions in Xero (vice-versa).
Is there a way to send a "summary invoice" to the client (just total) but also record the itemised entries?
My client needs to know where that customer is located so he knows what postage to add to the sales invoice.
Is it just a matter of editing some field on the invoice to put my bank details or is there a better way to do this?
Also is there any way i can put in some fake bank transfers for this year that don't effect my income or expenses to balance out all my accounts so they all equal what is actually in there before starting the new year.
Does anyone know of a way to record the HUD-1 in Xero where they can similarly credit the bank account in a general journal entry?
Here’s how:1)   By allowing an outside XERO advisor to control you accounts and pay bills on our behalf, you can be cut off  if:   a.
We also don't need any file sync features (dropbox-like).
How do I add those transactions in Xero ?
I've created a custom branded invoice and I'd like to show the Tax Inclusive amount in right-hand column of my invoices.
Could we please have an option similar to MYOB where you can select multiple accounts in the Account Transaction Report and have the choice to print on one page or each account on a separate page.
(and we're talking some *SIGNIFICANT* work here - setup of items & accounts, bank & paypal reconciliations, training him & staff, set up invoices etc etc.
I would expect it at this stage to show in the "accounts payable" -> "awaiting payment" list so I can reimburse myself the expense from my business bank account, via a batch payment.
Hi guys we recently launched a simple tool for providing a quick 1-page report on web performance using data from a number of different systems including Xero.
The sole trader business, he now wants to  set up in Xero -  does he have to subscribe to a whole new billing plan (he pays the maximum price now ) or can the sole trader account be in addition to the existing one?
Is Xero able to pull these two accounts together when I need a report?
I understand how to enter the invoices to Xero, but, how can I enter the wages I receive as an employee to Xero ?
Can i delete the batch and return the transactions back to unpaid and then continue to pay them individually ?
Does anyone know what it might cost (ballpark figures) to get a xero consultant to perform the initial xero setup?
Creating a 'Receipt' for an item I know will 'match' due to bank rules is more trouble than it is worth on a phone just so I can take a photo.
We would like to add a placeholder for purchases, so as to get back to suppliers or users who feed in the data using web apps to Xero purchases to request them to revise or amend when the billing is deleted in Xero.
I like the new feature that I can open the email containing the Xero invoice for my subscription, click to save to Xero and then login to action this.
When I have reconciled a bank account, I would like to show a tick or a 'v' to indicate I have a voucher or receipt associated with that transaction, is this possible and how easy is it after the reconciliation has been done.
Hi there,Currently, there is only one option to pay for Xero subscription which is credit card.
At the moment you can pay invoices individually or pay the balance.
I am willing to PAY EXTRA (for implementing this option) if XERO can provide these features for my LOGIN ACCOUNT.
Maybe there is a way to do this without having the payment recorded twice in the account, but then my question is, why isn't this easier?
Please devise a system that removes the need for me to download bills from Xero and send to Receipts Bank.
When adding a bill and selecting the supplier I would like to be able to view the details of that supplier when hovering over the name in the same way you can when creating an invoice.
Please can you set up a VAT report where you can generate a report with just the un-reconciled items so you can easily identify items not included on the returns.
It would be nice to see a running total of the reconciled bank balance, as each item is marked for reconciling, as a cross check to see that accounts agree to the bank statements.
I like the new Aged Payables & Receivables Detail reports & summary - however - could we have the option to change the ageing period columns back to the Month of the date of the invoice please (as how it was displayed on the original summary report)?
Hi,Error message when importing bills, does not specify what exactly the problem is.
As a user of "" I would like to be able to connect my Xero account to my bank account at  in the same manner as possible for other supported banks.
As this information is hidden you only know it is wrong after the invoice has processed it if you don't check each invoice before.
Please add the ability to "create new account" in the drop down in the accounts dropdown on the reconciliation screen just like it exists in the edit transaction screen.
Also include in this report W1 & W2 figures included so you could reconcile this each month/quarter to see if you're on track just like you do with GST
It seems the simplest way would be to force Xero to match on more than just "transaction amount" or prevent the TX going green if the name does not match.
I do not run a bank reconciliation report very frequently, as there are not usually any such items there.
We have a lot of clients with the Managed Client user role so they can add comments to transactions and we prepare the accounts.
In practice, in order to review monthly transactions, we often use journal report to check as it contains all types of transactions in a selected period.
As it is just a text function we should be able to make this change without re-opening accounts
For the new reports where your can select report settings and then choose "group by" it would be great to be just able to print group totals without all the detail so a summary report can be prepared.
Anyhow, it would be great if Xero can integrate with Amazon Seller to import transaction data on a per-sale-basis so it can be reconciled with invoices that are generated by our inventory software, which are also imported into Xero.
It would be really great if this could be added to Xero or if there is another way please let me know.
Please add TD Ameritrade (not TD Bank, which is a seperate entity) to bank feeds.
Sometimes you dont want the detail, you just need to know what is in there.
Hi, I think it would be helpful to arrange transactions by if there are any documents attached.
When copying invoices, previously if there is a reference number in the first invoice this got copied over to the new invoice.
Please add the Pool Depreciation (Small Business Pool, Low Value Pool) Rates for Book Value Depreciation so we can Run Depreciation in the accounts.
I am hoping there is a way to setup a bank direct feed from our JBWere Australia bank account.
When there are two or more deposits in bank statement lines relating to one batch deposit, it does not allow you to partly pay the batch and then apply the next deposit from the bank statement line.
Hi there,I would like to request for a new feature in xero which is relevant to not-for-profit-organisations where their main source of revenue is donations from members and other Trusts.
Details of donation (i. e. , how much was contributed to each specific project/activity for the year which can be captured from category, item code,account code or invoices raised during the year) - Options: can be in summary form or by detailed transactions.
Hi,Usually when we do a bank reconciliation to check that the balance in an accounting program matches the bank statement, you'd be able to complete or save that reconciliation date, so in future when you come back to the file, you know at exactly what date the last reconciliation check was completed.
Could we please add in fields for non-bank details (e. g. Paypal or Skrill account) to a Supplier's profile?
I would like the option of selecting a credit note in the bank rec.
When I log in, I need a quick way of getting into the relevant client's system, funnily enough already in existence with My Xero.
It would be great if clients can view their accounts when sending them the invoices, so they can view, download all the invoices from their portal and see the total outstanding balance.
And a feature request please to ask Xero to insert a pop up warning notice if someone does accidentally remove the report.
So that bosses/clients can work out how long their book keeper has been logged into xero (so that they can know how long they have worked for) so that the hours match up to the invoice
Since Xero is updated/upgraded every day with new features, there is no way to tell which article is the most relevant to Xero's most up-to-date operating system.
Please add Interac as a payment option to Xero rather than having to pay another provider for this service and then have to try to integrate it into Xero or add the payments manually.
Open up a different section ie bank and also supplier invoices together - enable easy amendments.
Please add a feature onto the Chart of Accounts where all bankrules related to that particular account can be viewed and edited.
Hi,Could we please add the Closing Cost as a field in this report.
A simple modification might help - show the tax rate on the screen in much the same way as "How did you pay? "
I kindly request Xero to implement this feature where we can see a user's name on a journal that has been posted via an external add-on like Xero workpapers.
Just as sales invoices create a number, so should receipts.
Hi,I am just trying to make the values as blank in Payment Terms (Sales terms) of contact.
HiYou desperately need to add option to super quickly edit transactions like they do in Freeagent for example.
I have customised the report so I get everything except the contact detail inc address and phone number, I need this to give our delivery drivers and at present must create everything again in excel, please help!
Hi,How about, when I create a VAT return, Xero  posts the amount due to or from HMRC in my accounts ledgers?
When a new recurring payment is set up on my Paypal account it automatically creates a repeating invoice in Xero.
When you print a Bank Reconciliation Summary, can you also print the bank account number on the report for cross referencing purposes.
Hi, is there any way that all notes can be visable when you go into a bill or invoice all the time?
There are two reports in xero which are called account transactions.
Are there any features coming where either through Xero directly or through the API one can add a Staff Members name to an activity on the invoice.
I tried having them create a new invoice for $0 but Xero just marks this as paid and does not allow an overpayment.
Xero-to-Xero function is great - why can't Xero also populate account with it's own invoices?
Hi,I have customers who would like invoices sent in an excel or CSV format so they can upload the contents and the individual charges into their own systems.
Hi,It would be great if I could add an automated customer statement to an invoice reminder and other attachments (letters of demand, debt recovery notice etc) to later reminders.
As these are classified as bank accounts in Xero, they are automatically pulling into the opening and closing cash balances of this report.
When a tax invoice is issued, it is an official document that has to be entered into the accounts regardless of whether it is approved for payment or not.
I would like to be able to run the reconciliation report and when it shows all the outstanding Payments and outstanding Receipts have the option to select tick box on the left of the transactions and remove and redo these please.
Hi Guys, Can you introduce a way to create a batch payment (.
Hi thereI can't find any information on how to import my BBX New Zealand transactions into Xero.
When looking at transactions in a general ledger detail report, or when I have drilled down into a financial report, I would like to be able to click anywhere in the transaction detail to then open that particular transaction.
Whilst we can add billable expenses to invoices, it would be great to add billable expenses to a quote.
Given editing a chart of accounts takes a long time, a feature to copy an account would be very useful, whereby the reporting fields are copied, the name is copied and perhaps it defaults to the same account number + 01, it then can just be reviewed/edited to finalise the new account so for example the account name or number can just be edited quickly and finalised.
We would like to be able to run a Xero report showing all employees that do not have a tfn in Xero.
I go onto Contact Xero Support and select "I need help to do something".
And all of the above account cannot adjust by a Manual Journal, it is great if Xero can add like Find and Redo function that we can redo the tracking for the above account.
What I would like to be able to do is, Find and Recode by Account type.
Please could I ask that reports are made clear as to whether they are in invoice currency or converted to GBP I have just run the Payable Invoice detail report and the Payable Invoice Summary report and was confused as to why there was a difference.
In the Receivables Invoice Detail report, there should be an option to de-select billable expenses as part of the total, so that you can just see the total paid for actual costs billed.
Can you please add a column on the bank rules page to show when the bank rule was last used, this will help in keeping the bank rule page clean as you can remove old and unused bank rules.
When choosing to sort the Trial Balance by Account code, I'd expect the export to be sorted by account code and not by the name (which it does).
Can both of these place (pay run web page and the report) show a total which can be easily used to check the bank transaction against the pay run total.
There is enough room on the report for this to be added and would greatly help us.
In the situation when there is multiple bank accounts there is no way of identifying the published bank recs  without opening each report.
Recurring invoices ie standing order payments into the bank account xero can then automate the posting.
When completing Xero workpapers, it would be great to be able to drag and drop files which are already saved to a transaction in Xero, or in the Xero File Library, and add it as the supporting document in Xero workpapers.
Hi Xero CommunityI have been in touch with Xero Support and apparently there's no solution to excluding non-cash accounts in their Statement of Cashflow Reporting or in the Cash Summary.
The second bank transaction does not show any "match", so automatically defaults to suggesting a "Create" - I assume it does not show a possible "Match" since the 2 possible matches have been effectively assigned to the first transaction.
A recent change to Bank Accounts | Account Transactions adds the suffix "(with a user created bank transaction)" to the Status field of every Reconciled transaction if the account does not use Bank Feeds.
It sounds like a small request but can you please add View Receipt as an option because I then need to;- view invoice- click the hyperlink to get to the receipt- click options- click view receipt- then click print now and print so that I can send to customersI process about 100 payments a week that need to be sent to customers so as you can imagine, this is a necessity for me, and I don't even see why 'view invoice' is an option if the payment has just been put through?
I appreciate that this is a partnership with Xero and NAB but is there a way to stop it popping up every day (or what seems like it).
This drop down list could easily additionally show each bank account with unreconciled transactions in bold, or show reconciled accounts in green and the rest in grey, or a small number in a red circle showing the number of unreconciled transactions in each account.
This account information does not change each month and would save hours of work across the world as accountants/businesses would not need to back track to their invoices as to see where to allocate that visa expense.
I'd like to be able to apply a ratio, the way you can with Bank Rules, to all transactions.
I'd like to see an option to commit real or projected account withdrawals up to 30 days into the future, and then to see that reflected in the account dashboard graph and summary - perhaps a future look past today on the graph, and/or an estimated future balance in the summary.
We have 7 different bank accounts, so if an invoice is marked paid, i have 7 accounts to check.
In THIS VIEWYou should be able to see:Date, Description, Account (i. e. Category), Notes, Reference, Spent, Received, Status(Note - you CANNOT see the Account (i. e. Category) or Notes in this view now, so you won't know if there is an error/typo in the category or notes until you click into the transaction = ridiculous.
Hi lovely Xero team,would you please add the option to Sort by Invoice type/Type of document i. e "Invoice" or "Credit note" under the Customer Invoice Report, respectively Supplier Invoice Report?
There is no report, or I cannot find a report that prints off all paid sales invoices in the quarter.
In Report Codes have the list of Accounts on the left, and Edit report code mapping on the right so we can select and drap across to the correct codes.
I would also like to be able to store the bank generated bank statements within Xero, is this currently possible as I am yet to discover this function if it is there.
When recording receipts in Xero it would be great if after adding the payment the screen would return to the same place in the Invoice queue instead of returning to the first page of Invoices again.
At the minute there is no way to find out what was on the original invoice except by comparing a previously saved report to a current one.
Currently there is a feature where assigned billing expenses are linked to the transaction and you are able to check on these but once the Invoice is paid, this feature is gone and there is no way to check what assigned billing transactions these are from.
Hi, is there a way that I can email a sales invoice to draft in the same way Receipt Bank would with a purchase invoice.
One of my clients writes notes on all the transactions and I have to individually hit Find&Match to see if there is a matching bill or invoice.
I can also do a customer invoice report and add a column into the excel spreadsheet to divide all the amounts by 10%, however there are some items we charge, that do not have GST, so some of the figures are not accurate.
On the dashboard please give us something like invoices written to date this month (not paid, not over due, we just care about the date of the sale, who it was, and the size of the order).
), could someone give me a comprehensive list of search facilities on various pages which I would need to search in order to cover off all transactions within xero, e. g. Purchases, Sales, Bank transfers etc.
HiWould Xero be looking at a function where we could add a mobile phone to our customer account allowing SMS reminders to be issued for any overdue invoices past a certain date.
Currently in the new Account Transactions Report there is no column to select/view that includes the Income Statement line the transaction codes to.
Please can I request that Xero shows the sales invoice reference on the match tab when reconciling transactions.
Please add an option to remove and redo transactions within the find and recode function.
I would like to know which account was used in paying off this expense claim, but could not see any button which I could click.
Surely this button is not for Xero to Xero transactions only.
In this way the money can sit in Xero's bank account earning interest (paid 12 months in advance).
When I need to export the invoice statement as an excel file, it does not give me the option to add the reference for each invoice to the file - essential to my customers.
In the Dashboard view of "Bills you need to pay" for some reason repeating invoices are not included in the chart of expenses as it seems to only show "Awaiting Payment".
Confirming, I am NOT talking about a report, where you can save a template view, I am referring to the default view of the transactions tab in a bank account.
How do I let my staff know that they need to amend the invoice?
Please add Vystar to your banks so I can download bank transactions.
But i certainly don't need any payroll for what is simply just myself visiting clients, doing work and getting paid.
When you run a management report for any period (month, year etc) then Xero would pick up that there is an invoice which has period dates that runs over the end date and/or that there is an invoice which should be included in your period.
Is it possible to have an extra column containing the notes that are left in the discussion box on the bank reconciliation screen for the unreconciled transactions on the bank reconciliation summary tab of the report.
Can Xero add a box at the bottom of the recurring invoices section to show value of invoices to be sent the following month/quarter ?
CAN WE HAVE A COLUM WHERE IF WE ADD A BILL THERE IS A WAY TO ADD A PERCENTAGE OF PROFIT TO BILL
Effectively I'd like the ability to put my accounts in test/simulate mode, where I can perform a number of actions to see the resulting  outcomes.
I don't think this is an essential feature Xero needs - just letting you know it was requestedHeather Smith
If you decide not to do this can you please fix the reconciliation account process so that it does not auto code transactions based on the last code used.
We would like to download transactions from FACTS which is a method parents use to pay tuition at schools.
The second is to add to your invoices - that when the client receives your invoice they can click on the logo and this logo link will take them to the page where they can leave their feedback for you on the No cowboys page.
Could xero not add a prompt when a GST report or annual accounts report is finalised in xero?
PLEASE could you change the "White Screen" its hard to know what line you are on when typing or If you need to go back and add something or tab to another line, the screen is SOOooooo White its painful and BAD for the eyes
Hi, On the management report it would be nice to have more flexibility with the way it is laid out.
Hi all,We, like other companies have changed the 'Draft Invoice' to read 'Pro Forma Invoice' so that we can send the invoice to new customers for payment before delivery of goods.
Receipting individual payments to the Undeposited Funds account and then transferring between accounts when banking does not allow for a Bank Deposit slip to be printed.
Hi,Is there a way to CC your work email address in when contacting Xero support?
PLEASE amend the report to carry a column for "Invoice #" as represented in the Sales Invoice.
7) Invoice left on account for writing off or receiving next payment (for instance if cheque goes in and out of bank account on same day).
For some of my clients, this is a compulsory requirement which means I need to create an invoice outside of Xero.
When you have your Bank feed syncing to XERO on the IOS app there is no way add a photo of a receipt directly to a transaction item during Reconciliation or once item is Reconciled.
That way, when I go in to see what Bills I have to pay from the Dashboard, I can then see below what Client Invoice it relates to and if that invoice has been paid or not.
Please can you create the feature to have dates printed on all Account Transactions and reportsYou never know what date it has been printed on?
Can Xero please add the ability to display the results for multiple tracking categories in the new Report Packs?
Xero currently has bank feeds to DBS Personal accounts but that is essentially useless since Xero is an accounting software for businesses.
Hi thereWe would like to be able to export this report to excel and have the option to include the address of each contact so that we can filter by address.
You need to make it so you can change what email you are sending invoices and statement from when you are on the page of the invoice.
hi there,could i please request that the character length /size of the field which shows the header on the invoices as 'Invoice' be increased.
I think it would be beneficial to be able to add commentary to the management report so that variance analysis can be explained to the owner of the business / interested parties (i. e. investors, banks) rather than just presenting a set of figures.
What I want to know is there a way change the colour of the already Hyper links that get created when xero saves the default theme.
It would help for QA purposes internally or help narrow down searches when you know someone has edited one particular entry from a range of similar entries.
It would be great to see this object/database exist in Xero so Time/Invoice add on's like Harvest could push in this data.
I was hoping you could add this feature to your standard reports, such as Customer Invoice Report and Supplier Invoice Report .
Xero, can you please add a feature within a supplier setup to be able to choose whether the 'Details' field on a batch payment references from an account number or invoice number.
Hi,My suggestion is to have the respective Bank or Cash account names to be appeared in all reports such as ledger account, detail transaction report etc in the Type column, so that we can get a much reliable and strong report in all respect, currently for payment or receipt it appears only the word "Pay" in the Type columnmuch useful if can change itthanksRizwan
According to the LivePlan tech team this is what they said "Apparently Xero uses a single account type of BANK for both bank accounts (that is, cash on hand, an asset) and credit cards (a liability).
Xero changed how it works when entering purchase invoices and now when you startto enter the name of the supplier - Xero says- Looking for contacts.
When approving purchase invoices Xero currently shows a list with the following columns:Invoice NumberSupplierInvoice DateDue DateAmount DueThis is great if that's all you want to check as you can just tick all the ones you want and approve in one go.
Please can you add a feature (like the Would you like to update contact address details?
It would be better/easier if the Chart of Accounts appeared in Drop Down lists in the order they would appear on a  Trial Balance, so many incorrectly allocated transactions just because of the order of the list, or clients and/or their bookkeepers forgetting the fundamentals because Xero makes it so easy!
Many clients today just want a Bank Routing number and Account number instead.
It is not a report , it is a key managemnet activity to know that the VAT return has been filed.
;o))Set me about thinking it would be cool to extend this community to a more interactive social one so follow users could meet up on a day entering invoices (or whatever) and share tips/tricks.
I'd like to request a feature whereby the bank statements for the end of quarter BAS periods can be uploaded into Xero to have visual verification that the bank accounts balance.
in XERO However, I think you can see this detail  in the ledger but it DOES NOT show you what CHART of ACCOUNT item it is allocated to.
I would like to be able to attach a pdf of the actual bank account to the published reconciliation report in Xero; just like you can attach a file within a transaction.
Just wondering if there is a way to separate out table lines on the final invoice?
Can you please add a search function for account mapping, currently we have to locate each account  which can be frustrating when playing with financial statements.
Hi,When reviewing a VAT return on Xero we often click in to the transactions to view the attached file so we can check that the VAT has been treated correctly.
When looking inside any account, I would find it very helpful if I could view any repeating invoices already set up for this account.
I would like Xero to provide the ability to merge the feed from the satellite accounts to the master account so I can properly balance my finances.
Hi,I need a way to break out how the actual invoice differed from an estimate (over or under) in a report or in the invoice itself.
Hi there,Does anyone else think it could be useful to be able to be able to group items (particularly by reference/invoice number) in the GST audit report?
Hi, we don't use Xero purchase orders as it is not convenient for our business, but I need to be able to include our purchase order number on the bill when it is entered into Xero.
Hi,I would love the ability to be able to add images (for every line item) when creating Quotes (and Invoices) - much the same as what Quotient does.
I don't get any matching results when I try to add a new bank account and specify PayPal Credit.
request a report of all quotes (or by selected status) that can be exported to ExcelOR open Quotes to the API so they can be retreived directlymain requirement is to help tracking what value of a quote has been invoiced (clients will invoice in multiple chunks of the total quote) - they use the Ref field to match the Client PO # on AR invoices and the original Quotes so we can report on remaining value of quotes still to be invoiced
I would like to see a report that I could run that shows duplicate invoices.
In general, it feels like quite a few places in Xero haven't quite been optimised for people entering multiple transactions in a session, or for keyboard navigation/usage, which is probably quite a common usecase.
The current detailed account transaction report allows only a full dump of data, Could you please provide a filter (or multiple filters) to select one/multiple tracking categories and/or accounts codes for this information.
I know the current basic Acct transaction report allows you to select one tracking category at a time per one ledger account, however it does not give you the GST etc info on it, nor provide the ability to select multiple accounts & tracking categories at a time.
Can the general ledger report show just a total for the transactions in the system accounts such as bank accounts, debtors ledger, creditors ledger and the GST account to make the report shorter?
If there was only one report that Xero could do and this was it, there would not be any need of any other reports.
Should look exactly like Pay Run Summary, but replace pay runs with employees!
Hi guys,Could you allow the send of multiple remittance advices from the account transactions panel (where you can tick transactions).
As a secondary request that will follow this, please can we add the unique account number as a field in the bank statement upload as we expect customers will use this more and more as we educate them to do so.
Is there a way to stop repeating invoices before the next invoice date without deleting them from Xero?
Do people just accept separate invoices is normal?
When we make quotes I understand that we should just a make a "draft" invoices so thats fine.
Can you update reports to include this field including  Customer Invoice report or how can I customize it so it does?
Under Xero Reports, there is a report named "Supplier Invoice Reports".
This would be helpful in identifying which transaction belongs to the paper copy of the invoice in a client's records, and would be a useful way of identifying which paper receipts and transactions (by writing the Xero code on the receipt) have been entered already if more than one person is working on the client.
Hi,Could you please add Grouping by 'Contact' in the new account transactions report.
Also send email to that user that there are bills awaiting for them to approve for payment(I know this is not possible at the moment)?
I am wondering if it would be possible to have a pop up or alert show up (Like it does when people have money in credit & it says would you like to allocate it to this invoice) but showing that this person (account name) has an overdue account, so it can be followed up with them or so they can pay there overdue accounts while paying for the work they have just had done.
Thus my request:  Can the above report that I run just show the Cost centres with transactions attached please and ignore all Cost centres that has no transactions?
Its a simple request, please only allow a setting like Draft only but with the ability to add invoices.
I would like to see integration between Xero and the ATO, so that any movements in the client accounts (e. g. Integrated Client Account, Income Tax Account) can be reconciled in Xero, the same way bank accounts can be.
I would like to see two features in the balance sheet that would facilitate some of the reporting that I need to do.
Hi Xero,The new account transactions report is great, but there is some key functionality that I feel is missing:- There should be an option to turn on a running balance column.
Why doesn’t Xero show the true position of the GL account in the chart of accounts.
E,g, I have invoices issued for a future date that doesn’t show in the accounts watchlist/ chart of accounts.
Please provide a report that shows bank statement lines with narrations as they are on the bank statement - against the accounts each line has been coded to.
Obviously there will be split transactions for most bank statement lines (to do with GST), but this is a report that is easily available on other softwares like MYOB.
Is there any way or any Report available currently with which we can take CUSTOMER WISE STATEMENT FOR ONLY THE OVERDUE INVOICES, and not ALL invoices ?
So while we can’t promise that all, or some new User Roles will be created - placing your vote on the role(s) you’d like the most will help us.
There is no regularity for when invoices need to go out so I don't want to set up recurring invoices for this.
Does anyone use Xero and the Contacts feature to create a file that can be imported to the bank instead?
Please login to your online banking website and confirm that your bank or credit card accounts are visible, and that you have set up the correct sort of account in Xero.
I am hoping we can add a feature to add 'Tax Rate' for the whole invoice as oppose to having to add the tax per line.
**Customer Invoice Report**In the Status column - there is an option for "Show All" can there please be an option "Show All excluding VOIDED invoices".
Please add a field to the customer invoice import file to allow you to force the appropriate invoice theme.
Hi,Don't know if anyone else has asked for this but import function is really important feature of Xero for new clients.
Can you please set it up like a normal Xero file in that people with manage user access can invite anyone into the file, not just a 'Managed Cilent'.
Hi there, We have a client who is getting distressed by transactions being memorised in Xero i. e. the automatic prompt to code similar transactions, "learning" what this transaction is.
Can you please add the ability to attach a file to a batch payment/deposit transactionFor example with pay suppliers to their statement so it would be handy to keep in xero instead of a filling cabinet
The cash summary report does not do it for me, I do not want to manually create the report in excel and I do not want to quote Jeff Skilling when my clients ask for the Statement of Cash Flows :)
Right now there is no way in Xero to create a bill that is used to pay another bank/credit card account.
There is no facility for adding a description in the Chart of Accounts for bank and credit card accounts.
One way of doing this could be to add a drag a drop function in the layout option of the report.
There are not normally a lot of these transactions but they do need to be reconciled and balanced on a regular basis.
How about a check box for each Bank / Credit card account rather than just the ability to choose one account or all accounts
Also I would like to have the ability to manually input the actual bank balance at month end as this does not feed through from my bank account (and those accounts without feeds are not reconciled at all until the data marked as reconciled equals the bank statement!
The only way to do this now is to add a sales person to every invoice as a tracking code but this is a timely exercise.
I like to compare months but there is currently no way of doing this in Xero.
At the moment, you can add invoices from suppliers to bills and expense claims via the attach feature (see http://help.
What I would like to see is a simple way to do a repeating invoices regularly to all members of a contact group.
What I would like is to be able to set up just two repeating invoices.
It would be really great it xero could let you have unlimited custom invoice docx themes as addressing invoices are quite specialized in our business.
I have included the email I received from support on this below hopefully to help others that are looking for the solution: We don't yet directly support the ability to enter acquisition tax invoices or transactions in relation to purchases of goods.
What would really help me is a button on the sales invoice for adding multiple lines (to complement the "Add a new line" button).
I would like to be able to choose 'edit' in the transaction and change the 'tax rate' as you can currently do to change the 'account' used.
Perhaps the obvious answer is to pay from an account that Xero is watching and let it reconcile, but for now that is not a preferred option for me so I'm hoping that I'm just missing something *else* obvious.
Need to add a feature where phone contacts can be transferred from the phone into Xero via the app so new clients can be added and invoiced on the go.
As this footer does not go on the declarations and other pages just the P&L and Balance sheet and notes to financial statements should have this footer.
It would be helpful if we could add a note for an invoice separate to the payment date please.
This would be handy instead of having to supply your own invoice numbers as it would allow you to keep them in the same format as invoices created manually on xero.
Please can we have an option to delete all transactions, including invoices and bank statements prior to an input date with an option to delete the audit trail as well.
I would like to see "approve and email"Another key point is once an invoice has been emailed, it isn't possible to go straight to adding another invoice, currently it is required to click on sales, then click on 'new invoice'.
What I would like the option to do is report in USD, but for the purpose of that report treat USD as my base currency.
- Exception report detailing  - Supplier Invoice Number not found   - Supplier Invoice Number found but different amount  - Remaining invoices awaiting payment (by date).
There is a need for the ability to create a Prepayment Report showing all those customers that have a prepayment that is yet to be allocated to an invoice.
I recommend that there should be confirmation for at least the following scenarios (if not always):- when there are transactions that are NOT matched to bank feed lines (as the only redo option here is to recreate the SM/RM transactions- when more than one item is selected
I know that WFM transfers supplier invoices into Xero, however what about having it set up the other way around?
Please can you add a filter to this report that allows you to select one bank account only?
I would love to see the ability to add a Manual Journal entry directly from the Dashboard, much like you can add a "Sales Invoice", "Bill" or "Add Receipt".
Xero helps states  "The payment can be through a bank account of the same currency, or a bank account in your base currency.
We'd be keen to see Worldpay integration so that customers can pay an invoice via our Worldpay account with a single click.
At present, Xero imports transactions from bank which appear in checking account as 'PayPal -&#163;22.
Is there any way to have Xero's Bank Balance take into account post dated transactions?
Xero help centre states that:"If you do include sales tax on an invoice or credit note that's in another currency, the tax amount will be calculated and displayed in the currency of the item.
With this in mind, there is nothing technically wrong with the new "view invoice online" feature and there is A LOT to commend about it, but we talked about it in the office today and, while our invoices are presented in a professional way, as soon as a client clicks on a link the whole experience changes to become a hard-sell infomercial for Xero with our clients being obligated to register for Xero.
If I want to know how much I need to transfer before I pay the claims, I have to go back to the dashboard to get a total (!
Online PaymentsWith FreshBooks, you can get paid via PayPal or one of thirteen other payment gateways, which means you get paid faster, and you can get that nice happy feeling of money in the bank while you're on the way to your next meeting.
Can you add the ability to add account from the accounts dropdown in inventory items when you add or edit like in the accounts dropdown in enter accounts receivable invoice ?
Right now there is no way to deduct closing stock from purchases (except some complicated journals which I don't want to learn) and there is no way to display closing stock in the P&L report even with journals.
Please can you add weight/packsize plus barcode to inventoryPlease can we export accounts receivable to google docs as an option.
I work around the problem by Spending from one account and Receiving into the other using a dummy account where I can allocate tracking, but it would be really handy not to need to.
Redundant backups are like any other kind of insurance and hopefully I will never need them .
Obviously, when we invoice the customer, the corresponding amount goes in this account so that, unless there is a margin, the account should balance out.
We've just move one of our companies to Xero and was shattered to find we could not combine and hide line items on an invoice like we can in Quickbooks.
P&L with just first tier or P&L with all accounts for more detailed report).
From what I can tell, the only way to setup a new invoice that is sent at a future date is to create a 'recurring' invoice.
I'd like to see this by month, so I can encourage my clients to put that amount of cash away in a seperate bank account.
Would love for the Cash Summary report to be able to be sorted by Account Code (like the P&L can).
payrun feature is useful but need a way to add tracking.
I would like to see Xero add a deposit feature so that customers can pay a deposit off an invoice.
While it is easy enough to add line items to an unpaid invoice, once an invoice is paid, this becomes a real hassle in Xero.
One idea for fixing this could be done by creating a flag for an account that is late fees and/or interest (and then only allowing that type of account to be added in line items on a partially paid invoice).
does anyone have any tips on a way to do that in Xero?
Other related features here include putting an "edit" link/button beside all transactions in reports and query screens; allowing payments to be deleted from inside an invoice (using an "x" button like on the bank transactions screen) (right now we have to delete payments first before we can edit an invoice that has already been paid - VERY common; best solution here though is to allow invoices to be fully edited even after they have been paid, just like spend/receive money transactions can).
Entering these dates into Xero like this is no problem however, seeing as our invoices are generated and sent to customers on 1 Jun,  there is no way to get that date on the invoice.
Does anyone know how to import item codes when importing invoices into xero from MYOB?
Ideally I would like to be able to: - add a new line without having to use the mouse - the tab key does not seem to take me to the "add new line" button.
Currently we can only pay expenses from bank accounts that are using the base currency.
Just because we need a laugh sometimes - how about a dancing character across the screen when an account is reconciled.
Hi  thereIt would be great to have a Timesheet report that shows the hours that have been coded to a Job (tracking) - I understand there is a report of this nature in Australia.
I know you are reluctant to remove it completely, and renaming it will also cause confusion so how about moving the button down to the Payment Options menu within a transaction.
Have just discovered the new Leave Liability Report and it is exactly what is required to create journals for leave liability - thank you very much for adding this report.
So if the report subtotalled for each centre, we can know the leave liability amount for each centre and overall total for the company.
When you add a Reimbursement line to a payrun it gets its own Accounts -> Expense Claim -> Awaiting Payment list which is great, where is the Payroll -> Benefits and Deductions -> Awaiting Payments list?
I would like to be able to see a full and complete audit history of the transactions, created, approved and edited in Xero payroll.
When completing payroll, if there is an error in an employees pay XERO does not highlight who the error is for.
I pay my staff super in monthly batches so would like to reference each payment e. g. Feb Super.
For all fuction great exepted payroll features still need to do by manual then key in net pay in Xero only.
An example of this request, is a client who i process on a quarterly basis, the owner/director pays himself a wage, same every week that he does not need a payslip for obviously, so when I get to do his end of quarter processing, i have to go through and run each payrun manually, and its just annoying.
Like tax numbers, and bank accounts more often than not these do not change.
Can you please add on the timesheets report and leave report who approved the leave or timesheet.
Please add a feature, so that we can export pay items from one Xero account to a New Xero Account.
Please produce a report / screen that easily shows the TOTAL (not NETT) payment due to employeesThe only way we can see of doing this at present is to view each payslip and look at the total payment.
Does anyone know if the NZ Payroll system is going to be fixed so that we can code GST charged by contractors to the GST GL code rather than the current work around of reimbursements, suspense accounts and manual journals?
I then seem to have no way of checking that what came out of the bank matched the pay run.
Hi,Just wondering is there a way that employees can send payroll a message directly from My Payroll without having to do a separate email.
Just thought it could be an idea to make the "Approved" a different colour, so that it does not blend in and look the same as "Scheduled".
If this does not suit your business needs, when you enter a leave application you will need to manually adjust the number of hours to reflect what you would like processed ie.
(we can avoid duplicate employee records since we cannot merge duplicate employees records specially there payroll transactions during year end)It would also be helpful if we can put the history and notes field that will show what has been changed or added to the employee's record just like the history and notes functions in the bills module.
Perhaps just like what's in the payment summary function.
Lots of people need to provide this information on a weekly basis to Centrelink etc for Child Support and other reasons and so we have to generate a payroll summary report as well as the pay slip.
Hi Xero,I'd like to make some of the Payroll Reports "Favourite".
While I appreciate there are a number of time-tracking add-on partners that create time-based billing invoices in Xero via the API there are a number of business models especially in the temp recruitment and labour market that simply need to enter time sheets and it produce the pay run and customer invoice.
While The '801 Unpaid Expense Claims' internal Xero account *can* be assigned to a Payroll Reimbursement Item in Settings, it *cannot* be used in the Accounts Payable invoice that gets generated from the pay run.
Can anyone help me find or create a report that connects my bills to invoices using tracking.
What is the easiest way to recognise transactions that have been made within a personal bank account accidentally?
Hi,Does anyone know if it's possible to move all the transactions from one bank account to another?
So, here I'm thinking: how nice if I can easily copy the URL of the quote/invoice and just paste it in my email so I can say something like: "You may click this link to view/accept/pay my quote/invoice online"P/s: As the (silly) workaround at the moment, I had to send the quote/invoice to myself in order to grab the URL.
HII have imported sales invoices as purchase invoices, I then imported credit notes to reverse them but then I have paid the invoices through a contra bank account and now the credits are showing as outstanding, how do I fix it please
My P+L report is almost complete but there is one line of income (monthly total for income from writing options in the US) that I'd like to include with my other income sources (all tracked by Xero).
I need this as I am working for a partner who's had just reconciling bank and did not add bills for purchases.
These purchases are recorded as cash purchases in Xero but how do I report the cash sales into Xero?
Or will this reconcile them and just taking a while due to the volume of transactions?
Hi could you please guide me how to hide or delete last financial year bank transaction which have come through bank feeds.
there needs to be a simple and easy way to run a report over transactions and correct the entity it is assigned to.
PPS Does anyone offer a 'pay as you go' xero advice service for questions like this?
Hi,If I have purchased an item using my business account for someone else, and I just want to recoup my money, ie charge the exact same amount on the invoice, how do I enter it so that I don't end up paying tax on it?
I have spoken to all the Xero Conversion Add on Partners, Xero Help desk which turned out wasted three days of my time with wrong advice when I tried to export just the employees, so they could import it for me.
It takes a lot of unnecessary time every time I need to add them under settings -> tracking before I can tag the bills and invoices with the tracking number.
This report is useful for senior management who don't need to see every single account
How do I reconcile the one payment to the two different lines in the bank feed, when I can't split payments like I can split an invoice?
My question is really how do I reconcile that when I don't have an invoice outstanding for the client of $100,000 to match the credit in my bank account to?
Hi,I've just used Xero for the 2nd year for my small business partnerships and I need some help straightening it out please.
HIIm new to Xero and would like to know, when I run my GST (run every two months), does Xero already calculate claimable expenses in the background such as entertainment etc or do I still need to manually deduct on in the GST return?
Also, if I need to manually do the adjustment/claim, how does one process the adjustment in xero to balance to the finalized GST report?
Is there any way of assigning a tracking category just for expenses so it doesn't also appear in sales invoices?
I know  there is option in Xero, but I also would like to hide all old transactions (invoices, credit notes, payments) for this contact.
However when i create an invoice it does NOT prompt me to add these bills and there appears to be no other way to add a line item on the invoice to pull in a bill.
2) Can Xero output a CSV telling what imported sales invoices are paid - so when payment is received can a CSV be created to tell another system that invoice number x has been paid?
Is there any way of giving him access to only one bank account within an organisation (I think not), or any other way of just exporting that bank accounts information to some software that they routinely use with their other customers.
So MY IDEA is to create a Xero invoice after every art show (or have one I constantly edit) that is never paid in order to decrease my inventory and get all the Inventory Item Detail report information I like.
The receipts are attached to each transaction in XERO - this can be in personal expenses, and against the bank accounts transactions.
There is no direct feed available for the  Bank Account as far as I can tell from the help guide.
Hi All,I would like to know how to record thisCash loan from existing bank (no bank account or feed) into business, so I have created a new non-liability account - called 'SME LOAN'.
The transfer money function does not allow me to change the individual amounts to each bank account.
Zapier CAN connect Google Sheets to other parts of Xero like Invoices and Contacts, but not Quotes!
Xero lets you add billable expenses which can then be added to a client's invoice.
However, we have checked the following:1. all bank accounts and invoices are in AUD, client never deals with any foreign currency transactions 2. there is no foreign currency set up in general settings Can you please advise me how to fix this to get rid of the -$6000 balance in foreign currency gains and losses account?
Hi,I'm very new to accounting and Xero, and just in the process of setting things up (whilst continuing to run the business and pay our freelance guides on time.
When I go into zero to create my batch payment I click on all of the separate invoices I wish to pay for the different creditors, does zero add the invoices for the same creditor together into one amount and this amount is the only one sent to the creditor so that only 4 amounts are sent out from my bank to these creditors or does the file that goes to the bank send through 10 amounts (one for each invoice) to be sent our to the creditors.
Hi everyone,I am wondering if someone can tell me the easiest way to add items purchased from a supplier (with a purchase order created in Xero) to the inventory.
However the statement reflects multiple currencies (USD, EURO and GBP) but when the statement is imported unto Xero, Xero think all transactions are USD as that is how the account was set up.
Hi All,My Issue: possibly accidentally double accounted for director's loan by entering it as a conversion balance in addition to directors loan account + bank transaction.
Hi, Can anyone please help meI'm trying to turn on the Mark as reconciled feature in one of my accounts, I click on the ?
Is there a way for this information to be visible both in Stripe and in the Xero bank transactions representing my Stripe payments?
Is there a way to ensure that the payment is applied to their invoice specifically?
Obviously the individual can physically pay the company back, but how will we show this in the accounts?
The payment of the invoice was done in a batch reconciling a payment from Pay Pal against 5 invoices.
If I am to use values from Xero they need to already be on the report I am adding the formula to, so that would mean this can't be done.
Hi there,I am trying this system, now I&#180;ve just created few vendor invoices and see if I could download, and the format, but now, under every invoice I&#180;ve created, there is a legend that say "this is not a legal invoice", why?
Anyone know how I can create a report that would accurately reflect the number of kegs I have at an account when looking at both invoices and credit memos?
However, this report is still limited in that it is clearly triggered off by the chart of accounts settings.
Is there a way to add codes in the account column for expenses?
Is there another way to refresh the bank feed so that these missing transactions will sync into Xero?
I'd like to deactivate our bank feed and reassign it with my login details (so that I can refresh it myself).
I am now struggling with how to use the Xero system to invoice and affect the right accounts.
what is the issue>the development status just says you are aware there is an issue, but that doesnt help please let me know how this can happen and what is being done to ensure that if we use xero it will actually work
We also have multiple due dates on the one invoice so after comparing the options on prepayments and/or multiple invoices I have decided to go the route of multiple invoices as I want to be able to send the customer a statement which shows only the current total due and not the balance remaining for future due dates.
Given a PayPal account and two transactions for the same amount on the same day, there is a high probability that Xero will match the transaction to wrong invoice, even if there is a perfect transaction to invoice match available based on amount, date, reference and customer name on both.
However the 2 transactions on the bank feed remain, and I don’t know how to reconcile them.
However the 2 transactions on the bank feed remain, and I don’t know how to reconcile them.
Please let me know if you need any further info to help me out with this issue.
- manual journal that we process for monthly movement does not allow posting to Cash + Receivable + payable accounts.
We have invoices/bills denominated in EUR and there is evidence that the allocation to Xero accounts requires some review.
Hi there - I have been just told by Xero Support after experiencing this problem for weeks that "when a new transaction or contact is added in Xero, it can take up to 10 minutes for the contact or transaction to appear in Global Search"!
Hello,Does anyone know of a way to clear the auto-suggestion history/memory on the bank reconciliation screen?
Does the main bank account have to appear on the Dashboard to be able to mark off sales payments?
Hi, Can someone please tell me how to pay back a "Director's loan account"?
Does anybody know what is the difference between: - of the following month - day(s) after the end of the invoice monthThanksAndrew
When I print the balance sheet report for division A, the business bank account isn’t shown on the report under Assets for division A so would there be anyone able to show me how I can assign a business bank account to division/branch A so that it can be shown on division A’s balance sheet report.
Can anyone help me with how to do a GST reconciliation, I need a report showing the GST outstanding on the Debtors & Creditors?
Is there a way to import invoice automatically marked paid in the same invoice data?
(I have an ecommerce)Is there a way to import these invoices in different bank accounts?
Hi I am reconciling accounts during a sage to xero switch over and have one customer with  unallocated payments on account for the last financial year (Sage) resulting in a credit balance or payment on account at the year end.
Some debtors pay extra for the next invoice however, in Xero you need to create a received money transaction.
To do this I simply add a row in my invoice with zero amount charge and no account and it worked fine.
Now there is no way of easily and neatly adding the information I need to the invoice!
We have just starting using Xero for a Solar Company - we'd like to treat the Rebates as stock, so we can keep track of the comings and goings of them, rather than using a tired spreadsheet.
Hi,Is there any way to amend the accounts used in a paid expense claim?
Can we please have the old account transactions report back.
Do I have to put it in account "445 - LIght, power, heating" or create another account with name like "xxx - Water"?
I can't seem to find a way to reconcile the amount as am un-able to bring up the purchase invoice to go with the sales invoice.
So, is there any reason why I should add the GoCardLess payment addin to Xero?
With no items being purchased or entered into Xero at this point, what is the best way to reconcile this on the bank feed?
This automatically imported all transactions from October 4, 2014 until now, and is updating new transactions just fine.
Do I need to just download almost 3 years' worth of monthly statement PDF's and enter all those transactions manually into Xero?
Just wondering if there is a way to show Accounts with Zero balances on all the reports instead of just one with Balance?
However its a very big and ugly report and could do with something like Excel's "Freeze Panes" to keep the row & column labels visible as you scroll through it (QB does this beautifully)Additionally it would be nice to be able to click through on any Column or Row total to see the breakdown of theses totals (again QB does this very well)What i'd really like however is to be able to limit/filter such reports to just a selection of Tracking categories.
Can I add a comment to each invoice so I can add in extra info to individual invoices?
I reconciled the original payment via the bank feed but dont know how i should be treating the refund.
Where you create a rule and you select account to process the transaction to , there should be a drop down to allocate it to the customer account directly as reconciling every transaction to the Customer is time consuming when there is about 300 odd transactions per month.
Hi Xero Community, Wondering if anyone can help, i'm fairly new to Xero so apologies in advance if this is super easy.
I don't understand why this is - does every 'spend money' transaction need to have a bill or invoice made for it?
How can I add to this section so I can include the bank account from which I pay the bills?
Just wondering if there is the ability in Xero to convert an exiting receive money transaction into a receipt against an outstanding debtors invoice from a prior reconciled month.
How do I allocate part of this transaction to the invoice but still allocate the total value of the iZettle Card payment account in Xero?
Also, is there a way I can move multiple transactions to a different Chart of Accounts?
Hello,Let's say I have 2 invoices, on both I charge 10 Euro V. A. TWhen I have to pay the V. A. T department in my country, I send them a cheque of 20 Euro, in Xero where shall I input this 20 Euro V. A. T payment please?
What I would like to do is split the large invoice PDF into individual files in a more automated way - so I was wondering if the "multiple invoices in one PDF" method produces a PDF with tags or section breaks or something that I can use to split the document?
Is it just me or does xero not play very well when trying to import your whole history?
Is there any way, or an add-on that offers a way, of changing how transactions/history is viewed in each contact page?
Hi there,Is there a way that I can pull out a report of all the invoices without attachments in Xero and send it to my clients?
My question is whether I should use Xero's built-in expense app or something like Receipt-Bank or Entryless?
Is there a way to display the name of the account along with its zero  balance when running an income statement report?
How does Xero determine the order of transaction lines in the Account Transaction report?
Is it possible / advised to just make lump sum transfers from the 2 owners accounts into the DLA?
Luckily there is no tax involved, but we still need a way of linking these prepayments to their invoices.
Hi - Can anyone let me know if they are able to work xero payroll with RBS bankilne and make direct payments to employees?
2) in Mid June, start afresh with each of the connected bank accounts - delete all the existing transactions.
Hello - could you please let me know (as a matter of urgency, as I know that you refuse to have a Telephone Support facility) the answer to two questions:a) how I can change the banking details on a sales invoice that I am raising from our standard bank account number?
Xero has plenty of info/tutorials on easy things like "how to link a bank account", duh, but nothing on the actual complicated nature of sorting out messy transactions.
If I received an invoice and made a payment (using the function at the bottom of the invoice), after a while how could I know which account I paid it from?
We rename this to 'Pro Forma Invoice' so that we can invoice a new customer before shipping goods, to receive payment first.
Is there a way I can import just the data to go onto an invoice (eventually) without importing it as an invoice?
However I've just noted that when creating an invoice I can not add a custom message to the person I'm sending an invoice to.
I tried to post journal entry, I couldn't do it, I tried to reconcile it against unpaid expense claim (this account does not show up as the account to reconcile).
Is there a way to show all 6 bank accounts in the "pay from" drop down?
However, this approach does not permit me to "roll up" the individual invoices into a batch deposit which is what's truly happening.
Or does Xero's batch deposit feature need to be taken to the next level to work as well for credit card payments as it does for checks?
I cannot work out how Xero does this although with the latest export/modify/import, it did not change any of the accounts with amounts in them.
Is this just Xero "cleaning up" unused accounts or is there some logic to what it is doing?
Does anyone have any experience of using Xero like this?
It does, however, go through on one of our 'Standard' user accounts -albeit slow loading.
It would be great to see a report in Xero that allows you to extract any un-reconciled transactions for a particular period.
Hi All,Just wondering if anyone out there using tacking codes in Xero has a scenario where they need to use more than 100 tracking codes at any given time and what your expierence is with running reports out of Xero with a large number of tracking jobs?
I have two bank transactions appearing in my xero reconciliation report, one for &#163;100, one for &#163;2000.
We create invoices for services or call usage for the previous month, so would like to include in the repeating invoice 'Services for Month-1' in square brackets and it displays 'Services for February'.
Examples of search criteria used unsuccessfully include (symbols spelled out, as help forum does not like square brackets)<>^^% squarebracket ^^^ squarebracket% squarebracket !
Should it update in the same way that the bank does or do I need to manually export from PayPal and then import into Xero?
I need to be able to do a mass reserve find and recode and a bulk of transactions that were not meant to be recoded.
Does anyone have recommendations or work arounds that might help?
When invoicing/billing we select the contact that we would like to invoice/bill to/from right, but if for any reason we need to contact this client whilst invoicing/billing or have to find out any information and still continue on with what we are doing we cannot bring up any contact information quickly.
)Client is paying by credit card so there is a merchant fee (assume $5)Invoice client for $95 and add merchant fee of $5Client pays invoice for $100we receive $95 but have an open invoice for $100 - therefore have $5 unreconciled.
I can currently only add files to transactions.
How does one transfer funds between ledger accounts (i. e. , a transfer that does not involve the bank account at all)?
When xero business help center states "xero automatically matches imported bank transactions with transactions entered in Xero. "
Hi All,I understand that Xero does NOT use the Undeposited Funds accounts which in general is fine however what happens if the business owner uses some of those undeposited funds (cash) to pay for a business expense and only deposits the remainder to the bank?
At the "Invoice Only" permission level they are not given the "How did you pay" option to choose the company bank account.
Does anyone know how I can achieve this so the invoice is shown as paid and can be reconciled, but without actually doing a transaction into my bank account?
The first is the line item of type PAY on our bank statement showing what square deposited in our account.
Is there a report that we could print which includes the information entered into Xero followed by the pdf of the attached invoices?
The issue is,,, Transaction is appearing in paypal transactions but still showing as due in awaiting payment in invoices.
Does anyone know a UK advisor I can speak to to getting some help on the phone.
is there a way to just reset the template back to the Xero defaults?
How do I import invoices from my current accounts system that has multiple line items.
When I update the payment, Xero tells me that the invoice is $0.
Hi there,Is there a report in Xero to show unreconciled sales invoices which have been already marked as paid?
HI,Is there a way to add the amount of GST for an individual line item?
I would like to know if it is possible to include an uploaded file to these invoices?
We would love some help as we have resorted to creating the invoices manually so we can attach the file - meaning the time-saving batch option isn't effective!
The outstanding payments for this report does not seem to reflect the bank statement month on month.
Any way to ensure these Canadian $ invoices go to the proper account so they can be reconciled?
Need some urgent help pretty pretty please - When Exporting historical sales invoices from one Xero ledger and importing to new Xero ledger - what is the best/easiest way to mark them as paid, as they import to drafts and if approved they will be moved to Awaiting Payment?
Is there a way to add these one-off items to the monthly repeating invoice?
In eWay I have the Payment Account set to "200 - sales"(I also have the credit card surcharge account as "200 - sales" but no one has used a credit card to pay yet)Can anyone help please?
I am looking for a report on an Individual Supplier showing all invoices & dates and payment amounts and dates.
From what I can work out, to add a payment to the invoice I have to 'receive a payment' ON the invoice page, after it's created.
The bank transaction is now waiting to be reconciled, but since I can't post manual journals to the Accounts Payable account, how do I reconcile the transaction?
I realise there is a way to go back and add the scanned invoice to a bank transaction, but is there a way to report on all bank transactions without invoices attached?
Response Times - Does any users of Xero experience any time issues when importing or exporting data into or out of Xero.
So I need to address invoices to Attn: Mr Man @ Company, where does the company name go when creating an invoice in Xero?
Following Situation:I have 5 bank accounts in my chart of accounts- HKD Savings- HKD Current- USD Savings- SGD Savings- Time deposit account (HKD)I have added a bill in Xero and it is in MYR, but I paid it online with my USD account.
Now when I want to record the payment in Xero, I can only select my HKD accounts.
Then I tried to change the USD and SGD accounts in my "Chart of Account" settings, however I cannot edit the option "Enable payments to this account"How can I reconcile my payment in Xero?
How can the tax invoice say one date but we have transactions popping up dates later (in new financial periods!
When setting up Xero, how do I account for the previous transactions that occurred from my personal bank account?
Hi,I know there is a simple solution to this - but my Alzheimer's is kicking in today.
I just dont know what to enter in the date section as the invoice is paid last month.
Does anyone know whether it can be imported into xero accounts ?
some of the leading Xero advisors actively share expert advice and tips on Twitter.
I am from a company that sales coffee beanI need to create a report that shows the coffee salesI need some help with how to add this coffee accounts together to show the sales performanceI have Miscela d'oro Coffee Sical CoffeeTuscaniThoya bristo
Xero does not allow me to do this, and the import fails because the purchase account field are empty.
what's the best way to reconcile the payment/transfer across in xero?
Hello everyone,I understand Xero currently offer Quickbooks to Xero conversions, however, my problem is that I need to convert from Quickbooks Online to Xero and as far as I can see this is not a readily available option in the UK.
Hi thereI am wondering of there is a way to retrieve the email sent to a client along with their invoice.
Hi Everyone,I'm wondering if any of you have tips for collaboration with your clients that does not involve spreadsheets, dropbox, email attachments.
Please xero let me create a custom bank account for companies like pinpay who dont live stream so i can manually upload the details
I need to see the transactions in order to reconcile the payments, please!
Hi,I just need some clarification on the Repeating Invoice functionality.
Is there a way to group the bank lines to reconcile against the batch transactions?
I expect overdue invoices to be included in the total of invoice waiting for payment.
Is there a way to pay multiple PayPal invoices simultaneously like a batch deposit?
HiIs there any way in Xero that I can consolidate reports from 3 different companies that are set up in Xero?
Is there a way to add another AP account?
After reading how Xero deals with this circumstance, I discovered that Xero considers the credit card company as a vendor under Accounts Payable.
Problem: How do I reconcile and show receipt of a GBP invoice when payment is in my USD bank acct?
Does Xero have the ability to to attach further files to an invoice when you email the invoice out of Xero so the recipient receives that attachment?
7) Invoice left on account for writing off or receiving next payment (for instance if cheque goes in and out of bank account on same day).
I'd like to send a statement showing what we own them (bills) as well as what they owe us (invoices) as they only pay the difference (ie invoice amount offset by bill amount).
Does anyone know how I can run the report?
I would like to use the automatic feeds feature that is built in to Xero for the Paypal account, but it is setup as a checking account in Xero.
Is there any way to change the account type to the "Paypal" variety from standard checking account in Xero?
Hi, we are new to Xero, can someone please tell me if I can print a report to tell me all purchases that have been put to a job number.
Add option of "Upon receipt of Invoice" Due dates are confusing and too limited in some instancesAnd, you can add this in your invoice but then the invoice statesDue Date, and then,Payment upon receipt please.
Add a field for invoice branding theme to the invoice import template, so that imported invoices can be correctly assigned to the appropriate branding theme.
But what I'd rather do is just go into Xero and pay the invoice the same way the client would, by viewing the invoice online and paying it through Authorize.
And so for the infrequent user like me, you have to ask for help to login and then remember how stupid you are for not saving the login URL.
I paid this invoice (a positive amount) from the Cash in Hand account (which seemed to work) but I can't see a way to back off this transaction, there being no void or delete option on the invoice options menu,Can anyone help with either item please ?
Is it possible to add a bank account which only I can see?
For example, what I first looked for was a way to select all three transactions on the reconciliation page, and then hit 'create transaction' (yes, I know this doesn't exist in the UI, but conceptually that is what I am looking for).
5% surcharge - how do I reconcile this as when using the "add adjustment" it includes the bank fee not add it
I know there is a budget variance report but I need to know what I should do after the budget has been set up?
I'm thinking this is probably very simple, I just need to be pointed out how?
You may choose to respond to the payment claim in either of the following 2 ways:• you may pay the payee the amount claimed in the payment claim in full on or before the due date:or• if you object to the payment claim, you may provide a written payment schedule to the payee, which must identify the payment claim to which it relates and indicate what you are prepared to pay (which can be nothing).
If you provide a payment schedule in this way, then you must pay the scheduled amount in full on or before the due date for the progress payment to which the payment claim relates.
- could do with some way for them to get a little help on this (same as on various other payment services).
Can you please add the Band Camp icon and way to include that web address on the invoices?
Great discussions, ideas and helpful tips on using Xero.
And bank rules don't allow any logic like "payee matches invoice contact" or similar.
Cash coding doesn't help because there aren't any bank rules.
I'm thinking there may be either an add on or another service which could make my life a lot easier, but i don't actually know what i need or should be looking for.
Does anyone have an idea of how I can locate this missing Paid Invoice which would correspond with the Batch payment?
In MYOB, I could just click Find Transaction, Card, type in the name of the contact, and within 5 seconds I have a FULL history of every single transaction relating to a specific contact, whether the transaction has originated from Invoices/Bill/Spend Money or Receive Money.
Any suggestions on how to generate a report that gives you weekly cash bank deposit amount?
Does anyone on here currently use Xero in Portugal or have any information that would be able to help?
This may lead you to think these accounts have no balances when in fact  they do just no transactions for the period being reported on.
How do we enter all this into Xero so we can reconcile our sales with our bank account transactions?
What I want to be able to do is bring in the individual transactions into Xero and create Paid invoices for each.
com/documentation/api/invoices/#title2Thanks for any help.
I presume this is because an invoice was issued, Xero is treating it as a product sale regardless of what account it was posted to.
Please could you let me know if this situation has changed as what we would like to happen is the following:* each staff member has their own login (so that we have an audit trail, and so that they can't see sensitive info)* all sales invoices are sent from one central email address and NOT the user that created themI appreciate your thoughts on this issue.
- Stumbling block: when I go into reconcile these bank transactions via Xero, I'll have a deposit for, say, $300, which is made up of payments on 3 different invoices for $150, $50, and $100.
Since the payments have already been created via the API, then there is no way of even match splitting this bank statement line to the 3 invoices.
Hi All, hope someone can assist,I would like to find out how to do the following in Xero: I have created a theme for quotes in the Invoice Settings.
Trying to delete 2 credit card accounts, but there is no "ACCOUNT OPTIONS" button as the HELP suggests.
Total payment made to seller The problem: In the paypal transaction history, all of these transactions are grouped into one transaction.
Hi there,How can I tell in XERO when a bank account was last reconciled.
Hi All, I am using invoice branding as a way of separating different business and business names.
In case you need clarification on something here are my PayPal and Xero screenshots:PayPal refund transaction details: PayPal transaction history: Bank Account in Xero: PayPal account in Xero:
It would help you far more if Xero listed non-API programs like this in its Add-ons.
Clicking on 'My xero' brings me to a page which prompts me to add an organisation, there is nothing I can click on to delete the account.
In order to increase efficiency to get around this strange quirk of Xero, we are entering the transactions into Excel first then importing them in order to be able to create and reconcile them or match to reconcile them to entered transactions to simulate a bank feed.
My question then relates to how we can move the reconciled invoices to last financial year as it's affecting the P&L figures for this financial year when I run a report in Xero?
How do I add Late Payment Fees to a customer statement and can I distinguish these charges from general invoices?
For instance, is there a way for me to see how many purchase invoices have been added to my Xero account this week?
Does Xero have integration with any Bank (and credit cards) at all in Austria?
Is there a way using the Xero2Xero tool which would allow me to have my monthly purchases from Xero recorded in my Xero company file automatically.
Hi, I've got an automatic feed set up for a PayPal account and I'm wondering how best to reconcile entries which are just conversions from one currency to UK.
If i can't invoice a customer without first having to go to the website and create a customer i may as well just invoice them from the pc.
If they pay by eftpos this does not seem possible - as the days eftpos transactions can only be split out by description and account when doing the reconciliation.
Anyone have a problem with NatWest Online Credit Card bank feed or know how to resolve
Hi all,How should I best process direct debit transactions in Xero?
Using the "Receive Money" function in the bank account doesn't cut it, because the item doesn't show up as a payment from the customer that can be allocated to an invoice.
Hi All,Just quickly, can anyone tell me which components of the GST Audit Report make up the G11 Value on the GST Calculation Worksheet / BAS.
However, as some clients pay each week - it seems that we can't add to an invoice if a payment has already been received.
We used to use Myob and we were able to edit an invoice, even if a payment had already been made to that invoice - however, in Xero we can't do that and need to Remove & Redo each payment before we can edit the invoice and add extra lessons - this is very time consuming.
I feel like I'm missing something obvious, but is there a way to bookmark a report in xero?
Just wondering if I need to add an account for this and what type it should be, eg: liability or Asset.
This is really frustrating as it causes my xero monthly record and my paypal monthly report to be out by a few sales each month (as sales made on early hours June 1st and lets say July 1st, would be recorded in xero in the wrong month, and also financial year in this example).
Is there a way that Xero groups these payments so that only one amount appears in the Bank account?
It looks like I can get an integrated system going by using Xero and OneSaas Big Commerce (which will also work with Mailchimp that we plan to set up), however BigCommerce does not seem to link with Amazon, so would I therefore need to get the Stitchlabs add-on or have I missed something?
How do I remove/delete entire bank account feeds from my Xero account?
Is there a way to add custom fields to the default invoices templates?
With this latest release it seems there is no longer any way to delete incorrect bank feed transactions.
I need to reflect this interest in the figures - does anyone know the best way to do this?
I'm assuming there is a way to handle this other than deleted the bank transaction and manually reconciling the two Xero transactions?
Hi there,Is there a way to process a pay run without transferring payment via Xero?
However, I'm concerned that I'll have to continue paying for FreeAgent just so that I can see my past accounts.
Hi Xero,Just wonder, are there any plans for Xero to penetrate their services to Malaysia?
I am just wondering if there is a way to add contacts or products through a sales invoice.
And I don't know how to allocate the credit back to the bank account either.
HiWhen I add a line item on an invoice there is a little plus sign next to the Tax Rate that allows me to add an amount for tax in case it is slightly different.
Does anyone have any tips on making this work?
Does anyone have any experience of setting up and linking Streamline Merchant Account to Xero ?
Some good features released today - supplier remittance advice, tracking on budgets, export contact groups, address verification (for NZ and Australia), Chart of Accounts update (for the US), some more bank feeds and improved invoice totals for groups of multi-currency invoices.
Does anyone know how to cancel a bank transaction feed to Xero?
This gives a positive balance in the Business Credit Card account that I can then reconcile with the debit from our Main Bank Account representing the direct debit payment.
Is there a way to pay payable invoices against receivable?
I know Xero does not have a full inventory system without using addons but I there is a report that shows the purchase and sale of items over a period.
Can you add options to add supplier payments and customer receipts from both the dashboard and the bank summary report asap, so that you can record the date, payment amount and then allocate payments to the specific invoices.
I would love to know how other partners/ accountants present their accounts , or what they  use, when the main headings on the Balance Sheet can not be moved.
Xero has a report called Account Transactions which is similar but it only shows one account at a time.
I have just found a comment by someone on anther website saying xero is more suitable for companies which have low numbers of invoices per month.
Does anyone know of someone who offers invoice/credit note/statement customisation for a fee?
Is there some way I can add this to the pay slip automatically, without having to work them all out manually, and then add in?
I am hoping that you can help me:1) make the changes I need to to get his leave accruing again, and,2) suggest a way to go back and correct the two wrong payruns.
I noticed in Xero Payroll you can select if a pay type (say Ordinary Hours) is reported at W1 or not, so I am assuming that the EH info coming into Xero is not being flagged as 'reportable'.
Do you know of a way Xero can assign a gl account in the "Leave" section of the "Pay Items" settings so that when an employee takes long service leave it can come straight off the liability account, instead of defaulting to the Wages Expense account?
Does anyone know how I can skip pay runs, as Xero is telling me, my next weekly pay run is for Dec 2016, but the casuals have only started working again this week.
I know I haven't been using all the features how I'm suppose to, I just use what I need and do the basics.
I've only noticed today, in my profit & loss that its doubling up all the money, so it takes into account what I have posted under a pay run and it takes into account what I reconcile in my bank feed, is there a way to link the 2 as one transaction?
If I entered ordinary hours times hourly rate on template for a employee, Does the figures transfer to pay run?
Before I left I preloaded 4 pay cycles into Xero and had them automatically paid through our bank.
The error message we received was "You cannot pay Super via Non-SuperStream, please select a SuperStream enabled fund"That's all we got, with no further explanation and I haven't been able to find this error message anywhere on the help function within Xero.
I realise now I need to terminate him on Dec 31 and reemploy on Jan 1, so I can withhold a different amount and issue two payment summaries.
Or if its not possible without the subscription how do i manually enter it as I would like it to appear on the pay slip the amount that is accrued.
What is the best way to reconcile this to the 'wages payable' account as when I try to set up a bank rule I can only have one contact whereas we are paying multiple contacts for the one amount that appears on the bank statement.
Does Xero/ClickSuper automatically draw funds from my bank account to pay the funds for me?
Hi,I am new to Xero and have just had to re-do payruns from 1 July 2016.
This employee is leaving and I need to process this payment.
Do I remove the HELP debt component from their final pay and if so how?
Hi I've been processing payroll ABA files and just noticed that an employee had no bank details in their file.
How do I mark the related super transactions for that employee as 'unpaid' so I can process and pay the contributions through Auto Super?
Hi,Just wondering in Xero whether you can enter pay runs out of order.
I thought the wages amount would reconcile and find a match similar to what it does with bank rules and when it matches an invoice.
If I do need to setup another Pay Item how can I transfer the Annual Leave already accrued on the default Pay Item?
Any help appreciated - I'm still new to Xero and despite some of the things I see missing, I do like it.
Hi all,Can someone please clarify which account I should be using to reconcile a payment from our bank account to the ATO for PAYG?
How can I go back and create a payslip and pay record when program does no give me the option of that date?
Hi, We need to send our clients the super contribution summary receipts, however we can't send them the payment report, because there are too much private employees details on it.
just noticed that under the "accounts" tab is an option called "Pay run" which seems to be a different way of processing pays rather than the option under the "Payroll" tab - can anyone please tell me the difference and why there appear to be 2 ways of doing the same thing, which one should be used under what circumstances etc?
Hi, we pay mileage at 74cent per K, I have just found out that now 66Cents is tax free the remainder needs to entered to withholding tax.
When there are so many things that need fixing on xero (like supplier reports that we have been waiting on for years)  I am not sure what has been gained by changing the leave format.
Bit confused by Leave Status item in Approve Leave screenHave leave that has been taken in a pay run showing as Status "Approved"Does the status not change after leave has been taken and paid?
I would like to see in the Deduction Pay items the ability to choose any account in the chart of accounts.
Hello, I just would like to know how could I delete a pay calendar?
Hi,Can anyone at Xero please tell me why it's not an option to report on unpaid types of leave in the Leave Transaction report?
Its a bit misleading - is there a way to suppress the HELP component, and just show one sum as PAYG?
Hi All,I'm trying to run a payment summary report for one of my employees but it keeps coming up with the error "There was an error - please try again in a few minutes".
Hi,I am trialling Deputy and need to edit the description of pay items in payroll settings to include the Deputy Syntax.
After FY, I decided to pay Xero to start afresh in July so I can have a complete FY report.
When lodging PAYG Summaries to the ATO directly from Xero does Xero provide a lodgement confirmation receipt/report?
Is there a way I can add the employee to my payroll in Xero with his actual address and details?
I hope someone to assist, my payment summaries are not balancing with the payroll report, on occasion I have overriden the amount of tax in most cases just $1.
Hi,Does anyone know of a way to separate out different wage categories in payroll and, subsequently, P&L.
I need to transfer these amounts to wages expense however there is no way to do a manual journal against this account.
Hi,just wondering what is the best way to reverse payroll so that the full year amount can be entered as dividends instead please
But in the client accounts there is no such payment made to the employee which amounts to paying up FBT.
I can create the leave code and add it to the pay templates just not sure what is the best way to achieve the hours setting.
I know we could purchase add ons for roosters but our current process is working we are just trying to improve our systems.
If I set up a payroll etc, does Xero talk to my bank account and actually send the funds to the employee?
Hi, I'm a fairly novice user of Xero and would like some assistance in correcting the Annual Leave accrued in Payroll.
Hi, does anyone know of any Human Resource Management Information (HRMIS)  add- ons  or  any companies that provide   Human Resource Management Information (HRMIS) that are compatible with Xero payroll?
Hi does anyone know the best way to process Paid Parental Leave in Xero?
I've worked out the amounts owing to the employees but would like to know the correct way how to process the adjustment.
Please don't tell me that I have to run unscheduled pay runs for all of these instances, and in the process full out timesheets to add into these pay runs?
I then have to sort into Departments and total the net pay per department so that it can be paid out of the corresponding bank account.
And instead of one report which gave all the necessary information to the person actually making the payments, now she has to be sent the two different reports as my manually edited Payroll Employee Summary Report does not contain bank account details as often there are new employees each week being paid.
Please re-instate the Bank Payment Report in it's original format.
I have posted a pay run for the previous fortnight, the payment date set one day in advance of the current date and when I click on the button for Pay Run Options, the option to 'create draft invoice' is missing.
I am just wondering, what are the steps that I need to do to record this in Xero?
Hi teamCan you please advise whether we need to:> Do a monthly accrual journal for the employer kiwisaver contribution (say 3%) on top of the monthly holiday pay accrual journalMany thanksBharat
Hi all, Does anyone out there have any experience with Shearing business, who pay their employees in advance?
If you send an email to an employee with the PAYG Summary - where does the email bounce back to if the employee has closed the account/account full?
The Xero generated Pay run bill does not reconcile to the associated unscheduled pay run.
Clearly I need to get this organized for end of year payment summaries so any suggestions will be welcome.
Hi guysJust wondering how does one breakout the monthly accrual for all employees in $$ amounts.
do i need to contact Xero to add?
I have just converted over to XERO from MYOB, so this is the first pay period I have created.
Is there a report that shows how much super is still owing (after the payment I just made)?
HiI am just wondering if there is a way to have the pay run invoices go to Wages Payable rather than Accounts Payable.
Hi,We just started using Xero (AU) and can't seem to get the PAYG tax rate to be included in the pay run.
)2) How can I create an pay run without any hours assigned to it or at least that no line relating to hours and hourly rates appears on a pay slip - the concept simply does not apply in my case.
HI,Does anyone know how to apply a  super salary sacrifice in Xero?
When I run a general ledger in accrual vs. cash basis, I see some discrepancies with some of the pay run generated transactions.
How then do I make the entry so I can reconcile the transactions in my xero business checking account feed?
The only way I know how is to have them use Xero's timesheets and then adjust their rate at the payrun to to make sure they have consistent paycheck.
We will need to be able to somehow get the information from QB into Xero but not sure if there is way to do this via export?
As far as I can tell, there is no way for me to allocate a payment to the accounts payable account.
The issue is that Xero is splitting the single payment into multiple transactions.
Is there a way to match a single payment coming from a bank feed to multiple entries in the Xero checking account register?
Is there a way to set up Xero so that when I make a tax payment is posts as a single tax payment debit to the checking account while crediting multiple payments in my liability account?
even though Xero shows these in my bank register when I download my bank transactions.
And now there is no way for me to undo the Unscheduled Pay Runs that I ran, so I really don't know what to do.
I've just sat down to do the pensions and I've found that the "Pension Filling Report" does not show the Employer Contributions .
Just ran our first Xero payroll and all good other than pension submission error (Peoples Pension)- 1st month of Xero payroll (previously Kashflow)- Payroll ran without issue- RTI submission OK- Pension submission rejected - employee ID errors, gender set wrong- 1 error on single employee - "The auto enrolment status for this worker is invalid.
I have changed the account for both of these to another account I know works, I just can't get these two sorted out.
Trawled through hours of videos, community forums and online help - even phoned the bank - to establish how to make a payment to the employees!
Does HSBC Internet Banking and Xero seamlessly talk to one another and pay the employees?
Please, if anyone can help - timely response hugely appreciated - payroll normally uploaded to the bank tomorrowSorry to sound like a Dunce!
I gather that Xero notifies HMRC of my PAYE responsibility each month when I do a pay run (within Xero).
My question is where within Xero can I find out how much I need to pay each quarter?
2) 'Gross for NICs' - does this mean both employer and employee NICs or just employee NICs?
Does anyone know of anyone that does this?
I'd like to pay her pension which she is entitled to, but I can't wrangle Xero in to doing it manually.
Until today i was using both i mean, i run the payroll in 15 of each month so what i run this on xero i also do in in same date on Basic PAYE Tools , toady i made the payment of salary using just xero, do i need to submit this using Basic PAYE Tools?
In simple words if I pay 800 pounds as director's remuneration the report in Xero shows 1600 pounds paid in August and there is no way to merge the two transactions.
I cannot see any way of completing this process correctly without messing up staff's pay, if anyone has done this please help!
It was posted by Xero on the first pay day of this tax year and does not correspond to any figures on the P32 summary.
Hi guysWe've just started using Xero for payroll, this is just our 2nd month.
the xero its show me the transactions but i do not know how i record those transaction 910 salary and 77 nino plus taxcan someone help me?
the xero its show me the transactions but i do not know how i record those transaction 910 salary and 77 nino plus taxcan someone help me?
When I then view my pay run for the period 1st August to 31st August (which would include a final payment to the employee) the employee does not appear in the Employee list for that pay run period.
It's incredibly frustrating that:1)  There is no obvious choice to help with this on the "Options" button in the Pay Run screen;2) This is not covered in the training videos.
Hi Xero - would it be possible to close or archive old payroll calenders so for e. g. in this case weekly staff will now be paid monthly so we need to just take off the weekly payroll from the payrun options to save it being selected in error?
Hi,Does anyone understand how to set up a basic pay template.
HiDoes anyone have a way to add a bonus payment which will not be subject to Pension Deductions (EE's and ER's contribution) calculated as a % of gross pay ?
Does Xero do this yet in a best practice way Shane
If I tick the box 'include leave available to take in advance' it seems to give a balance of hours that does not match the holiday pay monetary amount owing.
Hi, Is there a way I can remove old/archived employees from the 'Employee Pay Run Summary' Report.
Is there a way around this without them having to create a new email just for xero?
Hi There, We did our first pay run with Xero on Wednesday.
Can Xero account the salary expense in the period the payroll covers up to instead of the payment period.
I would like to have the pay runs set up so that every week I can put in the hours worked for the week.
Hi, I was just wondering how we are expected to handle 8% holiday pay for employees in Xero Payroll?
00. and then for it to propagate automatically any tips, help?
not sure how xero records annual leave, should we add it manually in the balance fields, or need to do some journal entry?
Hi,This is my first payroll pay run with Xero.
Upload scanned or PDF invoices into your Xero account in seconds.
Perform lots of time saving actions like creating an invoice in Xero from an Infusionsoft invoice, check out .
Integrate Xero and PayPal with Zapier - create invoices in Xero from sales in PayPal, create contacts in Xero from PayPal transactions, check out .
Xero is expensive so I don't want to create new Xero accounts on a whim.
Does anyone use any specific add-ons that increase productivity while coding transactions?
Hi There,Does anyone know of a recurring job scheduling add on for Xero.
Hi there, I need app for invoices, any suggestion?
Ideally I'm looking for a 1 page report like  Is there any way or any add-on app that can give me useful reports like: * No of Customers* Net revenue* Net profit* Lifetime Customer Value* Cost of Goods* Fixed Costs* Margin* Customer Acquisition Cost* Profitability per productI've looked at apps like crunch boards/futrli, fathom etc but again these all seem financially focussed rather than strategy focussed.
What I'm trying to do is allow my clients to use my Square account to pay their invoices online.
Does anybody know of any tricks within Xero or an add-on for Xero which would enable these two items of functionality?
Does anybody know of any add-ons which would help me in with this issue?
Does anyone know of any add-ons that could help?
Does anyone know of an App that will allow me to raise invoices in a foreign language?
Does anyone know how I can make this work in the used car trade where we only pay tax on the margin?
Hi All,We have created a software tool which can be used to take payment for Xero invoices via WorldPay.
Does anyone know a Xero add-on which they can use to track attendance and then raise monthly invoices?
Good day everyoneWe have on boarded a large Bar/Restaurant group that use Xero for their back office accounting, Ikentoo for their POS and a stock control system called Opsimize to place orders, and keep track of recipes and stock usage from sales sent to it by IkentooThe issue they are having is that none of the information in Ikentoo or Opsimize integrates into Xero so a lot of manual journals are having to be processedCurrently in Opsimise they have all the food and beverage recipes eg Burger = Roll, patty, tomato, lettuceIkentoo sends the sales information of 10 x Burgers sold and Opsimize reduces the stock levelsThe client would ideally want to use a system that she can track all the inventory PO's, GRNS and Supplier invoices in one place but still have the stock management controller able to get the detailed stock reports and levels that they get from OpsimizeI have had a look at the app marketplace but i'm not sure what option to suggest to themPlease can you assist me with the above or point me in the right direction to find out which way to go and also find a company that would help to set it upMany Thanks
3) Can MS Access email an invoice directly to Xero and again when paid to tell Xero that the invoice has been paid (with other details like Invoice Number, Date Created, Amount Due, Paid / Not Paid, Payment Date)If we can help it we would prefer not to swap out the MS Access system but need a solution to the issue of Xero being able to have details of what has been ordered and when it is paid.
I have been in touch with receipt bank but I am not sure if this would work for us and I just need some helpful advice.
However, I don't then know how to properly reconcile the cheque in the bank rec screen when the payment appears in xero.
HiI would like to know if there is anybody who has come across a Xero add on app that will suite a tyre fitment company.
Hello,i am an accountant and looking to set up their woo-commerce store with Xero for the accounting and now i need to know what inventory system i can use outside of Xero as they will soon have more than 4000 tracked inventory items which is the max that Xero can handle.
I have picked Xero as my accounts package, Shopify as my online solution and i am wondering if i can run my business on just that or if i need a inventory app also.
Hi there,I have a client that is currently using Xero for the day to day accounts preparation.
Hi There, Can any one suggest an Add-on to help with the following scenario?
The ZAP that will not work, for some reason, is the trigger back from Xero to let Pipedrive know when a invoice is paid.
This way the systems know what invoice/deal they are talking about.
Hi there,  For a locksmith business I'm after a Xero add-on that does job sheets.
Is there a simple way to add this to our invoices?
Just new to Xero - as a small not for profit, I really need a simple CHEAP reporting app so that I can get budgets, actuals and tracking details on the same report, with the ability to group accounts.
How do I allocate part of this transaction to the invoice but still allocate the total value of the iZettle Card payment account in Xero?
Does Xero or any of it's add-ons?
I then post the invoices to update customer accounts / StockIf anyone can recommend an addon (Hopefully without me having to go through the numerous addon trials, your help would be much appreciated
If you can help for this, we are happy to pay your service.
A few days later, the payment arrives in my bank account and appears on the bank statement of that month.
Any way to get each "payment" to open an invoice.
Is there any way to modify the title of the imported bill/expense report in Xero to give a more user-friendly reference code?
Ideally I would like to set this reference to reflect the title of the report in Expensify in some way.
Does anyone know of an add on that would do this on closed invoices?
1) Create a Sales Returns account in the chart of accounts and assign the chargebacks  (with a negative balance) to that account?
Xero invoice shows as paid, but no payments are showing in my Stripe account.
Hi Everyone,Does anyone know an add on suitable for a self storage business.
Hi, I'm wondering if someone can recommend an add-on that will make EFT deposits to independent contractors bank accounts in lieu of payroll deposits?
Also can I setup duoplane so that it recognises which method of payment a customer has used and pays the invoice from the relevant bank account.
Hi, just wondering if anyone knows of a Xero add-on that can keep track of commissions received per client from various institutions.
We need an Add-on where you can allocate both sales invoices and expenses (payments) to specific jobs in Xero.
A sales invoice is raised to Mr Jones for &#163;120, and a bank payment is processed to Mrs Smith for &#163;100.
Thus you create invoices in Quickbooks or Xero, run the payment via Square and 'pay' the invoice in QB/Xero.
Provide an integration mode that uses transactions instead of an invoice (support both and let us choose).
Hi there,Is there any add-ons for xero to produce report in multi currency?
What is the best way to post the (cash) payment of purchase invoices?
Now, you do not need to waste your valuable time in entering sales data manually to your Xero account.
The Square integration creates its own invoice and I have no idea how to apply the payment to the invoice I generate for a customer.
For example:- Look at all sales invoices in Xero- Determine relevant invoices based on a set of criteria (ie date, customer, etc etc)- Generate a purchase invoice from supplier X for say 60% of each of the invoices identified in the step above, with a specified expense line, tracking category etc.
Eway deposits funds into our merchant account daily and we deposit funds manually into our account from Pay Pal.
The only solution I can think of is to run a monthly report in Shopify to work out the orders from overseas customers, and then do a manual journal entry in Xero to make an adjustment to the sales & GST accounts at the end of the month.
Can anybody help us out with some suggestions on add on for Xero that would help us with thisThanksRon JansonsSenior Finance / Projects OfficerCCCA
Does anyone know of a suitable add on  product that can help her?
I would like help understanding how DEAR and XERO interact with each other regarding the receipt of inventory and therefore the timing.
Does anyone know off a add on i can use in xero to produce professional financial statements?
I'd like Xero to be able to recognise a receipt from a customer, look up the introducer in the purchase ledger, and automatically create a purchase invoice for 10% of the receipt in that introducer's account which will then be paid at the end of the month.
I'd just like some insight on how other users had used Xero in the hotel industry?
com/products/xero/What we need to do / would like to do, is to import all the historical orders from October - June into Xero.
HiDoes anyone know of an add on that will generate sales invoices for a Nursing home including fields such as date of birth, name, room number, dates of stay,  etc that can easily be exported into XERO.
How then do we reconcile the bank line items since there won't be PO's in XERO, and just the manual journals from StitchLabs?
I know Xero does not do this currently but does anyone know an add on that may do different currenies on each line of a single invoice.
Hi just wondering if employees can upload their receipts using receipt bank paid with personal funds to create an expense claim for reimbursement?
Does anyone know of an add on that can calculate:Wage %  (cost of wages expressed as a % of sales)Liquor %  (cost of liquor expressed as a % of sales)As I am a Xero noob any help would be greatly appreciated!
Hello all,We have a client who runs a garage and are looking to move them to Xero, however, their current system allows them to raise invoices to insurance companies for jobs done together with a credit note for the excess and VAT while simultaneously invoicing the customer for this portion with just one entry of data, just checking to see if anyone knows of an add-on that would be able to facilitate this or if it would all need to be done manually if on Xero?
Do you have any literature that details the integration and what specifically is pulled through (i. e. only income or expense a/cs) if it is expense a/cs is there a need for me to manually add invoices for direct costs to Xero or does this pull through in some type of invoice that I can update/add to?
Also there is an option that I can allocate a payment to an 'account' on Kounta and by the looks of things this goes through to account receivables on Xero - does this kind of straight through processing  exist?
Hi,Does anyone know how to input returned stock in Vend.
Hi, that's what a xero representative wrote "you will need to create manual journals to move the funds from the default Sales Tax account to this different account you created" I don't like the word "manual" which service or add on automates that, please?
Hi all can anyone recommend an add-on that does automated calculation and payment of NSW Payroll Tax.
Is there an add-on that will also automatically backup the documents attached to transactions in Xero?
It comes up with an error message "Xero can't process the invoice/payment as the line item total of X doesn't match the expected line item total of Y".
Ideally the software would also have a feature so I can allocate the report to our chart of accounts.
com/add-ons  Our new app is beautifully seamlessly linked to Xero and will proactively alert you to potential bad debts and offer full account receivable services on the “click of a button “I will give all beta testers a free unlimited seat subscription to our add-on for helping us with the beta test and send them a bottle of something tasty If you’re interested, please email me on contact@oneclickapplications.
com/add-ons  Our new app is beautifully seamlessly linked to Xero and will proactively alert you to potential bad debts and offer full account receivable services on the “click of a button “I will give all beta testers a free unlimited seat subscription to our add-on for helping us with the beta test and send them a bottle of something tasty If you’re interested, please email me on contact@oneclickapplications.
Does there exist a car mountable GPS tracking add-on for Xero or WorkFlowMax?
please can someone help you it needs to look like thisemailcustomer phoneaddressit only shows the email and nothing else!
I would really like a system to handle different pricing for every product that we sell as each customer has their own pricing, also would like to see adhoc reports that can forecast what needs to purchased in case the inventory is low, What is being sold more that we probably need to keep of stock.
Are there any add-ons for xero  so I can import all my bank statements on day one of setting up xero?
Looking for an add on for Xero that can do the following:- generate a quote form that can then be published across multiple websites- push quote request through to Xero- generate quote with multiple pricing options- maintain a conversation track with the client about the quote- one click approval from clientHad a look at Quotient, it seems to do everything except my first need.
Apart from this, creating sales invoices, then reversing them via a credit note to remove the transaction from their accounts would be unfeasible.
Can anyone identify a 3rd party database invoicing sub-application that could capture cutomer, job, cost ,etc information to create these invoices (on behalf of) and then import a separate summary invoice into Xero for management services.
I know that Harvest has a retainer invoice option, but it doesn't send those invoices to Xero, so I can't use that feature.
Hi Xero usersWe're thinking of developing a new add on for Xero that supercharges emails, including HTML emails, unlimited templates with images, automatic emails and tracking.
Can someone please let me know if this is possible with Xero's add-ons?
Is anyone aware of a Xero Add On that integrates Daily Taking Sheets into Xero.
I can't forsee anyway of doing this in Xero, so hoping someone is aware of ideally a xero add on, or any program that we can use to manage this?
They want to speak to a business (does not need to be in the same field) who has made the shift from the MYOB POS software to Vend or similar software, just to be able to ask more specific questions in relation to the software and how the move has affected the business etc.
Anyway, if I were to use an add-on such as Geoop and create and invoice from there and take payment or part-payment onsite/through Geoop, how can I then reconcile the amount of the transaction that has been marked paid in Xero?
Hi there,What information do I need to work out whether a 3rd party software will link into Xero?
Hi there,Does anyone know a Xero add on which can manage fixed asset leases?
Or is there a solution in Xero whereby a CSV or Excel file can be directly uplaoded to Xero to populate invoices?
Hi there,I'm just in the process of setting up Xero for my business, I'm looking for an add on that will help me with Asset Tracking.
Can anyone advise how to import my customer details from batchbook into Xero so there is no need to add them manually?
My Question is:Is there a way to create another "Invoice" Line, as i can only seem to create the 1. also Is there a way to add another Tracking option, as that also seems to be locked at 1This may be a Zapier issue, i am unsure which set of developers are responsible for the templates.
I would like to utilize this opportunity to know if there is any value in having an EDI Integration add-on for such customers.
HiCan someone please help me with how does SimPro and Xero communicate - just had a couple of clients of Simpro call and want to setup with Xero and I could use some advice
Is there anyone out there using a combination of Xero and WorkflowMax, who is also using Receipt Bank (RB) as an add on (to either Xero or WFM) that could help me with their experiences?
Any tips or tricks I need to know?
Any invoices issued in the 'add on' software would need to be pushed through to our chart of accounts.
Hi, does anyone know an add-on that has this build in.
Hi there, I know there are a few ways of integrating Xero and Magento - can anyone share their experience about which way has worked best for them?
My requirement is just to manage sending Tickets to Xero including any payment information.
we need to have a simple add-on which enables us to compare our quotations costs for a job against the received invoices received from suppliers and contractors without double entry to our Xero accounts.
I notice that XERO is now automatically prefilling what they think the account code should be on sales invoices.
Xero response is to export to excel and sort, this request is not only related to how Xero reports, the whole way Xero shows employees is in first name order, which seriously, is ridiculous.
Already finding it slow and not streamlined to carry out basic functions:Entering supplier invoices- Date does not work i. e 01022017 comes out as 02 Feb 17 - or 31032017 comes out as today's date - Both my profile and my computer are set to the UK.
I would like to ask why a customers over payment can not be left as a credit on their account.
But when accessing through Google Chrome into Xero, I also have the same issue but this time it showed javascript:Please urgently assist as I need to run my Xero reports.
I can see only a February payment made but I need to get receipts for all 2016 and 2017.
Is there any way to automate the system so over New Year’s eve the invoices are sent later that just after midnight?
Attempting to load any of my bank accounts transactions times out every time?
We are continuously baffled at how this Organisation continues to promote itself, when you only need to look at how the users of this Software feel, and you get a complete opposite resultWho would you believeOh yes we continue to see the Office Parties, the Global Xerocons, Cons is rightUsers just want an efficient, fast, workable, usable, accounting SystemInterestingly seeing more and more Users asking for Credits on Subscriptions
Hi,Can i change the auto log off set up for my XERO account?
Without any Xero support, is there a way it can be forced to bring in bank transactions?
If I promote Xero as a cloud accounting solution to my clients and prospects, why can't I re-sit the certification exam or collect education credits to remain certified, in the same way that a partner does?
This will prove to the market that if Xero can use Xero for itself (including Multi-subsidiary consolidation) with the help from a handful of add-ons from the Marketplace, that any lots of large companies can use Xero as well.
Hi i was just wondering if your going to put a calendar with xero, currently I'm using google calendar and there are plenty of accounting software with calendars , just wondering why xero doesn't have one ?
I've quadruple checked the numbers, amounts, transactions to make sure the are accurate and still just can not get things to add up.
Hi,I have not received any bank feeds over night on any of my accounts.
Hi there, Could you please let me know if there is any way to get in touch with your support team other than email?
Could you please let me know if there's a way to contact you urgently as the email support is always a real let down if you don't receive the answer you need the first go around.
For example, how do you go about deciding that Apple watch functionality needs to be prioritized over something like getting rid of the ugliness of archived accounts appearing in account dropdown menus?
Or is there a way to edit the invoice template so all invoices appear as sent?
This is more of a question - if you are a company and pay a subscription but work with Xero with your accountant, is it only your accountant that can access help from Xero?
If this is the case, my request is, as a paying customer I would like access to help.
Xero does not have any good support notes to assist in the customisation in MS Word except to say "You should be experienced using tables and field codes in Word, or can get help with these - online or from someone in your organisation.
If you're able to log into Xero with the Subscriber's account, you can transfer the subscription within My Xero.
Hi, what seems to be minor bug (I'm on Chrome) using the 'Adjustment' feature when reconciling transactions.
The returned file is almost complete - the only thing we had to do was add bank details, check account balances (all good); set up the invoices and we're ready to go.
When viewing a contact there should be the ability to "add new quote" just as you can with an invoice.
Is there a way we can increase the session timeout, even if we're just using a trial account?
I just moved to xero and I'm disappointed there is no way to over ride the GST amount.
Xero is a delight to use and I'm pretty confident that once we have a month of transactions recorded, Xero is going to save me a LOT of time.
Hi Guys,I've noticed so much negativity through this forum and just wanted to let everyone at Xero know how great they are and how much I appreciate all the good work they have done with all the feature updates.
Xero does care and they work their butts off to help their clients and do a great job!
I might be confusing tasks, terms/words, or maybe Xero just can't do what I need done.
Instead of sitting in my office and grudgingly working away on the weekend as I used to do, I can lie on the couch in front of the fire and do all our bank recs and pay all our bills, and it feels like fun instead of yet another weekend chore I have to face.
It is far too hard to turn back our accounts and head back to MYOB, but I would like to know what XERO is going to do about this?
